ACT I.
SCENE I.
Truly, sir, in respect of a fine workman, I am
    but, as you would say, a cobbler.
A trade, sir, that, I hope, I may use with a safe
    conscience, which is indeed, sir, a mender of bad soles.
Nay, I beseech you, sir, be not out with me; yet,
    if you be out, sir, I can mend you.
Truly, Sir, all that I live by is with the awl; I
    meddle with no tradesman's matters, nor women's matters, but with
    awl.
I am indeed, sir, a surgeon to old shoes; when they are in
    great danger, I recover them.
Go you down that way towards the Capitol;
    This way will I.
I'll about
    And drive away the vulgar from the streets;
    So do you too, where you perceive them thick.
I shall remember.
I hear a tongue, shriller than all the music,
    Cry "Caesar.
Not I.
I pray you, do.
I am not gamesome; I do lack some part
    Of that quick spirit that is in Antony.
Let me not hinder, Cassius, your desires;
    I'll leave you.
Brutus, I do observe you now of late;
    I have not from your eyes that gentleness
    And show of love as I was wont to have;
    You bear too stubborn and too strange a hand
    Over your friend that loves you.
Cassius,
    Be not deceived; if I have veil'd my look,
    I turn the trouble of my countenance
    Merely upon myself.
Vexed I am
    Of late with passions of some difference,
    Conceptions only proper to myself,
    Which give some soil perhaps to my behaviors;
    But let not therefore my good friends be grieved-
    Among which number, Cassius, be you one-
    Nor construe any further my neglect
    Than that poor Brutus with himself at war
    Forgets the shows of love to other men.
Then, Brutus, I have much mistook your passion,  
    By means whereof this breast of mine hath buried
    Thoughts of great value, worthy cogitations.
I have heard
    Where many of the best respect in Rome,
    Except immortal Caesar, speaking of Brutus
    And groaning underneath this age's yoke,
    Have wish'd that noble Brutus had his eyes.
Therefore, good Brutus, be prepared to hear,
    And since you know you cannot see yourself
    So well as by reflection, I your glass  
    Will modestly discover to yourself
    That of yourself which you yet know not of.
And be not jealous on me, gentle Brutus;
    Were I a common laugher, or did use
    To stale with ordinary oaths my love
    To every new protester, if you know
    That I do fawn on men and hug them hard
    And after scandal them, or if you know
    That I profess myself in banqueting
    To all the rout, then hold me dangerous.
I do fear the people
    Choose Caesar for their king.
Then must I think you would not have it so.
I would not, Cassius, yet I love him well.
If it be aught toward the general good,
    Set honor in one eye and death i' the other  
    And I will look on both indifferently.
For let the gods so speed me as I love
    The name of honor more than I fear death.
I know that virtue to be in you, Brutus,
    As well as I do know your outward favor.
I cannot tell what you and other men
    Think of this life, but, for my single self,
    I had as lief not be as live to be
    In awe of such a thing as I myself.
I was born free as Caesar, so were you;
    We both have fed as well, and we can both
    Endure the winter's cold as well as he.
" Upon the word,
    Accoutred as I was, I plunged in
    And bade him follow.
But ere we could arrive the point proposed,
    Caesar cried, "Help me, Cassius, or I sink!
I, as Aeneas our great ancestor
    Did from the flames of Troy upon his shoulder
    The old Anchises bear, so from the waves of Tiber
    Did I the tired Caesar.
He had a fever when he was in Spain,
    And when the fit was on him I did mark
    How he did shake.
I did hear him groan.
I do believe that these applauses are
    For some new honors that are heap'd on Caesar.
O, you and I have heard our fathers say
    There was a Brutus once that would have brook'd
    The eternal devil to keep his state in Rome
    As easily as a king.
That you do love me, I am nothing jealous;
    What you would work me to, I have some aim.
How I have thought of this and of these times,
    I shall recount hereafter; for this present,
    I would not, so with love I might entreat you,  
    Be any further moved.
What you have said
    I will consider; what you have to say
    I will with patience hear, and find a time
    Both meet to hear and answer such high things.
I am glad that my weak words
    Have struck but thus much show of fire from Brutus.
I will do so.
But I fear him not,
    Yet if my name were liable to fear,
    I do not know the man I should avoid
    So soon as that spare Cassius.
I rather tell thee what is to be fear'd
    Than what I fear, for always I am Caesar.
I should not then ask Casca what had chanced.
I can as well be hang'd as tell the manner of it.
It was
    mere foolery; I did not mark it.
I saw Mark Antony offer him a
    crown (yet 'twas not a crown neither, 'twas one of these
    coronets) and, as I told you, he put it by once.
And
    for mine own part, I durst not laugh for fear of opening my lips
    and receiving the bad air.
But, soft, I pray you, what, did Caesars wound?
No, Caesar hath it not, but you, and I,
    And honest Casca, we have the falling sickness.
I know not what you mean by that, but I am sure Caesar fell
    down.
If the tagrag people did not clap him and hiss him
    according as he pleased and displeased them, as they use to do
    the players in the theatre, I am no true man.
An had been a man of any
    occupation, if I would not have taken him at a word, I would I  
    might go to hell among the rogues.
Three or
    four wenches where I stood cried, "Alas, good soul!
Nay, an I tell you that, I'll ne'er look you i' the face
    again; but those that understood him smiled at one another and
    shook their heads; but for mine own part, it was Greek to me.
I
    could tell you more news too: Marullus and Flavius, for pulling
    scarfs off Caesar's images, are put to silence.
No, I am promised forth.
Ay, if I be alive, and your mind hold, and your dinner worth
    the eating.
Good, I will expect you.
For this time I will leave you.
Tomorrow, if you please to speak with me,
    I will come home to you, or, if you will,
    Come home to me and I will wait for you.
I will do so.
Well, Brutus, thou art noble; yet, I see  
    Thy honorable mettle may be wrought
    From that it is disposed; therefore it is meet
    That noble minds keep ever with their likes;
    For who so firm that cannot be seduced?
If I were Brutus now and he were Cassius,
    He should not humor me.
I will this night,
    In several hands, in at his windows throw,
    As if they came from several citizens,
    Writings, all tending to the great opinion
    That Rome holds of his name, wherein obscurely
    Caesar's ambition shall be glanced at.
O Cicero,
    I have seen tempests when the scolding winds
    Have rived the knotty oaks, and I have seen
    The ambitious ocean swell and rage and foam
    To be exalted with the threatening clouds,
    But never till tonight, never till now,
    Did I go through a tempest dropping fire.
Besides- I ha' not since put up my sword-
    Against the Capitol I met a lion,
    Who glaz'd upon me and went surly by
    Without annoying me.
When these prodigies
    Do so conjointly meet, let not men say
    "These are their reasons; they are natural":
    For I believe they are portentous things
    Unto the climate that they point upon.
For my part, I have walk'd about the streets,
    Submitting me unto the perilous night,
    And thus unbraced, Casca, as you see,
    Have bared my bosom to the thunderstone;
    And when the cross blue lightning seem'd to open  
    The breast of heaven, I did present myself
    Even in the aim and very flash of it.
Now could I, Casca, name to thee a man
    Most like this dreadful night,
    That thunders, lightens, opens graves, and roars
    As doth the lion in the Capitol,
    A man no mightier than thyself or me
    In personal action, yet prodigious grown
    And fearful, as these strange eruptions are.
I know where I will wear this dagger then:
    Cassius from bondage will deliver Cassius.
If I know this, know all the world besides,
    That part of tyranny that I do bear
    I can shake off at pleasure.
So can I.
I know he would not be a wolf
    But that he sees the Romans are but sheep.
I perhaps speak this
    Before a willing bondman; then I know
    My answer must be made.
But I am arm'd,
    And dangers are to me indifferent.
Be factious for redress of all these griefs,
    And I will set this foot of mine as far
    As who goes farthest.
Now know you, Casca, I have moved already
    Some certain of the noblest-minded Romans
    To undergo with me an enterprise
    Of honorable-dangerous consequence;
    And I do know by this, they stay for me
    In Pompey's Porch.
'Tis Cinna, I do know him by his gait;
    He is a friend.
Am I not stay'd for, Cinna?
I am glad on't.
Am I not stay'd for?
Well, I will hie
    And so bestow these papers as you bade me.
Come, Casca, you and I will yet ere day
    See Brutus at his house.
SCENE I.
I cannot, by the progress of the stars,
    Give guess how near to day.
Lucius, I say!
I would it were my fault to sleep so soundly.
Awake, I say!
I will, my lord.
It must be by his death, and, for my part,
    I know no personal cause to spurn at him,
    But for the general.
Crown him that,  
    And then, I grant, we put a sting in him
    That at his will he may do danger with.
The abuse of greatness is when it disjoins
    Remorse from power, and, to speak truth of Caesar,
    I have not known when his affections sway'd
    More than his reason.
Searching the window for a flint I found
    This paper thus seal'd up, and I am sure
    It did not lie there when I went to bed.
I know not, sir.
I will, sir.
The exhalations whizzing in the air
    Give so much light that I may read by them.
"
    Such instigations have been often dropp'd  
    Where I have took them up.
" Thus must I piece it out.
" Am I entreated
    To speak and strike?
O Rome, I make thee promise,
    If the redress will follow, thou receivest
    Thy full petition at the hand of Brutus!
Since Cassius first did whet me against Caesar
    I have not slept.
No, sir, their hats are pluck'd about their ears,
    And half their faces buried in their cloaks,
    That by no means I may discover them
    By any mark of favor.
I think we are too bold upon your rest.
I have been up this hour, awake all night.
Know I these men that come along with you?
Shall I entreat a word?
Here, as I point my sword, the sun arises,
    Which is a great way growing on the south,
    Weighing the youthful season of the year.
But if these,
    As I am sure they do, bear fire enough
    To kindle cowards and to steel with valor
    The melting spirits of women, then, countrymen,
    What need we any spur but our own cause
    To prick us to redress?
I think he will stand very strong with us.
I think it is not meet
    Mark Antony, so well beloved of Caesar,
    Should outlive Caesar.
Yet I fear him,
    For in the ingrated love he bears to Caesar-
  BRUTUS.
If he be so resolved,
    I can o'ersway him, for he loves to hear
    That unicorns may be betray'd with trees,
    And bears with glasses, elephants with holes,
    Lions with toils, and men with flatterers;
    But when I tell him he hates flatterers,  
    He says he does, being then most flattered.
Let me work;
    For I can give his humor the true bent,
    And I will bring him to the Capitol.
I wonder none of you have thought of him.
He loves me well, and I have given him reasons;
    Send him but hither, and I'll fashion him.
have ungently, Brutus,
    Stole from my bed; and yesternight at supper
    You suddenly arose and walk'd about,
    Musing and sighing, with your arms across;
    And when I ask'd you what the matter was,
    You stared upon me with ungentle looks.
I urged you further; then you scratch'd your head,
    And too impatiently stamp'd with your foot.
Yet I insisted, yet you answer'd not,
    But with an angry waiter of your hand
    Gave sign for me to leave you.
So I did,
    Fearing to strengthen that impatience
    Which seem'd too much enkindled, and withal
    Hoping it was but an effect of humor,
    Which sometime hath his hour with every man.
It will not let you eat, nor talk, nor sleep,
    And, could it work so much upon your shape
    As it hath much prevail'd on your condition,
    I should not know you, Brutus.
I am not well in health, and that is all.
Why, so I do.
No, my Brutus,
    You have some sick offense within your mind,
    Which by the right and virtue of my place
    I ought to know of; and, upon my knees,
    I charm you, by my once commended beauty,
    By all your vows of love and that great vow
    Which did incorporate and make us one,
    That you unfold to me, yourself, your half,
    Why you are heavy and what men tonight
    Have had resort to you; for here have been
    Some six or seven, who did hide their faces
    Even from darkness.
I should not need, if you were gentle Brutus.
Within the bond of marriage, tell me, Brutus,
    Is it excepted I should know no secrets  
    That appertain to you?
Am I yourself
    But, as it were, in sort or limitation,
    To keep with you at meals, comfort your bed,
    And talk to you sometimes?
Dwell I but in the suburbs
    Of your good pleasure?
If this were true, then should I know this secret.
I grant I am a woman, but withal
    A woman that Lord Brutus took to wife.
I grant I am a woman, but withal
    A woman well reputed, Cato's daughter.
Think you I am no stronger than my sex,
    Being so father'd and so husbanded?
Tell me your counsels, I will not disclose 'em.
I have made strong proof of my constancy,
    Giving myself a voluntary wound
    Here in the thigh.
Can I bear that with patience  
    And not my husband's secrets?
All my engagements I will construe to thee,
    All the charactery of my sad brows.
I am not sick, if Brutus have in hand
    Any exploit worthy the name of honor.
Such an exploit have I in hand, Ligarius,
    Had you a healthful ear to hear of it.
By all the gods that Romans bow before,
    I here discard my sickness!
Now bid me run,
    And I will strive with things impossible,
    Yea, get the better of them.
What it is, my Caius,
    I shall unfold to thee, as we are going
    To whom it must be done.
Set on your foot,
    And with a heart new-fired I follow you,
    To do I know not what; but it sufficeth
    That Brutus leads me on.
I will, my lord.
Caesar, I I stood on ceremonies,
    Yet now they fright me.
These things are beyond all use,
    And I do fear them.
Of all the wonders that I yet have heard,
    It seems to me most strange that men should fear
    Seeing that death, a necessary end,
    Will come when it will come.
We are two lions litter'd in one day,  
    And I the elder and more terrible.
Mark Antony shall say I am not well,
    And, for thy humor, I will stay at home.
I come to fetch you to the Senate House.
And you are come in very happy time
    To bear my greeting to the senators
    And tell them that I will not come today.
Cannot, is false, and that I dare not, falser:
    I will not come today.
Have I in conquest stretch'd mine arm so far
    To be afeard to tell greybeards the truth?
Most mighty Caesar, let me know some cause,
    Lest I be laugh'd at when I tell them so.
The cause is in my will: I will not come,
    That is enough to satisfy the Senate.
But, for your private satisfaction,
    Because I love you, I will let you know.
And these does she apply for warnings and portents
    And evils imminent, and on her knee  
    Hath begg'd that I will stay at home today.
I have, when you have heard what I can say.
I am ashamed I did yield to them.
Give me my robe, for I will go.
I thank you for your pains and courtesy.
I am to blame to be thus waited for.
Now, Cinna; now, Metellus; what, Trebonius,
    I have an hour's talk in store for you;
    Remember that you call on me today;
    Be near me, that I may remember you.
Caesar, I will.
] And so near will I be
    That your best friends shall wish I had been further.
"
    Here will I stand till Caesar pass along,
    And as a suitor will I give him this.
I prithee, boy, run to the Senate House;
    Stay not to answer me, but get thee gone.
I would have had thee there, and here again,
    Ere I can tell thee what thou shouldst do there.
I have a man's mind, but a woman's might.
Madam, what should I do?
I hear none, madam.
I heard a bustling rumor like a fray,
    And the wind brings it from the Capitol.
Sooth, madam, I hear nothing.
I go to take my stand
    To see him pass on to the Capitol.
That I have, lady.
If it will please Caesar
    To be so good to Caesar as to hear me,  
    I shall beseech him to befriend himself.
None that I know will be, much that I fear may chance.
I'll get me to a place more void and there
    Speak to great Caesar as he comes along.
I must go in.
O, I grow faint.
Run, Lucius, and commend me to my lord;
    Say I am merry.
SCENE I.
I wish your enterprise today may thrive.
I fear our purpose is discovered.
If this be known,
    Cassius or Caesar never shall turn back,
    For I will slay myself.
I must prevent thee, Cimber.
Be not fond
    To think that Caesar bears such rebel blood
    That will be thaw'd from the true quality
    With that which melteth fools- I mean sweet words,
    Low-crooked court'sies, and base spaniel-fawning.
If thou dost bend and pray and fawn for him,
    I spurn thee like a cur out of my way.
I kiss thy hand, but not in flattery, Caesar,
    Desiring thee that Publius Cimber may
    Have an immediate freedom of repeal.
I could be well moved, if I were as you;
    If I could pray to move, prayers would move me;
    But I am constant as the northern star,
    Of whose true-fix'd and resting quality
    There is no fellow in the firmament.
So in the world, 'tis furnish'd well with men,
    And men are flesh and blood, and apprehensive;
    Yet in the number I do know but one
    That unassailable holds on his rank,
    Unshaked of motion; and that I am he,
    Let me a little show it, even in this;
    That I was constant Cimber should be banish'd,
    And constant do remain to keep him so.
Say I love Brutus and I honor him;  
    Say I fear'd Caesar, honor'd him, and loved him.
Thy master is a wise and valiant Roman;
    I never thought him worse.
I'll fetch him presently.
I know that we shall have him well to friend.
I wish we may, but yet have I a mind
    That fears him much, and my misgiving still
    Falls shrewdly to the purpose.
I know not, gentlemen, what you intend,
    Who else must be let blood, who else is rank.
If I myself, there is no hour so fit
    As Caesar's death's hour, nor no instrument
    Of half that worth as those your swords, made rich
    With the most noble blood of all this world.
I do beseech ye, if you bear me hard,
    Now, whilst your purpled hands do reek and smoke,
    Fulfill your pleasure.
Live a thousand years,
    I shall not find myself so apt to die;
    No place will please me so, no means of death,
    As here by Caesar, and by you cut off,
    The choice and master spirits of this age.
Only be patient till we have appeased
    The multitude, beside themselves with fear,
    And then we will deliver you the cause
    Why I, that did love Caesar when I struck him,
    Have thus proceeded.
I doubt not of your wisdom.
First, Marcus Brutus, will I shake with you;
    Next, Caius Cassius, do I take your hand;
    Now, Decius Brutus, yours; now yours, Metellus;
    Yours, Cinna; and, my valiant Casca, yours;
    Though last, not least in love, yours, good Trebonius.
Gentlemen all- alas, what shall I say?
That I did love thee, Caesar, O, 'tis true!
Had I as many eyes as thou hast wounds,
    Weeping as fast as they stream forth thy blood,
    It would become me better than to close
    In terms of friendship with thine enemies.
I blame you not for praising Caesar so;
    But what compact mean you to have with us?
Therefore I took your hands, but was indeed
    Sway'd from the point by looking down on Caesar.
Friends am I with you all and love you all,
    Upon this hope that you shall give me reasons
    Why and wherein Caesar was dangerous.
That's all I seek;
    And am moreover suitor that I may
    Produce his body to the marketplace,
    And in the pulpit, as becomes a friend,
    Speak in the order of his funeral.
By your pardon,
    I will myself into the pulpit first,
    And show the reason of our Caesar's death.
What Antony shall speak, I will protest
    He speaks by leave and by permission,  
    And that we are contented Caesar shall
    Have all true rites and lawful ceremonies.
I know not what may fall; I like it not.
And you shall speak
    In the same pulpit whereto I am going,
    After my speech is ended.
Be it so,
    I do desire no more.
O, pardon me, thou bleeding piece of earth,
    That I am meek and gentle with these butchers!
Over thy wounds now do I prophesy
    (Which like dumb mouths do ope their ruby lips
    To beg the voice and utterance of my tongue)
    A curse shall light upon the limbs of men;
    Domestic fury and fierce civil strife
    Shall cumber all the parts of Italy;
    Blood and destruction shall be so in use,
    And dreadful objects so familiar,
    That mothers shall but smile when they behold
    Their infants quarter'd with the hands of war;
    All pity choked with custom of fell deeds,
    And Caesar's spirit ranging for revenge,
    With Ate by his side come hot from hell,
    Shall in these confines with a monarch's voice
    Cry "Havoc!
I do, Mark Antony.
Passion, I see, is catching, for mine eyes,
    Seeing those beads of sorrow stand in thine,
    Began to water.
Yet stay awhile,
    Thou shalt not back till I have borne this corse
    Into the marketplace.
There shall I try,
    In my oration, how the people take
    The cruel issue of these bloody men,  
    According to the which thou shalt discourse
    To young Octavius of the state of things.
I will hear Brutus speak.
I will hear Cassius and compare their reasons,
    When severally we hear them rendered.
If
    there be any in this assembly, any dear friend of Caesar's, to
    him I say that Brutus' love to Caesar was no less than his.
If
    then that friend demand why Brutus rose against Caesar, this is
    my answer: Not that I loved Caesar less, but that I loved Rome
    more.
As Caesar loved me, I
    weep for him; as he was fortunate, I rejoice at it; as he was
    valiant, I honor him; but as he was ambitious, I slew him.
If any, speak, for him have I offended.
If any, speak, for him have I
    offended.
If
    any, speak, for him have I offended.
I pause for a reply.
Then none have I offended.
I have done no more to Caesar
    than you shall do to Brutus.
With this I
    depart- that, as I slew my best lover for the good of Rome, I
    have the same dagger for myself, when it shall please my country
    to need my death.
I do entreat you, not a man depart,
    Save I alone, till Antony have spoke.
For Brutus' sake, I am beholding to you.
I come to bury Caesar, not to praise him.
Here, under leave of Brutus and the rest-
    For Brutus is an honorable man;
    So are they all, all honorable men-
    Come I to speak in Caesar's funeral.
You all did see that on the Lupercal
    I thrice presented him a kingly crown,
    Which he did thrice refuse.
I speak not to disprove what Brutus spoke,
    But here I am to speak what I do know.
Bear with me;
    My heart is in the coffin there with Caesar,
    And I must pause till it come back to me.
I fear there will a worse come in his place.
If I were disposed to stir
    Your hearts and minds to mutiny and rage,
    I should do Brutus wrong and Cassius wrong,
    Who, you all know, are honorable men.
I will not do them wrong; I rather choose
    To wrong the dead, to wrong myself and you,
    Than I will wrong such honorable men.
But here's a parchment with the seal of Caesar;  
    I found it in his closet, 'tis his will.
Let but the commons hear this testament-
    Which, pardon me, I do not mean to read-
    And they would go and kiss dead Caesar's wounds
    And dip their napkins in his sacred blood,
    Yea, beg a hair of him for memory,
    And, dying, mention it within their wills,
    Bequeathing it as a rich legacy
    Unto their issue.
Have patience, gentle friends, I must not read it;
    It is not meet you know how Caesar loved you.
I have o'ershot myself to tell you of it.
I fear I wrong the honorable men
    Whose daggers have stabb'd Caesar; I do fear it.
Shall I descend?
I remember
    The first time ever Caesar put it on;
    'Twas on a summer's evening, in his tent,
    That day he overcame the Nervii.
Then I, and you, and all of us fell down,
    Whilst bloody treason flourish'd over us.
O, now you weep, and I perceive you feel
    The dint of pity.
What private griefs they have, alas, I know not,
    That made them do it.
I come not, friends, to steal away your hearts.
I am no orator, as Brutus is;
    But, as you know me all, a plain blunt man,
    That love my friend, and that they know full well
    That gave me public leave to speak of him.
For I have neither wit, nor words, nor worth,
    Action, nor utterance, nor the power of speech,
    To stir men's blood.
I only speak right on;
    I tell you that which you yourselves do know;
    Show you sweet Caesar's wounds, poor dumb mouths,
    And bid them speak for me.
But were I Brutus,
    And Brutus Antony, there were an Antony  
    Would ruffle up your spirits and put a tongue
    In every wound of Caesar that should move
    The stones of Rome to rise and mutiny.
Alas, you know not; I must tell you then.
You have forgot the will I told you of.
And thither will I straight to visit him.
I heard him say Brutus and Cassius
    Are rid like madmen through the gates of Rome.
Be like they had some notice of the people,
    How I had moved them.
I dreamt tonight that I did feast with Caesar,
    And things unluckily charge my fantasy.
I have no will to wander forth of doors,
    Yet something leads me forth.
Whither am I going?
Where do I dwell?
Am I
    a married man or a bachelor?
Then, to answer every man directly  
    and briefly, wisely and truly: wisely I say, I am a bachelor.
You'll bear me a bang for that, I fear.
Directly, I am going to Caesar's funeral.
Briefly, I dwell by the Capitol.
I am Cinna the poet, I am Cinna the poet.
I am not Cinna the conspirator.
SCENE I.
I do consent-
  OCTAVIUS.
He shall not live; look, with a spot I damn him.
What, shall I find you here?
Octavius, I have seen more days than you,
    And though we lay these honors on this man
    To ease ourselves of divers slanderous loads,
    He shall but bear them as the ass bears gold,
    To groan and sweat under the business,
    Either led or driven, as we point the way;
    And having brought our treasure where we will,
    Then take we down his load and turn him off,
    Like to the empty ass, to shake his ears
    And graze in commons.
So is my horse, Octavius, and for that
    I do appoint him store of provender.
It is a creature that I teach to fight,
    To wind, to stop, to run directly on,
    His corporal motion govern'd by my spirit.
Let us do so, for we are at the stake,
    And bay'd about with many enemies;
    And some that smile have in their hearts, I fear,
    Millions of mischiefs.
Your master, Pindarus,
    In his own change, or by ill officers,
    Hath given me some worthy cause to wish
    Things done undone; but if he be at hand,
    I shall be satisfied.
I do not doubt
    But that my noble master will appear
    Such as he is, full of regard and honor.
Wrong I mine enemies?
And, if not so, how should I wrong a brother?
Cassius, be content,
    Speak your griefs softly, I do know you well.
Bid them move away;
    Then in my tent, Cassius, enlarge your griefs,
    And I will give you audience.
That you have wrong'd me doth appear in this:
    You have condemn'd and noted Lucius Pella
    For taking bribes here of the Sardians,
    Wherein my letters, praying on his side,
    Because I knew the man, were slighted off.
I an itching palm?
I had rather be a dog, and bay the moon,
    Than such a Roman.
Brutus, bait not me,
    I'll not endure it.
I am a soldier, I,
    Older in practice, abler than yourself
    To make conditions.
I am.
I say you are not.
Urge me no more, I shall forget myself;
    Have mind upon your health, tempt me no farther.
Hear me, for I will speak.
Must I give way and room to your rash choler?
Shall I be frighted when a madman stares?
Must I endure all this?
Must I bouge?
Must I observe you?
Must I stand and crouch
    Under your testy humor?
By the gods,
    You shall digest the venom of your spleen,
    Though it do split you, for, from this day forth,
    I'll use you for my mirth, yea, for my laughter,
    When you are waspish.
For mine own part,
    I shall be glad to learn of noble men.
I said, an elder soldier, not a better.
Did I say "better"?
If you did, I care not.
I durst not?
Do not presume too much upon my love;
    I may do that I shall be sorry for.
There is no terror, Cassius, in your threats,
    For I am arm'd so strong in honesty,
    That they pass by me as the idle wind
    Which I respect not.
I did send to you
    For certain sums of gold, which you denied me,  
    For I can raise no money by vile means.
By heaven, I had rather coin my heart
    And drop my blood for drachmas than to wring
    From the hard hands of peasants their vile trash
    By any indirection.
I did send
    To you for gold to pay my legions,
    Which you denied me.
Should I have answer'd Caius Cassius so?
I denied you not.
I did not.
I do not, till you practise them on me.
I do not like your faults.
O, I could weep
    My spirit from mine eyes!
If that thou best a Roman, take it forth;
    I, that denied thee gold, will give my heart.
Strike, as thou didst at Caesar, for I know,
    When thou didst hate him worst, thou lovedst him better
    Than ever thou lovedst Cassius.
When I spoke that, I was ill-temper'd too.
Love, and be friends, as two such men should be;
    For I have seen more years, I'm sure, than ye.
I'll know his humor when he knows his time.
I did not think you could have been so angry.
O Cassius, I am sick of many griefs.
How 'scaped killing when I cross'd you so?
In this I bury all unkindness, Cassius.
Fill, Lucius, till the wine o'erswell the cup;
  I cannot drink too much of Brutus' love.
No more, I pray you.
Messala, I have here received letters  
    That young Octavius and Mark Antony
    Come down upon us with a mighty power,
    Bending their expedition toward Philippi.
Then like a Roman bear the truth I tell:
    For certain she is dead, and by strange manner.
With meditating that she must die once
    I have the patience to endure it now.
I have as much of this in art as you,
    But yet my nature could not bear it so.
I do not think it good.
Poor knave, I blame thee not, thou art o'erwatch'd.
Call Claudio and some other of my men,
    I'll have them sleep on cushions in my tent.
I pray you, sirs, lie in my tent and sleep;
    It may be I shall raise you by and by
    On business to my brother Cassius.
I would not have it so.
It may be I shall otherwise bethink me.
Look Lucius, here's the book I sought for so;
    I put it in the pocket of my gown.
I was sure your lordship did not give it me.
Bear with me, good boy, I am much forgetful.
I trouble thee too much, but thou art willing.
I should not urge thy duty past thy might;  
    I know young bloods look for a time of rest.
I have slept, my lord, already.
It was well done, and thou shalt sleep again;
    I will not hold thee long.
If I do live,
    I will be good to thee.
I will not do thee so much wrong to wake thee.
If thou dost nod, thou break'st thy instrument;
    I'll take it from thee; and, good boy, good night.
Let me see, let me see; is not the leaf turn'd down
    Where I left reading?
Here it is, I think.
I think it is the weakness of mine eyes
    That shapes this monstrous apparition.
Well, then I shall see thee again?
Why, I will see thee at Philippi then.
Now I have taken heart thou vanishest.
Ill spirit, I would hold more talk with thee.
My lord, I do not know that I did cry.
No, my lord, I saw nothing.
Nor I, my lord.
SCENE I.
Tut, I am in their bosoms, and I know
    Wherefore they do it.
Upon the right hand I, keep thou the left.
I do not cross you, but I will do so.
Look,
    I draw a sword against conspirators;
    When think you that the sword goes up again?
So I hope,
    I was not born to die on Brutus' sword.
Be thou my witness that, against my will,
    As Pompey was, am I compell'd to set
    Upon one battle all our liberties.
You know that I held Epicurus strong,
    And his opinion.
Now I change my mind,
    And partly credit things that do presage.
I but believe it partly,
    For I am fresh of spirit and resolved
    To meet all perils very constantly.
Even by the rule of that philosophy
    By which I did blame Cato for the death
    Which he did give himself- I know not how,
    But I do find it cowardly and vile,
    For fear of what might fall, so to prevent
    The time of life- arming myself with patience
    To stay the providence of some high powers
    That govern us below.
And whether we shall meet again I know not.
Let them set on at once, for I perceive
    But cold demeanor in Octavia's wing,
    And sudden push gives them the overthrow.
This ensign here of mine was turning back;
    I slew the coward, and did take it from him.
Look, look, Titinius:
    Are those my tents where I perceive the fire?
Titinius, if thou lovest me,
    Mount thou my horse and hide thy spurs in him,
    Till he have brought thee up to yonder troops
    And here again, that I may rest assured
    Whether yond troops are friend or enemy.
I will be here again, even with a thought.
This day I breathed first: time is come round,
    And where I did begin, there shall I end;
    My life is run his compass.
O, coward that I am, to live so long,
    To see my best friend ta'en before my face!
In Parthia did I take thee prisoner,
    And then I swore thee, saving of thy life,
    That whatsoever I did bid thee do,
    Thou shouldst attempt it.
So, I am free, yet would not so have been,
    Durst I have done my will.
Seek him, Titinius, whilst I go to meet
    The noble Brutus, thrusting this report
    Into his ears.
I may say "thrusting" it,
    For piercing steel and darts envenomed
    Shall be as welcome to the ears of Brutus
    As tidings of this sight.
Hie you, Messala,
    And I will seek for Pindarus the while.
Did I not meet thy friends?
But, hold thee, take this garland on thy brow;
    Thy Brutus bid me give it thee, and I
    Will do his bidding.
Brutus, come apace,
    And see how I regarded Caius Cassius.
Friends, I owe moe tears
    To this dead man than you shall see me pay.
I shall find time, Cassius, I shall find time.
I will proclaim my name about the field.
I am the son of Marcus Cato, ho!
I am the son of Marcus Cato, ho!
And I am Brutus, Marcus Brutus, I;
    Brutus, my country's friend; know me for Brutus!
Only I yield to die.
I'll tell the news.
I dare assure thee that no enemy
    Shall ever take alive the noble Brutus;
    The gods defend him from so great a shame!
This is not Brutus, friend, but, I assure you,
    A prize no less in worth.
Keep this man safe,
    Give him all kindness; I had rather have
    Such men my friends than enemies.
What, I, my lord?
I'll rather kill myself.
Shall I do such a deed?
I know my hour is come.
Nay I am sure it is, Volumnius.
Good Volumnius,
    Thou know'st that we two went to school together;
    Even for that our love of old, I prithee,
    Hold thou my sword-hilts, whilst I run on it.
Countrymen,
    My heart doth joy that yet in all my life
    I found no man but he was true to me.
I shall have glory by this losing day,
    More than Octavius and Mark Antony
    By this vile conquest shall attain unto.
I will follow.
I prithee, Strato, stay thou by thy lord.
Hold then my sword, and turn away thy face,
    While I do run upon it.
Caesar, now be still;
    I kill'd not thee with half so good a will.
I thank thee, Brutus,
    That thou hast proved Lucilius' saying true.
All that served Brutus, I will entertain them.
I held the sword, and he did run on it.
ACT I.
Scene I.
I thought the King had more affected the Duke of Albany than
     Cornwall.
I have so often
     blush'd to acknowledge him that now I am braz'd to't.
I cannot conceive you.
I cannot wish the fault undone, the issue of it being so
     proper.
But I have, sir, a son by order of law, some year elder than
     this, who yet is no dearer in my account.
I must love you, and sue to know you better.
Sir, I shall study deserving.
I shall, my liege.
Sir, I love you more than words can wield the matter;
     Dearer than eyesight, space, and liberty;
     Beyond what can be valued, rich or rare;  
     No less than life, with grace, health, beauty, honour;
     As much as child e'er lov'd, or father found;
     A love that makes breath poor, and speech unable.
Beyond all manner of so much I love you.
Sir, I am made
     Of the selfsame metal that my sister is,
     And prize me at her worth.
In my true heart
     I find she names my very deed of love;
     Only she comes too short, that I profess
     Myself an enemy to all other joys
     Which the most precious square of sense possesses,
     And find I am alone felicitate
     In your dear Highness' love.
And yet not so; since I am sure my love's
     More richer than my tongue.
Unhappy that I am, I cannot heave
     My heart into my mouth.
I love your Majesty
     According to my bond; no more nor less.
Good my lord,
     You have begot me, bred me, lov'd me; I
     Return those duties back as are right fit,
     Obey you, love you, and most honour you.
Haply, when I shall wed,
     That lord whose hand must take my plight shall carry
     Half my love with him, half my care and duty.
Sure I shall never marry like my sisters,
     To love my father all.
For, by the sacred radiance of the sun,
     The mysteries of Hecate and the night;
     By all the operation of the orbs
     From whom we do exist and cease to be;
     Here I disclaim all my paternal care,  
     Propinquity and property of blood,
     And as a stranger to my heart and me
     Hold thee from this for ever.
I lov'd her most, and thought to set my rest
     On her kind nursery.
-
     So be my grave my peace as here I give
     Her father's heart from her!
I do invest you jointly in my power,
     Preeminence, and all the large effects
     That troop with majesty.
Royal Lear,
     Whom I have ever honour'd as my king,
     Lov'd as my father, as my master follow'd,
     As my great patron thought on in my prayers-
  Lear.
My life I never held but as a pawn
     To wage against thine enemies; nor fear to lose it,
     Thy safety being the motive.
Revoke thy gift,
     Or, whilst I can vent clamour from my throat,  
     I'll tell thee thou dost evil.
Most royal Majesty,
     I crave no more than hath your Highness offer'd,
     Nor will you tender less.
I know no answer.
Then leave her, sir; for, by the pow'r that made me,
     I tell you all her wealth.
[To France] For you, great King,
     I would not from your love make such a stray
     To match you where I hate; therefore beseech you
     T' avert your liking a more worthier way
     Than on a wretch whom nature is asham'd
     Almost t' acknowledge hers.
I yet beseech your Majesty,
     If for I want that glib and oily art
     To speak and purpose not, since what I well intend,
     I'll do't before I speak- that you make known
     It is no vicious blot, murther, or foulness,
     No unchaste action or dishonoured step,
     That hath depriv'd me of your grace and favour;
     But even for want of that for which I am richer-
     A still-soliciting eye, and such a tongue
     As I am glad I have not, though not to have it
     Hath lost me in your liking.
Royal Lear,
     Give but that portion which yourself propos'd,
     And here I take Cordelia by the hand,
     Duchess of Burgundy.
I have sworn; I am firm.
I am sorry then you have so lost a father
     That you must lose a husband.
Since that respects of fortune are his love,
     I shall not be his wife.
Thee and thy virtues here I seize upon.
Be it lawful I take up what's cast away.
I know you what you are;
     And, like a sister, am most loath to call  
     Your faults as they are nam'd.
To your professed bosoms I commit him;
     But yet, alas, stood I within his grace,
     I would prefer him to a better place!
Sister, it is not little I have to say of what most nearly
     appertains to us both.
I think our father will hence to-night.
Wherefore should I
     Stand in the plague of custom, and permit
     The curiosity of nations to deprive me,
     For that I am some twelve or fourteen moonshines
     Lag of a brother?
Well then,
     Legitimate Edgar, I must have your land.
I grow; I prosper.
I know no news, my lord.
Come, if it be nothing, I shall not need
     spectacles.
I beseech you, sir, pardon me.
It is a letter from my brother
     that I have not all o'er-read; and for so much as I have  
     perus'd, I find it not fit for your o'erlooking.
I shall offend, either to detain or give it.
The contents, as
     in part I understand them, are to blame.
I hope, for my brother's justification, he wrote this but as
     an essay or taste of my virtue.
I begin to find an idle
     and fond bondage in the oppression of aged tyranny, who sways,
     not as it hath power, but as it is suffer'd.
Come to me, that
     of this I may speak more.
If our father would sleep till I
     wak'd him, you should enjoy half his revenue for ever, and live
     the beloved of your brother,
                                                        'EDGAR.
'Sleep till I wak'd him, you should enjoy half
     his revenue.
I  
     found it thrown in at the casement of my closet.
If the matter were good, my lord, I durst swear it were his;
     but in respect of that, I would fain think it were not.
It is his hand, my lord; but I hope his heart is not in the
     contents.
But I have heard him oft maintain it to be fit
     that, sons at perfect age, and fathers declining, the father
     should be as ward to the son, and the son manage his revenue.
I'll apprehend him.
I do not well know, my lord.
I dare pawn down my life
     for him that he hath writ this to feel my affection to your
     honour, and to no other pretence of danger.
If your honour judge it meet, I will place you where you shall
     hear us confer of this and by an auricular assurance have your
     satisfaction, and that without any further delay than this very
     evening.
Edmund, seek him out; wind me into him, I pray
     you; frame the business after your own wisdom.
I would unstate
     myself to be in a due resolution.
I will seek him, sir, presently; convey the business as I
     shall find means, and acquaint you withal.
My father
     compounded with my mother under the Dragon's Tail, and my
     nativity was under Ursa Major, so that it follows I am rough and  
     lecherous.
I should have been that I am, had the
     maidenliest star in the firmament twinkled on my bastardizing.
I am thinking, brother, of a prediction I read this other day,
     what should follow these eclipses.
I promise you, the effects he writes of succeed unhappily: as
     of unnaturalness between the child and the parent; death,
     dearth, dissolutions of ancient amities; divisions in state,
     menaces and maledictions against king and nobles; needless
     diffidences, banishment of friends, dissipation of cohorts,
     nuptial breaches, and I know not what.
I pray you have a continent forbearance till
     the speed of his rage goes slower; and, as I say, retire with me
     to my lodging, from whence I will fitly bring you to hear my
     lord speak.
Brother, I advise you to the best.
I am no honest man
     if there be any good meaning toward you.
I have told you what I  
     have seen and heard; but faintly, nothing like the image and
     horror of it.
Shall I hear from you anon?
I do serve you in this business.
I see the business.
Let me, if not by birth, have lands by wit;
     All with me's meet that I can fashion fit.
I'll not endure it.
When he returns from hunting,
     I will not speak with him.
Say I am sick.
If you come slack of former services,
     You shall do well; the fault of it I'll answer.
He's coming, madam; I hear him.
I'd have it come to question.
If he distaste it, let him to our sister,
     Whose mind and mine I know in that are one,
     Not to be overrul'd.
Remember what I have said.
I would breed from hence occasions, and I shall,
     That I may speak.
I'll write straight to my sister
     To hold my very course.
If but as well I other accents borrow,
     That can my speech defuse, my good intent
     May carry through itself to that full issue
     For which I raz'd my likeness.
I do profess to be no less than I seem, to serve him truly
     that will put me in trust, to love him that is honest, to
     converse with him that is wise and says little, to fear  
     judgment, to fight when I cannot choose, and to eat no fish.
No, sir; but you have that in your countenance which I would
     fain call master.
I can keep honest counsel, ride, run, mar a curious tale in
     telling it and deliver a plain message bluntly.
That which
     ordinary men are fit for, I am qualified in, and the best of me
     is diligence.
I have years on my back forty-eight.
If I like thee no worse after
     dinner, I will not part from thee yet.
I think the world's
     asleep.
Why came not the slave back to me when I call'd him?
My lord, I know not what the matter is; but to my judgment
     your Highness is not entertain'd with that ceremonious affection
     as you were wont.
I beseech you pardon me, my lord, if I be mistaken; for
     my duty cannot be silent when I think your Highness wrong'd.
I have
     perceived a most faint neglect of late, which I have rather
     blamed as mine own jealous curiosity than as a very pretence
     and purpose of unkindness.
I will look further into't.
I have not seen him this two days.
No more of that; I have noted it well.
Go you and tell my
     daughter I would speak with her.
Who am I, sir?
I am none of these, my lord; I beseech your pardon.
I'll not be strucken, my lord.
I thank thee, fellow.
Thou serv'st me, and I'll love thee.
I'll teach you differences.
Now, my friendly knave, I thank thee.
Would I had two coxcombs and two daughters!
If I gave them all my living, I'ld keep my coxcombs myself.
Sirrah, I'll teach thee a speech.
If I had a
     monopoly out, they would have part on't.
Give me an egg, nuncle, and I'll give thee two
     crowns.
Why, after I have cut the egg i' th' middle and eat up the
     meat, the two crowns of the egg.
If I speak like myself in
     this, let him be whipp'd that first finds it so.
I have us'd it, nuncle, ever since thou mad'st thy daughters
     thy mother; for when thou gav'st them the rod, and put'st down
     thine own breeches,
  
     [Sings]    Then they for sudden joy did weep,
                  And I for sorrow sung,
                That such a king should play bo-peep
                  And go the fools among.
I would fain learn to lie.
I marvel what kin thou and thy daughters are.
They'll have me
     whipp'd for speaking true; thou'lt have me whipp'd for lying;
     and sometimes I am whipp'd for holding my peace.
I had rather be
     any kind o' thing than a fool!
And yet I would not be thee,
     nuncle.
I am better
     than thou art now: I am a fool, thou art nothing.
[To Goneril] Yes, forsooth, I will hold my tongue.
Sir,
     I had thought, by making this well known unto you,
     To have found a safe redress, but now grow fearful,
     By what yourself, too, late have spoke and done,
     That you protect this course, and put it on
     By your allowance; which if you should, the fault
     Would not scape censure, nor the redresses sleep,
     Which, in the tender of a wholesome weal,  
     Might in their working do you that offence
     Which else were shame, that then necessity
     Must call discreet proceeding.
Come, sir,
     I would you would make use of that good wisdom
     Whereof I know you are fraught, and put away
     These dispositions that of late transform you
     From what you rightly are.
Whoop, Jug, I love thee!
Who is it that can tell me who I am?
I would learn that; for, by the marks of sovereignty,
     Knowledge, and reason, I should be false persuaded
     I had daughters.
I do beseech you
     To understand my purposes aright.
Degenerate bastard, I'll not trouble thee;
     Yet have I left a daughter.
My lord, I am guiltless, as I am ignorant
     Of what hath mov'd you.
I'll tell thee.
I am asham'd
     That thou hast power to shake my manhood thus;  
     That these hot tears, which break from me perforce,
     Should make thee worth them.
- Old fond eyes,
     Beweep this cause again, I'll pluck ye out,
     And cast you, with the waters that you lose,
     To temper clay.
Yet have I left a daughter,
     Who I am sure is kind and comfortable.
Thou shalt find
     That I'll resume the shape which thou dost think
     I have cast off for ever; thou shalt, I warrant thee.
I cannot be so partial, Goneril,
     To the great love I bear you -
  Gon.
- Oswald, I say!
Let me still take away the harms I fear,
     Not fear still to be taken.
I know his heart.
What he hath utter'd I have writ my sister.
If she sustain him and his hundred knights,
     When I have show'd th' unfitness-
  
                     Enter [Oswald the] Steward.
This milky gentleness and course of yours,
     Though I condemn it not, yet, under pardon,
     You are much more at task for want of wisdom
     Than prais'd for harmful mildness.
How far your eyes may pierce I cannot tell.
If your diligence be not speedy, I
     shall be there afore you.
I will not sleep, my lord, till I have delivered your letter.
Then I prithee be merry.
Shalt see thy other daughter will use thee kindly; for though
     she's as like this as a crab's like an apple, yet I can tell
     what I can tell.
I did her wrong.
Nor I neither; but I can tell why a snail has a house.
I will forget my nature.
If thou wert my fool, nuncle, I'ld have thee beaten for being
     old before thy time.
Keep me in temper; I would not be mad!
Scene I.
I have been with your father, and given him
     notice that the Duke of Cornwall and Regan his Duchess will be
     here with him this night.
Nay, I know not.
You have heard of the news abroad- I mean the
     whisper'd ones, for they are yet but ear-kissing arguments?
Not I.
My father hath set guard to take my brother;
     And I have one thing, of a queasy question,
     Which I must act.
Brother, I say!
I am sure on't, not a word.
I hear my father coming.
In cunning I must draw my sword upon you.
] I have seen
        drunkards
     Do more than this in sport.
Look, sir, I bleed.
Persuade me to the murther of your lordship;
     But that I told him the revenging gods
     'Gainst parricides did all their thunders bend;  
     Spoke with how manifold and strong a bond
     The child was bound to th' father- sir, in fine,
     Seeing how loathly opposite I stood
     To his unnatural purpose, in fell motion
     With his prepared sword he charges home
     My unprovided body, lanch'd mine arm;
     But when he saw my best alarum'd spirits,
     Bold in the quarrel's right, rous'd to th' encounter,
     Or whether gasted by the noise I made,
     Full suddenly he fled.
By his authority I will proclaim it
     That he which find, him shall deserve our thanks,
     Bringing the murderous caitiff to the stake;
     He that conceals him, death.
When I dissuaded him from his intent
     And found him pight to do it, with curst speech  
     I threaten'd to discover him.
He replied,
     'Thou unpossessing bastard, dost thou think,
     If I would stand against thee, would the reposal
     Of any trust, virtue, or worth in thee
     Make thy words faith'd?
What I should deny
     (As this I would; ay, though thou didst produce
     My very character), I'ld turn it all
     To thy suggestion, plot, and damned practice;
     And thou must make a dullard of the world,
     If they not thought the profits of my death
     Were very pregnant and potential spurs
     To make thee seek it.
I never got him.
I know not why he comes.
All ports I'll bar; the villain shall not scape;
     The Duke must grant me that.
Besides, his picture
     I will send far and near, that all the kingdom
     May have due note of him, and of my land,  
     Loyal and natural boy, I'll work the means
     To make thee capable.
Since I came hither
     (Which I can call but now) I have heard strange news.
I know not, madam.
I have this present evening from my sister
     Been well inform'd of them, and with such cautions
     That, if they come to sojourn at my house,
     I'll not be there.
Nor I, assure thee, Regan.
Edmund, I hear that you have shown your father
     A childlike office.
I shall serve you, sir,  
     Truly, however else.
For him I thank your Grace.
Our father he hath writ, so hath our sister,
     Of differences, which I best thought it fit
     To answer from our home.
I serve you, madam.
I' th' mire.
I love thee not.
Why then, I care not for thee.
If I had thee in Lipsbury Pinfold, I would make thee care for
     me.
I know thee not.
Fellow, I know thee.
A knave; a rascal; an eater of broken meats; a base, proud,
     shallow, beggarly, three-suited, hundred-pound, filthy,
     worsted-stocking knave; a lily-liver'd, action-taking, whoreson,
     glass-gazing, superserviceable, finical rogue;
     one-trunk-inheriting slave; one that wouldst be a bawd in way of
     good service, and art nothing but the composition of a knave,  
     beggar, coward, pander, and the son and heir of a mongrel bitch;
     one whom I will beat into clamorous whining, if thou deny the
     least syllable of thy addition.
Is it two days ago since I beat thee and tripp'd up thy heels
     before the King?
I'll make a sop o' th'
     moonshine o' you.
I have nothing to do with thee.
Draw, you rogue, or I'll so carbonado your shanks!
Come, I'll flesh ye!
I am scarce in breath, my lord.
This ancient ruffian, sir, whose life I have spar'd
     At suit of his grey beard-
  Kent.
My lord, if
     you'll give me leave, I will tread this unbolted villain into
     mortar and daub the walls of a jakes with him.
Smile you my speeches, as I were a fool?
Goose, an I had you upon Sarum Plain,
     I'ld drive ye cackling home to Camelot.
No contraries hold more antipathy
     Than I and such a knave.
I have seen better faces in my time
     Than stands on any shoulder that I see
     Before me at this instant.
These kind of knaves I know which in this plainness
     Harbour more craft and more corrupter ends
     Than twenty silly-ducking observants
     That stretch their duties nicely.
I
     know, sir, I am no flatterer.
He that beguil'd you in a plain
     accent was a plain knave, which, for my part, I will not be,
     though I should win your displeasure to entreat me to't.
I never gave him any.
Sir, I am too old to learn.
I serve the King;
     On whose employment I was sent to you.
As I have life and honour,
     There shall he sit till noon.
Why, madam, if I were your father's dog,
     You should not use me so.
Sir, being his knave, I will.
I'll answer that.
I am sorry for thee, friend.
I'll entreat for thee.
I have watch'd and travell'd hard.
Some time I shall sleep out, the rest I'll whistle.
Approach, thou beacon to this under globe,
     That by thy comfortable beams I may
     Peruse this letter.
I know 'tis from Cordelia,
     Who hath most fortunately been inform'd
     Of my obscured course- and [reads] 'shall find time
     From this enormous state, seeking to give
     Losses their remedies'- All weary and o'erwatch'd,
     Take vantage, heavy eyes, not to behold  
     This shameful lodging.
I heard myself proclaim'd,
     And by the happy hollow of a tree
     Escap'd the hunt.
Whiles I may scape,
     I will preserve myself; and am bethought
     To take the basest and most poorest shape
     That ever penury, in contempt of man,
     Brought near to beast.
My face I'll grime with filth,
     Blanket my loins, elf all my hair in knots,
     And with presented nakedness outface
     The winds and persecutions of the sky.
Edgar I nothing am.
As I learn'd,
     The night before there was no purpose in them
     Of this remove.
No, I say.
I say yea.
By Jupiter, I swear no!
By Juno, I swear ay!
My lord, when at their home
     I did commend your Highness' letters to them,
     Ere I was risen from the place that show'd
     My duty kneeling, came there a reeking post,
     Stew'd in his haste, half breathless, panting forth
     From Goneril his mistress salutations;  
     Deliver'd letters, spite of intermission,
     Which presently they read; on whose contents,
     They summon'd up their meiny, straight took horse,
     Commanded me to follow and attend
     The leisure of their answer, gave me cold looks,
     And meeting here the other messenger,
     Whose welcome I perceiv'd had poison'd mine-
     Being the very fellow which of late
     Display'd so saucily against your Highness-
     Having more man than wit about me, drew.
I
     would have none but knaves follow it, since a fool gives it.
But I will tarry; the fool will stay,
            And let the wise man fly.
Why, Gloucester, Gloucester,
     I'ld speak with the Duke of Cornwall and his wife.
Well, my good lord, I have inform'd them so.
I'll forbear;  
     And am fallen out with my more headier will,
     To take the indispos'd and sickly fit
     For the sound man.
Go tell the Duke and 's wife I'ld speak with them-
     Now, presently.
Bid them come forth and hear me,
     Or at their chamber door I'll beat the drum
     Till it cry sleep to death.
I would have all well betwixt you.
I am glad to see your Highness.
Regan, I think you are; I know what reason
     I have to think so.
If thou shouldst not be glad,
     I would divorce me from thy mother's tomb,
     Sepulchring an adultress.
]
     I can scarce speak to thee.
I pray you, sir, take patience.
I have hope
     You less know how to value her desert
     Than she to scant her duty.
I cannot think my sister in the least
     Would fail her obligation.
Therefore I pray you
     That to our sister you do make return;
     Say you have wrong'd her, sir.
Do you but mark how this becomes the house:
     'Dear daughter, I confess that I am old.
On my knees I beg
     That you'll vouchsafe me raiment, bed, and food.
Thy half o' th' kingdom hast thou not forgot,
     Wherein I thee endow'd.
I know't- my sister's.
Regan, I have good hope
     Thou didst not know on't.
How have I offended?
I set him there, sir; but his own disorders
     Deserv'd much less advancement.
I pray you, father, being weak, seem so.
I am now from home, and out of that provision  
     Which shall be needful for your entertainment.
No, rather I abjure all roofs, and choose
     To wage against the enmity o' th' air,
     To be a comrade with the wolf and owl-
     Necessity's sharp pinch!
Why, the hot-blooded France, that dowerless took
     Our youngest born, I could as well be brought
     To knee his throne, and, squire-like, pension beg
     To keep base life afoot.
I prithee, daughter, do not make me mad.
I will not trouble thee, my child; farewell.
But yet thou art my flesh, my blood, my daughter;
     Or rather a disease that's in my flesh,
     Which I must needs call mine.
But I'll not chide thee.
Let shame come when it will, I do not call it.
I do not bid the Thunder-bearer shoot
     Nor tell tales of thee to high-judging Jove.
Mend when thou canst; be better at thy leisure;
     I can be patient, I can stay with Regan,
     I and my hundred knights.
I look'd not for you yet, nor am provided
     For your fit welcome.
I dare avouch it, sir.
If you will come to me
     (For now I spy a danger), I entreat you
     To bring but five-and-twenty.
To no more
     Will I give place or notice.
I gave you all-
  Reg.
What, must I come to you
     With five-and-twenty, Regan?
[To Goneril] I'll go with thee.
But, for true need-
     You heavens, give me that patience, patience I need!
I will have such revenges on you both  
     That all the world shall- I will do such things-
     What they are yet, I know not; but they shall be
     The terrors of the earth!
You think I'll weep.
No, I'll not weep.
I have full cause of weeping, but this heart
     Shall break into a hundred thousand flaws
     Or ere I'll weep.
O fool, I shall go mad!
For his particular, I'll receive him gladly,
     But not one follower.
So am I purpos'd.
He calls to horse, but will I know not whither.
Scene I.
I know you.
Sir, I do know you,
     And dare upon the warrant of my note
     Commend a dear thing to you.
I am a gentleman of blood and breeding,
     And from some knowledge and assurance offer
     This office to you.
I will talk further with you.
For confirmation that I am much more
     Than my out-wall, open this purse and take
     What it contains.
I will go seek the King.
Few words, but, to effect, more than all yet:
     That, when we have found the King (in which your pain
     That way, I'll this), he that first lights on him  
     Holla the other.
I tax not you, you elements, with unkindness.
I never gave you kingdom, call'd you children,
     You owe me no subscription.
Here I stand your slave,
     A poor, infirm, weak, and despis'd old man.
But yet I call you servile ministers,
     That will with two pernicious daughters join
     Your high-engender'd battles 'gainst a head
     So old and white as this!
No, I will be the pattern of all patience;
     I will say nothing.
Since I was man,
     Such sheets of fire, such bursts of horrid thunder,
     Such groans of roaring wind and rain, I never
     Remember to have heard.
I am a man
     More sinn'd against than sinning.
Repose you there, whilst I to this hard house
     (More harder than the stones whereof 'tis rais'd,
     Which even but now, demanding after you,
     Denied me to come in) return, and force
     Their scanted courtesy.
I am cold myself.
Poor fool and knave, I have one part in my heart
     That's sorry yet for thee.
I'll speak a
     prophecy ere I go:
          When priests are more in word than matter;
          When brewers mar their malt with water;
          When nobles are their tailors' tutors,
          No heretics burn'd, but wenches' suitors;
          When every case in law is right,
          No squire in debt nor no poor knight;
          When slanders do not live in tongues,
          Nor cutpurses come not to throngs;
          When usurers tell their gold i' th' field,  
          And bawds and whores do churches build:
          Then shall the realm of Albion
          Come to great confusion.
This prophecy Merlin shall make, for I live before his time.
Alack, alack, Edmund, I like not this unnatural dealing!
When
     I desir'd their leave that I might pity him, they took from me
     the use of mine own house, charg'd me on pain of perpetual
     displeasure neither to speak of him, entreat for him, nor any
     way sustain him.
I have received a letter this
     night- 'tis dangerous to be spoken- I have lock'd the letter in
     my closet.
I will seek him and privily relieve him.
If he ask for me, I am ill and gone to bed.
Though I
     die for't, as no less is threat'ned me, the King my old master
     must be relieved.
I had rather break mine own.
But I will punish home!
No, I will weep no more.
Pour on; I will endure.
But I'll go in.
I'll pray, and then I'll sleep.
O, I have ta'en
     Too little care of this!
There could I have him now- and there-
     and there again- and there!
A servingman, proud in heart and mind; that curl'd my hair,
     wore gloves in my cap; serv'd the lust of my mistress' heart and
     did the act of darkness with her; swore as many oaths as I spake
     words, and broke them in the sweet face of heaven; one that
     slept in the contriving of lust, and wak'd to do it.
Wine lov'd
     I deeply, dice dearly; and in woman out-paramour'd the Turk.
Though their injunction be to bar my doors
     And let this tyrannous night take hold upon you,
     Yet have I ventur'd to come seek you out
     And bring you where both fire and food is ready.
I'll talk a word with this same learned Theban.
Thou say'st the King grows mad: I'll tell thee, friend,
     I am almost mad myself.
I had a son,
     Now outlaw'd from my blood.
I lov'd him, friend-
     No father his son dearer.
I do beseech your Grace-
  Lear.
I will keep still with my philosopher.
I smell the blood of a British man.
I will have my revenge ere I depart his house.
How, my lord, I may be censured, that nature thus gives way to
     loyalty, something fears me to think of.
I now perceive it was not altogether your brother's evil
     disposition made him seek his death; but a provoking merit, set
     awork by a reproveable badness in himself.
How malicious is my fortune that I must repent to be just!
that
     this treason were not- or not I the detector!
[aside] If I find him comforting the King, it will stuff his  
     suspicion more fully.
- I will persever in my course of loyalty,
     though the conflict be sore between that and my blood.
I will lay trust upon thee, and thou shalt find a dearer
     father in my love.
I will
     piece out the comfort with what addition I can.
I will not be
     long from you.
It shall be done; I will arraign them straight.
Croak
     not, black angel; I have no food for thee.
I'll see their trial first.
I here take my oath before
     this honourable assembly, she kicked the poor King her father.
Cry you mercy, I took you for a joint-stool.
[To Edgar] You, sir- I entertain you for one of my  
     hundred; only I do not like the fashion of your garments.
And I'll go to bed at noon.
Good friend, I prithee take him in thy arms.
I have o'erheard a plot of death upon him.
How light and portable my pain seems now,
     When that which makes me bend makes the King bow,
     He childed as I fathered!
Bind him, I say.
Unmerciful lady as you are, I am none.
I am your host.
I have a letter guessingly set down,
     Which came from one that's of a neutral heart,
     And not from one oppos'd.
I am tied to th' stake, and I must stand the course.
Because I would not see thy cruel nails
     Pluck out his poor old eyes; nor thy fierce sister
     In his anointed flesh stick boarish fangs.
But I shall see
     The winged vengeance overtake such children.
Upon these eyes of thine I'll set my foot.
I have serv'd you ever since I was a child;
     But better service have I never done you
     Than now to bid you hold.
If you did wear a beard upon your chin,
     I'ld shake it on this quarrel.
O, I am slain!
I have receiv'd a hurt.
Regan, I bleed apace.
I'll never care what wickedness I do,
     If this man come to good.
I'll fetch some flax and whites of eggs
     To apply to his bleeding face.
Scene I.
Welcome then,
     Thou unsubstantial air that I embrace!
O my good lord,  
     I have been your tenant, and your father's tenant,
     These fourscore years.
I have no way, and therefore want no eyes;
     I stumbled when I saw.
Might I but live to see thee in my touch,
     I'ld say I had eyes again!
Who is't can say 'I am at the worst'?
I am worse than e'er I was.
[aside] And worse I may be yet.
I' th' last night's storm I such a fellow saw,
     Which made me think a man a worm.
I have heard more since.
If for my sake
     Thou wilt o'ertake us hence a mile or twain
     I' th' way toward Dover, do it for ancient love;
     And bring some covering for this naked soul,
     Who I'll entreat to lead me.
Do as I bid thee, or rather do thy pleasure.
I'll bring him the best 'parel that I have,
     Come on't what will.
[Aside] I cannot daub it further.
[aside] And yet I must.
That I am wretched
     Makes thee the happier.
Bring me but to the very brim of it,
     And I'll repair the misery thou dost bear
     With something rich about me.
From that place
     I shall no leading need.
I marvel our mild husband
     Not met us on the way.
I told him of the army that was landed:
     He smil'd at it.
I told him you were coming:
     His answer was, 'The worse.
' Of Gloucester's treachery
     And of the loyal service of his son
     When I inform'd him, then he call'd me sot
     And told me I had turn'd the wrong side out.
I must change arms at home and give the distaff
     Into my husband's hands.
I have been worth the whistle.
I fear your disposition.
[aside] One way I like this well;
     But being widow, and my Gloucester with her,
     May all the building in my fancy pluck
     Upon my hateful life.
- I'll read, and answer.
No, my good lord; I met him back again.
Gloucester, I live
     To thank thee for the love thou show'dst the King,
     And to revenge thine eyes.
Well, sir, I'll bring you to our master Lear
     And leave you to attend him.
When I am known aright, you shall not grieve
     Lending me this acquaintance.
I pray you go
     Along with me.
O dear father,
     It is thy business that I go about.
Soon may I hear and see him!
I know not, lady.
Edmund, I think, is gone,
     In pity of his misery, to dispatch
     His nighted life; moreover, to descry
     The strength o' th' enemy.
I must needs after him, madam, with my letter.
I may not, madam.
Belike,
     Something- I know not what- I'll love thee much-
     Let me unseal the letter.
Madam, I had rather-
  Reg.
I know your lady does not love her husband;
     I am sure of that; and at her late being here
     She gave strange eliads and most speaking looks
     To noble Edmund.
I know you are of her bosom.
I, madam?
I speak in understanding.
I know't.
Therefore I do advise you take this note.
My lord is dead; Edmund and I have talk'd,
     And more convenient is he for my hand
     Than for your lady's.
If you do find him, pray you give him this;  
     And when your mistress hears thus much from you,
     I pray desire her call her wisdom to her.
Would I could meet him, madam!
I should show
     What party I do follow.
When shall I come to th' top of that same hill?
In nothing am I chang'd
     But in my garments.
I'll look no more,
     Lest my brain turn, and the deficient sight
     Topple down headlong.
For all beneath the moon
     Would I not leap upright.
Why I do trifle thus with his despair
     Is done to cure it.
This world I do renounce, and, in your sights,
     Shake patiently my great affliction off.
If I could bear it longer and not fall
     To quarrel with your great opposeless wills,
     My snuff and loathed part of nature should
     Burn itself out.
-
     And yet I know not how conceit may rob
     The treasury of life when life itself
     Yields to the theft.
But have I fall'n, or no?
Alack, I have no eyes!
As I stood here below, methought his eyes
     Were two full moons; he had a thousand noses,
     Horns whelk'd and wav'd like the enridged sea.
I do remember now.
Henceforth I'll bear
     Affliction till it do cry out itself
     'Enough, enough,' and die.
That thing you speak of,
     I took it for a man.
No, they cannot touch me for coming;
     I am the King himself.
There's my gauntlet; I'll prove it
     on a giant.
I know that voice.
They flatter'd me like a dog,
     and told me I had white hairs in my beard ere the black ones
     were there.
To say 'ay' and 'no' to everything I said!
When the rain came to wet me
     once, and the wind to make me chatter; when the thunder would  
     not peace at my bidding; there I found 'em, there I smelt 'em
     out.
They told me I was
     everything.
'Tis a lie- I am not ague-proof.
The trick of that voice I do well remember.
When I do stare, see how the subject quakes.
I pardon that man's life.
for I lack soldiers.
I remember thine eyes well enough.
I'll not love.
Were all the letters suns, I could not see one.
[aside] I would not take this from report.
I see it feelingly.
None does offend, none- I say none!
I'll able 'em.
I know thee well enough; thy name is Gloucester.
I will preach to thee.
I'll put't in proof,  
     And when I have stol'n upon these sons-in-law,
     Then kill, kill, kill, kill, kill, kill!
I am even
     The natural fool of fortune.
Let me have a surgeon;
     I am cut to th' brains.
I will die bravely, like a smug bridegroom.
I will be jovial.
Come, come, I am a king;
     My masters, know you that?
I thank you sir.
I thank you, sir
                                               Exit [Gentleman].
Give me your hand;
     I'll lead you to some biding.
I know thee well.
I am only sorry
     He had no other deathsman.
Then am I the prisoner, and his bed my
     jail; from the loathed warmth whereof deliver me, and supply the
     place for your labour.
'Your (wife, so I would say) affectionate servant,
                                                          'Goneril.
Here in the sands
     Thee I'll rake up, the post unsanctified
     Of murtherous lechers; and in the mature time
     With this ungracious paper strike the sight
     Of the death-practis'd Duke, For him 'tis well
     That of thy death and business I can tell.
How stiff is my vile sense,
     That I stand up, and have ingenious feeling
     Of my huge sorrows!
Better I were distract.
Far off methinks I hear the beaten drum.
Come, father, I'll bestow you with a friend.
O thou good Kent, how shall I live and work
     To match thy goodness?
I prithee put them off.
My boon I make it that you know me not
     Till time and I think meet.
Be govern'd by your knowledge, and proceed
     I' th' sway of your own will.
I doubt not of his temperance.
Thou art a soul in bliss; but I am bound
     Upon a wheel of fire, that mine own tears
     Do scald like molten lead.
You are a spirit, I know.
Where have I been?
Where am I?
Fair daylight,
     I am mightily abus'd.
I should e'en die with pity,
     To see another thus.
I know not what to say.
I will not swear these are my hands.
I feel this pin prick.
Would I were assur'd
     Of my condition!
I am a very foolish fond old man,
     Fourscore and upward, not an hour more nor less;
     And, to deal plainly,
     I fear I am not in my perfect mind.
Methinks I should know you, and know this man;
     Yet I am doubtful; for I am mainly ignorant  
     What place this is; and all the skill I have
     Remembers not these garments; nor I know not
     Where I did lodge last night.
Do not laugh at me;
     For (as I am a man) I think this lady
     To be my child Cordelia.
And so I am!
I am!
I pray weep not.
If you have poison for me, I will drink it.
I know you do not love me; for your sisters
     Have, as I do remember, done me wrong.
Am I in France?
I am old and foolish.
Scene I.
Now, sweet lord,
     You know the goodness I intend upon you.
I am doubtful that you have been conjunct  
     And bosom'd with her, as far as we call hers.
I never shall endure her.
[aside] I had rather lose the battle than that sister
     Should loosen him and me.
Sir, this I hear: the King is come to his daughter,
     With others whom the rigour of our state
     Forc'd to cry out.
Where I could not be honest,
     I never yet was valiant.
For this business,
     It toucheth us as France invades our land,
     Not bolds the King, with others whom, I fear,
     Most just and heavy causes make oppose.
I shall attend you presently at your tent.
[aside] O, ho, I know the riddle.
- I will go.
I'll overtake you.
Wretched though I seem,
     I can produce a champion that will prove
     What is avouched there.
Stay till I have read the letter.
I was forbid it.
When time shall serve, let but the herald cry,
     And I'll appear again.
I will o'erlook thy paper.
To both these sisters have I sworn my love;  
     Each jealous of the other, as the stung
     Are of the adder.
Which of them shall I take?
To take the widow
     Exasperates, makes mad her sister Goneril;
     And hardly shall I carry out my side,
     Her husband being alive.
If ever I return to you again,
     I'll bring you comfort.
For thee, oppressed king, am I cast down;
     Myself could else outfrown false Fortune's frown.
When thou dost ask me blessing, I'll kneel down
     And ask of thee forgiveness.
Have I caught thee?
One step I have advanc'd thee.
I'll do't, my lord.
Mark- I say, instantly; and carry it so
     As I have set it down.
I cannot draw a cart, nor eat dried oats;
     If it be man's work, I'll do't.
Sir, I thought it fit
     To send the old and miserable King
     To some retention and appointed guard;
     Whose age has charms in it, whose title more,  
     To pluck the common bosom on his side
     And turn our impress'd lances in our eyes
     Which do command them.
With him I sent the Queen,
     My reason all the same; and they are ready
     To-morrow, or at further space, t' appear
     Where you shall hold your session.
Sir, by your patience,
     I hold you but a subject of this war,
     Not as a brother.
Lady, I am not well; else I should answer
     From a full-flowing stomach.
Witness the world that I create thee here
     My lord and master.
Edmund, I arrest thee
     On capital treason; and, in thine attaint,
     This gilded serpent [points to Goneril].
For your claim, fair
        sister,
     I bar it in the interest of my wife.
'Tis she is subcontracted to this lord,
     And I, her husband, contradict your banes.
I'll prove it on thy
        heart,
     Ere I taste bread, thou art in nothing less
     Than I have here proclaim'd thee.
[aside] If not, I'll ne'er trust medicine.
I will maintain
     My truth and honour firmly.
Yet am I noble as the adversary  
     I come to cope.
I protest-
     Maugre thy strength, youth, place, and eminence,
     Despite thy victor sword and fire-new fortune,
     Thy valour and thy heart- thou art a traitor;
     False to thy gods, thy brother, and thy father;
     Conspirant 'gainst this high illustrious prince;
     And from th' extremest upward of thy head
     To the descent and dust beneath thy foot,
     A most toad-spotted traitor.
Say thou 'no,'
     This sword, this arm, and my best spirits are bent
     To prove upon thy heart, whereto I speak,
     Thou liest.
In wisdom I should ask thy name;
     But since thy outside looks so fair and warlike,
     And that thy tongue some say of breeding breathes,
     What safe and nicely I might well delay
     By rule of knighthood, I disdain and spurn.
Back do I toss those treasons to thy head;
     With the hell-hated lie o'erwhelm thy heart;
     Which- for they yet glance by and scarcely bruise-
     This sword of mine shall give them instant way
     Where they shall rest for ever.
Shut your mouth, dame,
     Or with this paper shall I stop it.
I perceive you know it.
Say if I do- the laws are mine, not thine.
Ask me not what I know.
What, you have charg'd me with, that have I done,
     And more, much more.
'Tis past, and so am I.
If thou'rt noble,
     I do forgive thee.
I am no less in blood than thou art, Edmund;
     If more, the more th' hast wrong'd me.
The wheel is come full circle; I am here.
I must embrace thee.
Let sorrow split my heart if ever I
     Did hate thee, or thy father!
Worthy prince, I know't.
) taught me to shift
     Into a madman's rags, t' assume a semblance
     That very dogs disdain'd; and in this habit
     Met I my father with his bleeding rings,
     Their precious stones new lost; became his guide,  
     Led him, begg'd for him, sav'd him from despair;
     Never (O fault!
) reveal'd myself unto him
     Until some half hour past, when I was arm'd,
     Not sure, though hoping of this good success,
     I ask'd his blessing, and from first to last
     Told him my pilgrimage.
If there be more, more woful, hold it in;
     For I am almost ready to dissolve,
     Hearing of this.
Whilst I was big in clamour, came there a man,  
     Who, having seen me in my worst estate,
     Shunn'd my abhorr'd society; but then, finding
     Who 'twas that so endur'd, with his strong arms
     He fastened on my neck, and bellowed out
     As he'd burst heaven; threw him on my father;
     Told the most piteous tale of Lear and him
     That ever ear receiv'd; which in recounting
     His grief grew puissant, and the strings of life
     Began to crack.
Twice then the trumpets sounded,
     And there I left him tranc'd.
I was contracted to them both.
I am come
     To bid my king and master aye good night.
I pant for life.
Some good I mean to do,
     Despite of mine own nature.
Had I your tongues and eyes, I'ld use them so
     That heaven's vault should crack.
I know when one is dead, and when one lives.
If it be so,
     It is a chance which does redeem all sorrows
     That ever I have felt.
I might have sav'd her; now she's gone for ever!
I kill'd the slave that was a-hanging thee.
Did I not, fellow?
I have seen the day, with my good biting falchion
     I would have made them skip.
I am old now,
     And these same crosses spoil me.
I'll tell you straight.
He's a good fellow, I can tell you that.
No, my good lord; I am the very man-
  Lear.
I'll see that straight.
Ay, so I think.
Break, heart; I prithee break!
I have a journey, sir, shortly to go.
My master calls me; I must not say no.
>>



SCENE:
Navarre


ACT I.
SCENE I.
I am resolv'd; 'tis but a three years' fast.
The grosser manner of these world's delights
    He throws upon the gross world's baser slaves;
    To love, to wealth, to pomp, I pine and die,
    With all these living in philosophy.
I can but say their protestation over;
    So much, dear liege, I have already sworn,
    That is, to live and study here three years.
But there are other strict observances,
    As: not to see a woman in that term,  
    Which I hope well is not enrolled there;
    And one day in a week to touch no food,
    And but one meal on every day beside,
    The which I hope is not enrolled there;
    And then to sleep but three hours in the night
    And not be seen to wink of all the day-
    When I was wont to think no harm all night,
    And make a dark night too of half the day-
    Which I hope well is not enrolled there.
Let me say no, my liege, an if you please:
    I only swore to study with your Grace,
    And stay here in your court for three years' space.
By yea and nay, sir, then I swore in jest.
Come on, then; I will swear to study so,
    To know the thing I am forbid to know,
    As thus: to study where I well may dine,
    When I to feast expressly am forbid;
    Or study where to meet some mistress fine,
    When mistresses from common sense are hid;
    Or, having sworn too hard-a-keeping oath,
    Study to break it, and not break my troth.
Swear me to this, and I will ne'er say no.
Well, say I am; why should proud summer boast
    Before the birds have any cause to sing?
Why should I joy in any abortive birth?
At Christmas I no more desire a rose
    Than wish a snow in May's new-fangled shows;
    But like of each thing that in season grows;
    So you, to study now it is too late,
    Climb o'er the house to unlock the little gate.
No, my good lord; I have sworn to stay with you;
    And though I have for barbarism spoke more
    Than for that angel knowledge you can say,
    Yet confident I'll keep what I have swore,
    And bide the penance of each three years' day.
Give me the paper; let me read the same;
    And to the strictest decrees I'll write my name.
Marry, that did I.
If I break faith, this word shall speak for me:
    I am forsworn on mere necessity.
So to the laws at large I write my name;        [Subscribes]
    And he that breaks them in the least degree
    Stands in attainder of eternal shame.
Suggestions are to other as to me;
    But I believe, although I seem so loath,
    I am the last that will last keep his oath.
How you delight, my lords, I know not, I;
    But I protest I love to hear him lie,
    And I will use him for my minstrelsy.
I myself reprehend his own person, for I am his Grace's
    farborough; but I would see his own person in flesh and blood.
How low soever the matter, I hope in God for high words.
The manner of it is, I was taken with the manner.
In manner and form following, sir; all those three: I was
    seen with her in the manor-house, sitting with her upon the form,
    and taken following her into the park; which, put together, is in
    manner and form following.
Of other men's secrets, I beseech you.
[Reads] 'So it is, besieged with sable-coloured melancholy, I
    did commend the black oppressing humour to the most wholesome
    physic of thy health-giving air; and, as I am a gentleman, betook
    myself to walk.
which, I mean, I upon; it is ycleped thy park.
where, I mean, I did encounter that obscene
    and most prepost'rous event that draweth from my snow-white pen
    the ebon-coloured ink which here thou viewest, beholdest,
    surveyest, or seest.
There did I see that low-spirited swain,  
    that base minnow of thy mirth,'
  COSTARD.
'which, as I remember, hight Costard,'
  COSTARD.
'sorted and consorted, contrary to thy established proclaimed
    edict and continent canon; which, with, O, with- but with this I
    passion to say wherewith-'
  COSTARD.
Him I, as my ever-esteemed
    duty pricks me on, have sent to thee, to receive the meed of
    punishment, by thy sweet Grace's officer, Antony Dull, a man of
    good repute, carriage, bearing, and estimation.
Me, an't shall please you; I am Antony Dull.
'For Jaquenetta- so is the weaker vessel called, which I
    apprehended with the aforesaid swain- I keep her as a vessel of  
    thy law's fury; and shall, at the least of thy sweet notice,
    bring her to trial.
This is not so well as I look'd for, but the best that
    ever I heard.
Sir, I confess the wench.
I do confess much of the hearing it, but little of the
    marking of it.
I was taken with none, sir; I was taken with a damsel.
If it were, I deny her virginity; I was taken with a maid.
Sir, I will pronounce your sentence: you shall fast a week
    with bran and water.
I had rather pray a month with mutton and porridge.
I'll lay my head to any good man's hat
    These oaths and laws will prove an idle scorn.
I suffer for the truth, sir; for true it is I was taken
    with Jaquenetta, and Jaquenetta is a true girl; and therefore
    welcome the sour cup of prosperity!
I spoke it, tender juvenal, as a congruent epitheton
    appertaining to thy young days, which we may nominate tender.
And I, tough signior, as an appertinent title to your old
    time, which we may name tough.
I pretty, and my saying apt?
or I apt, and
    my saying pretty?
I will praise an eel with the same praise.
I do say thou art quick in answers; thou heat'st my blood.
I am answer'd, sir.
I love not to be cross'd.
I have promised to study three years with the Duke.
I am ill at reck'ning; it fitteth the spirit of a tapster.
I confess both; they are both the varnish of a complete
    man.
Then I am sure you know how much the gross sum of deuce-ace
    amounts to.
I will hereupon confess I am in love.
And as it is base for
    a soldier to love, so am I in love with a base wench.
If drawing
    my sword against the humour of affection would deliver me from
    the reprobate thought of it, I would take Desire prisoner, and
    ransom him to any French courtier for a new-devis'd curtsy.
I
    think scorn to sigh; methinks I should out-swear Cupid.
I do excel thee
    in my rapier as much as thou didst me in carrying gates.
I am in
    love too.
As I have read, sir; and the best of them too.
The world was very guilty of such a ballad some three ages
    since; but I think now 'tis not to be found; or if it were, it
    would neither serve for the writing nor the tune.
I will have that subject newly writ o'er, that I may
    example my digression by some mighty precedent.
Boy, I do love  
    that country girl that I took in the park with the rational hind
    Costard; she deserves well.
I say, sing.
For this damsel, I must keep her at
    the park; she is allow'd for the day-woman.
I do betray myself with blushing.
I will visit thee at the lodge.
I know where it is situate.
I will tell thee wonders.
I love thee.
So I heard you say.
Well, sir, I hope when I do it I shall do it on a full
    stomach.
I am more bound to you than your fellows, for they are but
    lightly rewarded.
Let me not be pent up, sir; I will fast, being loose.
Well, if ever I do see the merry days of desolation that I
    have seen, some shall see.
It is
    not for prisoners to be too silent in their words, and therefore
    I will say nothing.
I thank God I have as little patience as
    another man, and therefore I can be quiet.
I do affect the very ground, which is base, where her shoe,
    which is baser, guided by her foot, which is basest, doth tread.
I shall be forsworn- which is a great argument of falsehood- if I
    love.
Assist me, some
    extemporal god of rhyme, for I am sure I shall turn sonnet.
Devise, wit; write, pen; for I am for whole volumes in folio.
Beauty is bought by judgment of the eye,
    Not utt'red by base sale of chapmen's tongues;  
    I am less proud to hear you tell my worth
    Than you much willing to be counted wise
    In spending your wit in the praise of mine.
Proud of employment, willingly I go.
I know him, madam; at a marriage feast,
    Between Lord Perigort and the beauteous heir
    Of Jaques Falconbridge, solemnized
    In Normandy, saw I this Longaville.
I saw him at the Duke Alencon's once;
    And much too little of that good I saw
    Is my report to his great worthiness.
Another of these students at that time
    Was there with him, if I have heard a truth.
Berowne they call him; but a merrier man,
    Within the limit of becoming mirth,
    I never spent an hour's talk withal.
Navarre had notice of your fair approach,
    And he and his competitors in oath
    Were all address'd to meet you, gentle lady,
    Before I came.
Marry, thus much I have learnt:
    He rather means to lodge you in the field,
    Like one that comes here to besiege his court,
    Than seek a dispensation for his oath,
    To let you enter his unpeopled house.
'Fair' I give you back again; and 'welcome' I
    have not yet.
I will be welcome then; conduct me thither.
Hear me, dear lady: I have sworn an oath-
  PRINCESS OF FRANCE.
I hear your Grace hath sworn out house-keeping.
But pardon me, I am too sudden bold;
    To teach a teacher ill beseemeth me.
Madam, I will, if suddenly I may.
YOU Will the sooner that I were away,
    For you'll prove perjur'd if you make me stay.
Did not I dance with you in Brabant once?
Did not I dance with you in Brabant once?
I know you did.
Nay, then will I be gone.
I do protest I never heard of it;
    And, if you prove it, I'll repay it back
    Or yield up Aquitaine.
It shall suffice me; at which interview
    All liberal reason I will yield unto.
Thy own wish wish I thee in every place.
Lady, I will commend you to mine own heart.
Pray you, do my commendations;  
    I would be glad to see it.
I would you heard it groan.
I cannot stay thanksgiving.
Sir, I pray you, a word: what lady is that same?
I beseech you a word: what is she in the white?
I desire her name.
Her mother's, I have heard.
I was as willing to grapple as he was to board.
You sheep and I pasture- shall that finish the jest?
I'll give you Aquitaine and all that is his,
    An you give him for my sake but one loving kiss.
But to speak that in words which his eye hath disclos'd;
    I only have made a mouth of his eye,
    By adding a tongue which I know will not lie.
SCENE I.
Go, tenderness of years, take this key, give
    enlargement to the swain, bring him festinately hither; I must
    employ him in a letter to my love.
Almost I had.
And out of heart, master; all those three I will prove.
A man, if I live; and this, by, in, and without, upon the
    instant.
I am all these three.
But I go.
I say lead is slow.
He reputes me a cannon; and the bullet, that's he;
    I shoot thee at the swain.
Thump, then, and I flee.
By thy favour, sweet welkin, I must sigh in thy face;
    Most rude melancholy, valour gives thee place.
I will example it:
           The fox, the ape, and the humble-bee,  
           Were still at odds, being but three.
I will add the l'envoy.
Now will I begin your moral, and do you follow with my l'envoy.
True, and I for a plantain.
I will tell you sensibly.
Thou hast no feeling of it, Moth; I will speak that
      l'envoy.
I, Costard, running out, that was safely within,
    Fell over the threshold and broke my shin.
I will enfranchise thee.
I smell some l'envoy, some
    goose, in this.
By my sweet soul, I mean setting thee at liberty,
    enfreedoming thy person; thou wert immured, restrained,
    captivated, bound.
I give thee thy liberty, set thee from durance; and, in  
    lieu thereof, impose on thee nothing but this: bear this
    significant [giving a letter] to the country maid Jaquenetta;
    there is remuneration, for the best ward of mine honour is
    rewarding my dependents.
Like the sequel, I.
Exit MOTH
    Now will I look to his remuneration.
'- 'No, I'll give
    you a remuneration.
I will never buy and sell out of
    this word.
I thank your worship.
Stay, slave; I must employ thee.
As thou wilt win my favour, good my knave,
    Do one thing for me that I shall entreat.
Well, I will do it, sir; fare you well.
I shall know, sir, when I have done it.
I will come to your worship to-morrow morning.
I will do it,
    sir, in print.
And I, forsooth, in love; I, that have been love's whip;
    A very beadle to a humorous sigh;
    A critic, nay, a night-watch constable;
    A domineering pedant o'er the boy,
    Than whom no mortal so magnificent!
And I to be a corporal of his field,
    And wear his colours like a tumbler's hoop!
I love, I sue, I seek a wife-
    A woman, that is like a German clock,
    Still a-repairing, ever out of frame,
    And never going aright, being a watch,
    But being watch'd that it may still go right!
And I to sigh for her!
Well, I will love, write, sigh, pray, sue, and groan:
    Some men must love my lady, and some Joan.
SCENE I.
I know not; but I think it was not he.
I thank my beauty I am fair that shoot,
    And thereupon thou speak'st the fairest shoot.
Pardon me, madam, for I meant not so.
Now mercy goes to kill,
    And shooting well is then accounted ill;
    Thus will I save my credit in the shoot:
    Not wounding, pity would not let me do't;
    If wounding, then it was to show my skill,
    That more for praise than purpose meant to kill.
And, out of question, so it is sometimes:
    Glory grows guilty of detested crimes,
    When, for fame's sake, for praise, an outward part,
    We bend to that the working of the heart;  
    As I for praise alone now seek to spill
    The poor deer's blood that my heart means no ill.
I have a letter from Monsieur Berowne to one
    Lady Rosaline.
I am bound to serve.
We will read it, I swear.
I am the king, for so
    stands the comparison; thou the beggar, for so witnesseth thy
    lowliness.
Shall I command thy love?
I may.
Shall I enforce thy
    love?
I could.
Shall I entreat thy love?
I will.
Thus expecting thy reply, I profane my lips on thy foot, my
    eyes on thy picture, and my heart on thy every part.
I am much deceived but I remember the style.
I told you: my lord.
Shall I teach you to know?
Well then, I am the shooter.
Have I hit her now?
Shall I come upon thee with an old saying, that was a man
    when King Pepin of France was a little boy, as touching the hit  
    it?
So I may answer thee with one as old, that was a woman when
    Queen Guinever of Britain was a little wench, as touching the hit
    it.
An I cannot, cannot, cannot,
            An I cannot, another can.
I' faith, your hand is out.
I fear too much rubbing; good-night, my good owl.
how the ladies and I have put him down!
Truly, Master Holofernes, the epithets are sweetly
    varied, like a scholar at the least; but, sir, I assure ye it was
    a buck of the first head.
I Said the deer was not a haud credo; 'twas a pricket.
But, omne bene, say I, being of an old father's mind:
    Many can brook the weather that love not the wind.
I say th' allusion holds in
    the exchange.
And I say the polusion holds in the exchange; for the moon is
    never but a month old; and I say, beside, that 'twas a pricket
    that the Princess kill'd.
I Will something affect the letter, for it argues
    facility.
Of one sore I an hundred make by adding but one more L.
This is a gift that I have, simple, simple; a foolish
    extravagant spirit, full of forms, figures, shapes, objects,
    ideas, apprehensions, motions, revolutions.
But the gift is good in
    those in whom it is acute, and I am thankful for it.
Sir, I praise the Lord for you, and so may my
    parishioners; for their sons are well tutor'd by you, and their
    daughters profit very greatly under you.
Mehercle, if their sons be ingenious, they shall want
    no instruction; if their daughters be capable, I will put it to
    them; but, vir sapit qui pauca loquitur.
I
    beseech you read it.
I may speak of thee as
    the traveller doth of Venice:
                   Venetia, Venetia,
                   Chi non ti vede, non ti pretia.
[Reads] 'If love make me forsworn, how shall I swear to
      love?
Though to myself forsworn, to thee I'll faithful prove;
    Those thoughts to me were oaks, to thee like osiers bowed.
If knowledge be the mark, to know thee shall suffice;  
    Well learned is that tongue that well can thee commend;
    All ignorant that soul that sees thee without wonder;
    Which is to me some praise that I thy parts admire.
I will overglance the superscript: 'To the snow-white
    hand of the most beauteous Lady Rosaline.
' I will look again on
    the intellect of the letter, for the nomination of the party  
    writing to the person written unto: 'Your Ladyship's in all
    desired employment, Berowne.
Stay not thy compliment; I forgive thy duty.
Sir, tell not me of the father; I do fear colourable
    colours.
I do dine to-day at the father's of a certain pupil of
    mine; where, if, before repast, it shall please you to gratify
    the table with a grace, I will, on my privilege I have with the
    parents of the foresaid child or pupil, undertake your ben  
    venuto; where I will prove those verses to be very unlearned,
    neither savouring of poetry, wit, nor invention.
I beseech your
    society.
[To DULL] Sir, I do invite you too; you shall not say me nay:
    pauca verba.
The King he is hunting the deer: I am coursing myself.
They have pitch'd a toil: I am tolling in a pitch- pitch that
    defiles.
' for
    so they say the fool said, and so say I, and I am the fool.
By the Lord, this love is as mad as Ajax: it kills
    sheep; it kills me- I a sheep.
I
    will not love; if I do, hang me.
I' faith, I will not.
By this light, but for her eye, I would not love her- yes,
    for her two eyes.
Well, I do nothing in the world but lie, and
    lie in my throat.
By heaven, I do love; and it hath taught me to
    rhyme, and to be melancholy; and here is part of my rhyme, and
    here my melancholy.
By the world, I would not
    care a pin if the other three were in.
Thou shin'st in every tear that I do weep;
      No drop but as a coach doth carry thee;
      So ridest thou triumphing in my woe.
I'll drop the paper-
    Sweet leaves, shade folly.
Ay me, I am forsworn!
In love, I hope; sweet fellowship in shame!
Am I the first that have been perjur'd so?
I could put thee in comfort: not by two that I know;
    Thou makest the triumviry, the corner-cap of society,
    The shape of Love's Tyburn that hangs up simplicity.
I fear these stubborn lines lack power to move.
These numbers will I tear, and write in prose.
A woman I forswore; but I will prove,
      Thou being a goddess, I forswore not thee:
      My vow was earthly, thou a heavenly love;
      Thy grace being gain'd cures all disgrace in me.
By whom shall I send this?
Like a demigod here sit I in the sky,
    And wretched fools' secrets heedfully o'er-eye.
O heavens, I have my wish!
Stoop, I say;  
    Her shoulder is with child.
O that I had my wish!
And I had mine!
And I mine too,.
Amen, so I had mine!
I would forget her; but a fever she
    Reigns in my blood, and will rememb'red be.
Once more I'll read the ode that I have writ.
Once more I'll mark how love can vary wit.
"Air," quoth he "thy cheeks may blow;
        Air, would I might triumph so!
Do not call it sin in me
        That I am forsworn for thee;
        Thou for whom Jove would swear
        Juno but an Ethiope were;
        And deny himself for Jove,
        Turning mortal for thy love.
"'
    This will I send; and something else more plain
    That shall express my true love's fasting pain.
[Advancing] Dumain, thy love is far from charity,
    That in love's grief desir'st society;
    You may look pale, but I should blush, I know,
    To be o'erheard and taken napping so.
I have been closely shrouded in this bush,
    And mark'd you both, and for you both did blush.
I heard your guilty rhymes, observ'd your fashion,
    Saw sighs reek from you, noted well your passion.
For all the wealth that ever I did see,
    I would not have him know so much by me.
[Descending] Now step I forth to whip hypocrisy,
    Ah, good my liege, I pray thee pardon me.
You found his mote; the King your mote did see;
    But I a beam do find in each of three.
O, what a scene of fool'ry have I seen,
    Of sighs, of groans, of sorrow, and of teen!
O, me, with what strict patience have I sat,
    To see a king transformed to a gnat!
Not you by me, but I betrayed to you.
I that am honest, I that hold it sin
    To break the vow I am engaged in;
    I am betrayed by keeping company
    With men like you, men of inconstancy.
When shall you hear that I
    Will praise a hand, a foot, a face, an eye,
    A gait, a state, a brow, a breast, a waist,  
    A leg, a limb-
  KING.
I post from love; good lover, let me go.
I beseech your Grace, let this letter be read;
    Our person misdoubts it: 'twas treason, he said.
I confess, I confess.
- and I
    Are pick-purses in love, and we deserve to die.
O, dismiss this audience, and I shall tell you more.
My eyes are then no eyes, nor I Berowne.
That I may swear beauty doth beauty lack,  
    If that she learn not of her eye to look.
'Twere good yours did; for, sir, to tell you plain,
    I'll find a fairer face not wash'd to-day.
I'll prove her fair, or talk till doomsday here.
I never knew man hold vile stuff so dear.
From women's eyes this doctrine I derive:
    They are the ground, the books, the academes,
    From whence doth spring the true Promethean fire.
From women's eyes this doctrine I derive.
SCENE I.
I praise God for you, sir.
I did converse this quondam
    day with a companion of the King's who is intituled, nominated,
    or called, Don Adriano de Armado.
He is too picked, too spruce, too affected, too odd,
    as it were, too peregrinate, as I may call it.
I abhor such fanatical phantasimes,
    such insociable and point-devise companions; such rackers of  
    orthography, as to speak 'dout' fine, when he should say 'doubt';
    'det' when he should pronounce 'debt'- d, e, b, t, not d, e, t.
I
    marvel thy master hath not eaten thee for a word, for thou are
    not so long by the head as honorificabilitudinitatibus; thou art
    easier swallowed than a flap-dragon.
The third of the five vowels, if You repeat them; or the
    fifth, if I.
I will repeat them: a, e, I-
  MOTH.
Lend me your horn to make one, and I will whip about your
    infamy circum circa- a gig of a cuckold's horn.
An I had but one penny in the world, thou shouldst have it
    to buy ginger-bread.
Hold, there is the very remuneration I had
    of thy master, thou halfpenny purse of wit, thou pigeon-egg of
    discretion.
O, I smell false Latin; 'dunghill' for unguem.
I do, sans question.
The word is well
    cull'd, chose, sweet, and apt, I do assure you, sir, I do assure.
Sir, the King is a noble gentleman, and my familiar, I do
    assure ye, very good friend.
I do beseech thee, remember thy courtesy.
I beseech
    thee, apparel thy head.
And among other importunate and most
    serious designs, and of great import indeed, too- but let that
    pass; for I must tell thee it will please his Grace, by the
    world, sometime to lean upon my poor shoulder, and with his royal
    finger thus dally with my excrement, with my mustachio; but,
    sweet heart, let that pass.
By the world, I recount no fable:
    some certain special honours it pleaseth his greatness to impart
    to Armado, a soldier, a man of travel, that hath seen the world;
    but let that pass.
The very all of all is- but, sweet heart, I do
    implore secrecy- that the King would have me present the
    Princess, sweet chuck, with some delightful ostentation, or show,
    or pageant, or antic, or firework.
Now, understanding that the
    curate and your sweet self are good at such eruptions and sudden
    breaking-out of mirth, as it were, I have acquainted you withal,  
    to the end to crave your assistance.
Sir Nathaniel, as concerning some entertainment of time, some
    show in the posterior of this day, to be rend'red by our
    assistance, the King's command, and this most gallant,
    illustrate, and learned gentleman, before the Princess- I say
    none so fit as to present the Nine Worthies.
Shall I have audience?
He shall present Hercules in
    minority: his enter and exit shall be strangling a snake; and I
    will have an apology for that purpose.
I will play three myself.
Shall I tell you a thing?
I beseech you,
    follow.
I'll make one in a dance, or so, or I will play
    On the tabor to the Worthies, and let them dance the hay.
Look you what I have from the loving King.
You'll mar the light by taking it in snuff;
    Therefore I'll darkly end the argument.
Indeed, I weigh not you; and therefore light.
I would you knew.
Nay, I have verses too, I thank Berowne;
    The numbers true, and, were the numb'ring too,
    I were the fairest goddess on the ground.
I am compar'd to twenty thousand fairs.
and I beshrew all shrows!
I think no less.
Ay, or I would these hands might never part.
That same Berowne I'll torture ere I go.
O that I knew he were but in by th' week!
How I would make him fawn, and beg, and seek,
    And wait the season, and observe the times,
    And spend his prodigal wits in bootless rhymes,
    And shape his service wholly to my hests,
    And make him proud to make me proud that jests!
So pertaunt-like would I o'ersway his state
    That he should be my fool, and I his fate.
O, I am stabb'd with laughter!
Under the cool shade of a sycamore  
    I thought to close mine eyes some half an hour;
    When, lo, to interrupt my purpos'd rest,
    Toward that shade I might behold addrest
    The King and his companions; warily
    I stole into a neighbour thicket by,
    And overheard what you shall overhear-
    That, by and by, disguis'd they will be here.
'
    The boy replied 'An angel is not evil;
    I should have fear'd her had she been a devil.
They do, they do, and are apparell'd thus,
    Like Muscovites or Russians, as I guess.
Therefore I do it; and I make no doubt
    The rest will ne'er come in, if he be out.
Thus change I like the moon.
Yet still she is the Moon, and I the Man.
I am best pleas'd with that.
Since you can cog, I'll play no more with you.
Please it you,
    As much in private, and I'll bid adieu.
I know the reason, lady, why you ask.
Quickly, sir; I long.
No, I'll not be your half.
One word in private with you ere I die.
'No point' quoth I; my servant straight was mute.
Lord Longaville said I came o'er his heart;
    And trow you what he call'd me?
I will; and so will she, I know, my lord.
'Fair' in 'all hail' is foul, as I conceive.
Then wish me better; I will give you leave.
This field shall hold me, and so hold your vow:
    Nor God, nor I, delights in perjur'd men.
Now by my maiden honour, yet as pure
    As the unsullied lily, I protest,
    A world of torments though I should endure,
    I would not yield to be your house's guest;
    So much I hate a breaking cause to be
    Of heavenly oaths, vowed with integrity.
Not so, my lord; it is not so, I swear;
    We have had pastimes here, and pleasant game;
    A mess of Russians left us but of late.
I dare not call them fools; but this I think,
    When they are thirsty, fools would fain have drink.
I am a fool, and full of poverty.
O, I am yours, and all that I possess.
I cannot give you less.
Sea-sick, I think, coming from Muscovy.
Here stand I, lady- dart thy skill at me,
    Bruise me with scorn, confound me with a flout,
    Thrust thy sharp wit quite through my ignorance,
    Cut me to pieces with thy keen conceit;
    And I will wish thee never more to dance,
    Nor never more in Russian habit wait.
O, never will I trust to speeches penn'd,
    Nor to the motion of a school-boy's tongue,
    Nor never come in vizard to my friend,
    Nor woo in rhyme, like a blind harper's song.
I do forswear them; and I here protest,
    By this white glove- how white the hand, God knows!
Sans 'sans,' I pray you.
Yet I have a trick
    Of the old rage; bear with me, I am sick;
    I'll leave it by degrees.
These lords are visited; you are not free,
    For the Lord's tokens on you do I see.
Peace; for I will not have to do with you.
Nor shall not, if I do as I intend.
Madam, I was.
I was, fair madam.
That more than all the world I did respect her.
Despise me when I break this oath of mine.
I will; and therefore keep it.
By my life, my troth,
    I never swore this lady such an oath.
My faith and this the Princess I did give;
    I knew her by this jewel on her sleeve.
Pardon me, sir, this jewel did she wear;
    And Lord Berowne, I thank him, is my dear.
Neither of either; I remit both twain.
I see the trick on't: here was a consent,
    Knowing aforehand of our merriment,
    To dash it like a Christmas comedy.
Peace; I have done.
Not so, sir; under correction, sir,
    I hope it is not so.
You cannot beg us, sir, I can assure you, sir; we know what we
      know;
    I hope, sir, three times thrice, sir-
  BEROWNE.
By Jove, I always took three threes for nine.
For mine own part, I am, as they
    say, but to parfect one man in one poor man, Pompion the Great,
    sir.
It pleased them to think me worthy of Pompey the Great;
    for mine own part, I know not the degree of the Worthy; but I am
    to stand for him.
I say they shall not come.
Anointed, I implore so much expense of thy royal sweet
    breath as will utter a brace of words.
That is all one, my fair, sweet, honey monarch; for, I
    protest, the schoolmaster is exceeding fantastical; too too vain,
    too too vain; but we will put it, as they say, to fortuna de la
    guerra.
I wish you the peace of mind, most royal couplement!
I Pompey am-
  BEROWNE.
I Pompey am-
  BOYET.
Well said, old mocker; I must needs be friends with thee.
I Pompey am, Pompey surnam'd the Big-  
   DUMAIN.
Pompey surnam'd the Great,
    That oft in field, with targe and shield, did make my foe to
      sweat;
    And travelling along this coast, I bere am come by chance,
    And lay my arms before the legs of this sweet lass of France.
If your ladyship would say 'Thanks, Pompey,' I had done.
'Tis not so much worth; but I hope I was perfect.
I made a little fault in Great.
When in the world I liv'd, I was the world's commander;
    By east, west, north, and south, I spread my conquering might.
My scutcheon plain declares that I am Alisander-
  BOYET.
When in the world I liv'd, I was the world's commander-
  BOYET.
Quoniam he seemeth in minority,
    Ergo I come with this apology.
[MOTH retires]
    Judas I am-
  DUMAIN.
Judas I am, ycliped Maccabaeus.
Judas I am-
  DUMAIN.
I will not be put out of countenance.
Though my mocks come home by me, I will now be merry.
I think Hector was not so clean-timber'd.
I am that flower-
  DUMAIN.
I must rather give it the rein, for it runs against
    Hector.
But  
    I will forward with my device.
I do adore thy sweet Grace's slipper.
By the North Pole, I do challenge thee.
I will not fight with a pole, like a Northern man; I'll
    slash; I'll do it by the sword.
I bepray you, let me borrow my
    arms again.
I'll do it in my shirt.
Gentlemen and soldiers, pardon me; I will not combat in my  
    shirt.
Sweet bloods, I both may and will.
The naked truth of it is: I have no shirt; I go woolward
    for penance.
True, and it was enjoined him in Rome for want of linen;
    since when, I'll be sworn, he wore none but a dishclout of
    Jaquenetta's, and that 'a wears next his heart for a favour.
I am sorry, madam; for the news I bring
    Is heavy in my tongue.
For mine own part, I breathe free breath.
I have seen the
    day of wrong through the little hole of discretion, and I will
    right myself like a soldier.
Boyet, prepare; I will away to-night.
Madam, not so; I do beseech you stay.
Prepare, I say.
I thank you, gracious lords,
    For all your fair endeavours, and entreat,
    Out of a new-sad soul, that you vouchsafe
    In your rich wisdom to excuse or hide
    The liberal opposition of our spirits,
    If over-boldly we have borne ourselves
    In the converse of breath- your gentleness
    Was guilty of it.
I understand you not; my griefs are double.
No, no, my lord, your Grace is perjur'd much,
    Full of dear guiltiness; and therefore this,
    If for my love, as there is no such cause,
    You will do aught- this shall you do for me:
    Your oath I will not trust; but go with speed
    To some forlorn and naked hermitage,
    Remote from all the pleasures of the world;
    There stay until the twelve celestial signs
    Have brought about the annual reckoning.
If this austere insociable life
    Change not your offer made in heat of blood,  
    If frosts and fasts, hard lodging and thin weeds,
    Nip not the gaudy blossoms of your love,
    But that it bear this trial, and last love,
    Then, at the expiration of the year,
    Come, challenge me, challenge me by these deserts;
    And, by this virgin palm now kissing thine,
    I will be thine; and, till that instant, shut
    My woeful self up in a mournful house,
    Raining the tears of lamentation
    For the remembrance of my father's death.
If this, or more than this, I would deny,
    To flatter up these powers of mine with rest,
    The sudden hand of death close up mine eye!
A beard, fair health, and honesty;
    With threefold love I wish you all these three.
O, shall I say I thank you, gentle wife?
No so, my lord; a twelvemonth and a day
    I'll mark no words that smooth-fac'd wooers say.
Come when the King doth to my lady come;
    Then, if I have much love, I'll give you some.
I'll serve thee true and faithfully till then.
At the twelvemonth's end
    I'll change my black gown for a faithful friend.
I'll stay with patience; but the time is long.
Oft have I heard of you, my Lord Berowne,
    Before I saw you; and the world's large tongue
    Proclaims you for a man replete with mocks,
    Full of comparisons and wounding flouts,
    Which you on all estates will execute
    That lie within the mercy of your wit.
To weed this wormwood from your fruitful brain,
    And therewithal to win me, if you please,
    Without the which I am not to be won,
    You shall this twelvemonth term from day to day
    Visit the speechless sick, and still converse
    With groaning wretches; and your task shall be,
    With all the fierce endeavour of your wit,
    To enforce the pained impotent to smile.
A jest's prosperity lies in the ear
    Of him that hears it, never in the tongue
    Of him that makes it; then, if sickly ears,
    Deaf'd with the clamours of their own dear groans,
    Will hear your idle scorns, continue then,
    And I will have you and that fault withal.
But if they will not, throw away that spirit,
    And I shall find you empty of that fault,
    Right joyful of your reformation.
Well, befall what will befall,
    I'll jest a twelvemonth in an hospital.
[ To the King] Ay, sweet my lord, and so I take
    my leave.
I will kiss thy royal finger, and take leave.
I am a
    votary: I have vow'd to Jaquenetta to hold the plough for her
    sweet love three year.
>>



SCENE: Scotland and England


ACT I.
SCENE I.
I come, Graymalkin.
If I say sooth, I must report they were
    As cannons overcharged with double cracks,
    So they
    Doubly redoubled strokes upon the foe.
Except they meant to bathe in reeking wounds,
    Or memorize another Golgotha,
    I cannot tell-
    But I am faint; my gashes cry for help.
I'll see it done.
"Give me," quoth I.
Her husband's to Aleppo gone, master the Tiger;
    But in a sieve I'll thither sail,
    And, like a rat without a tail,
    I'll do, I'll do, and I'll do.
I'll give thee a wind.
And I another.
I myself have all the other,
    And the very ports they blow,
    All the quarters that they know
    I' the shipman's card.
I will drain him dry as hay:
    Sleep shall neither night nor day
    Hang upon his penthouse lid;
    He shall live a man forbid.
Look what I have.
Here I have a pilot's thumb,
    Wreck'd as homeward he did come.
So foul and fair a day I have not seen.
I' the name of truth,
    Are ye fantastical or that indeed  
    Which outwardly ye show?
By Sinel's death I know I am Thane of Glamis;
    But how of Cawdor?
Speak, I charge you.
Whether he was combined
    With those of Norway, or did line the rebel
    With hidden help and vantage, or that with both
    He labor'd in his country's wreck, I know not;
    But treasons capital, confess'd and proved,
    Have overthrown him.
But 'tis strange;  
    And oftentimes, to win us to our harm,
    The instruments of darkness tell us truths,
    Win us with honest trifles, to betray's
    In deepest consequence-
    Cousins, a word, I pray you.
] Two truths are told,
    As happy prologues to the swelling act
    Of the imperial theme-I thank you, gentlemen.
I am Thane of Cawdor.
If good, why do I yield to that suggestion
    Whose horrid image doth unfix my hair
    And make my seated heart knock at my ribs,
    Against the use of nature?
Kind gentlemen, your pains
    Are register'd where every day I turn
    The leaf to read them.
But I have spoke
    With one that saw him die, who did report
    That very frankly he confess'd his treasons,
    Implored your Highness' pardon, and set forth
    A deep repentance.
There's no art
    To find the mind's construction in the face:
    He was a gentleman on whom I built
    An absolute trust.
Only I have left to say,
    More is thy due than more than all can pay.
I have begun to plant thee, and will labor
    To make thee full of growing.
There if I grow,
    The harvest is your own.
I'll be myself the harbinger, and make joyful
    The hearing of my wife with your approach;
    So humbly take my leave.
That is a step
    On which I must fall down, or else o'erleap,
    For in my way it lies.
He is full so valiant,
    And in his commendations I am fed;
    It is a banquet to me.
"They met me in the day of success, and I have
    learned by the perfectest report they have more in them than
    mortal knowledge.
When I burned in desire to question them
    further, they made themselves air, into which they vanished.
Whiles I stood rapt in the wonder of it, came missives from the
    King, who all-hailed me 'Thane of Cawdor'; by which title,
    before, these weird sisters saluted me and referred me to the
    coming on of time with 'Hail, King that shalt be!
' This have I
    thought good to deliver thee, my dearest partner of greatness,
    that thou mightst not lose the dues of rejoicing, by being
    ignorant of what greatness is promised thee.
Yet do I fear thy nature.
" Hie thee hither,
    That I may pour my spirits in thine ear,
    And chastise with the valor of my tongue
    All that impedes thee from the golden round,
    Which fate and metaphysical aid doth seem
    To have thee crown'd withal.
Thy letters have transported me beyond
    This ignorant present, and I feel now
    The future in the instant.
No jutty, frieze,
    Buttress, nor coign of vantage, but this bird
    Hath made his pendant bed and procreant cradle;
    Where they most breed and haunt, I have observed
    The air is delicate.
Herein I teach you
    How you shall bid God 'ield us for your pains,
    And thank us for your trouble.
He's here in double trust:
    First, as I am his kinsman and his subject,
    Strong both against the deed; then, as his host,
    Who should against his murtherer shut the door,  
    Not bear the knife myself.
I have no spur
    To prick the sides of my intent, but only
    Vaulting ambition, which o'erleaps itself
    And falls on the other.
We will proceed no further in this business:
    He hath honor'd me of late, and I have bought
    Golden opinions from all sorts of people,
    Which would be worn now in their newest gloss,
    Not cast aside so soon.
From this time
    Such I account thy love.
Wouldst thou have that
    Which thou esteem'st the ornament of life
    And live a coward in thine own esteem,
    Letting "I dare not" wait upon "I would"
    Like the poor cat i' the adage?
I dare do all that may become a man;
    Who dares do more is none.
I have given suck and know
    How tender 'tis to love the babe that milks me-
    I would, while it was smiling in my face,
    Have pluck'd my nipple from his boneless gums
    And dash'd the brains out had I so sworn as you
    Have done to this.
When Duncan is asleep-
    Whereto the rather shall his day's hard journey
    Soundly invite him- his two chamberlains
    Will I with wine and wassail so convince
    That memory, the warder of the brain,  
    Shall be a fume and the receipt of reason
    A limbeck only.
When in swinish sleep
    Their drenched natures lie as in a death,
    What cannot you and I perform upon
    The unguarded Duncan?
I am settled and bend up
    Each corporal agent to this terrible feat.
SCENE I.
The moon is down; I have not heard the clock.
I take't 'tis later, sir.
A heavy summons lies like lead upon me,
    And yet I would not sleep.
I dreamt last night of the three weird sisters:
    To you they have show'd some truth.
I think not of them;
    Yet, when we can entreat an hour to serve,
    We would spend it in some words upon that business,
    If you would grant the time.
So I lose none
    In seeking to augment it, but still keep  
    My bosom franchised and allegiance clear,
    I shall be counsel'd.
Is this a dagger which I see before me,
    The handle toward my hand?
I have thee not, and yet I see thee still.
I see thee yet, in form as palpable
    As this which now I draw.
Thou marshal'st me the way that I was going,
    And such an instrument I was to use.
I see thee still,  
    And on thy blade and dudgeon gouts of blood,
    Which was not so before.
Whiles I threat, he lives;
    Words to the heat of deeds too cold breath gives.
I go, and it is done; the bell invites me.
I have drugg'd their possets
    That death and nature do contend about them,
    Whether they live or die.
Alack, I am afraid they have awaked
    And 'tis not done.
I laid their daggers ready;
    He could not miss 'em.
Had he not resembled
    My father as he slept, I had done't.
I have done the deed.
I heard the owl scream and the crickets cry.
As I descended?
I stood and heard them,
    But they did say their prayers and address'd them
    Again to sleep.
Listening their fear, I could not say "Amen,"
    When they did say, "God bless us!
But wherefore could not I pronounce "Amen"?
I had most need of blessing, and "Amen"
    Stuck in my throat.
I heard a voice cry, "Sleep no more!
I'll go no more.
I am afraid to think what I have done;
    Look on't again I dare not.
If he do bleed,
    I'll gild the faces of the grooms withal,
    For it must seem their guilt.
My hands are of your color, but I shame
    To wear a heart so white.
] I hear knocking
    At the south entry.
I would thou couldst!
I'll
    devil-porter it no further.
I had thought to have let in some of
    all professions, that go the primrose way to the everlasting
    bonfire.
I pray you, remember the  
    porter.
I believe drink gave thee the lie last night.
That it did, sir, i' the very throat on me; but requited
    him for his lie, and, I think, being too strong for him, though  
    he took up my legs sometime, yet I made shift to cast him.
He did command me to call timely on him;
    I have almost slipp'd the hour.
I'll bring you to him.
I know this is a joyful trouble to you,
    But yet 'tis one.
MACDUFF I'll make so bold to call,
    For 'tis my limited service.
O gentle lady,
    'Tis not for you to hear what I can speak:
    The repetition in a woman's ear
    Would murther as it fell.
Dear Duff, I prithee, contradict thyself,
    And say it is not so.
Had I but died an hour before this chance,  
    I had lived a blessed time, for from this instant
    There's nothing serious in mortality.
O, yet I do repent me of my fury,
    That I did kill them.
In the great hand of God I stand, and thence
    Against the undivulged pretense I fight
    Of treasonous malice.
And so do I.
I'll to England.
To Ireland, I; our separated fortune
    Shall keep us both the safer.
Threescore and ten I can remember well,
    Within the volume of which time I have seen
    Hours dreadful and things strange, but this sore night
    Hath trifled former knowings.
No, cousin, I'll to Fife.
Well, I will thither.
SCENE I.
Thou hast it now: King, Cawdor, Glamis, all,
    As the weird women promised, and I fear
    Thou play'dst most foully for't; yet it was said
    It should not stand in thy posterity,
    But that myself should be the root and father
    Of many kings.
Tonight we hold a solemn supper, sir,
    And I'll request your presence.
Go not my horse the better,
    I must become a borrower of the night
    For a dark hour or twain.
My lord, I will not.
I wish your horses swift and sure of foot,
    And so I do commend you to their backs.
There is none but he
    Whose being I do fear; and under him
    My genius is rebuked, as it is said
    Mark Antony's was by Caesar.
If't be so,
    For Banquo's issue have I filed my mind,
    For them the gracious Duncan have I murther'd,
    Put rancors in the vessel of my peace
    Only for them, and mine eternal jewel  
    Given to the common enemy of man,
    To make them kings -the seed of Banquo kings!
This I made good to you
    In our last conference, pass'd in probation with you:
    How you were borne in hand, how cross'd, the instruments,
    Who wrought with them, and all things else that might
    To half a soul and to a notion crazed  
    Say, "Thus did Banquo.
I did so, and went further, which is now
    Our point of second meeting.
Now if you have a station in the file,
    Not i' the worst rank of manhood, say it,
    And I will put that business in your bosoms
    Whose execution takes your enemy off,
    Grapples you to the heart and love of us,
    Who wear our health but sickly in his life,
    Which in his death were perfect.
I am one, my liege,
    Whom the vile blows and buffets of the world
    Have so incensed that I am reckless what
    I do to spite the world.
And I another
    So weary with disasters, tugg'd with fortune,
    That I would set my life on any chance,
    To mend it or be rid on't.
So is he mine, and in such bloody distance
    That every minute of his being thrusts  
    Against my near'st of life; and though I could
    With barefaced power sweep him from my sight
    And bid my will avouch it, yet I must not,
    For certain friends that are both his and mine,
    Whose loves I may not drop, but wail his fall
    Who I myself struck down.
And thence it is
    That I to your assistance do make love,
    Masking the business from the common eye
    For sundry weighty reasons.
Within this hour at most
    I will advise you where to plant yourselves,
    Acquaint you with the perfect spy o' the time,
    The moment on't; fort must be done tonight
    And something from the palace (always thought
    That I require a clearness); and with him-
    To leave no rubs nor botches in the work-
    Fleance his son, that keeps him company,  
    Whose absence is no less material to me
    Than is his father's, must embrace the fate
    Of that dark hour.
Resolve yourselves apart;
    I'll come to you anon.
I'll call upon you straight.
Say to the King I would attend his leisure
    For a few words.
Madam, I will.
So shall I, love, and so, I pray, be you.
I hear horses.
Both sides are even; here I'll sit i' the midst.
My lord, his throat is cut; that I did for him.
I had else been perfect,
    Whole as the marble, founded as the rock,
    As broad and general as the casing air;
    But now I am cabin'd, cribb'd, confin'd, bound in
    To saucy doubts and fears -But Banquo's safe?
Here had we now our country's honor roof'd,
    Were the graced person of our Banquo present,
    Who may I rather challenge for unkindness  
    Than pity for mischance!
Thou canst not say I did it; never shake
    Thy gory locks at me.
Why, what care I?
If I stand here, I saw him.
I do forget.
I have a strange infirmity, which is nothing
    To those that know me.
Come, love and health to all;
    Then I'll sit down.
I drink to the general joy o' the whole table,
    And to our dear friend Banquo, whom we miss.
What man dare, I dare.
If trembling I inhabit then, protest me
    The baby of a girl.
Why, so, being gone,
    I am a man again.
You make me strange
    Even to the disposition that I owe
    When now I think you can behold such sights
    And keep the natural ruby of your cheeks
    When mine is blanch'd with fear.
I pray you, speak not; he grows worse and worse;
    Question enrages him.
I hear it by the way, but I will send.
There's not a one of them but in his house
    I keep a servant feed.
I will tomorrow,
    And betimes I will, to the weird sisters.
More shall they speak; for now I am bent to know,
    By the worst means, the worst.
I am in blood
    Stepp'd in so far that, should I wade no more,
    Returning were as tedious as go o'er.
Strange things I have in head that will to hand,
    Which must be acted ere they may be scann'd.
Have I not reason, beldams as you are,
    Saucy and overbold?
How did you dare
    To trade and traffic with Macbeth
    In riddles and affairs of death,
    And I, the mistress of your charms,
    The close contriver of all harms,
    Was never call'd to bear my part,
    Or show the glory of our art?
I am for the air; this night I'll spend
    Unto a dismal and a fatal end.
Great business must be wrought ere noon:
    Upon the corner of the moon
    There hangs a vaporous drop profound;
    I'll catch it ere it come to ground.
I am call'd; my little spirit, see,
    Sits in a foggy cloud and stays for me.
My former speeches have but hit your thoughts,
    Which can interpret farther; only I say
    Thing's have been strangely borne.
So that, I say,
    He has borne all things well; and I do think  
    That, had he Duncan's sons under his key-
    As, an't please heaven, he shall not -they should find
    What 'twere to kill a father; so should Fleance.
For from broad words, and 'cause he fail'd
    His presence at the tyrant's feast, I hear,
    Macduff lives in disgrace.
He did, and with an absolute "Sir, not I,"
    The cloudy messenger turns me his back,
    And hums, as who should say, "You'll rue the time
    That clogs me with this answer.
I'll send my prayers with him.
SCENE I.
I commend your pains,
    And everyone shall share i' the gains.
I conjure you, by that which you profess
    (Howeer you come to know it) answer me:
    Though you untie the winds and let them fight
    Against the churches, though the yesty waves
    Confound and swallow navigation up,
    Though bladed corn be lodged and trees blown down,
    Though castles topple on their warders' heads,
    Though palaces and pyramids do slope
    Their heads to their foundations, though the treasure
    Of nature's germaines tumble all together
    Even till destruction sicken, answer me
    To what I ask you.
Had I three ears, I'd hear thee.
What need I fear of thee?
But yet I'll make assurance double sure,
    And take a bond of fate: thou shalt not live,
    That I may tell pale-hearted fear it lies,
    And sleep in spite of thunder.
I will be satisfied!
I'll see no more!
And yet the eighth appears, who bears a glass
    Which shows me many more; and some I see
    That twofold balls and treble sceptres carry.
Now I see 'tis true;
    For the blood-bolter'd Banquo smiles upon me,  
    And points at them for his.
I'll charm the air to give a sound,
    While you perform your antic round,
    That this great King may kindly say
    Our duties did his welcome pay.
I did hear
    The galloping of horse.
And even now,
    To crown my thoughts with acts, be it thought and done:
    The castle of Macduff I will surprise,
    Seize upon Fife, give to the edge o' the sword
    His wife, his babes, and all unfortunate souls
    That trace him in his line.
No boasting like a fool;
    This deed I'll do before this purpose cool.
My dearest coz,  
    I pray you, school yourself.
I dare not speak much further;
    But cruel are the times when we are traitors
    And do not know ourselves; when we hold rumor
    From what we fear, yet know not what we fear,
    But float upon a wild and violent sea
    Each way and move.
I take my leave of you;
    Shall not be long but I'll be here again.
I am so much a fool, should I stay longer,
    It would be my disgrace and your discomfort.
I take my leave at once.
With what I get, I mean; and so do they.
Why should I, Mother?
Why, I can buy me twenty at any market.
If he were dead, you'ld weep for him; if you would not, it
    were a good sign that I should quickly have a new father.
I am not to you known,
    Though in your state of honor I am perfect.
I doubt some danger does approach you nearly.
To fright you thus, methinks I am too savage;
    To do worse to you were fell cruelty,
    Which is too nigh your person.
I dare abide no longer.
Whither should I fly?
I have done no harm.
But I remember now
    I am in this earthly world, where to do harm
    Is often laudable, to do good sometime
    Accounted dangerous folly.
Why then, alas,
    Do I put up that womanly defense,
    To say I have done no harm -What are these faces?
I hope, in no place so unsanctified
    Where such as thou mayst find him.
Run away, I pray you!
What I believe, I'll wall;
    What know, believe; and what I can redress,
    As I shall find the time to friend, I will.
I am young, but something
    You may deserve of him through me, and wisdom  
    To offer up a weak, poor, innocent lamb
    To appease an angry god.
I am not treacherous.
But I shall crave your pardon;
    That which you are, my thoughts cannot transpose.
I have lost my hopes.
Perchance even there where I did find my doubts.
I pray you,
    Let not my jealousies be your dishonors,
    But mine own safeties.
You may be rightly just,
    Whatever I shall think.
I would not be the villain that thou think'st
    For the whole space that's in the tyrant's grasp
    And the rich East to boot.
Be not offended;
    I speak not as in absolute fear of you.
I think our country sinks beneath the yoke;
    It weeps, it bleeds, and each new day a gash
    Is added to her wounds.
I think withal
    There would be hands uplifted in my right;
    And here from gracious England have I offer
    Of goodly thousands.
But for all this,
    When I shall tread upon the tyrant's head,
    Or wear it on my sword, yet my poor country
    Shall have more vices than it had before,
    More suffer and more sundry ways than ever,
    By him that shall succeed.
It is myself I mean, in whom I know  
    All the particulars of vice so grafted
    That, when they shall be open'd, black Macbeth
    Will seem as pure as snow, and the poor state
    Esteem him as a lamb, being compared
    With my confineless harms.
I grant him bloody,
    Luxurious, avaricious, false, deceitful,
    Sudden, malicious, smacking of every sin
    That has a name.
With this there grows
    In my most ill-composed affection such
    A stanchless avarice that, were I King,
    I should cut off the nobles for their lands,
    Desire his jewels and this other's house,
    And my more-having would be as a sauce
    To make me hunger more, that I should forge
    Quarrels unjust against the good and loyal,
    Destroying them for wealth.
But I have none.
The king-becoming graces,
    As justice, verity, temperance, stableness,
    Bounty, perseverance, mercy, lowliness,
    Devotion, patience, courage, fortitude,
    I have no relish of them, but abound
    In the division of each several crime,
    Acting it many ways.
Nay, had I power, I should
    Pour the sweet milk of concord into hell,
    Uproar the universal peace, confound
    All unity on earth.
I am as I have spoken.
For even now
    I put myself to thy direction and  
    Unspeak mine own detraction; here abjure
    The taints and blames I laid upon myself,
    For strangers to my nature.
I am yet
    Unknown to woman, never was forsworn,
    Scarcely have coveted what was mine own,
    At no time broke my faith, would not betray
    The devil to his fellow, and delight
    No less in truth than life.
What I am truly
    Is thine and my poor country's to command.
Comes the King forth, I pray you?
I thank you, Doctor.
'Tis call'd the evil:
    A most miraculous work in this good King,
    Which often, since my here-remain in England,
    I have seen him do.
My countryman, but yet I know him not.
I know him now.
No, they were well at peace when I did leave 'em.
When I came hither to transport the tidings,
    Which I have heavily borne, there ran a rumor
    Of many worthy fellows that were out,
    Which was to my belief witness'd the rather,
    For that I saw the tyrant's power afoot.
Would I could answer
    This comfort with the like!
But I have words
    That would be howl'd out in the desert air,
    Where hearing should not latch them.
I guess at it.
And I must be from thence!
I have said.
I shall do so,
    But I must also feel it as a man.
I cannot but remember such things were
    That were most precious to me.
Naught that I am,
    Not for their own demerits, but for mine,
    Fell slaughter on their souls.
O, I could play the woman with mine eyes
    And braggart with my tongue!
SCENE I.
I have two nights watched with you, but can perceive no
    truth in your report.
That, sir, which I will not report after her.
I have known her continue in this a quarter of
    an hour.
I will set down what comes from her, to
    satisfy my remembrance the more strongly.
Out, I say!
She has spoke what she should not, I am sure of that.
I would not have such a heart in my bosom for the
    dignity of the whole body.
Yet I have known those
    which have walked in their sleep who have died holily in their
    beds.
I tell you yet again, Banquo's buried; he cannot come out
    on's grave.
I think, but dare not speak.
For certain, sir, he is not; I have a file
    Of all the gentry.
Till Birnam Wood remove to Dunsinane
    I cannot taint with fear.
The mind I sway by and the heart I bear
    Shall never sag with doubt nor shake with fear.
Seyton-I am sick at heart,
    When I behold- Seyton, I say!
I have lived long enough.
My way of life
    Is fall'n into the sear, the yellow leaf,
    And that which should accompany old age,
    As honor, love, obedience, troops of friends,
    I must not look to have; but in their stead,
    Curses, not loud but deep, mouth-honor, breath,
    Which the poor heart would fain deny and dare not.
I'll fight, 'til from my bones my flesh be hack'd.
I'll put it on.
Throw physic to the dogs, I'll none of it.
If thou couldst, doctor, cast
    The water of my land, find her disease
    And purge it to a sound and pristine health,
    I would applaud thee to the very echo,
    That should applaud again.
Pull't off, I say.
I will not be afraid of death and bane
    Till Birnam Forest come to Dunsinane.
] Were I from Dunsinane away and clear,
    Profit again should hardly draw me here.
Cousins, I hope the days are near at hand
    That chambers will be safe.
I have almost forgot the taste of fears:
    The time has been, my senses would have cool'd
    To hear a night-shriek, and my fell of hair
    Would at a dismal treatise rouse and stir
    As life were in't.
I have supp'd full with horrors;
    Direness, familiar to my slaughterous thoughts,
    Cannot once start me.
Gracious my lord,
    I should report that which I say I saw,
    But know not how to do it.
As I did stand my watch upon the hill,
    I look'd toward Birnam, and anon, methought,
    The Wood began to move.
Within this three mile may you see it coming;
    I say, a moving grove.
If thou speak'st false,
    Upon the next tree shalt thou hang alive,
    Till famine cling thee; if thy speech be sooth,
    I care not if thou dost for me as much.
I pull in resolution and begin
    To doubt the equivocation of the fiend
    That lies like truth.
I 'gin to be aweary of the sun
    And wish the estate o' the world were now undone.
They have tied me to a stake; I cannot fly,
    But bear-like I must fight the course.
Such a one
    Am I to fear, or none.
YOUNG SIWARD O Thou liest, abhorred tyrant; with my sword
    I'll prove the lie thou speak'st.
But swords I smile at, weapons laugh to scorn,
    Brandish'd by man that's of a woman born.
I cannot strike at wretched kerns, whose arms
    Are hired to bear their staves.
Either thou, Macbeth,
    Or else my sword, with an unbatter'd edge,
    I sheathe again undeeded.
And more I beg not.
Why should I play the Roman fool and die
    On mine own sword?
Whiles I see lives, the gashes
    Do better upon them.
Of all men else I have avoided thee.
I have no words.
Let fall thy blade on vulnerable crests;  
    I bear a charmed life, which must not yield
    To one of woman born.
I'll not fight with thee.
I will not yield,
    To kiss the ground before young Malcolm's feet,
    And to be baited with the rabble's curse.
Though Birnam Wood be come to Dunsinane,
    And thou opposed, being of no woman born,
    Yet I will try the last.
Before my body
    I throw my warlike shield!
I would the friends we miss were safe arrived.
Some must go off, and yet, by these I see,
    So great a day as this is cheaply bought.
Had I as many sons as I have hairs,  
    I would not wish them to a fairer death.
He's worth more sorrow,
    And that I'll spend for him.
I see thee compass'd with thy kingdom's pearl
    That speak my salutation in their minds,
    Whose voices I desire aloud with mine-
    Hail, King of Scotland!
>>



SCENE:
Vienna


ACT I.
SCENE I.
Of government the properties to unfold
    Would seem in me t' affect speech and discourse,
    Since I am put to know that your own science
    Exceeds, in that, the lists of all advice
    My strength can give you; then no more remains
    But that to your sufficiency- as your worth is able-
    And let them work.
Call hither,
    I say, bid come before us, Angelo.
Always obedient to your Grace's will,
    I come to know your pleasure.
But I do bend my speech
    To one that can my part in him advertise.
To th' hopeful execution do I leave you
    Of your commissions.
Give me your hand;
    I'll privily away.
I love the people,
    But do not like to stage me to their eyes;
    Though it do well, I do not relish well  
    Their loud applause and Aves vehement;
    Nor do I think the man of safe discretion
    That does affect it.
I thank you.
I shall desire you, sir, to give me leave
    To have free speech with you; and it concerns me
    To look into the bottom of my place:
    A pow'r I have, but of what strength and nature
    I am not yet instructed.
I'll wait upon your honour.
I never heard any soldier dislike it.
I believe thee; for I think thou never wast where grace was
    said.
I think, or in any religion.
I grant; as there may between the lists and the velvet.
And thou the velvet; thou art good velvet; thou'rt
    a three-pil'd piece, I warrant thee.
I had as lief be a list of
    an English kersey as be pil'd, as thou art pil'd, for a French
    velvet.
Do I speak feelingly now?
I think thou dost; and, indeed, with most painful feeling of
    thy speech.
I will, out of thine own confession, learn to begin
    thy health; but, whilst I live, forget to drink after thee.
I think I have done myself wrong, have I not?
I have
    purchas'd as many diseases under her roof as come to-
  SECOND GENTLEMAN.
To what, I pray?
Thou art always figuring diseases in me, but thou
    art full of error; I am sound.
Who's that, I pray thee?
Nay, but I know 'tis so: I saw him arrested; saw him
    carried away; and, which is more, within these three days his
    head to be chopp'd off.
But, after all this fooling, I would not have it so.
I am too sure of it; and it is for getting Madam
    Julietta with child.
Thus, what with the war, what with the sweat, what
    with the gallows, and what with poverty, I am custom-shrunk.
Though you change your place you need not change your trade; I'll
    be your tapster still.
Bear me to prison, where I am committed.
I do it not in evil disposition,
    But from Lord Angelo by special charge.
If I could speak so wisely under an arrest, I would send for
    certain of my creditors; and yet, to say the truth, I had as lief
    have the foppery of freedom as the morality of imprisonment.
Thus stands it with me: upon a true contract
    I got possession of Julietta's bed.
And the new deputy now for the Duke-
    Whether it be the fault and glimpse of newness,
    Or whether that the body public be
    A horse whereon the governor doth ride,
    Who, newly in the seat, that it may know
    He can command, lets it straight feel the spur;
    Whether the tyranny be in his place,  
    Or in his eminence that fills it up,
    I stagger in.
I warrant it is; and thy head stands so tickle on thy
    shoulders that a milkmaid, if she be in love, may sigh it off.
I have done so, but he's not to be found.
I prithee, Lucio, do me this kind service:
    This day my sister should the cloister enter,
    And there receive her approbation;
    Acquaint her with the danger of my state;
    Implore her, in my voice, that she make friends
    To the strict deputy; bid herself assay him.
I have great hope in that; for in her youth
    There is a prone and speechless dialect  
    Such as move men; beside, she hath prosperous art
    When she will play with reason and discourse,
    And well she can persuade.
I pray she may; as well for the encouragement of the like,
    which else would stand under grievous imposition, as for the
    enjoying of thy life, who I would be sorry should be thus
    foolishly lost at a game of tick-tack.
I'll to her.
I thank you, good friend Lucio.
Why I desire thee
    To give me secret harbour hath a purpose
    More grave and wrinkled than the aims and ends
    Of burning youth.
My holy sir, none better knows than you
    How I have ever lov'd the life removed,
    And held in idle price to haunt assemblies
    Where youth, and cost, a witless bravery keeps.
I have deliver'd to Lord Angelo,
    A man of stricture and firm abstinence,
    My absolute power and place here in Vienna,
    And he supposes me travell'd to Poland;
    For so I have strew'd it in the common ear,
    And so it is received.
Now, pious sir,  
    You will demand of me why I do this.
I do fear, too dreadful.
Sith 'twas my fault to give the people scope,
    'Twould be my tyranny to strike and gall them
    For what I bid them do; for we bid this be done,
    When evil deeds have their permissive pass
    And not the punishment.
Therefore, indeed, my father,
    I have on Angelo impos'd the office;
    Who may, in th' ambush of my name, strike home,
    And yet my nature never in the fight
    To do in slander.
And to behold his sway,
    I will, as 'twere a brother of your order,
    Visit both prince and people.
Therefore, I prithee,
    Supply me with the habit, and instruct me
    How I may formally in person bear me
    Like a true friar.
Moe reasons for this action
    At our more leisure shall I render you.
Yes, truly; I speak not as desiring more,
    But rather wishing a more strict restraint
    Upon the sisterhood, the votarists of Saint Clare.
Gentle Isabella,
    Turn you the key, and know his business of him:
    You may, I may not; you are yet unsworn;
    When you have vow'd, you must not speak with men
    But in the presence of the prioress;
    Then, if you speak, you must not show your face,
    Or, if you show your face, you must not speak.
He calls again; I pray you answer him.
Let me ask
    The rather, for I now must make you know
    I am that Isabella, and his sister.
I would not- though 'tis my familiar sin
    With maids to seem the lapwing, and to jest,  
    Tongue far from heart- play with all virgins so:
    I hold you as a thing enskied and sainted,
    By your renouncement an immortal spirit,
    And to be talk'd with in sincerity,
    As with a saint.
Has censur'd him
    Already, and, as I hear, the Provost hath
    A warrant for his execution.
My power, alas, I doubt!
I'll see what I can do.
I will about it straight;
    No longer staying but to give the Mother  
    Notice of my affair.
I humbly thank you.
Commend me to my brother; soon at night
    I'll send him certain word of my success.
I take my leave of you.
Scene I.
this gentleman,
    Whom I would save, had a most noble father.
Let but your honour know,
    Whom I believe to be most strait in virtue,
    That, in the working of your own affections,
    Had time coher'd with place, or place with wishing,
    Or that the resolute acting of our blood
    Could have attain'd th' effect of your own purpose
    Whether you had not sometime in your life
    Err'd in this point which now you censure him,  
    And pull'd the law upon you.
I not deny
    The jury, passing on the prisoner's life,
    May in the sworn twelve have a thief or two
    Guiltier than him they try.
You may not so extenuate his offence
    For I have had such faults; but rather tell me,
    When I, that censure him, do so offend,
    Let mine own judgment pattern out my death,
    And nothing come in partial.
Come, bring them away; if these be good people in a
    commonweal that do nothing but use their abuses in common houses,
    I know no law; bring them away.
If it please your honour, I am the poor Duke's constable,
    and my name is Elbow; I do lean upon justice, sir, and do bring
    in here before your good honour two notorious benefactors.
If it please your honour, I know not well what they are; but  
    precise villains they are, that I am sure of, and void of all
    profanation in the world that good Christians ought to have.
A tapster, sir; parcel-bawd; one that serves a bad
    woman; whose house, sir, was, as they say, pluck'd down in the
    suburbs; and now she professes a hot-house, which, I think, is a
    very ill house too.
My Wife, sir, whom I detest before heaven and your honour-
  ESCALUS.
Ay, sir; whom I thank heaven, is an honest woman-
  ESCALUS.
I say, sir, I will detest myself also, as well as she, that
    this house, if it be not a bawd's house, it is pity of her life,
    for it is a naughty house.
As I say, this Mistress Elbow, being, as
    I say, with child, and being great-bellied, and longing, as I
    said, for prunes; and having but two in the dish, as I said,  
    Master Froth here, this very man, having eaten the rest, as I
    said, and, as I say, paying for them very honestly; for, as you
    know, Master Froth, I could not give you three pence again-
  FROTH.
Ay, so I did indeed.
Why, very well; I telling you then, if you be rememb'red,
    that such a one and such a one were past cure of the thing you
    wot of, unless they kept very good diet, as I told you-
  FROTH.
No, sir, nor I mean it not.
And,
    I beseech you, look into Master Froth here, sir, a man of
    fourscore pound a year; whose father died at Hallowmas- was't not  
    at Hallowmas, Master Froth?
Why, very well; I hope here be truths.
He, sir, sitting, as
    I say, in a lower chair, sir; 'twas in the Bunch of Grapes,
    where, indeed, you have a delight to sit, have you not?
I have so; because it is an open room, and good for winter.
Why, very well then; I hope here be truths.
This will last out a night in Russia,
    When nights are longest there; I'll take my leave,
    And leave you to the hearing of the cause,
    Hoping you'll find good cause to whip them all.
I think no less.
I beseech you, sir, ask him what this man did to my wife.
I beseech your honour, ask me.
I beseech you, sir, look in this gentleman's face.
Nay, I beseech you, mark it well.
Well, I do so.
I'll be suppos'd upon a book his face is the worst thing
    about him.
I would
    know that of your honour.
I
    respected with her before I was married to her!
If ever I was
    respected with her, or she with me, let not your worship think me
    the poor Duke's officer.
Prove this, thou wicked Hannibal, or
    I'll have mine action of batt'ry on thee.
Marry, I thank your good worship for it.
What is't your
    worship's pleasure I shall do with this wicked caitiff?
Marry, I thank your worship for it.
Master Froth, I
    would not have you acquainted with tapsters: they will draw you,
    Master Froth, and you will hang them.
I thank your worship.
For mine own part, I never come into
    any room in a taphouse but I am drawn in.
Truly, sir, I am a poor fellow that would live.
There is pretty orders beginning, I can tell you: but it
    is but heading and hanging.
If you head and hang all that offend that way but for ten
    year together, you'll be glad to give out a commission for more  
    heads; if this law hold in Vienna ten year, I'll rent the fairest
    house in it, after threepence a bay.
Thank you, good Pompey; and, in requital of your prophecy,
    hark you: I advise you, let me not find you before me again upon
    any complaint whatsoever- no, not for dwelling where you do; if I
    do, Pompey, I shall beat you to your tent, and prove a shrewd
    Caesar to you; in plain dealing, Pompey, I shall have you whipt.
I thank your worship for your good counsel; [Aside] but I
    shall follow it as the flesh and fortune shall better determine.
I thought, by the readiness in the office, you had
    continued in it some time.
Faith, sir, few of any wit in such matters; as they are
    chosen, they are glad to choose me for them; I do it for some
    piece of money, and go through with all.
I pray you home to dinner with me.
I humbly thank you.
I'll tell him of you.
[Exit SERVANT] I'll know
    His pleasure; may be he will relent.
Did not I tell thee yea?
Lest I might be too rash;
    Under your good correction, I have seen
    When, after execution, judgment hath  
    Repented o'er his doom.
I crave your honour's pardon.
I am a woeful suitor to your honour,
    Please but your honour hear me.
There is a vice that most I do abhor,
    And most desire should meet the blow of justice;
    For which I would not plead, but that I must;
    For which I must not plead, but that I am
    At war 'twixt will and will not.
I have a brother is condemn'd to die;
    I do beseech you, let it be his fault,
    And not my brother.
I had a brother, then.
To him, I say.
Yes; I do think that you might pardon him.
I will not do't.
Look, what I will not, that I cannot do.
Why, no; I, that do speak a word,
    May call it back again.
I would to heaven I had your potency,
    And you were Isabel!
No; I would tell what 'twere to be a judge
    And what a prisoner.
It is the law, not I condemn your brother.
I show it most of all when I show justice;
    For then I pity those I do not know,
    Which a dismiss'd offence would after gall,
    And do him right that, answering one foul wrong,
    Lives not to act another.
He will relent;  
    He's coming; I perceive 't.
I will bethink me.
Hark how I'll bribe you; good my lord, turn back.
[Aside] Amen; for I
    Am that way going to temptation
    Where prayers cross.
At what hour to-morrow  
    Shall I attend your lordship?
Not she; nor doth she tempt; but it is I
    That, lying by the violet in the sun,
    Do as the carrion does, not as the flow'r,
    Corrupt with virtuous season.
What, do I love her,  
    That I desire to hear her speak again,
    And feast upon her eyes?
What is't I dream on?
Ever till now,
    When men were fond, I smil'd and wond'red how.
so I think you are.
I am the Provost.
Bound by my charity and my blest order,
    I come to visit the afflicted spirits
    Here in the prison.
Do me the common right
    To let me see them, and to make me know
    The nature of their crimes, that I may minister
    To them accordingly.
I would do more than that, if more were needful.
As I do think, to-morrow.
[To JULIET] I have provided for you; stay awhile
    And you shall be conducted.
I do; and bear the shame most patiently.
I'll teach you how you shall arraign your conscience,
    And try your penitence, if it be sound
    Or hollowly put on.
I'll gladly learn.
Yes, as I love the woman that wrong'd him.
I do confess it, and repent it, father.
I do repent me as it is an evil,
    And take the shame with joy.
Your partner, as I hear, must die to-morrow,
    And I am going with instruction to him.
When I would pray and think, I think and pray
    To several subjects.
Heaven in my mouth,
    As if I did but only chew his name,
    And in my heart the strong and swelling evil
    Of my conception.
The state whereon I studied
    Is, like a good thing being often read,
    Grown sere and tedious; yea, my gravity,
    Wherein- let no man hear me- I take pride,
    Could I with boot change for an idle plume
    Which the air beats for vain.
I am come to know your pleasure.
Yet may he live awhile, and, it may be,
    As long as you or I; yet he must die.
I beseech you; that in his reprieve,
    Longer or shorter, he may be so fitted
    That his soul sicken not.
Then I shall pose you quickly.
Sir, believe this:
    I had rather give my body than my soul.
I talk not of your soul; our compell'd sins
    Stand more for number than for accompt.
Nay, I'll not warrant that; for I can speak
    Against the thing I say.
Answer to this:
    I, now the voice of the recorded law,
    Pronounce a sentence on your brother's life;
    Might there not be a charity in sin
    To save this brother's life?
Please you to do't,
    I'll take it as a peril to my soul
    It is no sin at all, but charity.
That I do beg his life, if it be sin,
    Heaven let me bear it!
You granting of my suit,
    If that be sin, I'll make it my morn prayer
    To have it added to the faults of mine,
    And nothing of your answer.
Let me be ignorant, and in nothing good
    But graciously to know I am no better.
But mark me:
    To be received plain, I'll speak more gross-
    Your brother is to die.
Admit no other way to save his life,
    As I subscribe not that, nor any other,
    But, in the loss of question, that you, his sister,
    Finding yourself desir'd of such a person
    Whose credit with the judge, or own great place,
    Could fetch your brother from the manacles
    Of the all-binding law; and that there were
    No earthly mean to save him but that either
    You must lay down the treasures of your body
    To this supposed, or else to let him suffer-
    What would you do?
As much for my poor brother as myself;
    That is, were I under the terms of death,
    Th' impression of keen whips I'd wear as rubies,
    And strip myself to death as to a bed
    That longing have been sick for, ere I'd yield
    My body up to shame.
It oft falls out,
    To have what we would have, we speak not what we mean:
    I something do excuse the thing I hate
    For his advantage that I dearly love.
I think it well;
    And from this testimony of your own sex,
    Since I suppose we are made to be no stronger
    Than faults may shake our frames, let me be bold.
I do arrest your words.
I have no tongue but one; gentle, my lord,
    Let me intreat you speak the former language.
Plainly conceive, I love you.
I know your virtue hath a license in't,
    Which seems a little fouler than it is,
    To pluck on others.
I will proclaim thee, Angelo, look for't.
Sign me a present pardon for my brother
    Or, with an outstretch'd throat, I'll tell the world aloud
    What man thou art.
I have begun,
    And now I give my sensual race the rein:  
    Fit thy consent to my sharp appetite;
    Lay by all nicety and prolixious blushes
    That banish what they sue for; redeem thy brother
    By yielding up thy body to my will;
    Or else he must not only die the death,
    But thy unkindness shall his death draw out
    To ling'ring sufferance.
Answer me to-morrow,
    Or, by the affection that now guides me most,
    I'll prove a tyrant to him.
To whom should I complain?
Did I tell this,
    Who would believe me?
I'll to my brother.
I'll tell him yet of Angelo's request,
    And fit his mind to death, for his soul's rest.
SCENE I.
The miserable have no other medicine
    But only hope:
    I have hope to Eve, and am prepar'd to die.
If I do lose thee, I do lose a thing
    That none but fools would keep.
I humbly thank you.
To sue to live, I find I seek to die;
    And, seeking death, find life.
Dear sir, ere long I'll visit you again.
Most holy sir, I thank you.
Bring me to hear them speak, where I may be conceal'd.
O, I do fear thee, Claudio; and I quake,
    Lest thou a feverous life shouldst entertain,
    And six or seven winters more respect
    Than a perpetual honour.
Think you I can a resolution fetch
    From flow'ry tenderness?
If I must die,
    I will encounter darkness as a bride
    And hug it in mine arms.
Dost thou think, Claudio,
    If I would yield him my virginity
    Thou mightst be freed?
This night's the time
    That I should do what I abhor to name,
    Or else thou diest to-morrow.
I'd throw it down for your deliverance
    As frankly as a pin.
What should I think?
I'll pray a thousand prayers for thy death,
    No word to save thee.
Might you dispense with your leisure, I would by and by have
    some speech with you; the satisfaction I would require is  
    likewise your own benefit.
I have no superfluous leisure; my stay must be stolen out
    of other affairs; but I will attend you awhile.
Son, I have overheard what hath pass'd between you and your
    sister.
I am confessor to Angelo, and I know this to be true;
    therefore prepare yourself to death.
I am so out of love with life
    that I will sue to be rid of it.
The assault that Angelo hath made to you,
    fortune hath convey'd to my understanding; and, but that frailty
    hath examples for his falling, I should wonder at Angelo.
I am now going to resolve him; I had rather my brother
    die by the law than my son should be unlawfully born.
If ever he return, and
    I can speak to him, I will open my lips in vain, or discover his
    government.
Therefore fasten your ear on my advisings; to the love I have in  
    doing good a remedy presents itself.
I do make myself believe
    that you may most uprighteously do a poor wronged lady a merited
    benefit; redeem your brother from the angry law; do no stain to
    your own gracious person; and much please the absent Duke, if
    peradventure he shall ever return to have hearing of this
    business.
Let me hear you speak farther; I have spirit to do
    anything that appears not foul in the truth of my spirit.
I have heard of the lady, and good words went with her
    name.
The maid will I frame and make fit for
    his attempt.
The image of it gives me content already; and I trust it
    will grow to a most prosperous perfection.
I will presently to Saint Luke's; there,
    at the moated grange, resides this dejected Mariana.
I thank you for this comfort.
Do thou but think
    What 'tis to cram a maw or clothe a back
    From such a filthy vice; say to thyself
    'From their abominable and beastly touches
    I drink, I eat, array myself, and live.
Indeed, it does stink in some sort, sir; but yet, sir,
    I would prove-
  DUKE.
I spy comfort; I cry bail.
Farewell; go, say I sent thee
    thither.
I hope, sir, your good worship will be my bail.
No, indeed, will I not, Pompey; it is not the wear.
I will
    pray, Pompey, to increase your bondage.
I know none.
I know not where; but wheresoever, I wish him well.
But it is certain that when he makes
    water his urine is congeal'd ice; that I know to be true.
I never heard the absent Duke much detected for women; he was
    not inclin'd that way.
Sir, I was an inward of his.
A shy fellow was the Duke; and
    I believe I know the cause of his withdrawing.
What, I prithee, might be the cause?
No, pardon; 'tis a secret must be lock'd within the teeth
    and the lips; but this I can let you understand: the greater file
    of the subject held the Duke to be wise.
Sir, I know him, and I love him.
Come, sir, I know what I know.
I can hardly believe that, since you know not what you speak.
If it be honest you
    have spoke, you have courage to maintain it; I am bound to call
    upon you; and I pray you your name?
He shall know you better, sir, if I may live to report you.
I fear you not.
But, indeed, I can do you little harm:
    you'll forswear this again.
I'll be hang'd first.
I would the Duke
    we talk of were return'd again.
Farewell, good friar; I prithee pray for me.
The
    Duke, I say to thee again, would eat mutton on Fridays.
He's not
    past it yet; and, I say to thee, he would mouth with a beggar
    though she smelt brown bread and garlic.
Say that I said so.
His child is a year and a quarter old
    come Philip and Jacob; I have kept it myself; and see how he goes
    about to abuse me.
I am a brother  
    Of gracious order, late come from the See
    In special business from his Holiness.
I pray you, sir, of what disposition was the Duke?
I am made to understand that you have lent him
    visitation.
Yet had he framed to himself, by the instruction of his
    frailty, many deceiving promises of life; which I, by my good
    leisure, have discredited to him, and now he is resolv'd to die.
I have labour'd for the poor
    gentleman to the extremest shore of my modesty; but my brother
    justice have I found so severe that he hath forc'd me to tell him
    he is indeed Justice.
I am going to visit the prisoner.
Craft against vice I must apply.
Scene I.
Exit BOY
    I cry you mercy, sir, and well could wish
    You had not found me here so musical.
I pray you tell me hath anybody inquir'd for me here to-day.
Much
    upon this time have I promis'd here to meet.
You have not been inquir'd after; I have sat here all day.
I do constantly believe you.
I
    shall crave your forbearance a little.
May be I will call upon
    you anon, for some advantage to yourself.
I am always bound to you.
There have I made my promise
    Upon the heavy middle of the night
    To call upon him.
I have ta'en a due and wary note upon't;
    With whispering and most guilty diligence,
    In action all of precept, he did show me
    The way twice o'er.
No, none, but only a repair i' th' dark;
    And that I have possess'd him my most stay
    Can be but brief; for I have made him know
    I have a servant comes with me along,
    That stays upon me; whose persuasion is
    I come about my brother.
I have not yet made known to Mariana
    A word of this.
Re-enter MARIANA

    I pray you be acquainted with this maid;
    She comes to do you good.
I do desire the like.
Do you persuade yourself that I respect you?
Good friar, I know you do, and have found it.
I shall attend your leisure; but make haste;
    The vaporous night approaches.
If the man be a bachelor, sir, I can; but if he be a
    married man, he's his wife's head, and I can never cut of a
    woman's head.
Sir, I have been an unlawful bawd time out of mind; but yet
    I will be content to be a lawful hangman.
I would be glad to
    receive some instructions from my fellow partner.
Painting, sir, I have heard say, is a mystery; and your
    whores, sir, being members of my occupation, using painting, do
    prove my occupation a mystery; but what mystery there should be
    in hanging, if I should be hang'd, I cannot imagine.
Sir, I will serve him; for I do find your hangman is a more
    penitent trade than your bawd; he doth oftener ask forgiveness.
Come on, bawd; I will instruct thee in my trade; follow.
I do desire to learn, sir; and I hope, if you have occasion
    to use me for your own turn, you shall find me yare; for truly,
    sir, for your kindness I owe you a good turn.
I hope it is some pardon or reprieve
    For the most gentle Claudio.
Happily
    You something know; yet I believe there comes
    No countermand; no such example have we.
Good morrow; for
    as I take it, it is almost day.
I shall obey him.
I told you: Lord Angelo, belike thinking me remiss in mine
    office, awakens me with this unwonted putting-on; methinks
    strangely, for he hath not us'd it before.
I have heard it was ever his
    manner to do so.
If I read it not truly, my ancient skill
    beguiles me; but in the boldness of my cunning I will lay myself
    in hazard.
To
    make you understand this in a manifested effect, I crave but four
    days' respite; for the which you are to do me both a present and
    a dangerous courtesy.
How may I do it, having the hour limited, and an  
    express command, under penalty, to deliver his head in the view
    of Angelo?
I may make my case as Claudio's, to cross this in the
    smallest.
By the vow of mine order, I warrant you, if my instructions
    may be your guide.
If anything fall to you upon this more than thanks and
    good fortune, by the saint whom I profess, I will plead against
    it with my life.
Yet since I see you  
    fearful, that neither my coat, integrity, nor persuasion, can
    with ease attempt you, I will go further than I meant, to pluck
    all fears out of you.
You know the character, I doubt not; and the signet is
    not strange to you.
I know them both.
I will give him a present shrift, and advise
    him for a better place.
I am as well acquainted here as I was in our house of
    profession; one would think it were Mistress Overdone's own
    house, for here be many of her old customers.
Then have we here young Dizy, and young Master Deepvow, and
    Master Copperspur, and Master Starvelackey, the rapier and dagger
    man, and young Dropheir that kill'd lusty Pudding, and Master
    Forthlight the tilter, and brave Master Shootie the great
    traveller, and wild Halfcan that stabb'd Pots, and, I think,
    forty more- all great doers in our trade, and are now 'for the
    Lord's sake.
[ Within ] Away, you rogue, away; I am sleepy.
He is coming, sir, he is coming; I hear his straw rustle.
Truly, sir, I would desire you to clap into your prayers;
    for, look you, the warrant's come.
You rogue, I have been drinking all night; I am not
    fitted for't.
Sir, induced by my charity, and hearing how hastily you are
    to depart, I am come to advise you, comfort you, and pray with
    you.
Friar, not I; I have been drinking hard all night, and
    I will have more time to prepare me, or they shall beat out my
    brains with billets.
I will not consent to die this day, that's  
    certain.
O, Sir, you must; and therefore I beseech you
    Look forward on the journey you shall go.
I swear I will not die to-day for any man's persuasion.
Not a word; if you have anything to say to me, come to
    my ward; for thence will not I to-day.
See this be done,
    And sent according to command; whiles I
    Persuade this rude wretch willingly to die.
I am your free dependant.
Exit PROVOST
    Now will I write letters to Angelo-
    The Provost, he shall bear them- whose contents
    Shall witness to him I am near at home,
    And that, by great injunctions, I am bound
    To enter publicly.
Him I'll desire
    To meet me at the consecrated fount,
    A league below the city; and from thence,
    By cold gradation and well-balanc'd form.
Here is the head; I'll carry it myself.
Make a swift return;
    For I would commune with you of such things
    That want no ear but yours.
I'll make all speed.
She's come to know
    If yet her brother's pardon be come hither;
    But I will keep her ignorant of her good,
    To make her heavenly comforts of despair
    When it is least expected.
O, I will to him and pluck out his eyes!
Mark what I say, which you shall find
    By every syllable a faithful verity.
If you can, pace your wisdom
    In that good path that I would wish it go,
    And you shall have your bosom on this wretch,
    Grace of the Duke, revenges to your heart,
    And general honour.
I am directed by you.
Say, by this token, I desire his company  
    At Mariana's house to-night.
Her cause and yours
    I'll perfect him withal; and he shall bring you
    Before the Duke; and to the head of Angelo
    Accuse him home and home.
For my poor self,
    I am combined by a sacred vow,
    And shall be absent.
Command these fretting waters from your eyes
    With a light heart; trust not my holy order,
    If I pervert your course.
O pretty Isabella, I am pale at mine heart to see thine eyes
    so red.
I am fain to dine and sup with
    water and bran; I dare not for my head fill my belly; one
    fruitful meal would set me to't.
By my troth, Isabel, I lov'd thy brother.
Friar, thou knowest not the Duke so well as I do; he's a
    better woodman than thou tak'st him for.
Nay, tarry; I'll go along with thee; I can tell thee pretty
    tales of the Duke.
I was once before him for getting a wench with child.
Yes, marry, did I; but I was fain to forswear it: they would
    else have married me to the rotten medlar.
By my troth, I'll go with thee to the lane's end.
Nay, friar, I am a
    kind of burr; I shall stick.
I guess not.
Well, I beseech you, let it be proclaim'd;
    Betimes i' th' morn I'll call you at your house;
    Give notice to such men of sort and suit
    As are to meet him.
I shall, sir; fare you well.
Go, call at Flavius' house,
    And tell him where I stay; give the like notice
    To Valentinus, Rowland, and to Crassus,
    And bid them bring the trumpets to the gate;
    But send me Flavius first.
I thank thee, Varrius; thou hast made good haste.
To speak so indirectly I am loath;
    I would say the truth; but to accuse him so,
    That is your part.
Yet I am advis'd to do it;
    He says, to veil full purpose.
Besides, he tells me that, if peradventure
    He speak against me on the adverse side,
    I should not think it strange; for 'tis a physic
    That's bitter to sweet end.
I would Friar Peter-

                         Enter FRIAR PETER

  ISABELLA.
Come, I have found you out a stand most fit,
    Where you may have such vantage on the Duke
    He shall not pass you.
SCENE I.
O, your desert speaks loud; and I should wrong it
    To lock it in the wards of covert bosom,
    When it deserves, with characters of brass,
    A forted residence 'gainst the tooth of time
    And razure of oblivion.
Vail your regard
    Upon a wrong'd- I would fain have said a maid!
Hear me yourself; for that which I must speak
    Must either punish me, not being believ'd,  
    Or wring redress from you.
My lord, her wits, I fear me, are not firm;
    She hath been a suitor to me for her brother,
    Cut off by course of justice-
  ISABELLA.
Most strange, but yet most truly, will I speak.
I conjure thee, as thou believ'st  
    There is another comfort than this world,
    That thou neglect me not with that opinion
    That I am touch'd with madness.
Believe it, royal Prince,
    If he be less, he's nothing; but he's more,
    Had I more name for badness.
By mine honesty,
    If she be mad, as I believe no other,
    Her madness hath the oddest frame of sense,
    Such a dependency of thing on thing,
    As e'er I heard in madness.
I am the sister of one Claudio,
    Condemn'd upon the act of fornication
    To lose his head; condemn'd by Angelo.
I, in probation of a sisterhood,
    Was sent to by my brother; one Lucio
    As then the messenger-
  LUCIO.
That's I, an't like your Grace.
I came to her from Claudio, and desir'd her
    To try her gracious fortune with Lord Angelo
    For her poor brother's pardon.
I wish you now, then;
    Pray you take note of it; and when you have
    A business for yourself, pray heaven you then  
    Be perfect.
I warrant your honour.
I went
    To this pernicious caitiff deputy.
In brief- to set the needless process by,
    How I persuaded, how I pray'd, and kneel'd,
    How he refell'd me, and how I replied,
    For this was of much length- the vile conclusion
    I now begin with grief and shame to utter:
    He would not, but by gift of my chaste body
    To his concupiscible intemperate lust,  
    Release my brother; and, after much debatement,
    My sisterly remorse confutes mine honour,
    And I did yield to him.
Heaven shield your Grace from woe,
    As I, thus wrong'd, hence unbelieved go!
I know you'd fain be gone.
One that I would were here, Friar Lodowick.
My lord, I know him; 'tis a meddling friar.
I do not like the man; had he been lay, my lord,
    For certain words he spake against your Grace
    In your retirement, I had swing'd him soundly.
But yesternight, my lord, she and that friar,
    I saw them at the prison; a saucy friar,
    A very scurvy fellow.
I have stood by, my lord, and I have heard
    Your royal ear abus'd.
I know him for a man divine and holy;
    Not scurvy, nor a temporary meddler,
    As he's reported by this gentleman;
    And, on my trust, a man that never yet
    Did, as he vouches, misreport your Grace.
Upon his mere request-
    Being come to knowledge that there was complaint
    Intended 'gainst Lord Angelo- came I hither
    To speak, as from his mouth, what he doth know  
    Is true and false; and what he, with his oath
    And all probation, will make up full clear,
    Whensoever he's convented.
Come, cousin Angelo;
    In this I'll be impartial; be you judge
    Of your own cause.
Pardon, my lord; I will not show my face
    Until my husband bid me.
I would he had some cause
    To prattle for himself.
My lord, I do confess I ne'er was married,
    And I confess, besides, I am no maid.
I have known my husband; yet my husband
    Knows not that ever he knew me.
Now I come to't, my lord:
    She that accuses him of fornication,
    In self-same manner doth accuse my husband;
    And charges him, my lord, with such a time
    When I'll depose I had him in mine arms,
    With all th' effect of love.
Not that I know.
My husband bids me; now I will unmask.
My lord, I must confess I know this woman;
    And five years since there was some speech of marriage
    Betwixt myself and her; which was broke off,
    Partly for that her promised proportions
    Came short of composition; but in chief
    For that her reputation was disvalued
    In levity.
Since which time of five years
    I never spake with her, saw her, nor heard from her,
    Upon my faith and honour.
Noble Prince,
    As there comes light from heaven and words from breath,
    As there is sense in truth and truth in virtue,
    I am affianc'd this man's wife as strongly
    As words could make up vows.
I did but smile till now.
I do perceive
    These poor informal women are no more
    But instruments of some more mightier member
    That sets them on.
I for a while will leave you;
    But stir not you till you have well determin'd
    Upon these slanderers.
Call that same Isabel here once again; I would speak with
    her.
[Exit an ATTENDANT] Pray you, my lord, give me leave to
    question; you shall see how I'll handle her.
Marry, sir, I think, if you handled her privately, she would
    sooner confess; perchance, publicly, she'll be asham'd.
I will go darkly to work with her.
My lord, here comes the rascal I spoke of, here with the  
    Provost.
This is the rascal; this is he I spoke of.
Be not so hot; the Duke
    Dare no more stretch this finger of mine than he
    Dare rack his own; his subject am I not,
    Nor here provincial.
My business in this state
    Made me a looker-on here in Vienna,
    Where I have seen corruption boil and bubble
    Till it o'errun the stew: laws for all faults,
    But faults so countenanc'd that the strong statutes
    Stand like the forfeits in a barber's shop,
    As much in mock as mark.
I remember you, sir, by the sound of your voice.
I met you at
    the prison, in the absence of the Duke.
Did not I pluck thee by the nose for
    thy speeches?
I protest I love the Duke as I love myself.
[To ESCALUS] What you have spoke I pardon; sit you down.
O my dread lord,
    I should be guiltier than my guiltiness,
    To think I can be undiscernible,
    When I perceive your Grace, like pow'r divine,
    Hath look'd upon my passes.
Then, good Prince,
    No longer session hold upon my shame,
    But let my trial be mine own confession;
    Immediate sentence then, and sequent death,
    Is all the grace I beg.
I was, my lord.
My lord, I am more amaz'd at his dishonour
    Than at the strangeness of it.
As I was then
    Advertising and holy to your business,
    Not changing heart with habit, I am still
    Attorney'd at your service.
O, give me pardon,
    That I, your vassal have employ'd and pain'd
    Your unknown sovereignty.
Your brother's death, I know, sits at your heart;
    And you may marvel why I obscur'd myself,
    Labouring to save his life, and would not rather
    Make rash remonstrance of my hidden pow'r
    Than let him so be lost.
O most kind maid,
    It was the swift celerity of his death,
    Which I did think with slower foot came on,
    That brain'd my purpose.
I do, my lord.
O my most gracious lord,
    I hope you will not mock me with a husband.
Consenting to the safeguard of your honour,
    I thought your marriage fit; else imputation,
    For that he knew you, might reproach your life,
    And choke your good to come.
O my dear lord,
    I crave no other, nor no better man.
Sweet Isabel, take my part;
    Lend me your knees, and all my life to come
    I'll lend you all my life to do you service.
Isabel,
    Sweet Isabel, do yet but kneel by me;
    Hold up your hands, say nothing; I'll speak all.
I partly think
    A due sincerity govern'd his deeds
    Till he did look on me; since it is so,
    Let him not die.
Your suit's unprofitable; stand up, I say.
I have bethought me of another fault.
For which I do discharge you of your office;
    Give up your keys.
Pardon me, noble lord;
    I thought it was a fault, but knew it not;
    Yet did repent me, after more advice;
    For testimony whereof, one in the prison,
    That should by private order else have died,
    I have reserv'd alive.
I would thou hadst done so by Claudio.
I am sorry one so learned and so wise
    As you, Lord Angelo, have still appear'd,
    Should slip so grossly, both in the heat of blood
    And lack of temper'd judgment afterward.
I am sorry that such sorrow I procure;
    And so deep sticks it in my penitent heart
    That I crave death more willingly than mercy;
    'Tis my deserving, and I do entreat it.
Thou'rt condemn'd;
    But, for those earthly faults, I quit them all,
    And pray thee take this mercy to provide
    For better times to come.
Friar, advise him;
    I leave him to your hand.
This is another prisoner that I sav'd,
    Who should have died when Claudio lost his head;
    As like almost to Claudio as himself.
By this Lord Angelo perceives he's safe;
    Methinks I see a quick'ning in his eye.
I find an apt remission in myself;
    And yet here's one in place I cannot pardon.
Wherein have I so deserv'd of you
    That you extol me thus?
Faith, my lord, I spoke it but according to the trick.
If you will hang me for it, you may; but I had rather it would
    please you I might be whipt.
Proclaim it, Provost, round about the city,
    If any woman wrong'd by this lewd fellow-
    As I have heard him swear himself there's one
    Whom he begot with child, let her appear,
    And he shall marry her.
I beseech your Highness, do not marry me to a whore.
Your
    Highness said even now I made you a duke; good my lord, do not
    recompense me in making me a cuckold.
Thy slanders I forgive; and therewithal
    Remit thy other forfeits.
Love her, Angelo;
    I have confess'd her, and I know her virtue.
Dear Isabel,
    I have a motion much imports your good;
    Whereto if you'll a willing ear incline,
    What's mine is yours, and what is yours is mine.
>>



SCENE:
Venice, and PORTIA'S house at Belmont


ACT I.
SCENE I.
In sooth, I know not why I am so sad.
It wearies me; you say it wearies you;
    But how I caught it, found it, or came by it,
    What stuff 'tis made of, whereof it is born,
    I am to learn;
    And such a want-wit sadness makes of me
    That I have much ado to know myself.
Believe me, sir, had I such venture forth,
    The better part of my affections would
    Be with my hopes abroad.
I should be still  
    Plucking the grass to know where sits the wind,
    Peering in maps for ports, and piers, and roads;
    And every object that might make me fear
    Misfortune to my ventures, out of doubt,
    Would make me sad.
My wind, cooling my broth,
    Would blow me to an ague when I thought
    What harm a wind too great might do at sea.
I should not see the sandy hour-glass run
    But I should think of shallows and of flats,
    And see my wealthy Andrew dock'd in sand,
    Vailing her high top lower than her ribs
    To kiss her burial.
Should I go to church
    And see the holy edifice of stone,
    And not bethink me straight of dangerous rocks,
    Which, touching but my gentle vessel's side,
    Would scatter all her spices on the stream,
    Enrobe the roaring waters with my silks,
    And, in a word, but even now worth this,
    And now worth nothing?
Shall I have the thought  
    To think on this, and shall I lack the thought
    That such a thing bechanc'd would make me sad?
But tell not me; I know Antonio
    Is sad to think upon his merchandise.
Believe me, no; I thank my fortune for it,
    My ventures are not in one bottom trusted,
    Nor to one place; nor is my whole estate
    Upon the fortune of this present year;
    Therefore my merchandise makes me not sad.
I would have stay'd till I had made you merry,
    If worthier friends had not prevented me.
I take it your own business calls on you,
    And you embrace th' occasion to depart.
My Lord Bassanio, since you have found Antonio,
    We two will leave you; but at dinner-time,
    I pray you, have in mind where we must meet.
I will not fail you.
I hold the world but as the world, Gratiano-
    A stage, where every man must play a part,
    And mine a sad one.
I tell thee what, Antonio-
    I love thee, and 'tis my love that speaks-
    There are a sort of men whose visages
    Do cream and mantle like a standing pond,
    And do a wilful stillness entertain,  
    With purpose to be dress'd in an opinion
    Of wisdom, gravity, profound conceit;
    As who should say 'I am Sir Oracle,
    And when I ope my lips let no dog bark.
'
    O my Antonio, I do know of these
    That therefore only are reputed wise
    For saying nothing; when, I am very sure,
    If they should speak, would almost damn those ears
    Which, hearing them, would call their brothers fools.
I'll tell thee more of this another time.
Fare ye well awhile;
    I'll end my exhortation after dinner.
I must be one of these same dumb wise men,
    For Gratiano never lets me speak.
Fare you well; I'll grow a talker for this gear.
'Tis not unknown to you, Antonio,
    How much I have disabled mine estate
    By something showing a more swelling port
    Than my faint means would grant continuance;
    Nor do I now make moan to be abridg'd
    From such a noble rate; but my chief care
    Is to come fairly off from the great debts
    Wherein my time, something too prodigal,
    Hath left me gag'd.
To you, Antonio,  
    I owe the most, in money and in love;
    And from your love I have a warranty
    To unburden all my plots and purposes
    How to get clear of all the debts I owe.
I pray you, good Bassanio, let me know it;
    And if it stand, as you yourself still do,
    Within the eye of honour, be assur'd
    My purse, my person, my extremest means,
    Lie all unlock'd to your occasions.
In my school-days, when I had lost one shaft,
    I shot his fellow of the self-same flight
    The self-same way, with more advised watch,
    To find the other forth; and by adventuring both
    I oft found both.
I urge this childhood proof,
    Because what follows is pure innocence.
I owe you much; and, like a wilful youth,
    That which I owe is lost; but if you please
    To shoot another arrow that self way
    Which you did shoot the first, I do not doubt,
    As I will watch the aim, or to find both,  
    Or bring your latter hazard back again
    And thankfully rest debtor for the first.
You know me well, and herein spend but time
    To wind about my love with circumstance;
    And out of doubt you do me now more wrong
    In making question of my uttermost
    Than if you had made waste of all I have.
Then do but say to me what I should do
    That in your knowledge may by me be done,
    And I am prest unto it; therefore, speak.
Sometimes from her eyes
    I did receive fair speechless messages.
O my Antonio, had I but the means
    To hold a rival place with one of them,
    I have a mind presages me such thrift
    That I should questionless be fortunate.
Thou know'st that all my fortunes are at sea;
    Neither have I money nor commodity
    To raise a present sum; therefore go forth,
    Try what my credit can in Venice do;
    That shall be rack'd, even to the uttermost,
    To furnish thee to Belmont to fair Portia.
Go presently inquire, and so will I,
    Where money is; and I no question make
    To have it of my trust or for my sake.
You would be, sweet madam, if your miseries were in the
    same abundance as your good fortunes are; and yet, for aught I
    see, they are as sick that surfeit with too much as they that
    starve with nothing.
It is a good divine that follows his own instructions; I
    can easier teach twenty what were good to be done than to be one
    of the twenty to follow mine own teaching.
I may neither
    choose who I would nor refuse who I dislike; so is the will of a
    living daughter curb'd by the will of a dead father.
Is it not
    hard, Nerissa, that I cannot choose one, nor refuse none?
I pray thee over-name them; and as thou namest them, I will
    describe them; and according to my description, level at my
    affection.
Ay, that's a colt indeed, for he doth nothing but talk of
    his horse; and he makes it a great appropriation to his own good
    parts that he can shoe him himself; I am much afear'd my lady his
    mother play'd false with a smith.
I fear
    he will prove the weeping philosopher when he grows old, being so
    full of unmannerly sadness in his youth.
I had rather be married
    to a death's-head with a bone in his mouth than to either of
    these.
In
    truth, I know it is a sin to be a mocker, but he- why, he hath a
    horse better than the Neapolitan's, a better bad habit of
    frowning than the Count Palatine; he is every man in no man.
If a
    throstle sing he falls straight a-cap'ring; he will fence with
    his own shadow; if I should marry him, I should marry twenty
    husbands.
If he would despise me, I would forgive him; for if he
    love me to madness, I shall never requite him.
You know I say nothing to him, for he understands not me,
    nor I him: he hath neither Latin, French, nor Italian, and you  
    will come into the court and swear that I have a poor pennyworth
    in the English.
I think he
    bought his doublet in Italy, his round hose in France, his bonnet
    in Germany, and his behaviour everywhere.
That he hath a neighbourly charity in him, for he borrowed
    a box of the ear of the Englishman, and swore he would pay him
    again when he was able; I think the Frenchman became his surety,
    and seal'd under for another.
An the worst fall that ever fell, I hope I
    shall make shift to go without him.
Therefore, for fear of the worst, I pray thee set a deep
    glass of Rhenish wine on the contrary casket; for if the devil be
    within and that temptation without, I know he will choose it.
I
    will do anything, Nerissa, ere I will be married to a sponge.
If I live to be as old as Sibylla, I will die as chaste as
    Diana, unless I be obtained by the manner of my father's will.
I
    am glad this parcel of wooers are so reasonable; for there is not
    one among them but I dote on his very absence, and I pray God
    grant them a fair departure.
Yes, yes, it was Bassanio; as I think, so was he call'd.
I remember him well, and I remember him worthy of thy
    praise.
If I could bid the fifth welcome with so good heart as I
    can bid the other four farewell, I should be glad of his
    approach; if he have the condition of a saint and the complexion
    of a devil, I had rather he should shrive me than wive me.
For the which, as I told you, Antonio shall be bound.
Shall I know your
    answer?
Ho, no, no, no, no; my meaning in saying he is a good man
    is to have you understand me that he is sufficient; yet his means
    are in supposition: he hath an argosy bound to Tripolis, another
    to the Indies; I understand, moreover, upon the Rialto, he hath a
    third at Mexico, a fourth for England- and other ventures he
    hath, squand'red abroad.
But ships are but boards, sailors but  
    men; there be land-rats and water-rats, water-thieves and
    land-thieves- I mean pirates; and then there is the peril of
    waters, winds, and rocks.
Three thousand ducats- I think I may take his bond.
I will be assur'd I may; and, that I may be assured, I
    will bethink me.
May I speak with Antonio?
I will buy with
    you, sell with you, talk with you, walk with you, and so
    following; but I will not eat with you, drink with you, nor pray
    with you.
I hate him for he is a Christian;
    But more for that in low simplicity  
    He lends out money gratis, and brings down
    The rate of usance here with us in Venice.
If I can catch him once upon the hip,
    I will feed fat the ancient grudge I bear him.
Cursed be my tribe
    If I forgive him!
I am debating of my present store,
    And, by the near guess of my memory,
    I cannot instantly raise up the gross
    Of full three thousand ducats.
Shylock, albeit I neither lend nor borrow
    By taking nor by giving of excess,  
    Yet, to supply the ripe wants of my friend,
    I'll break a custom.
I had forgot- three months; you told me so.
I do never use it.
I cannot tell; I make it breed as fast.
Signior Antonio, many a time and oft
    In the Rialto you have rated me
    About my moneys and my usances;
    Still have I borne it with a patient shrug,
    For suff'rance is the badge of all our tribe;
    You call me misbeliever, cut-throat dog,
    And spit upon my Jewish gaberdine,
    And all for use of that which is mine own.
What should I say to you?
Should I not say
    'Hath a dog money?
' Or
    Shall I bend low and, in a bondman's key,
    With bated breath and whisp'ring humbleness,
    Say this:
    'Fair sir, you spit on me on Wednesday last,
    You spurn'd me such a day; another time
    You call'd me dog; and for these courtesies
    I'll lend you thus much moneys'?
I am as like to call thee so again,
    To spit on thee again, to spurn thee too.
I would be friends with you, and have your love,  
    Forget the shames that you have stain'd me with,
    Supply your present wants, and take no doit
    Of usance for my moneys, and you'll not hear me.
This is kind I offer.
This kindness will I show.
Content, in faith; I'll seal to such a bond,
    And say there is much kindness in the Jew.
You shall not seal to such a bond for me;
    I'll rather dwell in my necessity.
Why, fear not, man; I will not forfeit it;
    Within these two months- that's a month before  
    This bond expires- I do expect return
    Of thrice three times the value of this bond.
Pray you, tell me this:
    If he should break his day, what should I gain
    By the exaction of the forfeiture?
I say,
    To buy his favour, I extend this friendship;
    If he will take it, so; if not, adieu;
    And, for my love, I pray you wrong me not.
Yes, Shylock, I will seal unto this bond.
Then meet me forthwith at the notary's;
    Give him direction for this merry bond,
    And I will go and purse the ducats straight,
    See to my house, left in the fearful guard
    Of an unthrifty knave, and presently
    I'll be with you.
I like not fair terms and a villain's mind.
SCENE I.
Mislike me not for my complexion,
    The shadowed livery of the burnish'd sun,
    To whom I am a neighbour, and near bred.
I tell thee, lady, this aspect of mine
    Hath fear'd the valiant; by my love, I swear
    The best-regarded virgins of our clime
    Have lov'd it too.
I would not change this hue,
    Except to steal your thoughts, my gentle queen.
In terms of choice I am not solely led
    By nice direction of a maiden's eyes;
    Besides, the lott'ry of my destiny  
    Bars me the right of voluntary choosing.
But, if my father had not scanted me,
    And hedg'd me by his wit to yield myself
    His wife who wins me by that means I told you,
    Yourself, renowned Prince, then stood as fair
    As any comer I have look'd on yet
    For my affection.
Even for that I thank you.
Therefore, I pray you, lead me to the caskets
    To try my fortune.
By this scimitar,
    That slew the Sophy and a Persian prince,
    That won three fields of Sultan Solyman,
    I would o'erstare the sternest eyes that look,
    Outbrave the heart most daring on the earth,
    Pluck the young sucking cubs from the she-bear,
    Yea, mock the lion when 'a roars for prey,
    To win thee, lady.
So is Alcides beaten by his page;
    And so may I, blind Fortune leading me,
    Miss that which one unworthier may attain,
    And die with grieving.
'Conscience,' say I, (you counsel well.
' 'Fiend,' say I, 'you
    counsel well.
' To be rul'd by my conscience, I should stay with  
    the Jew my master, who- God bless the mark!
- is a kind of devil;
    and, to run away from the Jew, I should be ruled by the fiend,
    who- saving your reverence!
I will run, fiend; my heels are at your commandment; I
    will run.
Master young man, you, I pray you, which is the way to
    master Jew's?
I will try confusions with him.
Master young gentleman, I pray you, which is the way to
    master Jew's?
[Aside]  Mark me
    now; now will I raise the waters.
No master, sir, but a poor man's son; his father, though I
    say't, is an honest exceeding poor man, and, God be thanked, well
    to live.
But I pray you, ergo, old man, ergo, I beseech you, talk
    you of young Master Launcelot?
Do I look like a cudgel or a hovel-post, a staff or a
    prop?
Alack the day, I know you not, young gentleman; but I pray
    you tell me, is my boy- God rest his soul!
Alack, sir, I am sand-blind; I know you not.
Well,
    old man, I will tell you news of your son.
Pray you, sir, stand up; I am sure you are not Launcelot my
    boy.
Pray you, let's have no more fooling about it, but give
    me your blessing; I am Launcelot, your boy that was, your son
    that is, your child that shall be.
I cannot think you are my son.
I know not what I shall think of that; but I am
    Launcelot, the Jew's man, and I am sure Margery your wife is my
    mother.
I'll be sworn, if thou be
    Launcelot, thou art mine own flesh and blood.
It should seem, then, that Dobbin's tail grows backward;
    I am sure he had more hair of his tail than I have of my face
    when I last saw him.
I have brought him a present.
Well, well; but, for mine own part, as I have set up my
    rest to run away, so I will not rest till I have run some ground.
I
    am famish'd in his service; you may tell every finger I have with
    my ribs.
Father, I am glad you are come; give me your present to
    one Master Bassanio, who indeed gives rare new liveries; if I
    serve not him, I will run as far as God has any ground.
To him, father, for I am a Jew, if I
    serve the Jew any longer.
Indeed the short and the long is, I serve the Jew, and
    have a desire, as my father shall specify-
  GOBBO.
To be brief, the very truth is that the Jew, having done
    me wrong, doth cause me, as my father, being I hope an old man,
    shall frutify unto you-
  GOBBO.
I have here a dish of doves that I would bestow upon your
    worship; and my suit is-
  LAUNCELOT.
In very brief, the suit is impertinent to myself, as
    your worship shall know by this honest old man; and, though I say
    it, though old man, yet poor man, my father.
I know thee well; thou hast obtain'd thy suit.
I cannot get a service, no!
I have ne'er a
    tongue in my head!
[Looking on his palm]  Well; if any man in
    Italy have a fairer table which doth offer to swear upon a book- I
    shall have good fortune.
Father,
    come; I'll take my leave of the Jew in the twinkling.
I pray thee, good Leonardo, think on this.
These things being bought and orderly bestowed,
    Return in haste, for I do feast to-night
    My best esteem'd acquaintance; hie thee, go.
I have suit to you.
You must not deny me: I must go with you to Belmont.
Pray thee, take pain
    To allay with some cold drops of modesty
    Thy skipping spirit; lest through thy wild behaviour
    I be misconst'red in the place I go to
    And lose my hopes.
Signior Bassanio, hear me:  
    If I do not put on a sober habit,
    Talk with respect, and swear but now and then,
    Wear prayer-books in my pocket, look demurely,
    Nay more, while grace is saying hood mine eyes
    Thus with my hat, and sigh, and say amen,
    Use all the observance of civility
    Like one well studied in a sad ostent
    To please his grandam, never trust me more.
Nay, but I bar to-night; you shall not gauge me
    By what we do to-night.
No, that were pity;
    I would entreat you rather to put on
    Your boldest suit of mirth, for we have friends
    That purpose merriment.
But fare you well;
    I have some business.
And I must to Lorenzo and the rest;
    But we will visit you at supper-time.
I am sorry thou wilt leave my father so.
I would not have my father
    See me in talk with thee.
If a Christian do not play the knave and get
    thee, I am much deceived.
But though I am a daughter to his blood,  
    I am not to his manners.
O Lorenzo,
    If thou keep promise, I shall end this strife,
    Become a Christian and thy loving wife.
I know the hand; in faith, 'tis a fair hand,
    And whiter than the paper it writ on  
    Is the fair hand that writ.
Tell gentle Jessica
    I will not fail her; speak it privately.
I am provided of a torch-bearer.
Ay, marry, I'll be gone about it straight.
And so will I.
I must needs tell thee all.
She hath directed
    How I shall take her from her father's house;
    What gold and jewels she is furnish'd with;  
    What page's suit she hath in readiness.
-
    And sleep and snore, and rend apparel out-
    Why, Jessica, I say!
I do not bid thee call.
Your worship was wont to tell me I could do nothing
    without bidding.
I am bid forth to supper, Jessica;
    There are my keys.
But wherefore should I go?
I am not bid for love; they flatter me;  
    But yet I'll go in hate, to feed upon
    The prodigal Christian.
I am right loath to go;
    There is some ill a-brewing towards my rest,
    For I did dream of money-bags to-night.
I beseech you, sir, go; my young master doth expect your
    reproach.
So do I his.
And they have conspired together; I will not say you
    shall see a masque, but if you do, then it was not for nothing
    that my nose fell a-bleeding on Black Monday last at six o'clock
    i' th' morning, falling out that year on Ash Wednesday was four
    year, in th' afternoon.
Hear you me, Jessica:
    Lock up my doors, and when you hear the drum,
    And the vile squealing of the wry-neck'd fife,
    Clamber not you up to the casements then,
    Nor thrust your head into the public street
    To gaze on Christian fools with varnish'd faces;
    But stop my house's ears- I mean my casements;  
    Let not the sound of shallow fopp'ry enter
    My sober house.
By Jacob's staff, I swear
    I have no mind of feasting forth to-night;
    But I will go.
Go you before me, sirrah;
    Say I will come.
I will go before, sir.
The patch is kind enough, but a huge feeder,
    Snail-slow in profit, and he sleeps by day
    More than the wild-cat; drones hive not with me,
    Therefore I part with him; and part with him
    To one that I would have him help to waste
    His borrowed purse.
Well, Jessica, go in;
    Perhaps I will return immediately.
Do as I bid you, shut doors after you.
Farewell; and if my fortune be not crost,
    I have a father, you a daughter, lost.
Not I, but my affairs, have made you wait.
When you shall please to play the thieves for wives,
    I'll watch as long for you then.
Tell me, for more certainty,
    Albeit I'll swear that I do know your tongue.
Lorenzo, certain; and my love indeed;
    For who love I so much?
And now who knows  
    But you, Lorenzo, whether I am yours?
I am glad 'tis night, you do not look on me,
    For I am much asham'd of my exchange;
    But love is blind, and lovers cannot see
    The pretty follies that themselves commit,
    For, if they could, Cupid himself would blush
    To see me thus transformed to a boy.
must I hold a candle to my shames?
Why, 'tis an office of discovery, love,
    And I should be obscur'd.
I will make fast the doors, and gild myself  
    With some moe ducats, and be with you straight.
Beshrew me, but I love her heartily,
    For she is wise, if I can judge of her,
    And fair she is, if that mine eyes be true,
    And true she is, as she hath prov'd herself;
    And therefore, like herself, wise, fair, and true,
    Shall she be placed in my constant soul.
'Tis nine o'clock; our friends all stay for you;
    No masque to-night; the wind is come about;
    Bassanio presently will go aboard;
    I have sent twenty out to seek for you.
I am glad on't; I desire no more delight
    Than to be under sail and gone to-night.
'
    How shall I know if I do choose the right?
The one of them contains my picture, Prince;
    If you choose that, then I am yours withal.
Let me see;
    I will survey th' inscriptions back again.
A golden mind stoops not to shows of dross;
    I'll then nor give nor hazard aught for lead.
As much as I deserve?
I do in birth deserve her, and in fortunes,
    In graces, and in qualities of breeding;
    But more than these, in love I do deserve.
What if I stray'd no farther, but chose here?
Or shall I think in silver she's immur'd,
    Being ten times undervalued to tried gold?
Deliver me the key;
    Here do I choose, and thrive I as I may!
There, take it, Prince, and if my form lie there,
    Then I am yours.
I'll read the writing.
I have too griev'd a heart
    To take a tedious leave; thus losers part.
Why, man, I saw Bassanio under sail;
    With him is Gratiano gone along;
    And in their ship I am sure Lorenzo is not.
I never heard a passion so confus'd,
    So strange, outrageous, and so variable,
    As the dog Jew did utter in the streets.
Marry, well rememb'red;
    I reason'd with a Frenchman yesterday,
    Who told me, in the narrow seas that part
    The French and English, there miscarried
    A vessel of our country richly fraught.
I thought upon Antonio when he told me,
    And wish'd in silence that it were not his.
I saw Bassanio and Antonio part.
I think he only loves the world for him.
I pray thee, let us go and find him out,
    And quicken his embraced heaviness
    With some delight or other.
Quick, quick, I pray thee, draw the curtain straight;
    The Prince of Arragon hath ta'en his oath,
    And comes to his election presently.
If you choose that wherein I am contain'd,
    Straight shall our nuptial rites be solemniz'd;
    But if you fail, without more speech, my lord,
    You must be gone from hence immediately.
I am enjoin'd by oath to observe three things:
    First, never to unfold to any one
    Which casket 'twas I chose; next, if I fail
    Of the right casket, never in my life
    To woo a maid in way of marriage;  
    Lastly,
    If I do fail in fortune of my choice,
    Immediately to leave you and be gone.
And so have I address'd me.
'
    You shall look fairer ere I give or hazard.
I will not choose what many men desire,
    Because I will not jump with common spirits
    And rank me with the barbarous multitudes.
'
    I will assume desert.
I will read it.
'
    Did I deserve no more than a fool's head?
Take what wife you will to bed,  
         I will ever be your head.
'

         Still more fool I shall appear
         By the time I linger here.
With one fool's head I came to woo,
         But I go away with two.
I'll keep my oath,
         Patiently to bear my wroth.
Yet I have not seen
    So likely an ambassador of love.
No more, I pray thee; I am half afeard
    Thou wilt say anon he is some kin to thee,
    Thou spend'st such high-day wit in praising him.
Come, come, Nerissa, for I long to see
    Quick Cupid's post that comes so mannerly.
SCENE I.
Why, yet it lives there uncheck'd that Antonio hath a ship
    of rich lading wreck'd on the narrow seas; the Goodwins I think
    they call the place, a very dangerous flat and fatal, where the
    carcases of many a tall ship lie buried, as they say, if my
    gossip Report be an honest woman of her word.
I would she were as lying a gossip in that as ever knapp'd
    ginger or made her neighbours believe she wept for the death of a
    third husband.
But it is true, without any slips of prolixity or
    crossing the plain highway of talk, that the good Antonio, the
    honest Antonio- O that I had a title good enough to keep his name
    company!
I would it might prove the end of his losses.
That's certain; I, for my part, knew the tailor that made
    the wings she flew withal.
I say my daughter is my flesh and my blood.
There I have another bad match: a bankrupt, a prodigal,
    who dare scarce show his head on the Rialto; a beggar, that was
    us'd to come so smug upon the mart.
Why, I am sure, if he forfeit, thou wilt not take his
    flesh.
I am a Jew.
The villainy you teach me
    I will execute; and itshall go hard but I will better the
    instruction.
I often came where I did hear of her, but cannot find her.
The curse never fell upon our
    nation till now; I never felt it till now.
I would my daughter
    were dead at my foot, and the jewels in her ear; would she were
    hears'd at my foot, and the ducats in her coffin!
Why, so- and I know not what's spent in the search.
Yes, other men have ill luck too: Antonio, as I heard in
    Genoa-
  SHYLOCK.
I thank God, I thank God.
I spoke with some of the sailors that escaped the wreck.
I thank thee, good Tubal.
Your daughter spent in Genoa, as I heard, one night,
    fourscore ducats.
Thou stick'st a dagger in me- I shall never see my gold
    again.
I am very glad of it; I'll plague him, I'll torture him; I
    am glad of it.
It was my
    turquoise; I had it of Leah when I was a bachelor; I would not
    have given it for a wilderness of monkeys.
I will have the heart of
    him, if he forfeit; for, were he out of Venice, I can make what
    merchandise I will.
I pray you tarry; pause a day or two
    Before you hazard; for, in choosing wrong,
    I lose your company; therefore forbear a while.
There's something tells me- but it is not love-
    I would not lose you; and you know yourself
    Hate counsels not in such a quality.
But lest you should not understand me well-
    And yet a maiden hath no tongue but thought-
    I would detain you here some month or two
    Before you venture for me.
I could teach you
    How to choose right, but then I am forsworn;
    So will I never be; so may you miss me;
    But if you do, you'll make me wish a sin,
    That I had been forsworn.
They have o'erlook'd me and divided me;
    One half of me is yours, the other half yours-  
    Mine own, I would say; but if mine, then yours,
    And so all yours.
Prove it so,
    Let fortune go to hell for it, not I.
I speak too long, but 'tis to peize the time,
    To eke it, and to draw it out in length,
    To stay you from election.
Let me choose;
    For as I am, I live upon the rack.
Ay, but I fear you speak upon the rack,
    Where men enforced do speak anything.
Promise me life, and I'll confess the truth.
Away, then; I am lock'd in one of them.
I stand for sacrifice;
    The rest aloof are the Dardanian wives,
    With bleared visages come forth to view
    The issue of th' exploit.
Live thou, I live.
With much much more dismay
    I view the fight than thou that mak'st the fray.
Let us all ring fancy's knell:
                   I'll begin it- Ding, dong, bell.
Therefore, thou gaudy gold,
    Hard food for Midas, I will none of thee;
    Nor none of thee, thou pale and common drudge
    'Tween man and man; but thou, thou meagre lead,
    Which rather threaten'st than dost promise aught,
    Thy plainness moves me more than eloquence,
    And here choose I.
I feel too much thy blessing.
Make it less,
    For fear I surfeit.
[Opening the leaden casket]  What find I here?
Fair lady, by your leave;
    I come by note, to give and to receive.
Like one of two contending in a prize,
    That thinks he hath done well in people's eyes,
    Hearing applause and universal shout,
    Giddy in spirit, still gazing in a doubt
    Whether those peals of praise be his or no;
    So, thrice-fair lady, stand I even so,
    As doubtful whether what I see be true,  
    Until confirm'd, sign'd, ratified by you.
You see me, Lord Bassanio, where I stand,
    Such as I am.
Though for myself alone
    I would not be ambitious in my wish
    To wish myself much better, yet for you
    I would be trebled twenty times myself,
    A thousand times more fair, ten thousand times more rich,
    That only to stand high in your account
    I might in virtues, beauties, livings, friends,
    Exceed account.
But now I was the lord  
    Of this fair mansion, master of my servants,
    Queen o'er myself; and even now, but now,
    This house, these servants, and this same myself,
    Are yours- my lord's.
I give them with this ring,
    Which when you part from, lose, or give away,
    Let it presage the ruin of your love,
    And be my vantage to exclaim on you.
My Lord Bassanio, and my gentle lady,
    I wish you all the joy that you can wish,
    For I am sure you can wish none from me;
    And, when your honours mean to solemnize
    The bargain of your faith, I do beseech you
    Even at that time I may be married too.
I thank your lordship, you have got me one.
My eyes, my lord, can look as swift as yours:
    You saw the mistress, I beheld the maid;
    You lov'd, I lov'd; for intermission
    No more pertains to me, my lord, than you.
Your fortune stood upon the caskets there,
    And so did mine too, as the matter falls;
    For wooing here until I sweat again,
    And swearing till my very roof was dry
    With oaths of love, at last- if promise last-
    I got a promise of this fair one here
    To have her love, provided that your fortune  
    Achiev'd her mistress.
By your leave,
    I bid my very friends and countrymen,  
    Sweet Portia, welcome.
So do I, my lord;
    They are entirely welcome.
I thank your honour.
I did, my lord,
    And I have reason for it.
Ere I ope his letter,
    I pray you tell me how my good friend doth.
I know he will be glad of our success:  
    We are the Jasons, we have won the fleece.
I would you had won the fleece that he hath lost.
With leave, Bassanio: I am half yourself,
    And I must freely have the half of anything
    That this same paper brings you.
Gentle lady,
    When I did first impart my love to you,
    I freely told you all the wealth I had
    Ran in my veins- I was a gentleman;
    And then I told you true.
And yet, dear lady,
    Rating myself at nothing, you shall see
    How much I was a braggart.
When I told you
    My state was nothing, I should then have told you  
    That I was worse than nothing; for indeed
    I have engag'd myself to a dear friend,
    Engag'd my friend to his mere enemy,
    To feed my means.
Never did I know
    A creature that did bear the shape of man
    So keen and greedy to confound a man.
When I was with him, I have heard him swear
    To Tubal and to Chus, his countrymen,
    That he would rather have Antonio's flesh
    Than twenty times the value of the sum
    That he did owe him; and I know, my lord,
    If law, authority, and power, deny not,
    It will go hard with poor Antonio.
Bid your friends welcome, show a merry cheer;
    Since you are dear bought, I will love you dear.
[Reads]  'Sweet Bassanio, my ships have all miscarried,
    my creditors grow cruel, my estate is very low, my bond to the
    Jew is forfeit; and since, in paying it, it is impossible I  
    should live, all debts are clear'd between you and I, if I might
    but see you at my death.
Since I have your good leave to go away,
    I will make haste; but, till I come again,
    No bed shall e'er be guilty of my stay,
    Nor rest be interposer 'twixt us twain.
I'll have my bond; speak not against my bond.
I have sworn an oath that I will have my bond.
Thou call'dst me dog before thou hadst a cause,
    But, since I am a dog, beware my fangs;
    The Duke shall grant me justice.
I do wonder,
    Thou naughty gaoler, that thou art so fond
    To come abroad with him at his request.
I pray thee hear me speak.
I'll have my bond.
I will not hear thee speak;
    I'll have my bond; and therefore speak no more.
I'll not be made a soft and dull-ey'd fool,
    To shake the head, relent, and sigh, and yield,
    To Christian intercessors.
Follow not;  
    I'll have no speaking; I will have my bond.
Let him alone;
    I'll follow him no more with bootless prayers.
He seeks my life; his reason well I know:
    I oft deliver'd from his forfeitures
    Many that have at times made moan to me;
    Therefore he hates me.
I am sure the Duke
    Will never grant this forfeiture to hold.
Therefore, go;
    These griefs and losses have so bated me
    That I shall hardly spare a pound of flesh
    To-morrow to my bloody creditor.
Well, gaoler, on; pray God Bassanio come
    To see me pay his debt, and then I care not.
Madam, although I speak it in your presence,
    You have a noble and a true conceit
    Of godlike amity, which appears most strongly
    In bearing thus the absence of your lord.
But if you knew to whom you show this honour,
    How true a gentleman you send relief,
    How dear a lover of my lord your husband,
    I know you would be prouder of the work
    Than customary bounty can enforce you.
I never did repent for doing good,
    Nor shall not now; for in companions
    That do converse and waste the time together,
    Whose souls do bear an equal yoke of love,
    There must be needs a like proportion
    Of lineaments, of manners, and of spirit,
    Which makes me think that this Antonio,
    Being the bosom lover of my lord,  
    Must needs be like my lord.
If it be so,
    How little is the cost I have bestowed
    In purchasing the semblance of my soul
    From out the state of hellish cruelty!
Lorenzo, I commit into your hands
    The husbandry and manage of my house
    Until my lord's return; for mine own part,
    I have toward heaven breath'd a secret vow
    To live in prayer and contemplation,
    Only attended by Nerissa here,
    Until her husband and my lord's return.
I do desire you
    Not to deny this imposition,
    The which my love and some necessity
    Now lays upon you.
Madam, with all my heart
    I shall obey you in an fair commands.
I wish your ladyship all heart's content.
I thank you for your wish, and am well pleas'd
    To wish it back on you.
Exeunt JESSICA and LORENZO
    Now, Balthasar,
    As I have ever found thee honest-true,
    So let me find thee still.
Take this same letter,
    And use thou all th' endeavour of a man
    In speed to Padua; see thou render this
    Into my cousin's hands, Doctor Bellario;
    And look what notes and garments he doth give thee,
    Bring them, I pray thee, with imagin'd speed
    Unto the traject, to the common ferry
    Which trades to Venice.
Waste no time in words,
    But get thee gone; I shall be there before thee.
Madam, I go with all convenient speed.
Come on, Nerissa, I have work in hand
    That you yet know not of; we'll see our husbands
    Before they think of us.
I'll hold thee any wager,
    When we are both accoutred like young men,
    I'll prove the prettier fellow of the two,
    And wear my dagger with the braver grace,
    And speak between the change of man and boy
    With a reed voice; and turn two mincing steps
    Into a manly stride; and speak of frays
    Like a fine bragging youth; and tell quaint lies,
    How honourable ladies sought my love,
    Which I denying, they fell sick and died-
    I could not do withal.
Then I'll repent,
    And wish for all that, that I had not kill'd them.
And twenty of these puny lies I'll tell,  
    That men shall swear I have discontinued school
    About a twelvemonth.
I have within my mind
    A thousand raw tricks of these bragging Jacks,
    Which I will practise.
But come, I'll tell thee all my whole device
    When I am in my coach, which stays for us
    At the park gate; and therefore haste away,
    For we must measure twenty miles to-day.
Yes, truly; for, look you, the sins of the father are to
    be laid upon the children; therefore, I promise you, I fear you.
I was always plain with you, and so now I speak my agitation of
    the matter; therefore be o' good cheer, for truly I think you are
    damn'd.
And what hope is that, I pray thee?
Truly then I fear you are damn'd both by father and
    mother; thus when I shun Scylla, your father, I fall into
    Charybdis, your mother; well, you are gone both ways.
I shall be sav'd by my husband; he hath made me a
    Christian.
I'll tell my husband, Launcelot, what you say; here he
    comes.
I shall grow jealous of you shortly, Launcelot, if you
    thus get my wife into corners.
Nay, you need nor fear us, Lorenzo; Launcelot and I are
    out; he tells me flatly there's no mercy for me in heaven,
    because I am a Jew's daughter; and he says you are no good member
    of the commonwealth, for in converting Jews to Christians you
    raise the price of pork.
I shall answer that better to the commonwealth than you
    can the getting up of the negro's belly; the Moor is with child
    by you, Launcelot.
It is much that the Moor should be more than reason; but  
    if she be less than an honest woman, she is indeed more than I
    took her for.
I think the best
    grace of wit will shortly turn into silence, and discourse grow
    commendable in none only but parrots.
Not so, sir, neither; I know my duty.
I pray thee understand a
    plain man in his plain meaning: go to thy fellows, bid them cover
    the table, serve in the meat, and we will come in to dinner.
The fool hath planted in his memory
    An army of good words; and I do know
    A many fools that stand in better place,
    Garnish'd like him, that for a tricksy word
    Defy the matter.
I will anon; first let us go to dinner.
Nay, let me praise you while I have a stomach.
No, pray thee, let it serve for table-talk;
    Then howsome'er thou speak'st, 'mong other things
    I shall digest it.
Well, I'll set you forth.
SCENE I.
I am sorry for thee; thou art come to answer
    A stony adversary, an inhuman wretch,
    Uncapable of pity, void and empty
    From any dram of mercy.
I have heard
    Your Grace hath ta'en great pains to qualify
    His rigorous course; but since he stands obdurate,
    And that no lawful means can carry me
    Out of his envy's reach, I do oppose
    My patience to his fury, and am arm'd
    To suffer with a quietness of spirit
    The very tyranny and rage of his.
Shylock, the world thinks, and I think so too,
    That thou but leadest this fashion of thy malice
    To the last hour of act; and then, 'tis thought,
    Thou'lt show thy mercy and remorse, more strange
    Than is thy strange apparent cruelty;
    And where thou now exacts the penalty,
    Which is a pound of this poor merchant's flesh,
    Thou wilt not only loose the forfeiture,
    But, touch'd with human gentleness and love,
    Forgive a moiety of the principal,
    Glancing an eye of pity on his losses,
    That have of late so huddled on his back-
    Enow to press a royal merchant down,
    And pluck commiseration of his state
    From brassy bosoms and rough hearts of flint,
    From stubborn Turks and Tartars, never train'd  
    To offices of tender courtesy.
I have possess'd your Grace of what I purpose,
    And by our holy Sabbath have I sworn
    To have the due and forfeit of my bond.
You'll ask me why I rather choose to have
    A weight of carrion flesh than to receive
    Three thousand ducats.
I'll not answer that,
    But say it is my humour- is it answer'd?
What if my house be troubled with a rat,
    And I be pleas'd to give ten thousand ducats
    To have it ban'd?
Now, for your answer:  
    As there is no firm reason to be rend'red
    Why he cannot abide a gaping pig;
    Why he, a harmless necessary cat;
    Why he, a woollen bagpipe, but of force
    Must yield to such inevitable shame
    As to offend, himself being offended;
    So can I give no reason, nor I will not,
    More than a lodg'd hate and a certain loathing
    I bear Antonio, that I follow thus
    A losing suit against him.
I am not bound to please thee with my answers.
I pray you, think you question with the Jew.
Therefore, I do beseech you,
    Make no moe offers, use no farther means,
    But with all brief and plain conveniency
    Let me have judgment, and the Jew his will.
If every ducat in six thousand ducats
    Were in six parts, and every part a ducat,
    I would not draw them; I would have my bond.
What judgment shall I dread, doing no wrong?
You have among you many a purchas'd slave,
    Which, fike your asses and your dogs and mules,
    You use in abject and in slavish parts,  
    Because you bought them; shall I say to you
    'Let them be free, marry them to your heirs-
    Why sweat they under burdens?
' So do I answer you:
    The pound of flesh which I demand of him
    Is dearly bought, 'tis mine, and I will have it.
I stand for judgment; answer; shall I have it?
Upon my power I may dismiss this court,
    Unless Bellario, a learned doctor,
    Whom I have sent for to determine this,
    Come here to-day.
I am a tainted wether of the flock,
    Meetest for death; the weakest kind of fruit
    Drops earliest to the ground, and so let me.
I stand here for law.
[Reads]  'Your Grace shall understand that at the receipt
    of your letter I am very sick; but in the instant that your
    messenger came, in loving visitation was with me a young doctor
    of Rome- his name is Balthazar.
I acquainted him with the cause
    in controversy between the Jew and Antonio the merchant; we
    turn'd o'er many books together; he is furnished with my opinion
    which, bettered with his own learning-the greatness whereof I
    cannot enough commend- comes with him at my importunity to fill
    up your Grace's request in my stead.
I beseech you let his lack
    of years be no impediment to let him lack a reverend estimation,
    for I never knew so young a body with so old a head.
I leave him
    to your gracious acceptance, whose trial shall better publish his
    commendation.
YOU hear the learn'd Bellario, what he writes;  
    And here, I take it, is the doctor come.
I did, my lord.
I am informed throughly of the cause.
I do.
On what compulsion must I?
I have spoke thus much
    To mitigate the justice of thy plea,  
    Which if thou follow, this strict court of Venice
    Must needs give sentence 'gainst the merchant there.
I crave the law,
    The penalty and forfeit of my bond.
Yes; here I tender it for him in the court;
    Yea, twice the sum; if that will not suffice,
    I will be bound to pay it ten times o'er
    On forfeit of my hands, my head, my heart;
    If this will not suffice, it must appear
    That malice bears down truth.
And, I beseech you,
    Wrest once the law to your authority;
    To do a great right do a little wrong,
    And curb this cruel devil of his will.
O wise young judge, how I do honour thee!
I pray you, let me look upon the bond.
I have an oath in heaven.
Shall I lay perjury upon my soul?
It doth appear you are a worthy judge;
    You know the law; your exposition
    Hath been most sound; I charge you by the law,
    Whereof you are a well-deserving pillar,
    Proceed to judgment.
By my soul I swear
    There is no power in the tongue of man
    To alter me.
I stay here on my bond.
Most heartily I do beseech the court  
    To give the judgment.
I have them ready.
I cannot find it; 'tis not in the bond.
But little: I am arm'd and well prepar'd.
Grieve not that I am fall'n to this for you,
    For herein Fortune shows herself more kind
    Than is her custom.
Commend me to your honourable wife;
    Tell her the process of Antonio's end;
    Say how I lov'd you; speak me fair in death;
    And, when the tale is told, bid her be judge
    Whether Bassanio had not once a love.
Repent but you that you shall lose your friend,
    And he repents not that he pays your debt;
    For if the Jew do cut but deep enough,  
    I'll pay it instantly with all my heart.
Antonio, I am married to a wife
    Which is as dear to me as life itself;
    But life itself, my wife, and all the world,
    Are not with me esteem'd above thy life;
    I would lose all, ay, sacrifice them all
    Here to this devil, to deliver you.
I have a wife who I protest I love;
    I would she were in heaven, so she could
    Entreat some power to change this currish Jew.
I have a
    daughter-
    Would any of the stock of Barrabas
    Had been her husband, rather than a Christian!
-
    We trifle time; I pray thee pursue sentence.
I take this offer then: pay the bond thrice,  
    And let the Christian go.
Now, infidel, I have you on the hip.
I have it ready for thee; here it is.
A Daniel still say I, a second Daniel!
I thank thee, Jew, for teaching me that word.
Shall I not have barely my principal?
I'll stay no longer question.
In which predicament, I say, thou stand'st;
    For it appears by manifest proceeding
    That indirectly, and directly too,
    Thou hast contrived against the very life
    Of the defendant; and thou hast incurr'd
    The danger formerly by me rehears'd.
That thou shalt see the difference of our spirit,
    I pardon thee thy life before thou ask it.
You take my house when you do take the prop
    That doth sustain my house; you take my life  
    When you do take the means whereby I live.
So please my lord the Duke and all the court
    To quit the fine for one half of his goods;
    I am content, so he will let me have
    The other half in use, to render it
    Upon his death unto the gentleman
    That lately stole his daughter-
    Two things provided more; that, for this favour,
    He presently become a Christian;
    The other, that he do record a gift,
    Here in the court, of all he dies possess'd
    Unto his son Lorenzo and his daughter.
He shall do this, or else I do recant
    The pardon that I late pronounced here.
I am content.
I pray you, give me leave to go from hence;  
    I am not well; send the deed after me
    And I will sign it.
In christ'ning shalt thou have two god-fathers;
    Had I been judge, thou shouldst have had ten more,
    To bring thee to the gallows, not to the font.
Sir, I entreat you home with me to dinner.
I humbly do desire your Grace of pardon;
    I must away this night toward Padua,
    And it is meet I presently set forth.
I am sorry that your leisure serves you not.
Most worthy gentleman, I and my friend
    Have by your wisdom been this day acquitted
    Of grievous penalties; in lieu whereof
    Three thousand ducats, due unto the Jew,
    We freely cope your courteous pains withal.
He is well paid that is well satisfied,
    And I, delivering you, am satisfied,
    And therein do account myself well paid.
I pray you, know me when we meet again;
    I wish you well, and so I take my leave.
Dear sir, of force I must attempt you further;
    Take some remembrance of us, as a tribute,
    Not as fee.
Grant me two things, I pray you,
    Not to deny me, and to pardon me.
You press me far, and therefore I will yield.
[To ANTONIO]  Give me your gloves, I'll wear them for your sake.
[To BASSANIO]  And, for your love, I'll take this ring from you.
Do not draw back your hand; I'll take no more,
    And you in love shall not deny me this.
This ring, good sir- alas, it is a trifle;
    I will not shame myself to give you this.
I will have nothing else but only this;  
    And now, methinks, I have a mind to it.
The dearest ring in Venice will I give you,
    And find it out by proclamation;
    Only for this, I pray you, pardon me.
I see, sir, you are liberal in offers;
    You taught me first to beg, and now, methinks,
    You teach me how a beggar should be answer'd.
Good sir, this ring was given me by my wife;
    And, when she put it on, she made me vow
    That I should neither sell, nor give, nor lose it.
And if your wife be not a mad woman,
    And know how well I have deserv'd this ring,
    She would not hold out enemy for ever
    For giving it to me.
Exit GRATIANO
    Come, you and I will thither presently;
    And in the morning early will we both
    Fly toward Belmont.
His ring I do accept most thankfully,
    And so, I pray you, tell him.
Furthermore,
    I pray you show my youth old Shylock's house.
That will I do.
Sir, I would speak with you.
[Aside to PORTIA]  I'll See if I can get my husband's ring,
    Which I did make him swear to keep for ever.
[To NERISSA]  Thou Mayst, I warrant.
[Aloud]  Away, make haste, thou know'st where I will tarry.
SCENE I.
I would out-night you, did no body come;
    But, hark, I hear the footing of a man.
Your name, I pray you, friend?
Stephano is my name, and I bring word
    My mistress will before the break of day  
    Be here at Belmont; she doth stray about
    By holy crosses, where she kneels and prays
    For happy wedlock hours.
I pray you, is my master yet return'd?
But go we in, I pray thee, Jessica,
    And ceremoniously let us prepare
    Some welcome for the mistress of the house.
My friend Stephano, signify, I pray you,
    Within the house, your mistress is at hand;
    And bring your music forth into the air.
I am never merry when I hear sweet music.
Nothing is good, I see, without respect;  
    Methinks it sounds much sweeter than by day.
The crow doth sing as sweetly as the lark
    When neither is attended; and I think
    ne nightingale, if she should sing by day,
    When every goose is cackling, would be thought
    No better a musician than the wren.
That is the voice,
    Or I am much deceiv'd, of Portia.
Your husband is at hand; I hear his trumpet.
I thank you, madam; give welcome to my friend.
This is the man, this is Antonio,
    To whom I am so infinitely bound.
You should in all sense be much bound to him,
    For, as I hear, he was much bound for you.
No more than I am well acquitted of.
It must appear in other ways than words,
    Therefore I scant this breathing courtesy.
[To NERISSA]  By yonder moon I swear you do me wrong;
    In faith, I gave it to the judge's clerk.
You swore to me, when I did give it you,  
    That you would wear it till your hour of death,
    And that it should lie with you in your grave;
    Though not for me, yet for your vehement oaths,
    You should have been respective and have kept it.
Now by this hand I gave it to a youth,
    A kind of boy, a little scrubbed boy
    No higher than thyself, the judge's clerk;
    A prating boy that begg'd it as a fee;
    I could not for my heart deny it him.
You were to blame, I must be plain with you,
    To part so slightly with your wife's first gift,
    A thing stuck on with oaths upon your finger
    And so riveted with faith unto your flesh.
I gave my love a ring, and made him swear
    Never to part with it, and here he stands;
    I dare be sworn for him he would not leave it  
    Nor pluck it from his finger for the wealth
    That the world masters.
Now, in faith, Gratiano,
    You give your wife too unkind a cause of grief;
    An 'twere to me, I should be mad at it.
[Aside]  Why, I were best to cut my left hand off,
    And swear I lost the ring defending it.
Not that, I hope, which you receiv'd of me.
If I could add a lie unto a fault,
    I would deny it; but you see my finger
    Hath not the ring upon it; it is gone.
Even so void is your false heart of truth;
    By heaven, I will ne'er come in your bed
    Until I see the ring.
Nor I in yours
    Till I again see mine.
Sweet Portia,
    If you did know to whom I gave the ring,
    If you did know for whom I gave the ring,
    And would conceive for what I gave the ring,
    And how unwillingly I left the ring,
    When nought would be accepted but the ring,
    You would abate the strength of your displeasure.
Nerissa teaches me what to believe:
    I'll die for't but some woman had the ring.
No, by my honour, madam, by my soul,  
    No woman had it, but a civil doctor,
    Which did refuse three thousand ducats of me,
    And begg'd the ring; the which I did deny him,
    And suffer'd him to go displeas'd away-
    Even he that had held up the very life
    Of my dear friend.
What should I say, sweet lady?
I was enforc'd to send it after him;
    I was beset with shame and courtesy;
    My honour would not let ingratitude
    So much besmear it.
Pardon me, good lady;
    For by these blessed candles of the night,
    Had you been there, I think you would have begg'd
    The ring of me to give the worthy doctor.
Let not that doctor e'er come near my house;
    Since he hath got the jewel that I loved,
    And that which you did swear to keep for me,
    I will become as liberal as you;
    I'll not deny him anything I have,
    No, not my body, nor my husband's bed.
Know him I shall, I am well sure of it.
Lie not a night from home; watch me like Argus;
    If you do not, if I be left alone,
    Now, by mine honour which is yet mine own,
    I'll have that doctor for mine bedfellow.
And I his clerk; therefore be well advis'd
    How you do leave me to mine own protection.
Well, do you so, let not me take him then;
    For, if I do, I'll mar the young clerk's pen.
I am th' unhappy subject of these quarrels.
Portia, forgive me this enforced wrong;
    And in the hearing of these many friends
    I swear to thee, even by thine own fair eyes,
    Wherein I see myself-
  PORTIA.
Pardon this fault, and by my soul I swear  
    I never more will break an oath with thee.
I once did lend my body for his wealth,
    Which, but for him that had your husband's ring,
    Had quite miscarried; I dare be bound again,
    My soul upon the forfeit, that your lord
    Will never more break faith advisedly.
By heaven, it is the same I gave the doctor!
I had it of him.
Lorenzo here
    Shall witness I set forth as soon as you,
    And even but now return'd; I have not yet
    Enter'd my house.
Antonio, you are welcome;
    And I have better news in store for you
    Than you expect.
You shall not know by what strange accident
    I chanced on this letter.
I am dumb.
Were you the doctor, and I knew you not?
Sweet doctor, you shall be my bedfellow;
    When I am absent, then lie with my wife.
Sweet lady, you have given me life and living;  
    For here I read for certain that my ships
    Are safely come to road.
Ay, and I'll give them him without a fee.
There do I give to you and Jessica,
    From the rich Jew, a special deed of gift,
    After his death, of all he dies possess'd of.
It is almost morning,
    And yet I am sure you are not satisfied
    Of these events at full.
But were the day come, I should wish it dark,  
    Till I were couching with the doctor's clerk.
Well, while I live, I'll fear no other thing
    So sore as keeping safe Nerissa's ring.
>>



SCENE:
Windsor, and the neighbourhood


The Merry Wives of Windsor



ACT I.
Sir Hugh, persuade me not; I will make a Star
    Chamber matter of it; if he were twenty Sir John Falstaffs,
    he shall not abuse Robert Shallow, esquire.
Ay, that I do; and have done any time these three
    hundred years.
I may quarter, coz.
If Sir John Falstaff have committed
    disparagements unto you, I am of the church, and will be
    glad to do my benevolence, to make atonements and
    compremises between you.
o' my life, if I were young again, the sword  
    should end it.
I know the young gentlewoman; she has good
    gifts.
Shall I tell you a lie?
I do despise a liar as I do
    despise one that is false; or as I despise one that is not
    true.
The knight Sir John is there; and, I beseech you, be
    ruled by your well-willers.
I will peat the door for Master
    Page.
I am glad to see your worships well.
I thank you for
    my venison, Master Shallow.
Master Page, I am glad to see you; much good do
    it your good heart!
I wish'd your venison better; it was ill  
    kill'd.
-and I thank you
    always with my heart, la!
Sir, I thank you.
Sir, I thank you; by yea and no, I do.
I am glad to see you, good Master Slender.
I heard say
    he was outrun on Cotsall.
Sir, he is within; and I would I could do a good office
    between you.
I will answer it straight: I have done all this.
Slender, I broke your  
    head; what matter have you against me?
Marry, sir, I have matter in my head against you;
    and against your cony-catching rascals, Bardolph, Nym,
    and Pistol.
Slice, I say!
Peace, I pray you.
There is
    three umpires in this matter, as I understand: that is,
    Master Page, fidelicet Master Page; and there is myself,
    fidelicet myself; and the three party is, lastly and
    finally, mine host of the Garter.
I will make a prief of it in my note-book;
    and we will afterwards ork upon the cause with as great
    discreetly as we can.
Ay, by these gloves, did he-or I would I might
    never come in mine own great chamber again else!
Sir John and master
    mine,
    I combat challenge of this latten bilbo.
Be avis'd, sir, and pass good humours; I will say
    'marry trap' with you, if you run the nuthook's humour on  
    me; that is the very note of it.
By this hat, then, he in the red face had it; for
    though I cannot remember what I did when you made me
    drunk, yet I am not altogether an ass.
Why, sir, for my part, I say the gentleman had
    drunk himself out of his five sentences.
Ay, you spake in Latin then too; but 'tis no matter;
    I'll ne'er be drunk whilst I live again, but in honest,
    civil, godly company, for this trick.
If I be drunk, I'll be
    drunk with those that have the fear of God, and not with
    drunken knaves.
Come, we have a
    hot venison pasty to dinner; come, gentlemen, I hope we
    shall drink down all unkindness.
I had rather than forty shillings I had my Book of
    Songs and Sonnets here.
I must wait on
    myself, must I?
Ay, sir, you shall find me reasonable; if it be so, I
    shall do that that is reason.
So I do, sir.
Give ear to his motions: Master Slender, I will
    description the matter to you, if you be capacity of it.
Nay, I will do as my cousin Shallow says; I pray
    you pardon me; he's a justice of peace in his country,
    simple though I stand here.
Why, if it be so, I will marry her upon any
    reasonable demands.
I hope, sir, I will do as it shall become one that
    would do reason.
I will do a greater thing than that upon your request,
    cousin, in any reason.
Nay, conceive me, conceive me, sweet coz; what
    I do is to pleasure you, coz.
I will marry her, sir, at your request; but if there
    be no great love in the beginning, yet heaven may decrease  
    it upon better acquaintance, when we are married and
    have more occasion to know one another.
I hope upon
    familiarity will grow more contempt.
But if you say
    'marry her,' I will marry her; that I am freely dissolved,
    and dissolutely.
Ay, I think my cousin meant well.
Ay, or else I would I might be hang'd, la!
Would I were
    young for your sake, Mistress Anne!
I will wait on him, fair Mistress Anne!
I will not be absence at the grace.
No, I thank you, forsooth, heartily; I am very
    well.
I am not a-hungry, I thank you, forsooth.
I keep but three men
    and a boy yet, till my mother be dead.
Yet I live like a poor gentleman born.
I may not go in without your worship; they will not
    sit till you come.
I' faith, I'll eat nothing; I thank you as much as
    though I did.
I pray you, sir, walk in.
I had rather walk here, I thank you.
I bruis'd my
    shin th' other day with playing at sword and dagger with
    a master of fence-three veneys for a dish of stew'd prunes
    -and, I with my ward defending my head, he hot my shin,
    and, by my troth, I cannot abide the smell of hot meat  
    since.
I think there are, sir; I heard them talk'd of.
I love the sport well; but I shall as soon quarrel at
    it as any man in England.
I have seen
    Sackerson loose twenty times, and have taken him by the
    chain; but I warrant you, the women have so cried and
    shriek'd at it that it pass'd; but women, indeed, cannot
    abide 'em; they are very ill-favour'd rough things.
I'll eat nothing, I thank you, sir.
Not I, sir; pray you keep on.
Truly, I will not go first; truly, la!
I will not do
    you that wrong.
I pray you, sir.
I'll rather be unmannerly than troublesome.
I pray you
    be gone.
I will make an end of my dinner; there's pippins
    and cheese to come.
Truly, mine host, I must turn away some of my
    followers.
I sit at ten pounds a week.
I
    will entertain Bardolph; he shall draw, he shall tap; said I
    well, bully Hector?
I have spoke; let him follow.
I am at a word; follow.
It is a life that I have desir'd; I will thrive.
I am glad I am so acquit of this tinder-box: his
    thefts were too open; his filching was like an unskilful
    singer-he kept not time.
Well, sirs, I am almost out at heels.
There is no remedy; I must cony-catch; I must
    shift.
I ken the wight; he is of substance good.
My honest lads, I will tell you what I am about.
Indeed, I am in the waist
    two yards about; but I am now about no waste; I am about
    thrift.
Briefly, I do mean to make love to Ford's wife; I
    spy entertainment in her; she discourses, she carves, she
    gives the leer of invitation; I can construe the action of her
    familiar style; and the hardest voice of her behaviour, to be
    English'd rightly, is 'I am Sir John Falstaff's.
As many devils entertain; and 'To her, boy,' say I.
I have writ me here a letter to her; and here
    another to Page's wife, who even now gave me good eyes
    too, examin'd my parts with most judicious oeillades;
    sometimes the beam of her view gilded my foot, sometimes my
    portly belly.
I thank thee for that humour.
I will be cheaters to them both, and they
    shall be exchequers to me; they shall be my East and West
    Indies, and I will trade to them both.
Shall I Sir Pandarus of Troy become,
    And by my side wear steel?
I will run no base humour.
Here, take the
    humour-letter; I will keep the haviour of reputation.
for gourd and fullam
    holds,
    And high and low beguiles the rich and poor;
    Tester I'll have in pouch when thou shalt lack,
    Base Phrygian Turk!
I have operations in my head which be humours of
    revenge.
With both the humours, I.
I will discuss the humour of this love to Page.
And I to Ford shall eke unfold
    How Falstaff, varlet vile,
    His dove will prove, his gold will hold,
    And his soft couch defile.
My humour shall not cool; I will incense Page to deal
    with poison; I will possess him with yellowness; for the  
    revolt of mine is dangerous.
Thou art the Mars of malcontents; I second thee;
    troop on.
I pray thee go to the casement
    and see if you can see my master, Master Doctor
    Caius, coming.
I'll go watch.
[Exit RUGBY]  An
    honest, willing, kind fellow, as ever servant shall come in
    house withal; and, I warrant you, no tell-tale nor no
    breed-bate; his worst fault is that he is given to prayer; he is
    something peevish that way; but nobody but has his fault;
    but let that pass.
O, I should remember him.
Tell Master Parson Evans I will do what I can for your
    master.
Anne is a good girl, and I wish-

                         Re-enter RUGBY

  RUGBY.
what, John,
    I say!
Go, John, go inquire for my master; I doubt he be
    not well that he comes not home.
I do not like des toys.
Do intend vat I speak?
Ay, forsooth, I'll fetch it you.
[Aside]  I am glad
    he went not in himself; if he had found the young man,
    he would have been horn-mad.
By my trot, I tarry too long.
Dere is some simples in my closet dat I vill not for the
    varld I shall leave behind.
Wherefore shall I be content-a?
I beseech you, be not so phlegmatic; hear the
    truth of it.
Peace, I pray you.
but I'll ne'er put my finger
    in the fire, and need not.
[Aside to SIMPLE]  I am glad he is so quiet; if he
    had been throughly moved, you should have heard him
    so loud and so melancholy.
But notwithstanding, man, I'll
    do you your master what good I can; and the very yea and
    the no is, the French doctor, my master-I may call him
    my master, look you, for I keep his house; and I wash,
    wring, brew, bake, scour, dress meat and drink, make the
    beds, and do all myself-
  SIMPLE.
You  
    shall find it a great charge; and to be up early and down
    late; but notwithstanding-to tell you in your ear, I would
    have no words of it-my master himself is in love with
    Mistress Anne Page; but notwithstanding that, I know
    Anne's mind-that's neither here nor there.
You jack'nape; give-a this letter to Sir Hugh; by gar,
    it is a shallenge; I will cut his troat in de park; and I will
    teach a scurvy jack-a-nape priest to meddle or make.
By gar, I will
    cut all his two stones; by gar, he shall not have a stone
    to throw at his dog.
Do not you tell-a me dat I
    shall have Anne Page for myself?
By gar, I vill kill de Jack
    priest; and I have appointed mine host of de Jarteer to
    measure our weapon.
By gar, I will myself have Anne
    Page.
By gar, if I have  
    not Anne Page, I shall turn your head out of my door.
No,
    I know Anne's mind for that; never a woman in Windsor
    knows more of Anne's mind than I do; nor can do more
    than I do with her, I thank heaven.
Who's there, I trow?
Come near the house, I pray
    you.
In truth, sir, and she is pretty, and honest, and
    gentle; and one that is your friend, I can tell you that by
    the way; I praise heaven for it.
Shall I do any good, think'st thou?
Shall I not lose  
    my suit?
Troth, sir, all is in His hands above; but
    notwithstanding, Master Fenton, I'll be sworn on a book
    she loves you.
Yes, marry, have I; what of that?
Well, thereby hangs a tale; good faith, it is such
    another Nan; but, I detest, an honest maid as ever broke
    bread.
We had an hour's talk of that wart; I shall never
    laugh but in that maid's company!
Well, I shall see her to-day.
Will I?
I' faith, that we will; and I will tell your
    worship more of the wart the next time we have confidence;
    and of other wooers.
Well, farewell; I am in great haste now.
[Exit FENTON]  Truly,
    an honest gentleman; but Anne loves him not; for I know  
    Anne's mind as well as another does.
Out upon 't, what
    have I forgot?
have I scap'd love-letters in the holiday-time
    of my beauty, and am I now a subject for them?
[Reads]
    'Ask me no reason why I love you; for though Love use
    Reason for his precisian, he admits him not for his counsellor.
You are not young, no more am I; go to, then, there's
    sympathy.
You are merry, so am I; ha!
You love sack, and so do I; would you
    desire better sympathy?
Let it suffice thee, Mistress Page
    at the least, if the love of soldier can suffice-that I love
    thee.
I will not say, Pity me: 'tis not a soldier-like phrase;
    but I say, Love me.
What should I say to him?
I was then frugal of my mirth.
Why, I'll exhibit a bill in the parliament
    for the putting down of men.
How shall I be
    reveng'd on him?
for reveng'd I will be, as sure as his guts
    are made of puddings.
trust me, I was going to your
    house.
And, trust me, I was coming to you.
Nay, I'll ne'er believe that; I have to show to
    the contrary.
Well, I do, then; yet, I say, I could show you to
    the contrary.
O woman, if it were not for one trifling respect,
    I could come to such honour!
If I would but go to hell for an eternal moment
    or so, I could be knighted.
Here, read, read; perceive
    how I might be knighted.
I shall think the worse of fat
    men as long as I have an eye to make difference of men's
    liking.
And yet he would not swear; prais'd women's
    modesty, and gave such orderly and well-behaved reproof  
    to all uncomeliness that I would have sworn his disposition
    would have gone to the truth of his words; but they do no
    more adhere and keep place together than the Hundredth
    Psalm to the tune of 'Greensleeves.
' What tempest, I trow,
    threw this whale, with so many tuns of oil in his belly,
    ashore at Windsor?
How shall I be revenged on him?
I
    think the best way were to entertain him with hope, till
    the wicked fire of lust have melted him in his own grease.
To thy great comfort in this mystery of ill
    opinions, here's the twin-brother of thy letter; but let thine
    inherit first, for, I protest, mine never shall.
I warrant he
    hath a thousand of these letters, writ with blank space for
    different names-sure, more!
I
    had rather be a giantess and lie under Mount Pelion.
Well,
    I will find you twenty lascivious turtles ere one chaste
    man.
Nay, I know not; it makes me almost ready to
    wrangle with mine own honesty.
I'll entertain myself like
    one that I am not acquainted withal; for, sure, unless he
    know some strain in me that I know not myself, he would
    never have boarded me in this fury.
I'll be sure to keep him
    above deck.
So will I; if he come under my hatches, I'll never
    to sea again.
Nay, I will consent to act any villainy against
    him that may not sully the chariness of our honesty.
Why, look where he comes; and my good man
    too; he's as far from jealousy as I am from giving him  
    cause; and that, I hope, is an unmeasurable distance.
Well, I hope it be not so.
The horn, I say.
[Aside]  I will be patient; I will find out this.
[To PAGE]  And this is true; I like not the humour of
    lying.
He hath wronged me in some humours; I should
    have borne the humour'd letter to her; but I have a sword,
    and it shall bite upon my necessity.
My name is Corporal Nym; I speak, and I avouch;
    'Tis true.
I love not the humour of bread and cheese; and
    there's the humour of it.
I will seek out Falstaff.
I never heard such a drawling, affecting rogue.
If I do find it-well.
I will not believe such a Cataian though the priest o'  
    th' town commended him for a true man.
I melancholy!
I am not melancholy.
PAGE]  Trust me, I thought on
    her; she'll fit it.
Ay, forsooth; and, I pray, how does good Mistress Anne?
I do not think the knight would offer it;
    but these that accuse him in his intent towards our
    wives are a yoke of his discarded men; very rogues, now
    they be out of service.
I like it never the better for that.
If he should intend this voyage
    toward my wife, I would turn her loose to him; and what
    he gets more of her than sharp words, let it lie on my head.
I do not misdoubt my wife; but I would be loath to
    turn them together.
I would
    have nothing lie on my head.
I cannot be thus satisfied.
[To
    SHALLOW following]  Cavaleiro Justice, I say.
I follow, mine host, I follow.
My
    merry host hath had the measuring of their weapons; and,
    I think, hath appointed them contrary places; for, believe
    me, I hear the parson is no jester.
Hark, I will tell you
    what our sport shall be.
None, I protest; but I'll give you a pottle of burnt
    sack to give me recourse to him, and tell him my name is
    Brook-only for a jest.
My hand, bully; thou shalt have egress and regress-
    said I well?
I have heard the Frenchman hath good skill in his
    rapier.
Tut, sir, I could have told you more.
In these
    times you stand on distance, your passes, stoccadoes, and
    I know not what.
I have seen the time with my long sword I would
    have made you four tall fellows skip like rats.
I had rather hear them scold than
    fight.
Though Page be a secure fool, and stands so firmly on
    his wife's frailty, yet I cannot put off my opinion so
    easily.
She was in his company at Page's house, and what
    they made there I know not.
Well, I will look further into
    't, and I have a disguise to sound Falstaff.
If I find her
    honest, I lose not my labour; if she be otherwise, 'tis labour
    well bestowed.
I will not lend thee a penny.
I will retort the sum in equipage.
Which I with
    sword will open.
I have been content, sir, you should
    lay my countenance to pawn.
I have grated upon my good
    friends for three reprieves for you and your coach-fellow,
    Nym; or else you had look'd through the grate, like a
    geminy of baboons.
I am damn'd in hell for swearing to
    gentlemen my friends you were good soldiers and tall fellows;
    and when Mistress Bridget lost the handle of her fan,
    I took 't upon mine honour thou hadst it not.
Think'st thou I'll
    endanger my soul gratis?
At a word, hang no more about me,  
    I am no gibbet for you.
Why,
    thou unconfinable baseness, it is as much as I can do to
    keep the terms of my honour precise.
I, I, I myself
    sometimes, leaving the fear of God on the left hand, and hiding
    mine honour in my necessity, am fain to shuffle, to hedge,
    and to lurch; and yet you, rogue, will ensconce your rags,
    your cat-a-mountain looks, your red-lattice phrases, and
    your bold-beating oaths, under the shelter of your honour!
I do relent; what would thou more of man?
I'll be sworn;
    As my mother was, the first hour I was born.
I do believe the swearer.
Shall I vouchsafe your worship a word or two?
Two thousand, fair woman; and I'll vouchsafe
    thee the hearing.
There is one Mistress Ford, sir-I pray, come a little
    nearer this ways.
I myself dwell with Master Doctor
    Caius.
I pray your worship
    come a little nearer this ways.
I warrant thee nobody hears-mine own people,
    mine own people.
Well, heaven forgive you, and all of
    us, I pray.
Yet
    there has been knights, and lords, and gentlemen, with
    their coaches; I warrant you, coach after coach, letter after
    letter, gift after gift; smelling so sweetly, all musk, and so
    rushling, I warrant you, in silk and gold; and in such alligant
    terms; and in such wine and sugar of the best and the
    fairest, that would have won any woman's heart; and I
    warrant you, they could never get an eye-wink of her.
I had myself twenty angels given me this morning; but I
    defy all angels, in any such sort, as they say, but in the
    way of honesty; and, I warrant you, they could never get
    her so much as sip on a cup with the proudest of them all;  
    and yet there has been earls, nay, which is more,
    pensioners; but, I warrant you, all is one with her.
Woman, commend me to her; I
    will not fail her.
But I have another messenger
    to your worship.
Mistress Page hath her hearty commendations
    to you too; and let me tell you in your ear, she's as
    fartuous a civil modest wife, and one, I tell you, that will  
    not miss you morning nor evening prayer, as any is in
    Windsor, whoe'er be the other; and she bade me tell your
    worship that her husband is seldom from home, but she
    hopes there will come a time.
I never knew a woman so
    dote upon a man: surely I think you have charms, la!
Not I, I assure thee; setting the attraction of my
    good parts aside, I have no other charms.
But, I pray thee, tell me this: has Ford's wife and
    Page's wife acquainted each other how they love me?
They have not so little
    grace, I hope-that were a trick indeed!
Why, I will.
There's my purse; I am yet thy debtor.
Say'st thou so, old Jack; go thy ways; I'll make
    more of thy old body than I have done.
Good body, I thank thee.
Mistress
    Ford and Mistress Page, have I encompass'd you?
I make bold to press with so little preparation upon
    you.
Sir, I am a gentleman that have spent much; my name
    is Brook.
Good Master Brook, I desire more acquaintance
    of you.
Good Sir John, I sue for yours-not to charge you; for I
    must let you understand I think myself in better plight for
    a lender than you are; the which hath something
    embold'ned me to this unseason'd intrusion; for they say, if
    money go before, all ways do lie open.
Troth, and I have a bag of money here troubles me; if
    you will help to bear it, Sir John, take all, or half, for easing
    me of the carriage.
Sir, I know not how I may deserve to be your
    porter.
I will tell you, sir, if you will give me the hearing.
Speak, good Master Brook; I shall be glad to be
    your servant.
Sir, I hear you are a scholar-I will be brief with you  
    -and you have been a man long known to me, though I
    had never so good means as desire to make myself acquainted
    with you.
I shall discover a thing to you, wherein
    I must very much lay open mine own imperfection; but,
    good Sir John, as you have one eye upon my follies, as you
    hear them unfolded, turn another into the register of your
    own, that I may pass with a reproof the easier, sith you
    yourself know how easy is it to be such an offender.
I have long lov'd her, and, I protest to you, bestowed
    much on her; followed her with a doting observance;
    engross'd opportunities to meet her; fee'd every slight occasion
    that could but niggardly give me sight of her; not
    only bought many presents to give her, but have given
    largely to many to know what she would have given;
    briefly, I have pursu'd her as love hath pursued me; which
    hath been on the wing of all occasions.
But whatsoever I  
    have merited, either in my mind or in my means, meed, I
    am sure, I have received none, unless experience be a jewel;
    that I have purchased at an infinite rate, and that hath
    taught me to say this:
    'Love like a shadow flies when substance love pursues;
    Pursuing that that flies, and flying what pursues.
Like a fair house built on another man's ground; so
    that I have lost my edifice by mistaking the place where
    erected it.
When I have told you that, I have told you all.
There is money; spend it,
    spend it; spend more; spend all I have; only give me so
    much of your time in exchange of it as to lay an amiable
    siege to the honesty of this Ford's wife; use your art of
    wooing, win her to consent to you; if any man may, you
    may as soon as any.
Would it apply well to the vehemency of your
    affection, that I should win what you would enjoy?
Now, could I come to her with any detection in my hand,
    my desires had instance and argument to commend themselves;
    I could drive her then from the ward of her purity,  
    her reputation, her marriage vow, and a thousand other her
    defences, which now are too too strongly embattl'd against
    me.
Master Brook, I will first make bold with your
    money; next, give me your hand; and last, as I am a gentleman,
    you shall, if you will, enjoy Ford's wife.
I say you shall.
I shall be with her, I may tell you, by her own
    appointment; even as you came in to me her assistant, or
    go-between, parted from me; I say I shall be with her between
    ten and eleven; for at that time the jealous rascally
    knave, her husband, will be forth.
Come you to me at
    night; you shall know how I speed.
I am blest in your acquaintance.
I know him
    not; yet I wrong him to call him poor; they say the  
    jealous wittolly knave hath masses of money; for the which
    his wife seems to me well-favour'd.
I will use her as the
    key of the cuckoldly rogue's coffer; and there's my harvest-home.
I would you knew Ford, sir, that you might avoid him
    if you saw him.
I will
    stare him out of his wits; I will awe him with my cudgel;
    it shall hang like a meteor o'er the cuckold's horns.
Master
    Brook, thou shalt know I will predominate over the
    peasant, and thou shalt lie with his wife.
Ford's a knave, and I will aggravate his style; thou,
    Master Brook, shalt know him for knave and cuckold.
My bed shall be abus'd,
    my coffers ransack'd, my reputation gnawn at; and I shall
    not only receive this villainous wrong, but stand under the  
    adoption of abominable terms, and by him that does me
    this wrong.
Page is an ass, a secure ass; he will trust
    his wife; he will not be jealous; I will rather trust a Fleming
    with my butter, Parson Hugh the Welshman with my
    cheese, an Irishman with my aqua-vitae bottle, or a thief to
    walk my ambling gelding, than my wife with herself.
I will prevent this, detect
    my wife, be reveng'd on Falstaff, and laugh at Page.
I will about it; better three hours too soon than a minute
    too late.
By gar, de herring is no dead so as I vill kill him.
Take
    your rapier, Jack; I vill tell you how I vill kill him.
Alas, sir, I cannot fence!
I pray you, bear witness that me have stay six or
    seven, two tree hours for him, and he is no come.
Bodykins, Master Page, though I now be old, and
    of the peace, if I see a sword out, my finger itches to make
    one.
Master Doctor
  CAIUS, I come to fetch you home.
I am sworn of the peace;
    you have show'd yourself a wise physician, and Sir Hugh
    hath shown himself a wise and patient churchman.
By gar, then I have as much mockvater as de Englishman.
And I will provoke him to't, or let him wag.
See what humour he is in; and
    I will bring the doctor about by the fields.
Sheathe thy impatience; throw cold water  
    on thy choler; go about the fields with me through Frogmore;
    I will bring thee where Mistress Anne Page is, at a a
    farm-house, a-feasting; and thou shalt woo her.
Said I well?
By gar, me dank you vor dat; by gar, I love you; and
    I shall procure-a you de good guest, de earl, de knight, de
    lords, de gentlemen, my patients.
For the which I will be thy adversary toward Anne
    Page.
Said I well?
I pray you now, good Master Slender's serving-man,
    and friend Simple by your name, which way have you
    look'd for Master Caius, that calls himself Doctor of
    Physic?
I most fehemently desire you you will also look that
    way.
I will, Sir.
Pless my soul, how full of chollors I am, and trempling
    of mind!
I shall be glad if he have deceived me.
How
    melancholies I am!
I will knog his urinals about his knave's
    costard when I have goot opportunities for the ork.
I have a great dispositions to cry.
[Sings]
    Melodious birds sing madrigals-
    Whenas I sat in Pabylon-
    And a thousand vagram posies.
I have lived fourscore years and upward; I never
    heard a man of his place, gravity, and learning, so wide of
    his own respect.
I think you know him: Master Doctor Caius, the
    renowned French physician.
I had as lief
    you would tell me of a mess of porridge.
I warrant you, he's the man should fight with him.
I pray you, let-a me speak a word with your ear.
[Aside to CAIUS]  Pray you, let us not be
    laughing-stocks to other men's humours; I desire you in
    friendship, and I will one way or other make you amends.
[Aloud]  I will knog your urinals about your knave's cogscomb
    for missing your meetings and appointments.
Jack Rugby-mine Host de Jarteer-have I
    not stay for him to kill him?
Have I not, at de place I did
    appoint?
As I am a Christians soul, now, look you, this is the
    place appointed.
I'll be judgment by mine host of the
    Garter.
Peace, I say, Gallia and Gaul, French and Welsh,  
    soul-curer and body-curer.
Peace, I say.
Am I
    politic?
am I subtle?
am I a Machiavel?
Shall I lose my
    doctor?
Shall I
    lose my parson, my priest, my Sir Hugh?
Boys of art, I have
    deceiv'd you both; I have directed you to wrong places;
    your hearts are mighty, your skins are whole, and let burnt
    sack be the issue.
Ha, do I perceive dat?
I
    desire you that we may be friends; and let us knog our prains
    together to be revenge on this same scall, scurvy, cogging  
    companion, the host of the Garter.
Well, I will smite his noddles.
I had rather, forsooth, go before you like a man than
    follow him like a dwarf.
O, you are a flattering boy; now I see you'll be a
    courtier.
I think, if your husbands were dead, you two
    would marry.
I cannot tell what the dickens his name is my
    husband had him of.
He, he; I can never hit on's name.
I am sick till I see her.
Well; I will take him,
    then torture my wife, pluck the borrowed veil of modesty
    from the so seeming Mistress Page, divulge Page himself
    for a secure and wilful Actaeon; and to these violent proceedings
    all my neighbours shall cry aim.
[Clock strikes]
    The clock gives me my cue, and my assurance bids me
    search; there I shall find Falstaff.
I shall be rather prais'd
    for this than mock'd; for it is as positive as the earth is firm
    that Falstaff is there.
I will go.
Trust me, a good knot; I have good cheer at home,
    and I pray you all go with me.
I must excuse myself, Master Ford.
And so must I, sir; we have appointed to dine with
    Mistress Anne, and I would not break with her for more
    money than I'll speak of.
I hope I have your good will, father Page.
You have, Master Slender; I stand wholly for you.
Not by my consent, I promise you.
No,
    he shall not knit a knot in his fortunes with the finger of
    my substance; if he take her, let him take her simply; the
    wealth I have waits on my consent, and my consent goes
    not that way.
I beseech you, heartily, some of you go home with me  
    to dinner: besides your cheer, you shall have sport; I will
    show you a monster.
Go home, John Rugby; I come anon.
Farewell, my hearts; I will to my honest knight
    Falstaff, and drink canary with him.
[Aside]  I think I shall drink in pipe-wine first with
    him.
I'll make him dance.
I warrant.
What, Robin, I say!
Marry, as I told you before, John and Robert, be
    ready here hard by in the brew-house; and when I suddenly
    call you, come forth, and, without any pause or
    staggering, take this basket on your shoulders.
I ha' told them over and over; they lack no
    direction.
Ay, I'll be sworn.
My master knows not of your
    being here, and hath threat'ned to put me into everlasting
    liberty, if I tell you of it; for he swears he'll turn me away.
I'll go hide me.
Go tell thy master I am alone.
I warrant thee; if I do not act it, hiss me.
Have I caught thee, my heavenly jewel?
Why, now let me die, for I have liv'd long enough; this is
    the period of my ambition.
Mistress Ford, I cannot cog, I cannot prate,
    Mistress Ford.
Now shall I sin in my wish; I would thy
    husband were dead; I'll speak it before the best lord, I
    would make thee my lady.
I your lady, Sir John?
Alas, I should be a pitiful
    lady.
I  
    see how thine eye would emulate the diamond; thou hast
    the right arched beauty of the brow that becomes the
    ship-tire, the tire-valiant, or any tire of Venetian admittance.
I see what thou wert, if Fortune
    thy foe were, not Nature, thy friend.
Come, I cannot
    cog, and say thou art this and that, like a many of these
    lisping hawthorn-buds that come like women in men's
    apparel, and smell like Bucklersbury in simple time; I
    cannot; but I love thee, none but thee; and thou deserv'st it.
Do not betray me, sir; I fear you love Mistress
    Page.
Thou mightst as well say I love to walk by the
    Counter-gate, which is as hateful to me as the reek of a
    lime-kiln.
Well, heaven knows how I love you; and you
    shall one day find it.
Keep in that mind; I'll deserve it.
Nay, I must tell you, so you do; or else I could
    not be in that mind.
She shall not see me; I will ensconce me behind
    the arras.
Out upon you, how
    am I mistook in you!
'Tis not so, I hope.
I
    come before to tell you.
If you know yourself clear, why,
    I am glad of it; but if you have a friend here, convey,
    convey him out.
What shall I do?
There is a gentleman, my dear
    friend; and I fear not mine own shame as much as his peril.
I had rather than a thousand pound he were out of the
    house.
What shall I do?
I'll in, I'll in; follow your friend's counsel;
    I'll in.
PAGE]  I love thee and none but  
    thee; help me away.
-Let me creep in here; I'll never-
    [Gets into the basket; they cover him with foul linen]
  MRS.
If I suspect without cause, why
    then make sport at me, then let me be your jest; I deserve
    it.
I would I could wash myself of the buck!
I warrant you, buck; and of
    the season too, it shall appear.
[Exeunt SERVANTS with
    basket]  Gentlemen, I have dream'd to-night; I'll tell you my
    dream.
I'll warrant we'll unkennel the fox.
I know not which pleases me better, that my
    husband is deceived, or Sir John.
I am half afraid he will have need of washing; so
    throwing him into the water will do him a benefit.
I would all of the
    same strain were in the same distress.
I think my husband hath some special suspicion
    of Falstaff's being here, for I never saw him so gross in his
    jealousy till now.
I Will lay a plot to try that, and we will yet have
    more tricks with Falstaff.
I cannot find him; may be the knave bragg'd of that
    he could not compass.
Ay, I do so.
Ay, ay; I must bear it.
Be gar, nor I too; there is no bodies.
I would not ha'
    your distemper in this kind for the wealth of Windsor
    Castle.
'Tis my fault, Master Page; I suffer for it.
Your wife is as  
    honest a omans as I will desires among five thousand, and five
    hundred too.
By gar, I see 'tis an honest woman.
Well, I promis'd you a dinner.
I pray you pardon me; I will hereafter make
    known to you why I have done this.
Come, wife, come,
    Mistress Page; I pray you pardon me; pray heartly,
    pardon me.
I do invite you to-morrow morning to my house to breakfast;
    after, we'll a-birding together; I have a fine hawk for
    the bush.
If there is one, I shall make two in the company.
If there be one or two, I shall make-a the turd.
I pray you now, remembrance to-morrow on the
    lousy knave, mine host.
I see I cannot get thy father's love;
    Therefore no more turn me to him, sweet Nan.
He doth object I am too great of birth;
    And that, my state being gall'd with my expense,
    I seek to heal it only by his wealth.
Besides these, other bars he lays before me,
    My riots past, my wild societies;
    And tells me 'tis a thing impossible
    I should love thee but as a property.
Albeit I will confess thy father's wealth
    Was the first motive that I woo'd thee, Anne;
    Yet, wooing thee, I found thee of more value  
    Than stamps in gold, or sums in sealed bags;
    And 'tis the very riches of thyself
    That now I aim at.
I'll make a shaft or a bolt on 't; 'slid, 'tis but
    venturing.
I care not for that,
    but that I am afeard.
I come to him.
I had a father, Mistress Anne; my uncle can tell
    you good jests of him.
Ay, that I do; as well as I love any woman in
    Gloucestershire.
Ay, that I will come cut and longtail, under the
    degree of a squire.
Marry, I thank you for it; I thank you for that
    good comfort.
She calls you, coz; I'll leave you.
I ne'er made my will yet, I thank heaven; I am not
    such a sickly creature, I give heaven praise.
I mean, Master Slender, what would you with me?
Truly, for mine own part I would little or nothing
    with you.
They
    can tell you how things go better than I can.
I told you, sir, my daughter is dispos'd of.
Good Mistress Page, for that I love your daughter
    In such a righteous fashion as I do,
    Perforce, against all checks, rebukes, and manners,
    I must advance the colours of my love,
    And not retire.
I mean it not; I seek you a better husband.
Alas, I had rather be set quick i' th' earth.
Good Master
    Fenton,
    I will not be your friend, nor enemy;
    My daughter will I question how she loves you,
    And as I find her, so am I affected;
    Till then, farewell, sir; she must needs go in;
    Her father will be angry.
This is my doing now: 'Nay,' said I 'will you cast
    away your child on a fool, and a physician?
I thank thee; and I pray thee, once to-night
    Give my sweet Nan this ring.
But yet I would my
    master had Mistress Anne; or I would Master Slender had
    her; or, in sooth, I would Master Fenton had her; I will
    do what I can for them all three, for so I have promis'd,  
    and I'll be as good as my word; but speciously for Master
    Fenton.
Well, I must of another errand to Sir John Falstaff
    from my two mistresses.
What a beast am I to slack it!
Bardolph, I say!
Exit BARDOLPH
    Have I liv'd to be carried in a basket, like a barrow of
    butcher's offal, and to be thrown in the Thames?
Well, if
    I be serv'd such another trick, I'll have my brains ta'en out
    and butter'd, and give them to a dog for a new-year's gift.
The rogues slighted me into the river with as little remorse
    as they would have drown'd a blind bitch's puppies, fifteen
    i' th' litter; and you may know by my size that I have
    a kind of alacrity in sinking; if the bottom were as deep as
    hell I should down.
I had been drown'd but that the shore
    was shelvy and shallow-a death that I abhor; for the water
    swells a man; and what a thing should I have been when
    had been swell'd!
I should have been a mountain of  
    mummy.
Come, let me pour in some sack to the Thames
    water; for my belly's as cold as if I had swallow'd
    snowballs for pills to cool the reins.
By your leave; I cry you mercy.
Simple of itself; I'll no pullet-sperm in my
    brewage.
Marry, sir, I come to your worship from Mistress  
    Ford.
I have had ford enough; I was
    thrown into the ford; I have my belly full of ford.
So did I mine, to build upon a foolish woman's
    promise.
Her husband goes this morning
    a-birding; she desires you once more to come to her between
    eight and nine; I must carry her word quickly.
She'll make
    you amends, I warrant you.
Well, I Will visit her.
I will tell her.
Well, be gone; I will not miss her.
I marvel I hear not of Master Brook; he sent me
    word to stay within.
I like his money well.
Master Brook, I will not lie to you; I was at her
    house the hour she appointed me.
While I was there.
Nay, you shall hear, Master Brook, what I have
    suffer'd to bring this woman to evil for your good.
I quak'd for fear lest the lunatic knave would have
    search'd it; but Fate, ordaining he should be a cuckold,
    held his hand.
Well, on went he for a search, and away
    went I for foul clothes.
But mark the sequel, Master
    Brook-I suffered the pangs of three several deaths: first,
    an intolerable fright to be detected with a jealous rotten
    bell-wether; next, to be compass'd like a good bilbo in the
    circumference of a peck, hilt to point, heel to head; and
    then, to be stopp'd in, like a strong distillation, with
    stinking clothes that fretted in their own grease.
And in the height of
    this bath, when I was more than half-stew'd in grease, like
    a Dutch dish, to be thrown into the Thames, and cool'd,
    glowing hot, in that surge, like a horse-shoe; think of that  
    -hissing hot.
In good sadness, sir, I am sorry that for my sake you
    have suffer'd all this.
Master Brook, I will be thrown into Etna, as I
    have been into Thames, ere I will leave her thus.
Her
    husband is this morning gone a-birding; I have received from
    her another embassy of meeting; 'twixt eight and nine is
    the hour, Master Brook.
I Will then address me to my appointment.
Come to me at your convenient leisure, and you shall
    know how I speed; and the conclusion shall be crowned
    with your enjoying her.
Do I sleep?
Well, I will
    proclaim myself what I am; I will now take the lecher; he  
    is at my house.
But, lest the devil that guides him should aid
    him, I will search impossible places.
Though what I am I
    cannot avoid, yet to be what I would not shall not make
    me tame.
If I have horns to make one mad, let the proverb
    go with me-I'll be horn mad.
SCENE I.
I'll be with her by and by; I'll but bring my
    young man here to school.
Look where his master comes;
    'tis a playing day, I see.
Sir Hugh, my husband says my son profits
    nothing in the world at his book; I pray you ask him some
    questions in his accidence.
Truly, I thought there had been one number
    more, because they say 'Od's nouns.
You are a very simplicity oman; I pray you, peace.
No, it is 'lapis'; I pray you remember in your prain.
I pray you, have your remembrance, child.
'Hang-hog' is Latin for bacon, I warrant you.
Thou
    art as foolish Christian creatures as I would desires.
Forsooth, I have forgot.
He is a better scholar than I thought he was.
I see you are obsequious in your love, and I
    profess requital to a hair's breadth; not only, Mistress Ford, in
    the simple office of love, but in all the accoutrement,
    complement, and ceremony of it.
Truly, I am so glad you have nobody here.
' that any madness I
    ever yet beheld seem'd but tameness, civility, and patience,
    to this his distemper he is in now.
I am glad the fat knight
    is not here.
But I am glad the knight is not
    here; now he shall see his own foolery.
I am undone: the knight is here.
How should I bestow
    him?
Shall I put him into the basket again?
No, I'll come no more i' th' basket.
May I not go
    out ere he come?
What shall I do?
I'll creep up into the chimney.
I'll go out then.
Alas the day, I know not!
Mistress Page and I will
    look some linen for your head.
I would my husband would meet him in this
    shape; he cannot abide the old woman of Brainford; he
    swears she's a witch, forbade her my house, and hath
    threat'ned to beat her.
We'll try that; for I'll appoint my men to carry
    the basket again, to meet him at the door with it as they
    did last time.
I'll first direct my men what they shall do with
    the basket.
Go up; I'll bring linen for him straight.
I hope not; I had lief as bear so much lead.
What, wife, I  
    say!
So say I too, sir.
I suspect without cause,
    Mistress, do I?
I shall find you anon.
Empty the basket, I say.
Master Page, as I am a man, there was one convey'd
    out of my house yesterday in this basket.
In my house I am sure he is; my
    intelligence is true; my jealousy is reasonable.
Well, he's not here I seek for.
If I find not  
    what I seek, show no colour for my extremity; let me for
    ever be your table sport; let them say of me 'As jealous as
    Ford, that search'd a hollow walnut for his wife's leman.
Have I not
    forbid her my house?
Come down, you
    witch, you hag you; come down, I say.
I'll prat her.
I'll conjure you, I'll fortune-tell you.
I think you have kill'd the
    poor woman.
By yea and no, I think the oman is a witch indeed; I
    like not when a oman has a great peard; I spy a great peard
    under his muffler.
I beseech you follow;
    see but the issue of my jealousy; if I cry out thus upon no
    trail, never trust me when I open again.
I'll have the cudgel hallow'd and hung o'er the
    altar; it hath done meritorious service.
The spirit of wantonness is sure scar'd out of
    him; if the devil have him not in fee-simple, with fine and
    recovery, he will never, I think, in the way of waste,
    attempt us again.
I'll warrant they'll have him publicly sham'd;
    and methinks there would be no period to the jest, should
    he not be publicly sham'd.
I
    would not have things cool.
I hear
    not of him in the court.
Ay, sir; I'll call them to you.
They shall have my horses, but I'll make them pay;
    I'll sauce them; they have had my house a week at
    command; I have turn'd away my other guests.
They must
    come off; I'll sauce them.
Henceforth, do what thou wilt;
    I rather will suspect the sun with cold
    Than thee with wantonness.
So think I too.
That likewise have we thought upon, and
    thus:
    Nan Page my daughter, and my little son,
    And three or four more of their growth, we'll dress
    Like urchins, ouphes, and fairies, green and white,
    With rounds of waxen tapers on their heads,
    And rattles in their hands; upon a sudden,
    As Falstaff, she, and I, are newly met,
    Let them from forth a sawpit rush at once
    With some diffused song; upon their sight  
    We two in great amazedness will fly.
I will teach the children their behaviours; and I will
    be like a jack-an-apes also, to burn the knight with my
    taber.
I'll go buy them vizards.
That silk will I go buy.
Nay, I'll to him again, in name of Brook;
    He'll tell me all his purpose.
FORD
    I'll to the Doctor; he hath my good will,
    And none but he, to marry with Nan Page.
Marry, sir, I come to speak with Sir John Falstaff
    from Master Slender.
Knock, I say.
There's an old woman, a fat woman, gone up into
    his chamber; I'll be so bold as stay, sir, till she come down;
    I come to speak with her, indeed.
I'll call.
I spake with the old woman about it.
And what says she, I pray, sir?
I would I could have spoken with the woman
    herself; I had other things to have spoken with her too,  
    from him.
I may not conceal them, sir.
May I be bold to say so, sir?
, I thank your worship; I shall make my master glad
    with these tidings.
Ay, that there was, mine host; one that hath
    taught me more wit than ever I learn'd before in my life;  
    and I paid nothing for it neither, but was paid for my
    learning.
Run away with the cozeners; for so soon as I
    came beyond Eton, they threw me off from behind one of
    them, in a slough of mire; and set spurs and away, like
    three German devils, three Doctor Faustuses.
I tell you for
    good will, look you; you are wise, and full of gibes and
    vlouting-stogs, and 'tis not convenient you should be
    cozened.
I cannot tell vat is dat; but it is tell-a me dat you
    make grand preparation for a Duke de Jamany.
By my
    trot, dere is no duke that the court is know to come; I
    tell you for good will.
Assist me, knight; I am
    undone.
Fly, run, hue and cry, villain; I am undone.
I would all the world might be cozen'd, for I have
    been cozen'd and beaten too.
If it should come to the car  
    of the court how I have been transformed, and how my
    transformation hath been wash'd and cudgell'd, they
    would melt me out of my fat, drop by drop, and liquor
    fishermen's boots with me; I warrant they would whip me
    with their fine wits till I were as crestfall'n as a dried pear.
I never prosper'd since I forswore myself at primero.
I have suffer'd more
    for their sakes, more than the villainous inconstancy of
    man's disposition is able to bear.
Yes, I warrant;
    speciously one of them; Mistress Ford, good heart, is beaten
    black and blue, that you cannot see a white spot about her.
I was
    beaten myself into all the colours of the rainbow; and
    was like to be apprehended for the witch of Brainford.
Sir, let me speak with you in your chamber; you
    shall hear how things go, and, I warrant, to your content.
Master Fenton, talk not to me; my mind is heavy; I
    will give over all.
Assist me in my purpose,
    And, as I am a gentleman, I'll give the
    A hundred pound in gold more than your loss.
I will hear you, Master Fenton; and I will, at the least,
    keep your counsel.
From time to time I have acquainted you
    With the dear love I bear to fair Anne Page;
    Who, mutually, hath answer'd my affection,
    So far forth as herself might be her chooser,
    Even to my wish.
I have a letter from her
    Of such contents as you will wonder at;
    The mirth whereof so larded with my matter
    That neither, singly, can be manifested
    Without the show of both.
The image of the jest
    I'll show you here at large.
Well, husband your device; I'll to the vicar.
So shall I evermore be bound to thee;
    Besides, I'll make a present recompense.
I'll, hold.
This is
    the third time; I hope good luck lies in odd numbers.
I'll provide you a chain, and I'll do what I can to
    get you a pair of horns.
Away, I say; time wears; hold up your head, and
    mince.
I went to her, Master Brook, as you see, like a
    poor old man; but I came from her, Master Brook, like a
    poor old woman.
I will tell you-he beat me grievously
    in the shape of a woman; for in the shape of man, Master
    Brook, I fear not Goliath with a weaver's beam; because
    I know also life is a shuttle.
I am in haste; go along with
    me; I'll.
Since I pluck'd geese,
    play'd truant, and whipp'd top, I knew not what 'twas to
    be beaten till lately.
I'll tell you strange things
    of this knave-Ford, on whom to-night I will be revenged,
    and I will deliver his wife into your hand.
Ay, forsooth; I have spoke with her, and we have
    a nay-word how to know one another.
I come to her in
    white and cry 'mum'; she cries 'budget,' and by that we
    know one another.
I know vat I have to do; adieu.
Be pold, I pray you; follow me into the pit; and when I
    give the watch-ords, do as I pid you.
For me, I am here a Windsor
    stag; and the fattest, I think, i' th' forest.
Let the sky rain
    potatoes; let it thunder to the tune of Greensleeves, hail
    kissing-comfits, and snow eringoes; let there come a tempest
    of provocation, I will shelter me here.
Divide me like a brib'd buck, each a haunch; I
    will keep my sides to myself, my shoulders for the fellow
    of this walk, and my horns I bequeath your husbands.
Am
    I a woodman, ha?
Speak I like Heme the Hunter?
As I am a true spirit, welcome!
I think the devil will not have me damn'd, lest the
    oil that's in me should set hell on fire; he would never else  
    cross me thus.
I'll wink and couch; no man their works must eye.
I smell a man of middle earth.
Nay, do not fly; I think we have watch'd you now.
I pray you, come, hold up the jest no higher.
I will never take you for my love again; but I will
    always count you my deer.
I do begin to perceive that I am made an ass.
I was three or four
    times in the thought they were not fairies; and yet the
    guiltiness of my mind, the sudden surprise of my powers,
    drove the grossness of the foppery into a receiv'd belief,
    in despite of the teeth of all rhyme and reason, that they
    were fairies.
And leave you your jealousies too, I pray you.
I will never mistrust my wife again, till thou art able
    to woo her in good English.
Have I laid my brain in the sun, and dried it, that
    it wants matter to prevent so gross, o'er-reaching as this?
Am I ridden with a Welsh goat too?
Shall I have a cox-comb  
    of frieze?
'Tis time I were chok'd with a piece of
    toasted cheese.
Have I liv'd to stand at the
    taunt of one that makes fritters of English?
Well, I am your theme; you have the start of me;
    I am dejected; I am not able to answer the Welsh flannel;
    ignorance itself is a plummet o'er me; use me as you will.
Over and above that you have
    suffer'd, I think to repay that money will be a biting
    affliction.
Yet be cheerful, knight; thou shalt eat a posset
    tonight at my house, where I will desire thee to laugh at my
    wife, that now laughs at thee.
I'll make the best in Gloucestershire  
    know on't; would I were hang'd, la, else!
I came yonder at Eton to marry Mistress Anne
    Page, and she's a great lubberly boy.
If it had not been i'
    th' church, I would have swing'd him, or he should have
    swing'd me.
If I did not think it had been Anne Page,
    would I might never stir!
I think so, when I
    took a boy for a girl.
If I had been married to him, for all
    he was in woman's apparel, I would not have had him.
Did not I tell you how
    you should know my daughter by her garments?
I went to her in white and cried 'mum' and she
    cried 'budget' as Anne and I had appointed; and yet it was
    not Anne, but a postmaster's boy.
I knew of your
    purpose; turn'd my daughter into green; and, indeed, she
    is now with the Doctor at the dean'ry, and there married.
By gar, I am cozened; I ha'
    married un garcon, a boy; un paysan, by gar, a boy; it is
    not Anne Page; by gar, I am cozened.
Ay, be gar, and 'tis a boy; be gar, I'll raise all
    Windsor.
The truth is, she and I, long since contracted,
    Are now so sure that nothing can dissolve us.
I am glad, though you have ta'en a special stand
    to strike at me, that your arrow hath glanc'd.
Well, I will muse no further.
>>



SCENE:
Athens and a wood near it


ACT I.
SCENE I.
Exit PHILOSTRATE
    Hippolyta, I woo'd thee with my sword,  
    And won thy love doing thee injuries;
    But I will wed thee in another key,
    With pomp, with triumph, and with revelling.
Full of vexation come I, with complaint
    Against my child, my daughter Hermia.
And, my gracious Duke,
    Be it so she will not here before your Grace
    Consent to marry with Demetrius,
    I beg the ancient privilege of Athens:
    As she is mine I may dispose of her;
    Which shall be either to this gentleman
    Or to her death, according to our law
    Immediately provided in that case.
I would my father look'd but with my eyes.
I do entreat your Grace to pardon me.
I know not by what power I am made bold,
    Nor how it may concern my modesty
    In such a presence here to plead my thoughts;
    But I beseech your Grace that I may know
    The worst that may befall me in this case,
    If I refuse to wed Demetrius.
So will I grow, so live, so die, my lord,
    Ere I will yield my virgin patent up
    Unto his lordship, whose unwished yoke
    My soul consents not to give sovereignty.
Scornful Lysander, true, he hath my love;
    And what is mine my love shall render him;
    And she is mine; and all my right of her
    I do estate unto Demetrius.
I am, my lord, as well deriv'd as he,
    As well possess'd; my love is more than his;
    My fortunes every way as fairly rank'd,
    If not with vantage, as Demetrius';
    And, which is more than all these boasts can be,
    I am belov'd of beauteous Hermia.
Why should not I then prosecute my right?
Demetrius, I'll avouch it to his head,
    Made love to Nedar's daughter, Helena,
    And won her soul; and she, sweet lady, dotes,
    Devoutly dotes, dotes in idolatry,
    Upon this spotted and inconstant man.
I must confess that I have heard so much,  
    And with Demetrius thought to have spoke thereof;
    But, being over-full of self-affairs,
    My mind did lose it.
But, Demetrius, come;
    And come, Egeus; you shall go with me;
    I have some private schooling for you both.
Demetrius, and Egeus, go along;
    I must employ you in some business
    Against our nuptial, and confer with you
    Of something nearly that concerns yourselves.
Belike for want of rain, which I could well  
    Beteem them from the tempest of my eyes.
for aught that I could ever read,
    Could ever hear by tale or history,
    The course of true love never did run smooth;
    But either it was different in blood-
  HERMIA.
I have a widow aunt, a dowager
    Of great revenue, and she hath no child-
    From Athens is her house remote seven leagues-
    And she respects me as her only son.
There, gentle Hermia, may I marry thee;
    And to that place the sharp Athenian law
    Cannot pursue us.
If thou lovest me then,
    Steal forth thy father's house to-morrow night;
    And in the wood, a league without the town,
    Where I did meet thee once with Helena
    To do observance to a morn of May,
    There will I stay for thee.
I swear to thee by Cupid's strongest bow,  
    By his best arrow, with the golden head,
    By the simplicity of Venus' doves,
    By that which knitteth souls and prospers loves,
    And by that fire which burn'd the Carthage Queen,
    When the false Troyan under sail was seen,
    By all the vows that ever men have broke,
    In number more than ever women spoke,
    In that same place thou hast appointed me,
    To-morrow truly will I meet with thee.
Sickness is catching; O, were favour so,  
    Yours would I catch, fair Hermia, ere I go!
Were the world mine, Demetrius being bated,
    The rest I'd give to be to you translated.
I frown upon him, yet he loves me still.
I give him curses, yet he gives me love.
The more I hate, the more he follows me.
The more I love, the more he hateth me.
Before the time I did Lysander see,
    Seem'd Athens as a paradise to me.
And in the wood where often you and I
    Upon faint primrose beds were wont to lie,
    Emptying our bosoms of their counsel sweet,
    There my Lysander and myself shall meet;
    And thence from Athens turn away our eyes,
    To seek new friends and stranger companies.
I will, my Hermia.
Through Athens I am thought as fair as she.
And as he errs, doting on Hermia's eyes,
    So I, admiring of his qualities.
I will go tell him of fair Hermia's flight;  
    Then to the wood will he to-morrow night
    Pursue her; and for this intelligence
    If I have thanks, it is a dear expense.
But herein mean I to enrich my pain,
    To have his sight thither and back again.
A very good piece of work, I assure you, and a merry.
Answer, as I call you.
Name what part I am for, and proceed.
If I
    do it, let the audience look to their eyes; I will move storms; I
    will condole in some measure.
I could play Ercles rarely, or a part to tear a cat
    in, to make all split.
Nay, faith, let not me play a woman; I have a beard coming.
An I may hide my face, let me play Thisby too.
I'll speak in a monstrous little voice: 'Thisne, Thisne!
And, I hope, here is a play fitted.
Pray you, if it be, give it
    me, for I am slow of study.
I will roar that I will do any
    man's heart good to hear me; I will roar that I will make the
    Duke say 'Let him roar again, let him roar again.
I grant you, friends, if you should fright the ladies out
    of their wits, they would have no more discretion but to hang us;
    but I will aggravate my voice so, that I will roar you as gently
    as any sucking dove; I will roar you an 'twere any nightingale.
Well, I will undertake it.
What beard were I best to play  
    it in?
I will discharge it in either your straw-colour beard, your
    orange-tawny beard, your purple-in-grain beard, or your
    French-crown-colour beard, your perfect yellow.
But, masters, here are your parts; and
    I am to entreat you, request you, and desire you, to con them by
    to-morrow night; and meet me in the palace wood, a mile without
    the town, by moonlight; there will we rehearse; for if we meet in
    the city, we shall be dogg'd with company, and our devices known.
In the meantime I will draw a bill of properties, such as our
    play wants.
I pray you, fail me not.
SCENE I.
Over hill, over dale,
                Thorough bush, thorough brier,
              Over park, over pale,
                Thorough flood, thorough fire,
              I do wander every where,
              Swifter than the moon's sphere;
              And I serve the Fairy Queen,
              To dew her orbs upon the green.
I must go seek some dewdrops here,
    And hang a pearl in every cowslip's ear.
Farewell, thou lob of spirits; I'll be gone.
Either I mistake your shape and making quite,
    Or else you are that shrewd and knavish sprite
    Call'd Robin Goodfellow.
Thou speakest aright:
    I am that merry wanderer of the night.
I jest to Oberon, and make him smile
    When I a fat and bean-fed horse beguile,
    Neighing in likeness of a filly foal;
    And sometime lurk I in a gossip's bowl
    In very likeness of a roasted crab,
    And, when she drinks, against her lips I bob,
    And on her withered dewlap pour the ale.
The wisest aunt, telling the saddest tale,
    Sometime for three-foot stool mistaketh me;
    Then slip I from her bum, down topples she,
    And 'tailor' cries, and falls into a cough;
    And then the whole quire hold their hips and laugh,  
    And waxen in their mirth, and neeze, and swear
    A merrier hour was never wasted there.
Fairies, skip hence;
    I have forsworn his bed and company.
Tarry, rash wanton; am not I thy lord?
Then I must be thy lady; but I know
    When thou hast stolen away from fairy land,
    And in the shape of Corin sat all day,
    Playing on pipes of corn, and versing love
    To amorous Phillida.
How canst thou thus, for shame, Titania,
    Glance at my credit with Hippolyta,
    Knowing I know thy love to Theseus?
I do but beg a little changeling boy
    To be my henchman.
But she, being mortal, of that boy did die;
    And for her sake do I rear up her boy;
    And for her sake I will not part with him.
If you will patiently dance in our round,
    And see our moonlight revels, go with us;
    If not, shun me, and I will spare your haunts.
Give me that boy and I will go with thee.
We shall chide downright if I longer stay.
Well, go thy way; thou shalt not from this grove
    Till I torment thee for this injury.
Thou rememb'rest
    Since once I sat upon a promontory,  
    And heard a mermaid on a dolphin's back
    Uttering such dulcet and harmonious breath
    That the rude sea grew civil at her song,
    And certain stars shot madly from their spheres
    To hear the sea-maid's music.
I remember.
That very time I saw, but thou couldst not,
    Flying between the cold moon and the earth
    Cupid, all arm'd; a certain aim he took
    At a fair vestal, throned by the west,
    And loos'd his love-shaft smartly from his bow,
    As it should pierce a hundred thousand hearts;
    But I might see young Cupid's fiery shaft
    Quench'd in the chaste beams of the wat'ry moon;
    And the imperial vot'ress passed on,
    In maiden meditation, fancy-free.
Yet mark'd I where the bolt of Cupid fell.
Fetch me that flow'r, the herb I showed thee once.
I'll put a girdle round about the earth
    In forty minutes.
Having once this juice,
    I'll watch Titania when she is asleep,
    And drop the liquor of it in her eyes;
    The next thing then she waking looks upon,
    Be it on lion, bear, or wolf, or bull,
    On meddling monkey, or on busy ape,
    She shall pursue it with the soul of love.
And ere I take this charm from off her sight,
    As I can take it with another herb,
    I'll make her render up her page to me.
I am invisible;
    And I will overhear their conference.
I love thee not, therefore pursue me not.
The one I'll slay, the other slayeth me.
Thou told'st me they were stol'n unto this wood,
    And here am I, and wood within this wood,
    Because I cannot meet my Hermia.
Leave you your power to draw,
    And I shall have no power to follow you.
Do I entice you?
Do I speak you fair?
Or, rather, do I not in plainest truth
    Tell you I do not nor I cannot love you?
And even for that do I love you the more.
I am your spaniel; and, Demetrius,
    The more you beat me, I will fawn on you.
Use me but as your spaniel, spurn me, strike me,
    Neglect me, lose me; only give me leave,
    Unworthy as I am, to follow you.
What worser place can I beg in your love,
    And yet a place of high respect with me,
    Than to be used as you use your dog?
Tempt not too much the hatred of my spirit;
    For I am sick when I do look on thee.
And I am sick when I look not on you.
Your virtue is my privilege for that:
    It is not night when I do see your face,
    Therefore I think I am not in the night;
    Nor doth this wood lack worlds of company,
    For you, in my respect, are all the world.
Then how can it be said I am alone
    When all the world is here to look on me?
I'll run from thee and hide me in the brakes,
    And leave thee to the mercy of wild beasts.
I will not stay thy questions; let me go;
    Or, if thou follow me, do not believe
    But I shall do thee mischief in the wood.
Exit DEMETRIUS
    I'll follow thee, and make a heaven of hell,  
    To die upon the hand I love so well.
I pray thee give it me.
I know a bank where the wild thyme blows,
    Where oxlips and the nodding violet grows,
    Quite over-canopied with luscious woodbine,
    With sweet musk-roses, and with eglantine;
    There sleeps Titania sometime of the night,
    Lull'd in these flowers with dances and delight;
    And there the snake throws her enamell'd skin,
    Weed wide enough to wrap a fairy in;
    And with the juice of this I'll streak her eyes,
    And make her full of hateful fantasies.
Fair love, you faint with wand'ring in the wood;
    And, to speak troth, I have forgot our way;
    We'll rest us, Hermia, if you think it good,
    And tarry for the comfort of the day.
Be it so, Lysander: find you out a bed,
    For I upon this bank will rest my head.
I mean that my heart unto yours is knit,
    So that but one heart we can make of it;  
    Two bosoms interchained with an oath,
    So then two bosoms and a single troth.
Then by your side no bed-room me deny,
    For lying so, Hermia, I do not lie.
Amen, amen, to that fair prayer say I;
    And then end life when I end loyalty!
Through the forest have I gone,
             But Athenian found I none
             On whose eyes I might approve
             This flower's force in stirring love.
Churl, upon thy eyes I throw
             All the power this charm doth owe:
             When thou wak'st let love forbid
             Sleep his seat on thy eyelid.
So awake when I am gone;
             For I must now to Oberon.
I charge thee, hence, and do not haunt me thus.
Stay on thy peril; I alone will go.
O, I am out of breath in this fond chase!
No, no, I am as ugly as a bear,
    For beasts that meet me run away for fear;
    Therefore no marvel though Demetrius
    Do, as a monster, fly my presence thus.
I see no blood, no wound.
[Waking] And run through fire I will for thy sweet sake.
No: I do repent
    The tedious minutes I with her have spent.
Not Hermia but Helena I love:
    Who will not change a raven for a dove?
Things growing are not ripe until their season;
    So I, being young, till now ripe not to reason;
    And touching now the point of human skill,
    Reason becomes the marshal to my will,
    And leads me to your eyes, where I o'erlook  
    Love's stories, written in Love's richest book.
Wherefore was I to this keen mockery born?
When at your hands did I deserve this scorn?
Is't not enough, is't not enough, young man,
    That I did never, no, nor never can,
    Deserve a sweet look from Demetrius' eye,
    But you must flout my insufficiency?
But fare you well; perforce I must confess
    I thought you lord of more true gentleness.
Lysander, look how I do quake with fear.
I swoon almost with fear.
Then I well perceive you are not nigh.
Either death or you I'll find immediately.
SCENE I.
I believe we must leave the killing out, when all is
    done.
Not a whit; I have a device to make all well.
Write me a
    prologue; and let the prologue seem to say we will do no harm
    with our swords, and that Pyramus is not kill'd indeed; and for  
    the more better assurance, tell them that I Pyramus am not
    Pyramus but Bottom the weaver.
I fear it, I promise you.
Nay, you must name his name, and half his face must be seen
    through the lion's neck; and he himself must speak through,
    saying thus, or to the same defect: 'Ladies,' or 'Fair ladies, I
    would wish you' or 'I would request you' or 'I would entreat you
    not to fear, not to tremble.
If you think I
    come hither as a lion, it were pity of my life.
No, I am no such
    thing; I am a man as other men are.
I'll be an auditor;
    An actor too perhaps, if I see cause.
Stay thou but here awhile,
    And by and by I will to thee appear.
Must I speak now?
Most radiant Pyramus, most lily-white of hue,
    Of colour like the red rose on triumphant brier,
    Most brisky juvenal, and eke most lovely Jew,
    As true as truest horse, that would never tire,
    I'll meet thee, Pyramus, at Ninny's tomb.
If I were fair, Thisby, I were only thine.
I'll follow you; I'll lead you about a round,
    Through bog, through bush, through brake, through brier;  
    Sometime a horse I'll be, sometime a hound,
    A hog, a headless bear, sometime a fire;
    And neigh, and bark, and grunt, and roar, and burn,
    Like horse, hound, hog, bear, fire, at every turn.
What do I see on thee?
I see their knavery: this is to make an ass of me; to
    fright me, if they could.
But I will not stir from this place, do  
    what they can; I will walk up and down here, and will sing, that
    they shall hear I am not afraid.
I pray thee, gentle mortal, sing again.
Mine ear is much enamoured of thy note;
    So is mine eye enthralled to thy shape;
    And thy fair virtue's force perforce doth move me,  
    On the first view, to say, to swear, I love thee.
Nay, I can gleek upon
    occasion.
Not so, neither; but if I had wit enough to get out of this
    wood, I have enough to serve mine own turn.
I am a spirit of no common rate;
    The summer still doth tend upon my state;
    And I do love thee; therefore, go with me.
I'll give thee fairies to attend on thee;
    And they shall fetch thee jewels from the deep,
    And sing, while thou on pressed flowers dost sleep;
    And I will purge thy mortal grossness so
    That thou shalt like an airy spirit go.
And I.
And I.
And I.
I cry your worships mercy, heartily; I beseech your
    worship's name.
I shall desire you of more acquaintance, good Master
    Cobweb.
If I cut my finger, I shall make bold with you.
I pray you, commend me to Mistress Squash, your mother, and
    to Master Peascod, your father.
Good Master Peaseblossom, I shall
    desire you of more acquaintance too.
Your name, I beseech you,
    sir?
Good Master Mustardseed, I know your patience well.
I promise you your kindred hath made my eyes water
    ere now.
I desire you of more acquaintance, good Master
    Mustardseed.
I wonder if Titania be awak'd;
    Then, what it was that next came in her eye,
    Which she must dote on in extremity.
The shallowest thickskin of that barren sort,
    Who Pyramus presented, in their sport
    Forsook his scene and ent'red in a brake;  
    When I did him at this advantage take,
    An ass's nole I fixed on his head.
I led them on in this distracted fear,
    And left sweet Pyramus translated there;
    When in that moment, so it came to pass,
    Titania wak'd, and straightway lov'd an ass.
This falls out better than I could devise.
But hast thou yet latch'd the Athenian's eyes
    With the love-juice, as I did bid thee do?
I took him sleeping- that is finish'd too-
    And the Athenian woman by his side;
    That, when he wak'd, of force she must be ey'd.
Now I but chide, but I should use thee worse,
    For thou, I fear, hast given me cause to curse.
I'll believe as soon  
    This whole earth may be bor'd, and that the moon
    May through the centre creep and so displease
    Her brother's noontide with th' Antipodes.
So should the murdered look; and so should I,
    Pierc'd through the heart with your stern cruelty;
    Yet you, the murderer, look as bright, as clear,
    As yonder Venus in her glimmering sphere.
I had rather give his carcass to my hounds.
You spend your passion on a mispris'd mood:
    I am not guilty of Lysander's blood;
    Nor is he dead, for aught that I can tell.
I pray thee, tell me then that he is well.
An if I could, what should I get therefore?
And from thy hated presence part I so;
    See me no more whether he be dead or no.
There is no following her in this fierce vein;
    Here, therefore, for a while I will remain.
So sorrow's heaviness doth heavier grow
    For debt that bankrupt sleep doth sorrow owe;
    Which now in some slight measure it will pay,
    If for his tender here I make some stay.
By some illusion see thou bring her here;
    I'll charm his eyes against she do appear.
I go, I go; look how I go,
    Swifter than arrow from the Tartar's bow.
Why should you think that I should woo in scorn?
Look when I vow, I weep; and vows so born,
    In their nativity all truth appears.
I hod no judgment when to her I swore.
To what, my love, shall I compare thine eyne?
I see you all are bent
    To set against me for your merriment.
Can you not hate me, as I know you do,
    But you must join in souls to mock me too?
If you were men, as men you are in show,
    You would not use a gentle lady so:
    To vow, and swear, and superpraise my parts,
    When I am sure you hate me with your hearts.
This you know I know;
    And here, with all good will, with all my heart,
    In Hermia's love I yield you up my part;
    And yours of Helena to me bequeath,  
    Whom I do love and will do till my death.
Lysander, keep thy Hermia; I will none.
If e'er I lov'd her, all that love is gone.
Thou art not by mine eye, Lysander, found;
    Mine ear, I thank it, brought me to thy sound.
Could not this make thee know
    The hate I bare thee made me leave thee so?
Now I perceive they have conjoin'd all three
    To fashion this false sport in spite of me.
It is not friendly, 'tis not maidenly;
    Our sex, as well as I, may chide you for it,
    Though I alone do feel the injury.
I am amazed at your passionate words;
    I scorn you not; it seems that you scorn me.
What though I be not so in grace as you,
    So hung upon with love, so fortunate,
    But miserable most, to love unlov'd?
I understand not what you mean by this.
Ay, do- persever, counterfeit sad looks,
    Make mouths upon me when I turn my back,
    Wink each at other; hold the sweet jest up;
    This sport, well carried, shall be chronicled.
If she cannot entreat, I can compel.
Thou canst compel no more than she entreat;
    Thy threats have no more strength than her weak prayers
    Helen, I love thee, by my life I do;
    I swear by that which I will lose for thee
    To prove him false that says I love thee not.
I say I love thee more than he can do.
Hang off, thou cat, thou burr; vile thing, let loose,
    Or I will shake thee from me like a serpent.
Demetrius, I will keep my word with thee.
I would I had your bond; for I perceive
    A weak bond holds you; I'll not trust your word.
What, should I hurt her, strike her, kill her dead?
Although I hate her, I'll not harm her so.
Am not I Hermia?
I am as fair now as I was erewhile.
-
    In earnest, shall I say?
Therefore be out of hope, of question, of doubt;
    Be certain, nothing truer; 'tis no jest
    That I do hate thee and love Helena.
Now I perceive that she hath made compare
    Between our statures; she hath urg'd her height;
    And with her personage, her tall personage,
    Her height, forsooth, she hath prevail'd with him.
And are you grown so high in his esteem
    Because I am so dwarfish and so low?
How low am I, thou painted maypole?
How low am I?
I am not yet so low
    But that my nails can reach unto thine eyes.
I pray you, though you mock me, gentlemen,
    Let her not hurt me.
I was never curst;
    I have no gift at all in shrewishness;
    I am a right maid for my cowardice;
    Let her not strike me.
You perhaps may think,
    Because she is something lower than myself,
    That I can match her.
I evermore did love you, Hermia,
    Did ever keep your counsels, never wrong'd you;
    Save that, in love unto Demetrius,
    I told him of your stealth unto this wood.
He followed you; for love I followed him;
    But he hath chid me hence, and threat'ned me
    To strike me, spurn me, nay, to kill me too;
    And now, so you will let me quiet go,  
    To Athens will I bear my folly back,
    And follow you no further.
You see how simple and how fond I am.
A foolish heart that I leave here behind.
Nay, I'll go with thee, cheek by jowl.
I will not trust you, I;
    Nor longer stay in your curst company.
I am amaz'd, and know not what to say.
Believe me, king of shadows, I mistook.
Did not you tell me I should know the man  
    By the Athenian garments he had on?
And so far blameless proves my enterprise
    That I have 'nointed an Athenian's eyes;
    And so far am I glad it so did sort,
    As this their jangling I esteem a sport.
Whiles I in this affair do thee employ,
    I'll to my queen, and beg her Indian boy;
    And then I will her charmed eye release
    From monster's view, and all things shall be peace.
But we are spirits of another sort:  
    I with the Morning's love have oft made sport;
    And, like a forester, the groves may tread
    Even till the eastern gate, all fiery red,
    Opening on Neptune with fair blessed beams,
    Turns into yellow gold his salt green streams.
Up and down, up and down,
             I will lead them up and down.
I am fear'd in field and town.
I will be with thee straight.
Come, recreant, come, thou child;
    I'll whip thee with a rod.
He goes before me, and still dares me on;
    When I come where he calls, then he is gone.
The villain is much lighter heel'd than I.
I followed fast, but faster he did fly,  
    That fallen am I in dark uneven way,
    And here will rest me.
For if but once thou show me thy grey light,
    I'll find Demetrius, and revenge this spite.
Abide me, if thou dar'st; for well I wot
    Thou run'st before me, shifting every place,
    And dar'st not stand, nor look me in the face.
Come hither; I am here.
Thou shalt buy this dear,
    If ever I thy face by daylight see;
    Now, go thy way.
Shine comforts from the east,
    That I may back to Athens by daylight,
    From these that my poor company detest.
Never so weary, never so in woe,
    Bedabbled with the dew, and torn with briers,
    I can no further crawl, no further go;
    My legs can keep no pace with my desires.
Here will I rest me till the break of day.
On the ground
                 Sleep sound;
                 I'll apply
                 To your eye,
          Gentle lover, remedy.
SCENE I.
Come, sit thee down upon this flow'ry bed,
    While I thy amiable cheeks do coy,
    And stick musk-roses in thy sleek smooth head,
    And kiss thy fair large ears, my gentle joy.
Do not fret
    yourself too much in the action, mounsieur; and, good mounsieur,
    have a care the honey-bag break not; I would be loath to have you  
    overflown with a honey-bag, signior.
I must to the barber's, mounsieur; for methinks I am
    marvellous hairy about the face; and I am such a tender ass, if
    my hair do but tickle me I must scratch.
I have a reasonable good ear in music.
Truly, a peck of provender; I could munch your good dry
    oats.
Methinks I have a great desire to a bottle of hay.
I have a venturous fairy that shall seek
    The squirrel's hoard, and fetch thee new nuts.
I had rather have a handful or two of dried peas.
But, I  
    pray you, let none of your people stir me; I have an exposition
    of sleep come upon me.
Sleep thou, and I will wind thee in my arms.
O, how I love thee!
how I dote on thee!
Her dotage now I do begin to pity;
    For, meeting her of late behind the wood,
    Seeking sweet favours for this hateful fool,
    I did upbraid her and fall out with her.
When I had at my pleasure taunted her,
    And she in mild terms begg'd my patience,
    I then did ask of her her changeling child;
    Which straight she gave me, and her fairy sent
    To bear him to my bower in fairy land.
And now I have the boy, I will undo
    This hateful imperfection of her eyes.
But first I will release the Fairy Queen.
What visions have I seen!
Methought I was enamour'd of an ass.
Now thou and I are new in amity,
    And will to-morrow midnight solemnly
    Dance in Duke Theseus' house triumphantly,
    And bless it to all fair prosperity.
Fairy King, attend and mark;
              I do hear the morning lark.
Come, my lord; and in our flight,
              Tell me how it came this night
              That I sleeping here was found
              With these mortals on the ground.
Dispatch, I say, and find the forester.
I was with Hercules and Cadmus once
    When in a wood of Crete they bay'd the bear
    With hounds of Sparta; never did I hear
    Such gallant chiding, for, besides the groves,
    The skies, the fountains, every region near
    Seem'd all one mutual cry.
I never heard
    So musical a discord, such sweet thunder.
I wonder of their being here together.
I pray you all, stand up.
I know you two are rival enemies;
    How comes this gentle concord in the world  
    That hatred is so far from jealousy
    To sleep by hate, and fear no enmity?
My lord, I shall reply amazedly,
    Half sleep, half waking; but as yet, I swear,
    I cannot truly say how I came here,
    But, as I think- for truly would I speak,
    And now I do bethink me, so it is-
    I came with Hermia hither.
Enough, enough, my Lord; you have enough;
    I beg the law, the law upon his head.
My lord, fair Helen told me of their stealth,
    Of this their purpose hither to this wood;
    And I in fury hither followed them,
    Fair Helena in fancy following me.
But, my good lord, I wot not by what power-
    But by some power it is- my love to Hermia,
    Melted as the snow, seems to me now
    As the remembrance of an idle gaud
    Which in my childhood I did dote upon;
    And all the faith, the virtue of my heart,
    The object and the pleasure of mine eye,
    Is only Helena.
To her, my lord,
    Was I betroth'd ere I saw Hermia.
But, like a sickness, did I loathe this food;
    But, as in health, come to my natural taste,
    Now I do wish it, love it, long for it,
    And will for evermore be true to it.
Egeus, I will overbear your will;
    For in the temple, by and by, with us
    These couples shall eternally be knit.
Methinks I see these things with parted eye,
    When every thing seems double.
So methinks;
    And I have found Demetrius like a jewel,
    Mine own, and not mine own.
[Awaking] When my cue comes, call me, and I will answer.
I have had a most rare vision.
I have had a dream, past the wit of man to say what dream it was.
Methought
    I was- there is no man can tell what.
Methought I was, and
    methought I had, but man is but a patch'd fool, if he will offer
    to say what methought I had.
I
    will get Peter Quince to write a ballad of this dream.
It shall
    be call'd 'Bottom's Dream,' because it hath no bottom; and I will
    sing it in the latter end of a play, before the Duke.
Peradventure, to make it the more gracious, I shall sing it at
    her death.
An the
    Duke had not given him sixpence a day for playing Pyramus, I'll
    be hanged.
Masters, I am to discourse wonders; but ask me not what;
    for if I tell you, I am not true Athenian.
I will tell you
    everything, right as it fell out.
All that I will tell you is, that the
    Duke hath dined.
And, most dear actors, eat no
    onions nor garlic, for we are to utter sweet breath; and I do not
    doubt but to hear them say it is a sweet comedy.
SCENE I.
I never may believe
    These antique fables, nor these fairy toys.
'
    We'll none of that: that have I told my love,
    In glory of my kinsman Hercules.
'
    That is an old device, and it was play'd  
    When I from Thebes came last a conqueror.
A play there is, my lord, some ten words long,
    Which is as brief as I have known a play;
    But by ten words, my lord, it is too long,
    Which makes it tedious; for in all the play
    There is not one word apt, one player fitted.
Which when I saw rehears'd, I must confess,
    Made mine eyes water; but more merry tears
    The passion of loud laughter never shed.
I have heard it over,
    And it is nothing, nothing in the world;
    Unless you can find sport in their intents,
    Extremely stretch'd and conn'd with cruel pain,
    To do you service.
I will hear that play;
    For never anything can be amiss
    When simpleness and duty tender it.
I love not to see wretchedness o'er-charged,
    And duty in his service perishing.
Where I have come, great clerks have purposed
    To greet me with premeditated welcomes;
    Where I have seen them shiver and look pale,
    Make periods in the midst of sentences,
    Throttle their practis'd accent in their fears,
    And, in conclusion, dumbly have broke off,
    Not paying me a welcome.
Trust me, sweet,
    Out of this silence yet I pick'd a welcome;
    And in the modesty of fearful duty
    I read as much as from the rattling tongue
    Of saucy and audacious eloquence.
I wonder if the lion be to speak.
In this same interlude it doth befall
    That I, one Snout by name, present a wall;
    And such a wall as I would have you think  
    That had in it a crannied hole or chink,
    Through which the lovers, Pyramus and Thisby,
    Did whisper often very secretly.
This loam, this rough-cast, and this stone, doth show
    That I am that same wall; the truth is so;
    And this the cranny is, right and sinister,
    Through which the fearful lovers are to whisper.
It is the wittiest partition that ever I heard
    discourse, my lord.
O night, O night, alack, alack, alack,
    I fear my Thisby's promise is forgot!
But what see what see I?
No Thisby do I see.
O wicked wall, through whom I see no bliss,
    Curs'd he thy stones for thus deceiving me!
She is to enter now, and I am to spy her through the wall.
You shall see it will fall pat as I told you; yonder she comes.
I see a voice; now will I to the chink,
    To spy an I can hear my Thisby's face.
thou art my love, I think.
Think what thou wilt, I am thy lover's grace;
    And like Limander am I trusty still.
And I like Helen, till the Fates me kill.
As Shafalus to Procrus, I to you.
I kiss the wall's hole, not your lips at all.
Tide life, tide death, I come without delay.
Thus have I, Wall, my part discharged so;
    And, being done, thus Wall away doth go.
This is the silliest stuff that ever I heard.
Then know that I as Snug the joiner am
    A lion fell, nor else no lion's dam;
    For, if I should as lion come in strife
    Into this place, 'twere pity on my life.
The very best at a beast, my lord, that e'er I saw.
His discretion, I am sure, cannot carry his valour; for
    the goose carries not the fox.
I am aweary of this moon.
All that I have to say is to tell you that the lanthorn is  
    the moon; I, the Man i' th' Moon; this thorn-bush, my thorn-bush;
    and this dog, my dog.
Sweet Moon, I thank thee for thy sunny beams;  
    I thank thee, Moon, for shining now so bright;
    For, by thy gracious golden, glittering gleams,
    I trust to take of truest Thisby sight.
Beshrew my heart, but I pity the man.
[Stabs himself]
           Thus die I, thus, thus, thus.
Now am I dead,
             Now am I fled;
           My soul is in the sky.
Methinks she should not use a long one for such a
    Pyramus; I hope she will be brief.
[Starting up] No, I assure you; the wall is down that
    parted their fathers.
No epilogue, I pray you; for your play needs no excuse.
I fear we shall out-sleep the coming morn,
    As much as we this night have overwatch'd.
I am sent with broom before,
             To sweep the dust behind the door.
And, as I am an honest Puck,
             If we have unearned luck
             Now to scape the serpent's tongue,
             We will make amends ere long;
             Else the Puck a liar call.
ACT I.
Scene I.
I learn in this letter that Don Pedro of Arragon comes this
    night to Messina.
He was not three leagues off when I
    left him.
I find here that Don Pedro hath bestowed much honour on
    a young Florentine called Claudio.
I have already delivered him letters, and there appears much  
    joy in him; even so much that joy could not show itself modest
    enough without a badge of bitterness.
I pray you, is Signior Mountanto return'd from the wars or no?
I know none of that name, lady.
I pray
    you, how many hath he kill'd and eaten in these wars?
For indeed I promised to eat all of his
    killing.
Faith, niece, you tax Signior Benedick too much; but he'll  
    be meet with you, I doubt it not.
I see, lady, the gentleman is not in your books.
An he were, I would burn my study.
But I pray you, who is
    his companion?
I will hold friends with you, lady.
I think this is your
    daughter.
I wonder that you will still be talking, Signior Benedick.
But it is certain I am loved of
    all ladies, only you excepted; and I would I could find in my
    heart that I had not a hard heart, for truly I love none.
I thank God and my cold blood, I am of
    your humour for that.
I had rather hear my dog bark at a crow
    than a man swear he loves me.
I would my horse had the speed of your tongue, and so good a
    continuer.
I have done.
I know you of old.
I tell him
    we shall stay here at the least a month, and he heartly prays  
    some occasion may detain us longer.
I dare swear he is no
    hypocrite, but prays from his heart.
Being reconciled to the
    Prince your brother, I owe you all duty.
I thank you.
I am not of many words, but I thank you.
I noted her not, but I look'd on her.
I pray thee speak in sober judgment.
Only this commendation I can afford her, that were she other
    than she is, she were unhandsome, and being no other but as she  
    is, I do not like her.
Thou thinkest I am in sport.
I pray thee tell me truly how
    thou lik'st her.
In mine eye she is the sweetest lady that ever I look'd on.
I can see yet without spectacles, and I see no such matter.
But I hope you have no intent to turn husband, have
    you?
I would scarce trust myself, though I had sworn the
    contrary, if Hero would be my wife.
Shall I never see a
    bachelor of threescore again?
I would your Grace would constrain me to tell.
I charge thee on thy allegiance.
I can be secret as a dumb man, I
    would have you think so; but, on my allegiance--mark you this-on
    my allegiance!
By my troth, I speak my thought.
And, in faith, my lord, I spoke mine.
And, by my two faiths and troths, my lord, I spoke mine.
That I love her, I feel.
That she is worthy, I know.
That I neither feel how she should be loved, nor know how she
    should be worthy, is the opinion that fire cannot melt out of me.
I will die in it at the stake.
That a woman conceived me, I thank her; that she brought me
    up, I likewise give her most humble thanks; but that I will have
    a rechate winded in my forehead, or hang my bugle in an invisible
    baldrick, all women shall pardon me.
Because I will not do them
    the wrong to mistrust any, I will do myself the right to trust
    none; and the fine is (for the which I may go the finer), I will  
    live a bachelor.
I shall see thee, ere I die, look pale with love.
Prove that ever I lose more blood with love than I will get
    again with drinking, pick out mine eyes with a ballad-maker's pen
    and hang me up at the door of a brothel house for the sign of
    blind Cupid.
If I do, hang me in a bottle like a cat and shoot at me; and
    he that hits me, let him be clapp'd on the shoulder and call'd
    Adam.
I look for an earthquake too then.
In the meantime,
    good Signior Benedick, repair to Leonato's, commend me to him and
    tell him I will not fail him at supper; for indeed he hath made
    great preparation.
I have almost matter enough in me for such an embassage; and
    so I commit you--
  Claud.
From my house--if I had it--
  Pedro.
And so I leave you.
O my lord,
    When you went onward on this ended action,
    I look'd upon her with a soldier's eye,
    That lik'd, but had a rougher task in hand
    Than to drive liking to the name of love;
    But now I am return'd and that war-thoughts
    Have left their places vacant, in their rooms
    Come thronging soft and delicate desires,
    All prompting me how fair young Hero is,
    Saying I lik'd her ere I went to wars.
If thou dost love fair Hero, cherish it,
    And I will break with her and with her father,
    And thou shalt have her.
But lest my liking might too sudden seem,
    I would have salv'd it with a longer treatise.
'Tis once, thou lovest,
    And I will fit thee with the remedy.
I know we shall have revelling to-night.
I will assume thy part in some disguise
    And tell fair Hero I am Claudio,
    And in her bosom I'll unclasp my heart
    And take her hearing prisoner with the force
    And strong encounter of my amorous tale.
Then after to her father will I break,
    And the conclusion is, she shall be thine.
But, brother, I can tell you strange
    news that you yet dreamt not of.
I will send for him, and question him
    yourself.
We will hold it as a dream till it appear itself; but  
    I will acquaint my daughter withal, that she may be the better
    prepared for an answer, if peradventure this be true.
--[To the Musician] O, I cry you mercy, friend.
Go you with me,
    and I will use your skill.
And when I have heard it, what blessings brings it?
I wonder that thou (being, as thou say'st thou art, born
    under Saturn) goest about to apply a moral medicine to a
    mortifying mischief.
I cannot hide what I am: I must be sad when
    I have cause, and smile at no man's jests; eat when I have
    stomach, and wait for no man's leisure; sleep when I am drowsy,
    and tend on no man's business; laugh when I am merry, and claw no
    man in his humour.
I had rather be a canker in a hedge than a rose in his grace,
    and it better fits my blood to be disdain'd of all than to
    fashion a carriage to rob love from any.
In this, though I cannot
    be said to be a flattering honest man, it must not be denied but
    I am a plain-dealing villain.
I am trusted with a muzzle and
    enfranchis'd with a clog; therefore I have decreed not to sing in
    my cage.
If I had my mouth, I would bite; if I had my liberty, I
    would do my liking.
In the meantime let me be that I am, and seek
    not to alter me.
I make all use of it, for I use it only.
I came yonder from a great supper.
The Prince your brother is
    royally entertain'd by Leonato, and I can give you intelligence  
    of an intended marriage.
Being entertain'd for a perfumer, as I was smoking a musty
    room, comes me the Prince and Claudio, hand in hand in sad
    conference.
I whipt me behind the arras and there heard it agreed
    upon that the Prince should woo Hero for himself, and having
    obtain'd her, give her to Count Claudio.
If I can cross him any way, I bless myself every way.
Their cheer is the greater that  
    I am subdued.
Scene I.
I saw him not.
I never can see him but I am
    heart-burn'd an hour after.
I shall lessen God's sending
    that way, for it is said, 'God sends a curst cow short horns,'
    but to a cow too curst he sends none.
Just, if he send me no husband; for the which blessing I am
    at him upon my knees every morning and evening.
Lord, I could not
    endure a husband with a beard on his face.
I had rather lie in
    the woollen!
What should I do with him?
He that hath a beard is more than a
    youth, and he that hath no beard is less than a man; and he that
    is more than a youth is not for me; and he that is less than a
    man, I am not for him.
Therefore I will even take sixpence in
    earnest of the berrord and lead his apes into hell.
' So  
    deliver I up my apes, and away to Saint Peter--for the heavens.
[to Hero] Well, niece, I trust you will be rul'd by your
    father.
Well, niece, I hope to see you one day fitted with a husband.
No, uncle, I'll none.
Adam's sons are my brethren, and truly I
    hold it a sin to match in my kinred.
Daughter, remember what I told you.
I have a good eye, uncle; I can see a church by daylight.
So you walk softly and look sweetly and say nothing,
    I am yours for the walk; and especially when I walk away.
I may say so when I please.
When I like your favour, for God defend the lute should be
    like the case!
Well, I would you did like me.
So would not I for your own sake, for I have many ill
    qualities.
I say my prayers aloud.
I love you the better.
I know you well enough.
At a word, I am not.
I know you by the waggling of your head.
To tell you true, I counterfeit him.
At a word, I am not.
Come, come, do you think I do not know you by your excellent
    wit?
That I was disdainful, and that I had my good wit out of the
    'Hundred Merry Tales.
I am sure you know him well enough.
Not I, believe me.
I pray you, what is he?
I am sure he is in the fleet.
I would he had boarded me.
When I know the gentleman, I'll tell him what you say.
Nay, if they lead to any ill, I will leave them at the next
    turning.
I know him by his bearing.
I am he.
I pray you dissuade him from her; she is no
    equal for his birth.
I heard him swear his affection.
So did I too, and he swore he would marry her tonight.
Thus answer I in name of Benedick
    But hear these ill news with the ears of Claudio.
This is an accident of hourly proof,
    Which I mistrusted not.
I wish him joy of her.
I pray you leave me.
If it will not be, I'll leave you.
it may be I go under that title because I am
    merry.
Yea, but so I am apt to do myself wrong.
I am not so
    reputed.
Well,
    I'll be revenged as I may.
Troth, my lord, I have played the part of Lady Fame, I found
    him here as melancholy as a lodge in a warren.
I told him, and I
    think I told him true, that your Grace had got the good will of
    this young lady, and I off'red him my company to a willow tree,
    either to make him a garland, as being forsaken, or to bind him
    up a rod, as being worthy to be whipt.
Yet it had not been amiss the rod had been made, and the
    garland too; for the garland he might have worn himself, and the
    rod he might have bestowed on you, who, as I take it, have stol'n
    his bird's nest.
I will but teach them to sing and restore them to the owner.
She told me, not
    thinking I had been myself, that I was the Prince's jester, that
    I was duller than a great thaw; huddling jest upon jest with such  
    impossible conveyance upon me that I stood like a man at a mark,
    with a whole army shooting at me.
I would not marry her though she were endowed with all that
    Adam had left him before he transgress'd.
I would to God some scholar would
    conjure her, for certainly, while she is here, a man may live as
    quiet in hell as in a sanctuary; and people sin upon purpose,
    because they would go thither; so indeed all disquiet, horror,
    and perturbation follows her.
I
    will go on the slightest errand now to the Antipodes that you can
    devise to send me on; I will fetch you a toothpicker now from the  
    furthest inch of Asia; bring you the length of Prester John's
    foot; fetch you a hair off the great Cham's beard; do you any
    embassage to the Pygmies--rather than hold three words'
    conference with this harpy.
O God, sir, here's a dish I love not!
I cannot endure my Lady
    Tongue.
Indeed, my lord, he lent it me awhile, and I gave him use for
    it--a double heart for his single one.
Marry, once before he won
    it of me with false dice; therefore your Grace may well say I
    have lost it.
So I would not he should do me, my lord, lest I should prove
    the mother of fools.
I have brought Count Claudio, whom you sent
    me to seek.
I' faith, lady, I think your blazon to be true; though I'll
    be sworn, if he be so, his conceit is false.
Here, Claudio, I
    have wooed in thy name, and fair Hero is won.
I have broke with
    her father, and his good will obtained.
I were but little
    happy if I could say how much.
Lady, as you are mine, I am yours.
I give away myself for you and dote upon the exchange.
Yea, my lord; I thank it, poor fool, it keeps on the windy
    side of care.
Thus goes every one to the world but
    I, and I am sunburnt.
I may sit in a corner and cry 'Heigh-ho for
    a husband!
Lady Beatrice, I will get you one.
I would rather have one of your father's getting.
No, my lord, unless I might have another for working days:
    your Grace is too costly to wear every day.
But I beseech your
    Grace pardon me.
I was born to speak all mirth and no matter.
No, sure, my lord, my mother cried; but then there was a star
    danc'd, and under that was I born.
Niece, will you look to those things I told you of?
I cry you mercy, uncle, By your Grace's pardon.
She
    is never sad but when she sleeps, and not ever sad then; for I
    have heard my daughter say she hath often dreamt of unhappiness
    and wak'd herself with laughing.
Come, you shake the head at so long a breathing;
    but I warrant thee, Claudio, the time shall not go dully by us.
I will in the interim undertake one of Hercules' labours, which
    is, to bring Signior Benedick and the Lady Beatrice into a
    mountain of affection th' one with th' other.
I would fain have  
    it a match, and I doubt not but to fashion it if you three will
    but minister such assistance as I shall give you direction.
My lord, I am for you, though it cost me ten nights'
    watchings.
And I, my lord.
I will do any modest office, my lord, to help my cousin to a
    good husband.
And Benedick is not the unhopefullest husband that I know.
Thus far can I praise him: he is of a noble strain, of approved
    valour, and confirm'd honesty.
I will teach you how to humour
    your cousin, that she shall fall in love with Benedick; and I,
    [to Leonato and Claudio] with your two helps, will so practise on
    Benedick that, in despite of his quick wit and his queasy
    stomach, he shall fall in love with Beatrice.
Go in with me, and I will tell you my drift.
Yea, my lord; but I can cross it.
I am sick in displeasure to him, and whatsoever comes athwart his
    affection ranges evenly with mine.
I think I told your lordship, a year since, how much I am in
    the favour of Margaret, the waiting gentlewoman to Hero.
I remember.
I can, at any unseasonable instant of the night, appoint her
    to look out at her lady's chamber window.
What proof shall I make of that?
Only to despite them I will endeavour anything.
Offer them instances; which shall bear no
    less likelihood than to see me at her chamber window, hear me
    call Margaret Hero, hear Margaret term me Claudio; and bring them
    to see this the very night before the intended wedding (for in
    the meantime I will so fashion the matter that Hero shall be
    absent) and there shall appear such seeming truth of Hero's  
    disloyalty that jealousy shall be call'd assurance and all the
    preparation overthrown.
Grow this to what adverse issue it can, I will put it in
    practice.
I will presently go learn their day of marriage.
I am here already, sir.
I know that, but I would have thee hence and here again.
) I do much wonder that one man, seeing how much
    another man is a fool when he dedicates his behaviours to love,
    will, after he hath laugh'd at such shallow follies in others,
    become the argument of his own scorn by falling in love; and such
    a man is Claudio.
I have known when there was no music with him
    but the drum and the fife; and now had he rather hear the tabor
    and the pipe.
I have known when he would have walk'd ten mile
    afoot to see a good armour; and now will he lie ten nights awake  
    carving the fashion of a new doublet.
May I be so converted and see with
    these eyes?
I cannot tell; I think not.
I will not be sworn but
    love may transform me to an oyster; but I'll take my oath on it,
    till he have made an oyster of me he shall never make me such a
    fool.
One woman is fair, yet I am well; another is wise, yet I am
    well; another virtuous, yet I am well; but till all graces be in
    one woman, one woman shall not come in my grace.
Rich she shall
    be, that's certain; wise, or I'll none; virtuous, or I'll never
    cheapen her; fair, or I'll never look on her; mild, or come not
    near me; noble, or not I for an angel; of good discourse, an
    excellent musician, and her hair shall be of what colour it
    please God.
I will hide me in
    the arbour.
I pray thee sing, and let me woo no more.
Because you talk of wooing, I will sing,
    Since many a wooer doth commence his suit
    To her he thinks not worthy, yet he wooes,
    Yet will he swear he loves.
[aside] An he had been a dog that should have howl'd thus,
    they would have hang'd him; and I pray God his bad voice bode no
    mischief.
I had as live have heard the night raven, come what
    plague could have come after it.
I pray thee get us
    some excellent music; for to-morrow night we would have it at the
    Lady Hero's chamber window.
The best I can, my lord.
--I did never think that lady would have loved any man.
No, nor I neither; but most wonderful that she should so dote
    on Signior Benedick, whom she hath in all outward behaviours
    seem'd ever to abhor.
By my troth, my lord, I cannot tell what to think of it, but
    that she loves him with an enraged affection.
How, how, I pray you?
I would have thought her
    spirit had been invincible against all assaults of affection.
I would have sworn it had, my lord--especially against
    Benedick.
[aside] I should think this a gull but that the white-bearded
    fellow speaks it.
'Shall I,' says
    she, 'that have so oft encount'red him with scorn, write to him
    that I love him?
Now you talk of a sheet of paper, I remember a pretty jest
    your daughter told us of.
'I measure him,' says she, 'by my own
    spirit; for I should flout him if he writ to me.
Yea, though I
    love him, I should.
I am sorry
    for her, as I have just cause, being her uncle and her guardian.
I would she had bestowed this dotage on me.
I would have
    daff'd all other respects and made her half myself.
I pray you
    tell Benedick of it and hear what 'a will say.
And I take him to be valiant.
As Hector, I assure you; and in the managing of quarrels you
    may say he is wise, for either he avoids them with great
    discretion, or undertakes them with a most Christianlike fear.
Well, I am
    sorry for your niece.
I love Benedick well, and I could wish he would
    modestly examine himself to see how much he is unworthy so good a
    lady.
If he dote on her upon this, I will never trust my
    expectation.
That's the scene that I would see, which will be merely a dumb
    show.
I hear how I am censur'd.
They say I will bear
    myself proudly if I perceive the love come from her.
I did
    never think to marry.
I must not seem proud.
They say the
    lady is fair--'tis a truth, I can bear them witness; and virtuous  
    --'tis so, I cannot reprove it; and wise, but for loving me--by
    my troth, it is no addition to her wit, nor no great argument of
    her folly, for I will be horribly in love with her.
I may chance
    have some odd quirks and remnants of wit broken on me because I
    have railed so long against marriage.
When I said I would die a bachelor, I did not
    think I should live till I were married.
I do spy
    some marks of love in her.
Against my will I am sent to bid You come in to dinner.
Fair Beatrice, I thank you for your pains.
I took no more pains for those thanks than you take pains to
    thank me.
If it had been painful, I would not have come.
'Against my will I am sent to bid you come in to dinner.
'I took no more pains for those
    thanks than you took pains to thank me.
' That's as much as to
    say, 'Any pains that I take for you is as easy as thanks.
' If I
    do not take pity of her, I am a villain; if I do not love her, I
    am a Jew.
I will go get her picture.
Scene I.
Whisper her ear and tell her, I and Ursley
    Walk in the orchard, and our whole discourse
    Is all of her.
I'll make her come, I warrant you, presently.
When I do name him, let it be thy part
    To praise him more than ever man did merit.
I know her spirits are as coy and wild
    As haggards of the rock.
They did entreat me to acquaint her of it;
    But I persuaded them, if they lov'd Benedick,
    To wish him wrestle with affection
    And never to let Beatrice know of it.
I know he doth deserve
    As much as may be yielded to a man:  
    But Nature never fram'd a woman's heart
    Of prouder stuff than that of Beatrice.
Sure I think so;
    And therefore certainly it were not good
    She knew his love, lest she'll make sport at it.
I never yet saw man,
    How wise, how noble, young, how rarely featur'd,
    But she would spell him backward.
If I should speak,
    She would mock me into air; O, she would laugh me
    Out of myself, press me to death with wit!
No; rather I will go to Benedick
    And counsel him to fight against his passion.
And truly, I'll devise some honest slanders
    To stain my cousin with.
I pray you be not angry with me, madam,
    Speaking my fancy: Signior Benedick,
    For shape, for bearing, argument, and valour,
    Goes foremost in report through Italy.
I'll show thee some attires, and have thy counsel
    Which is the best to furnish me to-morrow.
She's lim'd, I warrant you!
Stand I condemn'd for pride and scorn so much?
And, Benedick, love on; I will requite thee,
    Taming my wild heart to thy loving hand.
If thou dost love, my kindness shall incite thee
    To bind our loves up in a holy band;
    For others say thou dost deserve, and I
    Believe it better than reportingly.
I do but stay till your marriage be consummate, and then go
    I toward Arragon.
I'll bring you thither, my lord, if you'll vouchsafe me.
I will only be bold with Benedick for his company; for, from
    the crown of his head to the sole of his foot, he is all mirth.
Gallants, I am not as I have been.
So say I.
I hope he be in love.
I have the toothache.
Yet say I he is in love.
for the which I hear what they say
    of him.
Nay, but I know who loves him.
That would I know too.
I warrant, one that knows him not.
I have studied eight or nine wise words to speak
    to you, which these hobby-horses must not hear.
If your leisure serv'd, I would speak with you.
Yet Count Claudio may hear, for what I
    would speak of concerns him.
I know not that, when he knows what I know.
If there be any impediment, I pray you discover it.
You may think I love you not.
Let that appear hereafter, and
    aim better at me by that I now will manifest.
For my brother, I  
    think he holds you well and in dearness of heart hath holp to
    effect your ensuing marriage--surely suit ill spent and labour
    ill bestowed!
I came hither to tell you, and, circumstances short'ned (for
    she has been too long a-talking of), the lady is disloyal.
I could say
    she were worse; think you of a worse title, and I will fit her to
    it.
I will not think it.
If you will follow me, I will show you enough; and when you
    have seen more and heard more, proceed accordingly.
If I see anything to-night why I should not marry her
    to-morrow, in the congregation where I should wed, there will I
    shame her.
And, as I wooed for thee to obtain her, I will join with
    thee to disgrace her.
I will disparage her no farther till you are my witnesses.
I knew it would be your answer.
Why, you speak like an ancient and most quiet watchman, for I
    cannot see how sleeping should offend.
Truly, by your office you may; but I think they that touch
    pitch will be defil'd.
Truly, I would not hang a dog by my will, much more a man who
    hath any honesty in him.
Nay, by'r lady, that I think 'a cannot.
By'r lady, I think it be so.
I pray you watch about
    Signior Leonato's door; for the wedding being there tomorrow,  
    there is a great coil to-night.
Be vigitant, I beseech
    you.
Conrade, I say!
I am at thy elbow.
I thought there would a scab
    follow.
I will owe thee an answer for that; and now forward with thy
    tale.
Stand thee close then under this penthouse, for it drizzles
    rain, and I will, like a true drunkard, utter all to thee.
Therefore know I have earned of Don John a thousand ducats.
I wonder at it.
I mean the fashion.
I may as well say the fool's the fool.
[aside] I know that Deformed.
I remember
    his name.
Seest thou not, I say, what a deformed thief this fashion is?
All this I see; and I see that the fashion wears out more
    apparel than the man.
But know that I have to-night wooed Margaret,
    the Lady Hero's gentlewoman, by the name of Hero.
She leans me
    out at her mistress' chamber window, bids me a thousand times
    good night--I tell this tale vilely; I should first tell thee how
    the Prince, Claudio and my master, planted and placed and
    possessed by my master Don John, saw afar off in the orchard this
    amiable encounter.
I know him; 'a wears a
    lock.
You'll be made bring Deformed forth, I warrant you.
A commodity in question, I warrant you.
I will, lady.
Troth, I think your other rebato were better.
No, pray thee, good Meg, I'll wear this.
By my troth, 's not so good, and I warrant your cousin will
    say so.
I'll wear none but
    this.
I like the new tire within excellently, if the hair were a
    thought browner; and your gown's a most rare fashion, i' faith.
I saw the Duchess of Milan's gown that they praise so.
I think you would have me say, 'saving your reverence,
    a husband.
' An bad thinking do not wrest true speaking, I'll
    offend nobody.
None, I think, an it be the right husband and the right wife.
I am out of all other tune, methinks.
Do
    you sing it, and I'll dance it.
I scorn that with my heels.
By my troth, I am exceeding ill.
Nothing I; but God send every one their heart's desire!
I am stuff'd, cousin; I cannot smell.
By my
    troth, I am sick.
No, by my troth, I have no moral meaning; I meant
    plain holy thistle.
You may think perchance that I think you are
    in love.
Nay, by'r lady, I am not such a fool to think what I
    list; nor I list not to think what I can; nor indeed I cannot
    think, if I would think my heart out of thinking, that you are in
    love, or that you will be in love, or that you can be in love.
He
    swore he would never marry; and yet now in despite of his heart
    he eats his meat without grudging; and how you may be converted I
    know not, but methinks you look with your eyes as other women do.
Marry, sir, I would have some confidence with you that decerns
    you nearly.
Brief, I pray you; for you see it is a busy time with me.
Goodman Verges, sir, speaks a little off the matter--an old
    man, sir, and his wits are not so blunt as, God help, I would
    desire they were; but, in faith, honest as the skin between his
    brows.
Yes, I thank God I am as honest as any man living that is an
    old man and no honester than I.
It pleases your worship to say so, but we are the poor Duke's  
    officers; but truly, for mine own part, if I were as tedious as a
    king, I could find in my heart to bestow it all of your worship.
Yea, in 'twere a thousand pound more than 'tis; for I hear as
    good exclamation on your worship as of any man in the city; and
    though I be but a poor man, I am glad to hear it.
And so am I.
I would fain know what you have to say.
I must leave you.
I am now in
    great haste, as it may appear unto you.
I'll wait upon them.
I am ready.
We will spare for no wit, I warrant you.
Scene I.
I do.
If either of you know any inward impediment why you should
    not be conjoined, I charge you on your souls to utter it.
I dare make his answer--none.
And what have I to give you back whose worth
    May counterpoise this rich and precious gift?
I know what you would say.
If I have known her,
    You will say she did embrace me as a husband,
    And so extenuate the forehand sin.
No, Leonato,
    I never tempted her with word too large,
    But, as a brother to his sister, show'd
    Bashful sincerity and comely love.
And seem'd I ever otherwise to you?
I will write against it.
What should I speak?
I stand dishonour'd that have gone about
    To link my dear friend to a common stale.
Are these things spoken, or do I but dream?
Leonato, stand I here?
I charge thee do so, as thou art my child.
How am I beset!
I talk'd with no man at that hour, my lord.
Leonato,
    I am sorry you must hear.
Thus, pretty lady,
    I am sorry for thy much misgovernment.
For thee I'll lock up all the gates of love,
    And on my eyelids shall conjecture hang,
    To turn all beauty into thoughts of harm,
    And never shall it more be gracious.
Dead, I think.
Do not live, Hero; do not ope thine eyes;
    For, did I think thou wouldst not quickly die,
    Thought I thy spirits were stronger than thy shames,
    Myself would on the rearward of reproaches
    Strike at thy life.
Griev'd I, I had but one?
Child I for that at frugal nature's frame?
Why had I one?
Why had I not with charitable hand  
    Took up a beggar's issue at my gates,
    Who smirched thus and mir'd with infamy,
    I might have said, 'No part of it is mine;
    This shame derives itself from unknown loins'?
But mine, and mine I lov'd, and mine I prais'd,
    And mine that I was proud on--mine so much
    That I myself was to myself not mine,
    Valuing of her--why, she, O, she is fall'n
    Into a pit of ink, that the wide sea
    Hath drops too few to wash her clean again,
    And salt too little which may season give
    To her foul tainted flesh!
For my part, I am so attir'd in wonder,
    I know not what to say.
No, truly, not; although, until last night,
    I have this twelvemonth been her bedfellow
  Leon.
Hear me a little;
    For I have only been silent so long,
    And given way unto this course of fortune,
    By noting of the lady.
I have mark'd
    A thousand blushing apparitions
    To start into her face, a thousand innocent shames
    In angel whiteness beat away those blushes,
    And in her eye there hath appear'd a fire
    To burn the errors that these princes hold
    Against her maiden truth.
They know that do accuse me; I know none.
If I know more of any man alive
    Than that which maiden modesty doth warrant,
    Let all my sins lack mercy!
O my father,
    Prove you that any man with me convers'd
    At hours unmeet, or that I yesternight
    Maintain'd the change of words with any creature,
    Refuse me, hate me, torture me to death!
I know not.
But not for that dream I on this strange course,
    But on this travail look for greater birth.
Let this be so, and doubt not but success
    Will fashion the event in better shape
    Than I can lay it down in likelihood.
Signior Leonato, let the friar advise you;
    And though you know my inwardness and love
    Is very much unto the Prince and Claudio,
    Yet, by mine honour, I will deal in this
    As secretly and justly as your soul  
    Should with your body.
Being that I flow in grief,
    The smallest twine may lead me.
Yea, and I will weep a while longer.
I will not desire that.
I do it freely.
Surely I do believe your fair cousin is wronged.
I do love nothing in the world so well as you.
As strange as the thing I know not.
It were as possible for
    me to say I loved nothing so well as you.
But believe me not; and
    yet I lie not.
I confess nothing, nor I deny nothing.
I am sorry
    for my cousin.
I will swear by it that you love me, and I will make him eat
    it that says I love not you.
I protest I love
    thee.
I was about to protest I
    loved you.
I love you with so much of my heart that none is left to
    protest.
I am gone, though I am here.
Nay, I
    pray you let me go.
In faith, I will go.
O that I were a
    man!
bear her in hand until they come to take hands, and
    then with public accusation, uncover'd slander, unmitigated
    rancour--O God, that I were a man!
I would eat his heart in the
    market place.
O that I were a man
    for his sake!
or that I had any friend would be a man for my
    sake!
I
    cannot be a man with wishing; therefore I will die a woman with
    grieving.
By this hand, I love thee.
Yea, as sure is I have a thought or a soul.
Enough, I am engag'd, I will challenge him.
I will kiss your
    hand, and so I leave you.
I must say she is dead-and so farewell.
Marry, that am I and my partner.
I am a gentleman, sir, and my name is Conrade.
A marvellous witty fellow, I assure you; but I will go about
    with him.
Sir, I say
    to you, it is thought you are false knaves.
Sir, I say to you we are none.
Masters, I charge you in the Prince's name accuse these men.
I do not like thy look, I promise
    thee.
I will go before and show him their
    examination.
But, masters,
    remember that I am an ass.
Though it be not written down, yet
    forget not that I am an ass.
I am a wise
    fellow; and which is more, an officer; and which is more, a
    householder; and which is more, as pretty a piece of flesh as any
    is in Messina, and one that knows the law, go to!
O that I had been writ down an ass!
Scene I.
I pray thee cease thy counsel,
    Which falls into mine ears as profitless
    As water in a sieve.
If such a one will smile and stroke his beard,
    Bid sorrow wag, cry 'hem' when he should groan,  
    Patch grief with proverbs, make misfortune drunk
    With candle-wasters--bring him yet to me,
    And I of him will gather patience.
I pray thee peace.
I will be flesh and blood;
    For there was never yet philosopher
    That could endure the toothache patiently,  
    However they have writ the style of gods
    And made a push at chance and sufferance.
Nay, I will do so.
Nay, never lay thy hand upon thy sword;
    I fear thee not.
never fleer and jest at me
    I speak not like a dotard nor a fool,
    As under privilege of age to brag
    What I have done being young, or what would do,
    Were I not old.
Know, Claudio, to thy head,
    Thou hast so wrong'd mine innocent child and me
    That I am forc'd to lay my reverence by
    And, with grey hairs and bruise of many days,
    Do challenge thee to trial of a man.
I say thou hast belied mine innocent child;
    Thy slander hath gone through and through her heart,
    And she lied buried with her ancestors-  
    O, in a tomb where never scandal slept,
    Save this of hers, fram'd by thy villany!
Thine, Claudio; thine I say.
My lord, my lord,
    I'll prove it on his body if he dare,
    Despite his nice fence and his active practice,
    His May of youth and bloom of lustihood.
I will not have to do with you.
Sir boy, I'll whip you from your foining fence!
Nay, as I am a gentleman, I will.
God knows I lov'd my niece,  
    And she is dead, slander'd to death by villains,
    That dare as well answer a man indeed
    As I dare take a serpent by the tongue.
I know them, yea,
    And what they weigh, even to the utmost scruple,
    Scambling, outfacing, fashion-monging boys,
    That lie and cog and flout, deprave and slander,
    Go anticly, show outward hideousness,
    And speak off half a dozen dang'rous words,
    How they might hurt their enemies, if they durst;
    And this is all.
I will not hear you.
--I will be heard.
Had we fought,
    I doubt we should have been too young for them.
I came to seek
    you both.
Shall I draw it?
I will bid thee draw, as we do the minstrel--draw to
    pleasure us.
As I am an honest man, he looks pale.
Sir, I shall meet your wit in the career an you charge it
    against me.
I pray you choose another subject.
I think he be angry
    indeed.
Shall I speak a word in your ear?
I jest not; I will make
    it good how you dare, with what you dare, and when you dare.
Do  
    me right, or I will protest your cowardice.
Well, I will meet you, so I may have good cheer.
I' faith, I thank him, he hath bid me to a calve's head and
    a capon, the which if I do not carve most curiously, say my
    knife's naught.
Shall I not find a woodcock too?
I'll tell thee how Beatrice prais'd thy wit the other day.
I
    said thou hadst a fine wit: 'True,' said she, 'a fine little
    one.
' 'No,' said I, 'a great wit.
' 'Nay,' said I, 'a good wit.
' 'Nay,' said I, 'the gentleman is wise.
' 'Nay,' said I, 'he hath the
    tongues.
' 'That I believe' said she, 'for he swore a thing to me
    on Monday night which he forswore on Tuesday morning.
I will leave you now to
    your gossiplike humour.
My lord, for your many
    courtesies I thank you.
I must discontinue your company.
For my Lord Lackbeard there, he
    and I shall meet; and till then peace be with him.
In most profound earnest; and, I'll warrant you, for the  
    love of Beatrice.
First, I ask thee what they have done; thirdly, I ask thee
    what's their offence; sixth and lastly, why they are committed;
    and to conclude, what you lay to their charge.
I have deceived even your
    very eyes.
My villany they have upon record,
    which I had rather seal with my death than repeat over to my  
    shame.
The lady is dead upon mine and my master's false
    accusation; and briefly, I desire nothing but the reward of a
    villain.
I have drunk poison whiles he utter'd it.
Sweet Hero, now thy image doth appear
    In the rare semblance that I lov'd it first.
And, masters, do not
    forget to specify, when time and place shall serve, that I am an
    ass.
Let me see his eyes,  
    That, when I note another man like him,
    I may avoid him.
Yea, even I alone.
I thank you princes for my daughter's death.
I know not how to pray your patience;
    Yet I must speak.
Yet sinn'd I not
    But in mistaking.
By my soul, nor I!
And yet, to satisfy this good old man,
    I would bend under any heavy weight  
    That he'll enjoin me to.
I cannot bid you bid my daughter live-
    That were impossible; but I pray you both,
    Possess the people in Messina here
    How innocent she died; and if your love
    Can labour aught in sad invention,
    Hang her an epitaph upon her tomb,
    And sing it to her bones--sing it to-night.
I do embrace your offer; and dispose
    For henceforth of poor Claudio.
To-morrow then I will expect your coming;  
    To-night I take my leave.
This naughty man
    Shall fact to face be brought to Margaret,
    Who I believe was pack'd in all this wrong,
    Hir'd to it by your brother.
No, by my soul, she was not;
    Nor knew not what she did when she spoke to me;
    But always hath been just and virtuous
    In anything that I do know by her.
I beseech you let
    it be rememb'red in his punishment.
I thank thee for thy care and honest pains.
Your worship speaks like a most thankful and reverent youth,
    and I praise God for you.
Go, I discharge thee of thy prisoner, and I thank thee.
I leave an arrant knave with your worship, which I beseech
    your worship to correct yourself, for the example of others.
I wish your worship well.
I humbly give you leave to depart; and if a merry
    meeting may be wish'd, God prohibit it!
To-night I'll mourn with Hero.
Why, shall I always keep below
    stairs?
And so I pray thee call Beatrice.
I give thee the bucklers.
Well, I will call Beatrice to you, who I think hath legs.
[Sings] The god of love,
               That sits above
           And knows me, and knows me,
             How pitiful I deserve--

    I mean in singing; but in loving Leander the good swimmer,
    Troilus the first employer of panders, and a whole book full of
    these quondam carpet-mongers, whose names yet run smoothly in the
    even road of a blank verse--why, they were never so truly turn'd
    over and over as my poor self in love.
Marry, I cannot show it in
    rhyme.
I have tried.
I can find out no rhyme to 'lady' but 'baby'
    --an innocent rhyme; for 'scorn,' 'horn'--a hard rhyme; for
    'school', 'fool'--a babbling rhyme: very ominous endings!
No, I
    was not born under a rhyming planet, nor cannot woo in festival
    terms.
Sweet Beatrice, wouldst thou come when I call'd thee?
And yet, ere I go, let
    me go with that I came for, which is, with knowing what hath
    pass'd between you and Claudio.
Only foul words; and thereupon I will kiss thee.
Therefore I will depart
    unkiss'd.
But I must tell thee plainly, Claudio
    undergoes my challenge; and either I must shortly hear from him
    or I will subscribe him a coward.
And I pray thee now tell me,
    for which of my bad parts didst thou first fall in love with me?
I do suffer love indeed, for I
    love thee against my will.
In spite of your heart, I think.
If you
    spite it for my sake, I will spite it for yours, for I will never
    love that which my friend hates.
Thou and I are too wise to woo peaceably.
Therefore is it most expedient for the wise, if Don Worm (his
    conscience) find no impediment to the contrary, to be the trumpet
    of his own virtues, as I am to myself.
So much for praising
    myself, who, I myself will bear witness, is praiseworthy.
There will I leave you too, for
    here comes one in haste.
I will live in thy heart, die in thy lap, and be buried thy
    eyes; and moreover, I will go with thee to thy uncle's.
]
    Praising her when I am dumb.
Yearly will I do this rite.
Did I not tell you she was innocent?
Well, I am glad that all things sort so well.
And so am I, being else by faith enforc'd
    To call young Claudio to a reckoning for it.
Well, daughter, and you gentlewomen all,
    Withdraw into a chamber by yourselves,
    And when I send for you, come hither mask'd.
Which I will do with confirm'd countenance.
Friar, I must entreat your pains, I think.
And I do with an eye of love requite her.
The sight whereof I think you had from me,
    From Claudio, and the Prince; but what's your will?
Your answer, sir, is enigmatical;
    But, for my will, my will is, your good will
    May stand with ours, this day to be conjoin'd
    In the state of honourable marriage;
    In which, good friar, I shall desire your help.
I'll hold my mind, were she an Ethiope.
I think he thinks upon the savage bull.
For this I owe you.
Which is the lady I must seize upon?
This same is she, and I do give you her.
I am your husband if you like of me.
And when I liv'd I was your other wife;       [Unmasks.
One Hero died defil'd; but I do live,
    And surely as I live, I am a maid.
All this amazement can I qualify,
    When, after that the holy rites are ended,
    I'll tell you largely of fair Hero's death.
[unmasks] I answer to that name.
Come, cousin, I am sure you love the gentleman.
And I'll be sworn upon't that he loves her;
    For here's a paper written in his hand,
    A halting sonnet of his own pure brain,
    Fashion'd to Beatrice.
Come, I will have thee; but, by this light, I take thee for pity.
I would not deny you; but, by this good day, I yield upon
    great persuasion, and partly to save your life, for I was told
    you were in a consumption.
I will stop your mouth.
I'll tell thee what, Prince: a college of wit-crackers cannot
    flout me out of my humour.
Dost thou think I care for a satire or
    an epigram?
In brief, since I do purpose to
    marry, I will think nothing to any purpose that the world can say
    against it; and therefore never flout at me for what I have said  
    against it; for man is a giddy thing, and this is my conclusion.
For thy part, Claudio, I did think to have beaten thee; but in
    that thou art like to be my kinsman, live unbruis'd, and love my
    cousin.
I had well hop'd thou wouldst have denied Beatrice, that I
    might have cudgell'd thee out of thy single life, to make thee a
    double-dealer, which out of question thou wilt be if my cousin do
    not look exceeding narrowly to thee.
I'll devise thee brave  
    punishments for him.
>>



SCENE: Venice and Cyprus

ACT I.
SCENE I.
I take it much unkindly
    That thou, Iago, who hast had my purse
    As if the strings were thine, shouldst know of this.
If ever I did dream of such a matter,
    Abhor me.
Despise me, if I do not.
Three great ones of the city,
    In personal suit to make me his lieutenant,
    Off-capp'd to him; and, by the faith of man,
    I know my price, I am worth no worse a place.
But he, as loving his own pride and purposes,
    Evades them, with a bumbast circumstance
    Horribly stuff'd with epithets of war,
    And, in conclusion,
    Nonsuits my mediators; for, "Certes," says he,
    "I have already chose my officer.
But he, sir, had the election;
    And I, of whom his eyes had seen the proof
    At Rhodes, at Cyprus, and on other grounds
    Christian and heathen, must be belee'd and calm'd
    By debitor and creditor.
This counter-caster,
    He, in good time, must his lieutenant be,
    And I- God bless the mark!
By heaven, I rather would have been his hangman.
Now, sir, be judge yourself
    Whether I in any just term am affined
    To love the Moor.
I would not follow him then.
I follow him to serve my turn upon him:
    We cannot all be masters, nor all masters
    Cannot be truly follow'd.
These fellows have some soul,
    And such a one do I profess myself.
For, sir,  
    It is as sure as you are Roderigo,
    Were I the Moor, I would not be Iago.
In following him, I follow but myself;
    Heaven is my judge, not I for love and duty,
    But seeming so, for my peculiar end.
For when my outward action doth demonstrate
    The native act and figure of my heart
    In complement extern, 'tis not long after
    But I will wear my heart upon my sleeve
    For daws to peck at: I am not what I am.
Here is her father's house; I'll call aloud.
Arise, I say!
Not I.
I have charged thee not to haunt about my doors.
Most grave Brabantio,
    In simple and pure soul I come to you.
I am one, sir, that comes to tell you your daughter and the
    Moor are now making the beast with two backs.
This thou shalt answer; I know thee, Roderigo.
Sir, I will answer anything.
But, I beseech you,
    If't be your pleasure and most wise consent,
    As partly I find it is, that your fair daughter,
    At this odd-even and dull watch o' the night,
    Transported with no worse nor better guard
    But with a knave of common hire, a gondolier,
    To the gross clasps of a lascivious Moor-  
    If this be known to you, and your allowance,
    We then have done you bold and saucy wrongs;
    But if you know not this, my manners tell me
    We have your wrong rebuke.
Do not believe
    That, from the sense of all civility,
    I thus would play and trifle with your reverence.
Your daughter, if you have not given her leave,
    I say again, hath made a gross revolt,
    Tying her duty, beauty, wit, and fortunes
    In an extravagant and wheeling stranger
    Of here and everywhere.
Light, I say, light!
Farewell, for I must leave you.
It seems not meet, nor wholesome to my place,
    To be produced- as, if I stay, I shall-
    Against the Moor; for I do know, the state,
    However this may gall him with some check,
    Cannot with safety cast him, for he's embark'd
    With such loud reason to the Cyprus wars,
    Which even now stands in act, that, for their souls,
    Another of his fathom they have none
    To lead their business; in which regard,
    Though I do hate him as I do hell pains,
    Yet for necessity of present life,
    I must show out a flag and sign of love,
    Which is indeed but sign.
That you shall surely find him,
    Lead to the Sagittary the raised search,
    And there will I be with him.
Truly, I think they are.
Yes, sir, I have indeed.
I think I can discover him, if you please
    To get good guard and go along with me.
At every house I'll call;
    I may command at most.
On, good Roderigo, I'll deserve your pains.
Though in the trade of war I have slain men,
    Yet do I hold it very stuff o' the conscience
    To do no contrived murther.
I lack iniquity
    Sometimes to do me service.
Nine or ten times
    I had thought to have yerk'd him here under the ribs.
Nay, but he prated
    And spoke such scurvy and provoking terms
    Against your honor
    That, with the little godliness I have,
    I did full hard forbear him.
But I pray you, sir,
    Are you fast married?
My services, which I have done the signiory,
    Shall out-tongue his complaints.
'Tis yet to know-
    Which, when I know that boasting is an honor,
    I shall promulgate- I fetch my life and being
    From men of royal siege, and my demerits
    May speak unbonneted to as proud a fortune
    As this that I have reach'd.
For know, Iago,
    But that I love the gentle Desdemona,
    I would not my unhoused free condition
    Put into circumscription and confine
    For the sea's worth.
Not I; I must be found.
By Janus, I think no.
Something from Cyprus, as I may divine;
    It is a business of some heat.
'Tis well I am found by you.
I will but spend a word here in the house  
    And go with you.
I do not understand.
Come, sir, I am for you.
Damn'd as thou art, thou hast enchanted her,
    For I'll refer me to all things of sense,
    If she in chains of magic were not bound,
    Whether a maid so tender, fair, and happy,
    So opposite to marriage that she shunn'd
    The wealthy, curled darlings of our nation,
    Would ever have, to incur a general mock,
    Run from her guardage to the sooty bosom
    Of such a thing as thou- to fear, not to delight.
I'll have't disputed on;
    'Tis probable, and palpable to thinking.
I therefore apprehend and do attach thee
    For an abuser of the world, a practicer
    Of arts inhibited and out of warrant.
Were it my cue to fight, I should have known it
    Without a prompter.
Where will you that I go
    To answer this your charge?
What if I do obey?
'Tis true, most worthy signior;
    The Duke's in council, and your noble self,
    I am sure, is sent for.
I do not so secure me in the error,
    But the main article I do approve
    In fearful sense.
The Turkish preparation makes for Rhodes,
    So was I bid report here to the state
    By Signior Angelo.
Ay, so I thought.
] I did not see you; welcome, gentle signior;
    We lack'd your counsel and your help tonight.
So did I yours.
Good your Grace, pardon me:
    Neither my place nor aught I heard of business
    Hath raised me from my bed, nor doth the general care
    Take hold on me; for my particular grief
    Is of so flood-gate and o'erbearing nature
    That it engluts and swallows other sorrows,
    And it is still itself.
Humbly I thank your Grace.
Most potent, grave, and reverend signiors,
    My very noble and approved good masters,
    That I have ta'en away this old man's daughter,
    It is most true; true, I have married her;
    The very head and front of my offending  
    Hath this extent, no more.
Rude am I in my speech,
    And little blest with the soft phrase of peace;
    For since these arms of mine had seven years' pith,
    Till now some nine moons wasted, they have used
    Their dearest action in the tented field,
    And little of this great world can I speak,
    More than pertains to feats of broil and battle;
    And therefore little shall I grace my cause
    In speaking for myself.
Yet, by your gracious patience,
    I will a round unvarnish'd tale deliver
    Of my whole course of love: what drugs, what charms,
    What conjuration, and what mighty magic-
    For such proceeding I am charged withal-
    I won his daughter.
I therefore vouch again
    That with some mixtures powerful o'er the blood,
    Or with some dram conjured to this effect,
    He wrought upon her.
I do beseech you,
    Send for the lady to the Sagittary,
    And let her speak of me before her father.
If you do find me foul in her report,  
    The trust, the office I do hold of you,
    Not only take away, but let your sentence
    Even fall upon my life.
And till she come, as truly as to heaven
    I do confess the vices of my blood,
    So justly to your grave ears I'll present
    How I did thrive in this fair lady's love
    And she in mine.
Her father loved me, oft invited me,
    Still question'd me the story of my life
    From year to year, the battles, sieges, fortunes,
    That I have pass'd.
I ran it through, even from my boyish days
    To the very moment that he bade me tell it:
    Wherein I spake of most disastrous chances,
    Of moving accidents by flood and field,  
    Of hair-breadth 'scapes i' the imminent deadly breach,
    Of being taken by the insolent foe
    And sold to slavery, of my redemption thence
    And portance in my travels' history;
    Wherein of antres vast and deserts idle,
    Rough quarries, rocks, and hills whose heads touch heaven,
    It was my hint to speak- such was the process-
    And of the Cannibals that each other eat,
    The Anthropophagi, and men whose heads
    Do grow beneath their shoulders.
This to hear
    Would Desdemona seriously incline;
    But still the house affairs would draw her thence,
    Which ever as she could with haste dispatch,
    She'ld come again, and with a greedy ear
    Devour up my discourse; which I observing,
    Took once a pliant hour, and found good means
    To draw from her a prayer of earnest heart
    That I would all my pilgrimage dilate,
    Whereof by parcels she had something heard,
    But not intentively.
I did consent,  
    And often did beguile her of her tears
    When I did speak of some distressful stroke
    That my youth suffer'd.
She wish'd she had not heard it, yet she wish'd
    That heaven had made her such a man; she thank'd me,
    And bade me, if I had a friend that loved her,
    I should but teach him how to tell my story,
    And that would woo her.
Upon this hint I spake:
    She loved me for the dangers I had pass'd,
    And I loved her that she did pity them.
This only is the witchcraft I have used.
I think this tale would win my daughter too.
I pray you, hear her speak.
My noble father,
    I do perceive here a divided duty.
To you I am bound for life and education;
    My life and education both do learn me
    How to respect you; you are the lord of duty,
    I am hitherto your daughter.
But here's my husband,
    And so much duty as my mother show'd
    To you, preferring you before her father,
    So much I challenge that I may profess
    Due to the Moor, my lord.
I have done.
Please it your Grace, on to the state affairs;
    I had rather to adopt a child than get it.
I here do give thee that with all my heart
    Which, but thou hast already, with all my heart
    I would keep from thee.
For your sake, jewel,
    I am glad at soul I have no other child;
    For thy escape would teach me tyranny,
    To hang clogs on them.
I have done, my lord.
But words are words; I never yet did hear
    That the bruised heart was pierced through the ear.
I humbly beseech you, proceed to the affairs of state.
I do agnize
    A natural and prompt alacrity
    I find in hardness and do undertake
    These present wars against the Ottomites.
Most humbly therefore bending to your state,
    I crave fit disposition for my wife,
    Due reference of place and exhibition,
    With such accommodation and besort
    As levels with her breeding.
I'll not have it so.
Nor I.
Nor I.
I would not there reside
    To put my father in impatient thoughts
    By being in his eye.
That I did love the Moor to live with him,
    My downright violence and storm of fortunes
    May trumpet to the world.
I saw Othello's visage in his mind,
    And to his honors and his valiant parts
    Did I my soul and fortunes consecrate.
So that, dear lords, if I be left behind,
    A moth of peace, and he go to the war,
    The rites for which I love him are bereft me,
    And I a heavy interim shall support
    By his dear absence.
Vouch with me, heaven, I therefore beg it not
    To please the palate of my appetite,
    Nor to comply with heat- the young affects
    In me defunct- and proper satisfaction;
    But to be free and bounteous to her mind.
And heaven defend your good souls, that you think
    I will your serious and great business scant  
    For she is with me.
To his conveyance I assign my wife,
    With what else needful your good Grace shall think
    To be sent after me.
Honest Iago,
    My Desdemona must I leave to thee.
I prithee, let thy wife attend on her,
    And bring them after in the best advantage.
Come, Desdemona, I have but an hour
    Of love, of worldly matters and direction,
    To spend with thee.
What will I do, thinkest thou?
I will incontinently drown myself.
If thou dost, I shall never love thee after.
I have looked upon the world for four times
    seven years, and since I could distinguish betwixt a benefit and
    an injury, I never found man that knew how to love himself.
Ere I
    would say I would drown myself for the love of a guinea hen, I
    would change my humanity with a baboon.
What should I do?
I confess it is my shame to be so fond,
    but it is not in my virtue to amend it.
But we have reason to cool our raging motions, our carnal stings,
    our unbitted lusts; whereof I take this, that you call love, to
    be a sect or scion.
I have professed me thy friend, and I confess me knit to
    thy deserving with cables of perdurable toughness; I could never
    better stead thee than now.
I say, put
    money in thy purse.
Wilt thou be fast to my hopes, if I depend on the issue?
I have told thee often,
    and I retell thee again and again, I hate the Moor.
I'll be with thee betimes.
I am changed; I'll go sell all my land.
Thus do I ever make my fool my purse;
    For I mine own gain'd knowledge should profane
    If I would time expend with such a snipe
    But for my sport and profit.
I hate the Moor,
    And it is thought abroad that 'twixt my sheets
    He has done my office.
I know not if't be true,
    But I for mere suspicion in that kind
    Will do as if for surety.
I have't.
SCENE I.
It is a high-wrought flood;
    I cannot, 'twixt the heaven and the main,
    Descry a sail.
I never did like molestation view
    On the enchafed flood.
I am glad on't; 'tis a worthy governor.
Pray heavens he be,
    For I have served him, and the man commands
    Like a full soldier.
O, let the heavens
    Give him defense against the elements,
    For I have lost him on a dangerous sea.
I she well shipp'd?
I pray you, sir, go forth,
    And give us truth who 'tis that is arrived.
I shall.
She that I spake of, our great captain's captain,
    Left in the conduct of the bold Iago,
    Whose footing here anticipates our thoughts  
    A se'nnight's speed.
I thank you, valiant Cassio.
He is not yet arrived, nor know I aught
    But that he's well and will be shortly here.
O, but I fear- How lost you company?
Let it not gall your patience, good Iago,
    That I extend my manners; 'tis my breeding
    That gives me this bold show of courtesy.
In faith, too much;
    I find it still when I have list to sleep.
Marry, before your ladyship I grant,
    She puts her tongue a little in her heart
    And chides with thinking.
Nay, it is true, or else I am a Turk:
    You rise to play, and go to bed to work.
O gentle lady, do not put me to't,
    For I am nothing if not critical.
I am not merry, but I do beguile
    The thing I am by seeming otherwise.
I am about it, but indeed my invention  
    Comes from my pate as birdlime does from frieze;
    It plucks out brains and all.
She that was ever fair and never proud,
    Had tongue at will and yet was never loud,
    Never lack'd gold and yet went never gay,
    Fled from her wish and yet said, "Now I may";
    She that, being anger'd, her revenge being nigh,
    Bade her wrong stay and her displeasure fly;
    She that in wisdom never was so frail
    To change the cod's head for the salmon's tail;
    She that could think and ne'er disclose her mind,
    See suitors following and not look behind;
    She was a wight, if ever such wight were-
  DESDEMONA.
With as little a web as this will I ensnare as great a fly as
    Cassio.
Ay, smile upon her, do; I will gyve thee in thine own
    courtship.
I know his trumpet.
If it were now to die,
    'Twere now to be most happy; for I fear
    My soul hath her content so absolute
    That not another comfort like to this
    Succeeds in unknown fate.
I cannot speak enough of this content;
    It stops me here; it is too much of joy.
But I'll set down the pegs that make this music,
    As honest as I am.
Honey, you shall be well desired in Cyprus;
    I have found great love amongst them.
O my sweet,
    I prattle out of fashion, and I dote
    In mine own comforts.
I prithee, good Iago,
    Go to the bay and disembark my coffers.
First, I
    must tell thee this: Desdemona is directly in love with him.
I cannot believe that in her; she's full of most blest
    condition.
Yes, that I did; but that was but courtesy.
I have brought you from
    Venice.
Watch you tonight; for the command, I'll lay't upon you.
I'll not be far from you.
Provoke him, that he may; for even out of that
    will I cause these of Cyprus to mutiny, whose qualification shall
    come into no true taste again but by the displanting of Cassio.
So shall you have a shorter journey to your desires by the means
    I shall then have to prefer them, and the impediment most
    profitably removed, without the which there were no expectation
    of our prosperity.
I will do this, if I can bring it to any opportunity.
I warrant thee.
I must
    fetch his necessaries ashore.
That Cassio loves her, I do well believe it;
    That she loves him, 'tis apt and of great credit.
The Moor, howbeit that I endure him not,
    Is of a constant, loving, noble nature,
    And I dare think he'll prove to Desdemona
    A most dear husband.
Now, I do love her too,
    Not out of absolute lust, though peradventure  
    I stand accountant for as great a sin,
    But partly led to diet my revenge,
    For that I do suspect the lusty Moor
    Hath leap'd into my seat; the thought whereof
    Doth like a poisonous mineral gnaw my inwards,
    And nothing can or shall content my soul
    Till I am even'd with him, wife for wife.
Or failing so, yet that I put the Moor
    At least into a jealousy so strong
    That judgement cannot cure.
Which thing to do,
    If this poor trash of Venice, whom I trace
    For his quick hunting, stand the putting on,
    I'll have our Michael Cassio on the hip,
    Abuse him to the Moor in the rank garb
    (For I fear Cassio with my nightcap too),
    Make the Moor thank me, love me, and reward me
    For making him egregiously an ass
    And practicing upon his peace and quiet
    Even to madness.
Iago hath direction what to do;
    But notwithstanding with my personal eye
    Will I look to't.
And, I'll warrant her, full of game.
Come, lieutenant, I have a
    stope of wine, and here without are a brace of Cyprus gallants
    that would fain have a measure to the health of black Othello.
I have very poor and unhappy brains
    for drinking.
I could well wish courtesy would invent some other
    custom of entertainment.
But one cup; I'll drink for you.
I have drunk but one cup tonight, and that was craftily  
    qualified too, and behold what innovation it makes here.
I am
    unfortunate in the infirmity, and dare not task my weakness with
    any more.
Here at the door; I pray you, call them in.
I'll do't, but it dislikes me.
If I can fasten but one cup upon him,
    With that which he hath drunk tonight already,
    He'll be as full of quarrel and offense
    As my young mistress' dog.
Three lads of Cyprus, noble swelling spirits,
    That hold their honors in a wary distance,
    The very elements of this warlike isle,
    Have I tonight fluster'd with flowing cups,
    And they watch too.
Now, 'mongst this flock of drunkards,
    Am I to put our Cassio in some action  
    That may offend the isle.
Good faith, a little one; not past a pint, as I am a
    soldier.
I learned it in England, where indeed they are most potent in
    potting.
I am for it, lieutenant, and I'll do you justice.
No, for I hold him to be unworthy of his place that does
    those things.
For mine own part- no offense to the general, nor any man
    of quality- I hope to be saved.
And so do I too, lieutenant.
Do not think, gentlemen, I am drunk: this is my
    ancient, this is my right hand, and this is my left.
I am not
    drunk now; I can stand well enough, and I speak well enough.
Why, very well then; you must not think then that I am
    drunk.
I fear the trust Othello puts him in
    On some odd time of his infirmity
    Will shake this island.
I pray you, after the lieutenant; go.
Not I, for this fair island.
I do love Cassio well, and would do much
    To cure him of this evil- But, hark!
But I'll beat the knave into a
    twiggen bottle.
Nay, good lieutenant; I pray you, sir, hold your hand.
Let me go, sir, or I'll knock you o'er the mazzard.
] Away, I say; go out and cry a mutiny.
'Zounds, I bleed still; I am hurt to the death.
On thy love, I charge thee.
I do not know.
I cannot speak  
    Any beginning to this peevish odds;
    And would in action glorious I had lost
    Those legs that brought me to a part of it!
I pray you, pardon me; I cannot speak.
Worthy Othello, I am hurt to danger.
Your officer, Iago, can inform you-
    While I spare speech, which something now offends me-
    Of all that I do know.
Nor know I aught
    By me that's said or done amiss this night,
    Unless self-charity be sometimes a vice,
    And to defend ourselves it be a sin
    When violence assails us.
If I once stir,
    Or do but lift this arm, the best of you
    Shall sink in my rebuke.
Touch me not so near:
    I had rather have this tongue cut from my mouth
    Than it should do offense to Michael Cassio;  
    Yet, I persuade myself, to speak the truth
    Shall nothing wrong him.
He, swift of foot,
    Outran my purpose; and I return'd the rather
    For that I heard the clink and fall of swords,
    And Cassio high in oath, which till tonight
    I ne'er might say before.
When I came back-
    For this was brief- I found them close together,
    At blow and thrust, even as again they were
    When you yourself did part them.
More of this matter cannot I report.
Though Cassio did some little wrong to him,  
    As men in rage strike those that wish them best,
    Yet surely Cassio, I believe, received
    From him that fled some strange indignity,
    Which patience could not pass.
I know, Iago,
    Thy honesty and love doth mince this matter,
    Making it light to Cassio.
Cassio, I love thee,
    But never more be officer of mine.
I'll make thee an example.
O, I have lost my
    reputation!
I have lost the immortal part of myself, and what
    remains is bestial.
As I am an honest man, I thought you had received some bodily
    wound; there is more sense in that than in reputation.
I will rather sue to be despised than to deceive so good a
    commander with so slight, so drunken, and so indiscreet an
    officer.
I know not.
I remember a mass of things, but nothing distinctly; a
    quarrel, but nothing wherefore.
As the time, the place,
    and the condition of this country stands, I could heartily wish
    this had not befallen; but since it is as it is, mend it for your  
    own good.
I will ask him for my place again; he shall tell me I am a
    drunkard!
Had I as many mouths as Hydra, such an answer would
    stop them all.
And, good lieutenant, I
    think you think I love you.
I have well approved it, sir.
I drunk!
I'll
    tell you what you shall do.
I may say so in this respect, for that he hath devoted
    and given up himself to the contemplation, mark, and denotement
    of her parts and graces.
I protest, in the sincerity of love and honest kindness.
I think it freely; and betimes in the morning I will beseech
    the virtuous Desdemona to undertake for me.
I am desperate of my
    fortunes if they check me here.
Good night, lieutenant, I must to the
    watch.
And what's he then that says I play the villain?
When this advice is free I give and honest,
    Probal to thinking, and indeed the course
    To win the Moor again?
How am I then a villain
    To counsel Cassio to this parallel course,
    Directly to his good?
When devils will the blackest sins put on,
    They do suggest at first with heavenly shows,
    As I do now.
For whiles this honest fool
    Plies Desdemona to repair his fortune,
    And she for him pleads strongly to the Moor,
    I'll pour this pestilence into his ear,
    That she repeals him for her body's lust;
    And by how much she strives to do him good,
    She shall undo her credit with the Moor.
So will I turn her virtue into pitch,
    And out of her own goodness make the net
    That shall enmesh them all.
I do follow here in the chase, not like a hound that
    hunts, but one that fills up the cry.
My money is almost spent; I
    have been tonight exceedingly well cudgeled; and I think the
    issue will be, I shall have so much experience for my pains; and
    so, with no money at all and a little more wit, return again to
    Venice.
Away, I say.
] Two things are to be done:
    My wife must move for Cassio to her mistress-  
    I'll set her on;
    Myself the while to draw the Moor apart,
    And bring him jump when he may Cassio find
    Soliciting his wife.
SCENE I.
Masters, play here, I will content your pains; Something
    that's brief; and bid "Good morrow, general.
Are these, I pray you, wind instruments?
Marry, sir, by many a wind instrument that I know.
Then put up your pipes in your bag, for I'll away.
No, I hear not your honest friend; I hear you.
If she will stir hither, I shall seem
    to notify unto her.
I have made bold, Iago,
    To send in to your wife.
I'll send her to you presently;
    And I'll devise a mean to draw the Moor
    Out of the way, that your converse and business
    May be more free.
I humbly thank you for't.
] I never knew
    A Florentine more kind and honest.
I am sorry
    For your displeasure, but all will sure be well.
Yet, I beseech you,
    If you think fit, or that it may be done,
    Give me advantage of some brief discourse
    With Desdemona alone.
I will bestow you where you shall have time
    To speak your bosom freely.
I am much bound to you.
That done, I will be walking on the works;
    Repair there to me.
Well, my good lord, I'll do't.
Be thou assured, good Cassio, I will do
    All my abilities in thy behalf.
I warrant it grieves my husband
    As if the cause were his.
Do not doubt, Cassio,
    But I will have my lord and you again
    As friendly as you were.
I know't: I thank you.
Ay, but, lady,
    That policy may either last so long,
    Or feed upon such nice and waterish diet,  
    Or breed itself so out of circumstances,
    That I being absent and my place supplied,
    My general will forget my love and service.
Before Emilia here
    I give thee warrant of thy place, assure thee,
    If I do vow a friendship, I'll perform it
    To the last article.
My lord shall never rest;
    I'll watch him tame and talk him out of patience;
    His bed shall seem a school, his board a shrift;
    I'll intermingle everything he does
    With Cassio's suit.
Madam, I'll take my leave.
I am very ill at ease,  
    Unfit for mine own purposes.
I like not that.
Nothing, my lord; or if- I know not what.
No, sure, I cannot think it,
    That he would steal away so guilty-like,
    Seeing you coming.
I do believe 'twas he.
I have been talking with a suitor here,
    A man that languishes in your displeasure.
Good my lord,
    If I have any grace or power to move you,
    His present reconciliation take;
    For if he be not one that truly loves you,
    That errs in ignorance and not in cunning,
    I have no judgement in an honest face.
I prithee, call him back.
I shall not dine at home;
    I meet the captains at the citadel.
I prithee, name the time, but let it not
    Exceed three days.
I wonder in my soul,
    What you would ask me, that I should deny,
    Or stand so mammering on.
Michael Cassio,
    That came awooing with you, and so many a time
    When I have spoke of you dispraisingly
    Hath ta'en your part- to have so much to do
    To bring him in!
Trust me, I could do much-
  OTHELLO.
Let him come when he will;
    I will deny thee nothing.
Why, this is not a boon;
    'Tis as I should entreat you wear your gloves,
    Or feed on nourishing dishes, or keep you warm,
    Or sue to you to do a peculiar profit
    To your own person.
Nay, when I have a suit
    Wherein I mean to touch your love indeed,
    It shall be full of poise and difficult weight,
    And fearful to be granted.
I will deny thee nothing,
    Whereon, I do beseech thee, grant me this,  
    To leave me but a little to myself.
Shall I deny you?
Farewell, my Desdemona; I'll come to thee straight.
Be as your fancies teach you;
    Whate'er you be, I am obedient.
Perdition catch my soul,
    But I do love thee!
and when I love thee not,
    Chaos is come again.
I did not think he had been acquainted with her.
My lord, for aught I know.
I heard thee say even now, thou like'st not that,
    When Cassio left my wife.
And when I told thee he was of my counsel
    In my whole course of wooing, thou criedst, "Indeed!
My lord, you know I love you.
I think thou dost;  
    And for I know thou'rt full of love and honesty
    And weigh'st thy words before thou givest them breath,
    Therefore these stops of thine fright me the more;
    For such things in a false disloyal knave
    Are tricks of custom; but in a man that's just
    They're close dilations, working from the heart,
    That passion cannot rule.
For Michael Cassio,
    I dare be sworn I think that he is honest.
I think so too.
Why then I think Cassio's an honest man.
I prithee, speak to me as to thy thinkings,
    As thou dost ruminate, and give thy worst of thoughts
    The worst of words.
Good my lord, pardon me;
    Though I am bound to every act of duty,  
    I am not bound to that all slaves are free to.
I do beseech you-
    Though I perchance am vicious in my guess,
    As, I confess, it is my nature's plague
    To spy into abuses, and oft my jealousy
    Shapes faults that are not- that your wisdom yet,
    From one that so imperfectly conceits,
    Would take no notice, nor build yourself a trouble
    Out of his scattering and unsure observance.
By heaven, I'll know thy thoughts.
Think'st thou I'ld make a life of jealousy,
    To follow still the changes of the moon
    With fresh suspicions?
Exchange me for a goat
    When I shall turn the business of my soul
    To such exsufflicate and blown surmises,
    Matching thy inference.
Nor from mine own weak merits will I draw
    The smallest fear or doubt of her revolt;
    For she had eyes and chose me.
No, Iago,
    I'll see before I doubt; when I doubt, prove;  
    And on the proof, there is no more but this-
    Away at once with love or jealousy!
I am glad of it, for now I shall have reason
    To show the love and duty that I bear you
    With franker spirit.
Therefore, as I am bound,
    Receive it from me.
I speak not yet of proof.
I would not have your free and noble nature
    Out of self-bounty be abused.
I know our country disposition well;
    In Venice they do let heaven see the pranks
    They dare not show their husbands; their best conscience
    Is not to leave't undone, but keep't unknown.
She that so young could give out such a seeming,
    To seel her father's eyes up close as oak-
    He thought 'twas witchcraft- but I am much to blame;
    I humbly do beseech you of your pardon
    For too much loving you.
I am bound to thee forever.
I see this hath a little dash'd your spirits.
I'faith, I fear it has.
I hope you will consider what is spoke
    Comes from my love.
But I do see you're moved;
    I am to pray you not to strain my speech
    To grosser issues nor to larger reach
    Than to suspicion.
I will not.
Cassio's my worthy friend-
    My lord, I see you're moved.
I do not think but Desdemona's honest.
I do not in position
    Distinctly speak of her; though I may fear,
    Her will, recoiling to her better judgement,
    May fall to match you with her country forms,
    And happily repent.
] My lord, I take my leave.
Why did I marry?
] My lord, I would I might entreat your honor
    To scan this thing no further; leave it to time.
In the meantime,
    Let me be thought too busy in my fears-
    As worthy cause I have to fear I am-
    And hold her free, I do beseech your honor.
I once more take my leave.
If I do prove her haggard,
    Though that her jesses were my dear heartstrings,
    I'ld whistle her off and let her down the wind
    To prey at fortune.
Haply, for I am black  
    And have not those soft parts of conversation
    That chamberers have, or for I am declined
    Into the vale of years- yet that's not much-
    She's gone.
I am abused, and my relief
    Must be to loathe her.
I had rather be a toad,
    And live upon the vapor of a dungeon,
    Than keep a corner in the thing I love
    For others' uses.
I'll not believe't.
I am to blame.
I have a pain upon my forehead here.
Come, I'll go in with you.
I am very sorry that you are not well.
I am glad I have found this napkin;
    This was her first remembrance from the Moor.
I'll have the work ta'en out,
    And give't Iago.
What he will do with it
    Heaven knows, not I;
    I nothing but to please his fantasy.
Do not you chide; I have a thing for you.
No, faith; she let it drop by negligence,  
    And, to the advantage, I being here took't up.
Be not acknown on't; I have use for it.
I will in Cassio's lodging lose this napkin,
    And let him find it.
I did say so.
I swear 'tis better to be much abused
    Than but to know't a little.
What sense had I of her stol'n hours of lust?
I saw't not, thought it not, it harm'd not me;
    I slept the next night well, was free and merry;
    I found not Cassio's kisses on her lips.
I am sorry to hear this.
I had been happy if the general camp,
    Pioners and all, had tasted her sweet body,
    So I had nothing known.
I thank you for this profit, and from hence
    I'll love no friend sith love breeds such offense.
I should be wise; for honesty's a fool,
    And loses that it works for.
By the world,
    I think my wife be honest, and think she is not;
    I think that thou art just, and think thou art not.
I'll have some proof.
If there be cords or knives,
    Poison or fire, or suffocating streams,
    I'll not endure it.
Would I were satisfied!
I see, sir, you are eaten up with passion;
    I do repent me that I put it to you.
Nay, I will.
It were a tedious difficulty, I think,
    To bring them to that prospect.
What shall I say?
But yet, I say,
    If imputation and strong circumstances,
    Which lead directly to the door of truth,
    Will give you satisfaction, you may have't.
I do not like the office;
    But sith I am enter'd in this cause so far,
    Prick'd to't by foolish honesty and love,
    I will go on.
I lay with Cassio lately
    And, being troubled with a raging tooth,
    I could not sleep.
In sleep I heard him say, "Sweet Desdemona,
    Let us be wary, let us hide our loves";
    And then, sir, would he gripe and wring my hand,
    Cry, "O sweet creature!
I'll tear her all to pieces.
I gave her such a one; 'twas my first gift.
I know not that; but such a handkerchief-
    I am sure it was your wife's- did I today
    See Cassio wipe his beard with.
Now do I see 'tis true.
Look here, Iago,
    All my fond love thus do I blow to heaven.
Patience, I say; your mind perhaps may change.
I here engage my words.
I greet thy love,
    Not with vain thanks, but with acceptance bounteous,
    And will upon the instant put thee to't:
    Within these three days let me hear thee say  
    That Cassio's not alive.
Come, go with me apart; I will withdraw,
    To furnish me with some swift means of death
    For the fair devil.
I am your own forever.
I dare not say he lies anywhere.
To tell you where he lodges, is to tell you where I lie.
I know not where he lodges, and for me to devise a lodging,
    and say he lies here or he lies there, were to lie in mine own
    throat.
I will catechize the world for him; that is, make questions
    and by them answer.
Tell him I have moved my
    lord on his behalf and hope all will be well.
To do this is within the compass of man's wit, and therefore  
    I will attempt the doing it.
Where should I lose that handkerchief, Emilia?
I know not, madam.
Believe me, I had rather have lost my purse
    Full of crusadoes; and, but my noble Moor
    Is true of mind and made of no such baseness
    As jealous creatures are, it were enough
    To put him to ill thinking.
I think the sun where he was born
    Drew all such humors from him.
I will not leave him now till Cassio
    Be call'd to him.
I cannot speak of this.
I have sent to bid Cassio come speak with you.
I have a salt and sorry rheum offends me;
    Lend me thy handkerchief.
That which I gave you.
I have it not about me.
I did so, and take heed on't;
    Make it a darling like your precious eye;
    To lose't or give't away were such perdition
    As nothing else could match.
Then would to God that I had never seen't!
I say, it is not lost.
Why, so I can, sir, but I will not now.
I pray, talk me of Cassio.
I ne'er saw this before.
Sure there's some wonder in this handkerchief;
    I am most unhappy in the loss of it.
Madam, my former suit: I do beseech you
    That by your virtuous means I may again
    Exist and be a member of his love
    Whom I with all the office of my heart
    Entirely honor.
I would not be delay'd.
If my offense be of such mortal kind
    That nor my service past nor present sorrows
    Nor purposed merit in futurity
    Can ransom me into his love again,
    But to know so must be my benefit;
    So shall I clothe me in a forced content
    And shut myself up in some other course
    To Fortune's alms.
My advocation is not now in tune;
    My lord is not my lord, nor should I know him
    Were he in favor as in humor alter'd.
So help me every spirit sanctified,
    As I have spoken for you all my best
    And stood within the blank of his displeasure
    For my free speech!
What I can do I will; and more I will
    Than for myself I dare.
I have seen the cannon,
    When it hath blown his ranks into the air
    And, like the devil, from his very arm
    Puff'd his own brother.
I will go meet him.
I prithee, do so.
Beshrew me much, Emilia,
    I was, unhandsome warrior as I am,
    Arraigning his unkindness with my soul;
    But now I find I had suborn'd the witness,
    And he's indicted falsely.
Alas the day, I never gave him cause!
I will go seek him.
If I do find him fit, I'll move your suit,
    And seek to effect it to my uttermost.
I humbly thank your ladyship.
I'faith, sweet love, I was coming to your house.
And I was going to your lodging, Cassio.
I have this while with leaden thoughts been press'd;
    But I shall in a more continuate time
    Strike off this score of absence.
To the felt absence now I feel a cause.
I know not, sweet.
I found it in my chamber.
I like the work well.
Ere it be demanded-  
    As like enough it will- I'ld have it copied.
I do attend here on the general;
    And think it no addition, nor my wish,
    To have him see me woman'd.
Why, I pray you?
Not that I love you not.
I pray you, bring me on the way a little,
    And say if I shall see you soon at night.
'Tis but a little way that I can bring you,
    For I attend here, but I'll see you soon.
'Tis very good; I must be circumstanced.
SCENE I.
But if I give my wife a handkerchief-
  OTHELLO.
Why, then, 'tis hers, my lord, and being hers,
    She may, I think, bestow't on any man.
By heaven, I would most gladly have forgot it.
What,
    If I had said I had seen him do you wrong?
Faith, that he did- I know not what he did.
I tremble at it.
My lord, I say!
When he is gone,
    I would on great occasion speak with you.
I mock you?
No, let me know,
    And knowing what I am, I know what she shall be.
I shifted him away,
    And laid good 'scuse upon your ecstasy;
    Bade him anon return and here speak with me  
    The which he promised.
Do but encave yourself
    And mark the fleers, the gibes, and notable scorns,
    That dwell in every region of his face;
    For I will make him tell the tale anew,
    Where, how, how oft, how long ago, and when
    He hath and is again to cope your wife.
I say, but mark his gesture.
Marry, patience,
    Or I shall say you are all in all in spleen,
    And nothing of a man.
I will be found most cunning in my patience;
    But (dost thou hear?
Now will I question Cassio of Bianca,
    A housewife that by selling her desires
    Buys herself bread and clothes.
I never knew a woman love man so.
I think, i'faith, she loves me.
I marry her!
I prithee, bear some charity
    to my wit; do not think it so unwholesome.
I am a very villain else.
She is persuaded I
    will marry her, out of her own love and flattery, not out of my
    promise.
I was
    the other day talking on the sea bank with certain Venetians, and
    thither comes the bauble, and, by this hand, she falls me thus  
    about my neck-
  OTHELLO.
O, I see
    that nose of yours, but not that dog I shall throw it to.
Well, I must leave her company.
I was a fine fool to
    take it.
I must take out the work?
This is some minx's token, and I must take out the work?
Wheresoever you had it, I'll take  
    out no work on't.
Faith, I must; she'll rail i' the street else.
Faith, I intend so.
Well, I may chance to see you, for I would very fain speak
    with you.
] How shall I murther him, Iago?
I would have him nine years akilling.
No, my heart is turned to stone; I strike it,
    and it hurts my hand.
I do but say what she is.
I will chop her into messes.
I'll not expostulate
    with her, lest her body and beauty unprovide my mind again.
I kiss the instrument of their pleasures.
I am very glad to see you, signior;
    Welcome to Cyprus.
I thank you.
I would do much
    To atone them, for the love I bear to Cassio.
May be the letter moved him;
    For, as I think, they do command him home,
    Deputing Cassio in his government.
By my troth, I am glad on't.
I am glad to see you mad.
I have not deserved this.
My lord, this would not be believed in Venice,
    Though I should swear I saw't.
] I will not stay to offend you.
I do beseech your lordship, call her back.
Who, I, my lord?
Ay, you did wish that I would make her turn.
-
    I am commanded home.
Get you away;
    I'll send for you anon.
Sir, I obey the mandate,
    And will return to Venice.
And, sir, tonight,
    I do entreat that we may sup together.
I may not breathe my censure
    What he might be: if what he might he is not,
    I would to heaven he were!
Faith, that was not so well; yet would I knew
    That stroke would prove the worst!
It is not honesty in me to speak
    What I have seen and known.
You shall observe him,
    And his own courses will denote him so  
    That I may save my speech.
I am sorry that I am deceived in him.
But then I saw no harm, and then I heard
    Each syllable that breath made up between them.
I durst, my lord, to wager she is honest,
    Lay down my soul at stake.
And yet she'll kneel and pray; I have seen her do't.
I understand a fury in your words,
    But not the words.
how am I false?
Am I the motive of these tears, my lord?
If you have lost him,
    Why, I have lost him too.
Had it pleased heaven
    To try me with affliction, had they rain'd
    All kinds of sores and shames on my bare head,
    Steep'd me in poverty to the very lips,
    Given to captivity me and my utmost hopes,
    I should have found in some place of my soul
    A drop of patience; but, alas, to make me
    A fixed figure for the time of scorn
    To point his slow unmoving finger at!
Yet could I bear that too, well, very well;
    But there, where I have garner'd up my heart,
    Where either I must live or bear no life;
    The fountain from the which my current runs,
    Or else dries up; to be discarded thence!
I hope my noble lord esteems me honest.
Alas, what ignorant sin have I committed?
I should make very forges of my cheeks,
    That would to cinders burn up modesty,
    Did I but speak thy deeds.
No, as I am a Christian.
If to preserve this vessel for my lord
    From any other foul unlawful touch  
    Be not to be a strumpet, I am none.
No, as I shall be saved.
I cry you mercy then;
    I took you for that cunning whore of Venice
    That married with Othello.
I pray you, turn the key, and keep our counsel.
I have none.
Do not talk to me, Emilia;
    I cannot weep, nor answer have I none
    But what should go by water.
'Tis meet I should be used so, very meet.
How have I been behaved, that he might stick
    The small'st opinion on my least misuse?
I cannot tell.
He might have chid me so, for in good faith,
    I am a child to chiding.
Am I that name, Iago?
Such as she says my lord did say I was.
I do not know; I am sure I am none such.
I will be hang'd, if some eternal villain,
    Some busy and insinuating rogue,
    Some cogging, cozening slave, to get some office,
    Have not devised this slander; I'll be hang'd else.
O good Iago,
    What shall I do to win my lord again?
Good friend, go to him, for by this light of heaven,
    I know not how I lost him.
Here I kneel:
    If e'er my will did trespass 'gainst his love
    Either in discourse of thought or actual deed,
    Or that mine eyes, mine ears, or any sense,
    Delighted them in any other form,
    Or that I do not yet, and ever did,
    And ever will, though he do shake me off
    To beggarly divorcement, love him dearly,
    Comfort forswear me!
I cannot say "whore.
"
    It doth abhor me now I speak the word;
    To do the act that might the addition earn
    Not the world's mass of vanity could make me.
I pray you, be content; 'tis but his humor:
    The business of the state does him offense,  
    And he does chide with you.
'Tis but so, I warrant.
I do not find that thou dealest justly with me.
I will indeed
    no longer endure it; nor am I yet persuaded to put up in peace
    what already I have foolishly suffered.
Faith, I have heard too much, for your words and  
    performances are no kin together.
I have wasted myself out of my
    means.
You have told me she hath
    received them and returned me expectations and comforts of sudden
    respect and acquaintance; but I find none.
I cannot go to, man; nor 'tis not very
    well.
By this hand, I say 'tis very scurvy, and begin to find
    myself fopped in it.
I tell you 'tis not very well.
I will make myself known
    to Desdemona.
If she will return me my jewels, I will give over
    my suit and repent my unlawful solicitation; if not, assure
    yourself I will seek satisfaction of you.
Ay, and said nothing but what I protest intendment of
    doing.
Why, now I see there's mettle in thee; and even from this  
    instant do build on thee a better opinion than ever before.
Thou hast taken against me a most just
    exception; but yet, I protest, have dealt most directly in thy
    affair.
I grant indeed it hath not appeared, and your suspicion is
    not without wit and judgement.
But, Roderigo, if thou hast that
    in thee indeed, which I have greater reason to believe now than
    ever, I mean purpose, courage, and valor, this night show it; if
    thou the next night following enjoy not Desdemona, take me from
    this world with treachery and devise engines for my life.
He sups
    tonight with a harlotry, and thither will I go to him.
If you will watch his going
    thence, which his will fashion to fall out between twelve and
    one, you may take him at your pleasure; I will be near to second
    your attempt, and he shall fall between us.
Come, stand not
    amazed at it, but go along with me; I will show you such a
    necessity in his death that you shall think yourself bound to put
    it on him.
I will hear further reason for this.
I do beseech you, sir, trouble yourself no further.
Madam, good night; I humbly thank your ladyship.
Get you to bed on the instant; I will be returned
    forthwith.
I will, my lord.
I would you had never seen him!
So would not I.
I have laid those sheets you bade me on the bed.
If I do die before thee, prithee shroud me
    In one of those same sheets.
That song tonight
    Will not go from my mind; I have much to do
    But to go hang my head all at one side
    And sing it like poor Barbary.
Shall I go fetch your nightgown?
I know a lady in Venice would have walked barefoot to
    Palestine for a touch of his nether lip.
Let nobody blame him; his scorn I approve-"

    Nay, that's not next.
]

        "I call'd my love false love; but what said he then?
If I court moe women, you'll couch with moe men-"

    So get thee gone; good night.
I have heard it said so.
Nor I neither by this heavenly light; I might do't as well
    i' the dark.
In troth, I think thou wouldst not.
In troth, I think I should, and undo't when I had done.
Marry, I would not do such a thing for a joint-ring, nor for
    measures of lawn, nor for gowns, petticoats, nor caps, nor any
    petty exhibition; but, for the whole world- why, who would not
    make her husband a cuckold to make him a monarch?
I should
    venture purgatory for't.
Beshrew me, if I would do such a wrong
    For the whole world.
I do not think there is any such woman.
But I do think it is their husbands' faults
    If wives do fall; say that they slack their duties
    And pour our treasures into foreign laps,
    Or else break out in peevish jealousies,
    Throwing restraint upon us, or say they strike us,
    Or scant our former having in despite,
    Why, we have galls, and though we have some grace,
    Yet have we some revenge.
I think it is.
I think it doth.
SCENE I.
Quick, quick; fear nothing; I'll be at thy elbow.
Be near at hand; I may miscarry in't.
I have no great devotion to the deed;
    And yet he hath given me satisfying reasons.
I have rubb'd this young quat almost to the sense,
    And he grows angry.
Live Roderigo,
    He calls me to a restitution large
    Of gold and jewels that I bobb'd from him,  
    As gifts to Desdemona;
    It must not be.
If Cassio do remain,
    He hath a daily beauty in his life
    That makes me ugly; and besides, the Moor
    May unfold me to him; there stand I in much peril.
I hear him coming.
I know his gait; 'tis he.
That thrust had been mine enemy indeed,
    But that my coat is better than thou know'st;
    I will make proof of thine.
O, I am slain!
I am maim'd forever.
O, villain that I am!
Strumpet, I come!
Then shall I bleed to death.
This is Othello's ancient, as I take it.
O, I am spoil'd, undone by villains!
I think that one of them is hereabout,
    And cannot make away.
I cry you mercy.
Light, gentlemen; I'll bind it with my shirt.
I am sorry to find you thus; I have been to seek you.
Gentlemen all, I do suspect this trash
    To be a party in this injury.
I cry you gentle pardon;
    These bloody accidents must excuse my manners,
    That so neglected you.
I am glad to see you.
Some good man bear him carefully from hence;
    I'll fetch the general's surgeon.
None in the world; nor do I know the man.
Behold her well; I pray you, look upon her.
He supp'd at my house; but I therefore shake not.
I charge you, go with me.
I am no strumpet, but of life as honest
    As you that thus abuse me.
As I!
Yet I'll not shed her blood,
    Nor scar that whiter skin of hers than snow
    And smooth as monumental alabaster.
If I quench thee, thou flaming minister,
    I can again thy former light restore,
    Should I repent me; but once put out thy light,
    Thou cunning'st pattern of excelling nature,
    I know not where is that Promethean heat
    That can thy light relume.
When I have pluck'd the rose,
    I cannot give it vital growth again,
    It must needs wither; I'll smell it on the tree.
One more, one more;  
    Be thus when thou art dead, and I will kill thee,
    And love thee after.
I must weep,
    But they are cruel tears; this sorrow's heavenly,
    It strikes where it doth love.
Well, do it, and be brief; I will walk by.
I would not kill thy unprepared spirit.
I would not kill thy soul.
Ay, I do.
If you say so, I hope you will not kill me.
And yet I fear you, for you are fatal then
    When your eyes roll so.
Why I should fear I know not,
    Since guiltiness I know not; but yet I feel I fear.
They are loves I bear to you.
These are portents; but yet I hope, I hope,
    They do not point on me.
I will so.
That handkerchief which I so loved and gave thee
    Thou gavest to Cassio.
Yes, presently:
    Therefore confess thee freely of thy sin,
    For to deny each article with oath
    Cannot remove nor choke the strong conception
    That I do groan withal.
I say, amen.
I never did
    Offend you in my life; never loved Cassio
    But with such general warranty of heaven
    As I might love.
I never gave him token.
By heaven, I saw my handkerchief in 's hand.
Thou dost stone my heart,
    And makest me call what I intend to do
    A murther, which I thought a sacrifice.
I saw the handkerchief.
He found it then;  
    I never gave it him.
Alas, he is betray'd, and I undone!
But while I say one prayer!
I that am cruel am yet merciful;
    I would not have thee linger in thy pain.
] O, good my lord, I would speak a word with you!
I think she stirs again.
I have no wife.
] I do beseech you
    That I may speak with you, O, good my lord!
I had forgot thee.
A guiltless death I die.
Nobody; I myself.
You heard her say herself, it was not I.
She said so; I must needs report the truth.
She's like a liar gone to burning hell;
    'Twas I that kill'd her.
O, I were damn'd beneath all depth in hell,
    But that I did proceed upon just grounds
    To this extremity.
Nay, had she been true,
    If heaven would make me such another world
    Of one entire and perfect chrysolite,
    I'ld not have sold her for it.
I say thy husband.
He, woman;
    I say thy husband.
Thou hast not half that power to do me harm
    As I have to be hurt.
Thou hast done a deed-  
    I care not for thy sword; I'll make thee known,
    Though I lost twenty lives.
He says thou told'st him that his wife was false;
    I know thou didst not, thou'rt not such a villain.
I told him what I thought, and told no more
    Than what he found himself was apt and true.
I did.
I will not charm my tongue; I am bound to speak.
I think upon't, I think, I smell't, O villainy!
I thought so then.
I'll kill myself for grief.
I charge you, get you home.
Good gentlemen, let me have leave to speak;
    'Tis proper I obey him, but not now.
Perchance, Iago, I will ne'er go home.
I scarce did know you, uncle; there lies your niece,
    Whose breath indeed these hands have newly stopp'd.
I know this act shows horrible and grim.
I am glad thy father's dead.
Cassio confess'd it,
    And she did gratify his amorous works
    With that recognizance and pledge of love
    Which I first gave her.
I saw it in his hand,
    It was a handkerchief, an antique token
    My father gave my mother.
I peace?
No, I will speak as liberal as the north;
    Let heaven and men and devils, let them all,
    All, all, cry shame against me, yet I'll speak.
I will not.
That handkerchief thou speak'st of
    I found by fortune and did give my husband,
    For often with a solemn earnestness,
    More than indeed belong'd to such a trifle,
    He begg'd of me to steal it.
No, alas, I found it,
    And I did give't my husband.
By heaven, I do not, I do not, gentlemen.
Take you this weapon,
    Which I have here recover'd from the Moor.
I'll after that same villain,
    For 'tis a damned slave.
I am not valiant neither,
    But every puny whipster gets my sword.
I will play the swan,  
    And die in music.
"
    Moor, she was chaste; she loved thee, cruel Moor;
    So come my soul to bliss, as I speak true;
    So speaking as I think, I die, I die.
I have another weapon in this chamber;
    It is a sword of Spain, the ice-brook's temper-
    O, here it is.
Uncle, I must come forth.
Look in upon me then, and speak with me,
    Or, naked as I am, I will assault thee.
Behold, I have a weapon;
    A better never did itself sustain
    Upon a soldier's thigh.
I have seen the day
    That with this little arm and this good sword
    I have made my way through more impediments  
    Than twenty times your stop.
Here I am.
I look down towards his feet; but that's a fable.
If that thou be'st a devil, I cannot kill thee.
I bleed, sir, but not kill'd.
I am not sorry neither.
I'ld have thee live,
    For, in my sense, 'tis happiness to die.
Why, anything;
    An honorable murtherer, if you will,
    For nought did I in hate, but all in honor.
Dear general, I never gave you cause.
I do believe it, and I ask your pardon.
Will you, I pray, demand that demi-devil
    Why he hath thus ensnared my soul and body?
From this time forth I never will speak word.
Sir, you shall understand what hath befall'n,
    Which, as I think, you know not.
I found it in my chamber;
    And he himself confess'd but even now
    That there he dropp'd it for a special purpose
    Which wrought to his desire.
There is besides in Roderigo's letter,
    How he upbraids Iago, that he made him
    Brave me upon the watch, whereon it came
    That I was cast.
I have done the state some service, and they know't.
I pray you, in your letters,
    When you shall these unlucky deeds relate,
    Speak of me as I am; nothing extenuate,
    Nor set down aught in malice.
Set you down this;
    And say besides, that in Aleppo once,  
    Where a malignant and a turban'd Turk
    Beat a Venetian and traduced the state,
    I took by the throat the circumcised dog
    And smote him, thus.
I kiss'd thee ere I kill'd thee.
This did I fear, but thought he had no weapon;
    For he was great of heart.
>>



SCENE:
England and Wales


ACT I.
SCENE I.
I have, my liege.
As near as I could sift him on that argument,
    On some apparent danger seen in him
    Aim'd at your Highness-no inveterate malice.
In the devotion of a subject's love,
    Tend'ring the precious safety of my prince,
    And free from other misbegotten hate,  
    Come I appellant to this princely presence.
Now, Thomas Mowbray, do I turn to thee,
    And mark my greeting well; for what I speak
    My body shall make good upon this earth,
    Or my divine soul answer it in heaven-
    Thou art a traitor and a miscreant,
    Too good to be so, and too bad to live,
    Since the more fair and crystal is the sky,
    The uglier seem the clouds that in it fly.
Once more, the more to aggravate the note,
    With a foul traitor's name stuff I thy throat;
    And wish-so please my sovereign-ere I move,
    What my tongue speaks, my right drawn sword may prove.
Yet can I not of such tame patience boast
    As to be hush'd and nought at an to say.
Setting aside his high blood's royalty,
    And let him be no kinsman to my liege,
    I do defy him, and I spit at him,
    Call him a slanderous coward and a villain;
    Which to maintain, I would allow him odds
    And meet him, were I tied to run afoot
    Even to the frozen ridges of the Alps,
    Or any other ground inhabitable
    Where ever Englishman durst set his foot.
Pale trembling coward, there I throw my gage,
    Disclaiming here the kindred of the King;
    And lay aside my high blood's royalty,
    Which fear, not reverence, makes thee to except.
By that and all the rites of knighthood else
    Will I make good against thee, arm to arm,
    What I have spoke or thou canst worst devise.
I take it up; and by that sword I swear
    Which gently laid my knighthood on my shoulder
    I'll answer thee in any fair degree
    Or chivalrous design of knightly trial;
    And when I mount, alive may I not light
    If I be traitor or unjustly fight!
Look what I speak, my life shall prove it true-
    That Mowbray hath receiv'd eight thousand nobles
    In name of lendings for your Highness' soldiers,
    The which he hath detain'd for lewd employments
    Like a false traitor and injurious villain.
Besides, I say and will in battle prove-
    Or here, or elsewhere to the furthest verge  
    That ever was survey'd by English eye-
    That all the treasons for these eighteen years
    Complotted and contrived in this land
    Fetch from false Mowbray their first head and spring.
Further I say, and further will maintain
    Upon his bad life to make all this good,
    That he did plot the Duke of Gloucester's death,
    Suggest his soon-believing adversaries,
    And consequently, like a traitor coward,
    Sluic'd out his innocent soul through streams of blood;
    Which blood, like sacrificing Abel's, cries,
    Even from the tongueless caverns of the earth,
    To me for justice and rough chastisement;
    And, by the glorious worth of my descent,
    This arm shall do it, or this life be spent.
O, let my sovereign turn away his face
    And bid his ears a little while be deaf,
    Till I have told this slander of his blood  
    How God and good men hate so foul a liar.
Were he my brother, nay, my kingdom's heir,
    As he is but my father's brother's son,
    Now by my sceptre's awe I make a vow,
    Such neighbour nearness to our sacred blood
    Should nothing privilege him nor partialize
    The unstooping firmness of my upright soul.
He is our subject, Mowbray; so art thou:
    Free speech and fearless I to thee allow.
Three parts of that receipt I had for Calais
    Disburs'd I duly to his Highness' soldiers;
    The other part reserv'd I by consent,
    For that my sovereign liege was in my debt
    Upon remainder of a dear account
    Since last I went to France to fetch his queen:
    Now swallow down that lie.
For Gloucester's death-
    I slew him not, but to my own disgrace  
    Neglected my sworn duty in that case.
For you, my noble Lord of Lancaster,
    The honourable father to my foe,
    Once did I lay an ambush for your life,
    A trespass that doth vex my grieved soul;
    But ere I last receiv'd the sacrament
    I did confess it, and exactly begg'd
    Your Grace's pardon; and I hope I had it.
As for the rest appeal'd,
    It issues from the rancour of a villain,
    A recreant and most degenerate traitor;
    Which in myself I boldly will defend,
    And interchangeably hurl down my gage
    Upon this overweening traitor's foot
    To prove myself a loyal gentleman
    Even in the best blood chamber'd in his bosom.
In haste whereof, most heartily I pray
    Your Highness to assign our trial day.
Obedience bids I should not bid again.
Myself I throw, dread sovereign, at thy foot;
    My life thou shalt command, but not my shame:
    The one my duty owes; but my fair name,
    Despite of death, that lives upon my grave
    To dark dishonour's use thou shalt not have.
I am disgrac'd, impeach'd, and baffl'd here;
    Pierc'd to the soul with slander's venom'd spear,  
    The which no balm can cure but his heart-blood
    Which breath'd this poison.
Take but my shame,
    And I resign my gage.
Mine honour is my life; both grow in one;
    Take honour from me, and my life is done:
    Then, dear my liege, mine honour let me try;
    In that I live, and for that will I die.
Shall I seem crest-fallen in my father's sight?
Alas, the part I had in Woodstock's blood
    Doth more solicit me than your exclaims
    To stir against the butchers of his life!
What shall I say?
God's is the quarrel; for God's substitute,  
    His deputy anointed in His sight,
    Hath caus'd his death; the which if wrongfully,
    Let heaven revenge; for I may never lift
    An angry arm against His minister.
Where then, alas, may I complain myself?
Why then, I will.
Sister, farewell; I must to Coventry.
I take my leave before I have begun,
    For sorrow ends not when it seemeth done.
Lo, this is all- nay, yet depart not so;
    Though this be all, do not so quickly go;
    I shall remember more.
Desolate, desolate, will I hence and die;
    The last leave of thee takes my weeping eye.
And as I truly fight, defend me heaven!
Harry of Hereford, Lancaster, and Derby,
    Am I; who ready here do stand in arms
    To prove, by God's grace and my body's valour,
    In lists on Thomas Mowbray, Duke of Norfolk,
    That he is a traitor, foul and dangerous,
    To God of heaven, King Richard, and to me.
And as I truly fight, defend me heaven!
O, let no noble eye profane a tear
    For me, if I be gor'd with Mowbray's spear.
As confident as is the falcon's flight
    Against a bird, do I with Mowbray fight.
My loving lord, I take my leave of you;
    Of you, my noble cousin, Lord Aumerle;
    Not sick, although I have to do with death,
    But lusty, young, and cheerly drawing breath.
Lo, as at English feasts, so I regreet  
    The daintiest last, to make the end most sweet.
As gentle and as jocund as to jest
    Go I to fight: truth hath a quiet breast.
Farewell, my lord, securely I espy
    Virtue with valour couched in thine eye.
Strong as a tower in hope, I cry amen.
Norfolk, for thee remains a heavier doom,
    Which I with some unwillingness pronounce:
    The sly slow hours shall not determinate
    The dateless limit of thy dear exile;
    The hopeless word of 'never to return'
    Breathe I against thee, upon pain of life.
A dearer merit, not so deep a maim
    As to be cast forth in the common air,
    Have I deserved at your Highness' hands.
The language I have learnt these forty years,
    My native English, now I must forgo;
    And now my tongue's use is to me no more
    Than an unstringed viol or a harp;  
    Or like a cunning instrument cas'd up
    Or, being open, put into his hands
    That knows no touch to tune the harmony.
I am too old to fawn upon a nurse,
    Too far in years to be a pupil now.
Then thus I turn me from my countrv's light,
    To dwell in solemn shades of endless night.
I swear.
And I, to keep all this.
No, Bolingbroke; if ever I were traitor,
    My name be blotted from the book of life,  
    And I from heaven banish'd as from hence!
But what thou art, God, thou, and I, do know;
    And all too soon, I fear, the King shall rue.
Now no way can I stray:
    Save back to England, an the world's my way.
Uncle, even in the glasses of thine eyes
    I see thy grieved heart.
I thank my liege that in regard of me
    He shortens four years of my son's exile;
    But little vantage shall I reap thereby,
    For ere the six years that he hath to spend
    Can change their moons and bring their times about,
    My oil-dried lamp and time-bewasted light
    Shall be extinct with age and endless night;  
    My inch of taper will be burnt and done,
    And blindfold death not let me see my son.
You urg'd me as a judge; but I had rather
    You would have bid me argue like a father.
O, had it been a stranger, not my child,
    To smooth his fault I should have been more mild.
A partial slander sought I to avoid,
    And in the sentence my own life destroy'd.
Alas, I look'd when some of you should say
    I was too strict to make mine own away;
    But you gave leave to my unwilling tongue
    Against my will to do myself this wrong.
My lord, no leave take I, for I will ride
    As far as land will let me by your side.
I have too few to take my leave of you,
    When the tongue's office should be prodigal
    To breathe the abundant dolour of the heart.
My heart will sigh when I miscall it so,
    Which finds it an enforced pilgrimage.
Nay, rather, every tedious stride I make
    Will but remember me what a deal of world
    I wander from the jewels that I love.
Must I not serve a long apprenticehood
    To foreign passages; and in the end,
    Having my freedom, boast of nothing else
    But that I was a journeyman to grief?
Go, say I sent thee forth to purchase honour,
    And not the King exil'd thee; or suppose
    Devouring pestilence hangs in our air
    And thou art flying to a fresher clime.
Come, come, my son, I'll bring thee on thy way.
Had I thy youtli and cause, I would not stay.
Where'er I wander, boast of this I can:
    Though banish'd, yet a trueborn English man.
I brought high Hereford, if you call him so,
    But to the next high way, and there I left him.
SCENE I.
Will the King come, that I may breathe my last
    In wholesome counsel to his unstaid youth?
Methinks I am a prophet new inspir'd,
    And thus expiring do foretell of him:
    His rash fierce blaze of riot cannot last,
    For violent fires soon burn out themselves;
    Small showers last long, but sudden storms are short;
    He tires betimes that spurs too fast betimes;
    With eager feeding food doth choke the feeder;  
    Light vanity, insatiate cormorant,
    Consuming means, soon preys upon itself.
This royal throne of kings, this scept'red isle,
    This earth of majesty, this seat of Mars,
    This other Eden, demi-paradise,
    This fortress built by Nature for herself
    Against infection and the hand of war,
    This happy breed of men, this little world,
    This precious stone set in the silver sea,
    Which serves it in the office of a wall,
    Or as a moat defensive to a house,
    Against the envy of less happier lands;
    This blessed plot, this earth, this realm, this England,
    This nurse, this teeming womb of royal kings,
    Fear'd by their breed, and famous by their birth,
    Renowned for their deeds as far from home,
    For Christian service and true chivalry,
    As is the sepulchre in stubborn Jewry
    Of the world's ransom, blessed Mary's Son;
    This land of such dear souls, this dear dear land,  
    Dear for her reputation through the world,
    Is now leas'd out-I die pronouncing it-
    Like to a tenement or pelting farm.
For sleeping England long time have I watch'd;
    Watching breeds leanness, leanness is an gaunt.
The pleasure that some fathers feed upon
    Is my strict fast-I mean my children's looks;
    And therein fasting, hast thou made me gaunt.
Gaunt am I for the grave, gaunt as a grave,
    Whose hollow womb inherits nought but bones.
No, misery makes sport to mock itself:
    Since thou dost seek to kill my name in me,
    I mock my name, great king, to flatter thee.
thou diest, though I the sicker be.
I am in health, I breathe, and see thee ill.
Now He that made me knows I see thee ill;  
    Ill in myself to see, and in thee seeing ill.
O, Spare me not, my brother Edward's son,
    For that I was his father Edward's son;
    That blood already, like the pelican,
    Hast thou tapp'd out, and drunkenly carous'd.
Join with the present sickness that I have;  
    And thy unkindness be like crooked age,
    To crop at once a too long withered flower.
I do beseech your Majesty impute his words
    To wayward sickliness and age in him.
How long shall I be patient?
I am the last of noble Edward's sons,
    Of whom thy father, Prince of Wales, was first.
O my liege,  
    Pardon me, if you please; if not, I, pleas'd
    Not to be pardoned, am content withal.
Now, afore God-God forbid I say true!
I'll not be by the while.
To-morrow next
    We will for Ireland; and 'tis time, I trow.
No good at all that I can do for him;
    Unless you call it good to pity him,
    Bereft and gelded of his patrimony.
And daily new exactions are devis'd,
    As blanks, benevolences, and I wot not what;
    But what, a God's name, doth become of this?
Not so; even through the hollow eyes of death
    I spy life peering; but I dare not say
    How near the tidings of our comfort is.
Then thus: I have from Le Port Blanc, a bay
    In Brittany, receiv'd intelligence
    That Harry Duke of Hereford, Rainold Lord Cobham,
    That late broke from the Duke of Exeter,
    His brother, Archbishop late of Canterbury,
    Sir Thomas Erpingham, Sir John Ramston,
    Sir John Norbery, Sir Robert Waterton, and Francis Quoint-
    All these, well furnish'd by the Duke of Britaine,  
    With eight tall ships, three thousand men of war,
    Are making hither with all due expedience,
    And shortly mean to touch our northern shore.
Hold out my horse, and I will first be there.
To please the King, I did; to please myself
    I cannot do it; yet I know no cause
    Why I should welcome such a guest as grief,
    Save bidding farewell to so sweet a guest
    As my sweet Richard.
Howe'er it be,
    I cannot but be sad; so heavy sad
    As-though, on thinking, on no thought I think-
    Makes me with heavy nothing faint and shrink.
'Tis nothing less: conceit is still deriv'd
    From some forefather grief; mine is not so,
    For nothing hath begot my something grief,
    Or something hath the nothing that I grieve;  
    'Tis in reversion that I do possess-
    But what it is that is not yet known what,
    I cannot name; 'tis nameless woe, I wot.
I hope the King is not yet shipp'd for Ireland.
Now hath my soul brought forth her prodigy;
    And I, a gasping new-deliver'd mother,
    Have woe to woe, sorrow to sorrow join'd.
I will despair, and be at enmity
    With cozening hope-he is a flatterer,
    A parasite, a keeper-back of death,
    Who gently would dissolve the bands of life,
    Which false hope lingers in extremity.
Should I do so, I should belie my thoughts.
Here am I left to underprop his land,
    Who, weak with age, cannot support myself.
My lord, your son was gone before I came.
The nobles they are fled, the commons they are cold
    And will, I fear, revolt on Hereford's side.
My lord, I had forgot to tell your lordship,
    To-day, as I came by, I called there-
    But I shall grieve you to report the rest.
An hour before I came, the Duchess died.
I know not what to do.
I would to God,
    So my untruth had not provok'd him to it,
    The King had cut off my head with my brother's.
Come, sister-cousin, I would say-pray, pardon me.
If I know how or which way to order these affairs
    Thus disorderly thrust into my hands,
    Never believe me.
-Come, cousin,
    I'll dispose of you.
I should to Plashy too,
    But time will not permit.
Well, I will for refuge straight to Bristow Castle.
Thither will I with you; for little office
    Will the hateful commons perform for us,
    Except Eke curs to tear us all to pieces.
No; I will to Ireland to his Majesty.
I fear me, never.
Believe me, noble lord,
    I am a stranger here in Gloucestershire.
But I bethink me what a weary way
    From Ravenspurgh to Cotswold will be found
    In Ross and Willoughby, wanting your company,
    Which, I protest, hath very much beguil'd
    The tediousness and process of my travel.
But theirs is sweet'ned with the hope to have
    The present benefit which I possess;
    And hope to joy is little less in joy
    Than hope enjoy'd.
By this the weary lords
    Shall make their way seem short, as mine hath done  
    By sight of what I have, your noble company.
I had thought, my lord, to have learn'd his health of you.
No, my good lord; for that is not forgot
    Which ne'er I did remember; to my knowledge,
    I never in my life did look on him.
My gracious lord, I tender you my service,
    Such as it is, being tender, raw, and young;
    Which elder days shall ripen, and confirm
    To more approved service and desert.
I thank thee, gentle Percy; and be sure
    I count myself in nothing else so happy
    As in a soul rememb'ring my good friends;
    And as my fortune ripens with thy love,
    It shall be still thy true love's recompense.
There stands the castle, by yon tuft of trees,  
    Mann'd with three hundred men, as I have heard;
    And in it are the Lords of York, Berkeley, and Seymour-
    None else of name and noble estimate.
I wot your love pursues
    A banish'd traitor.
It is my Lord of Berkeley, as I guess.
My lord, my answer is-'to Lancaster';
    And I am come to seek that name in England;
    And I must find that title in your tongue
    Before I make reply to aught you say.
To you, my lord, I come-what lord you will-
    From the most gracious regent of this land,
    The Duke of York, to know what pricks you on
    To take advantage of the absent time,
    And fright our native peace with self-borne arms.
I shall not need transport my words by you;
    Here comes his Grace in person.
I am no traitor's uncle; and that word 'grace'
    In an ungracious mouth is but profane.
Were I but now lord of such hot youth
    As when brave Gaunt, thy father, and myself
    Rescued the Black Prince, that young Mars of men,
    From forth the ranks of many thousand French,
    O, then how quickly should this arm of mine,  
    Now prisoner to the palsy, chastise the
    And minister correction to thy fault!
As I was banish'd, I was banish'd Hereford;
    But as I come, I come for Lancaster.
And, noble uncle, I beseech your Grace
    Look on my wrongs with an indifferent eye.
You are my father, for methinks in you
    I see old Gaunt alive.
O, then, my father,
    Will you permit that I shall stand condemn'd
    A wandering vagabond; my rights and royalties
    Pluck'd from my arms perforce, and given away
    To upstart unthrifts?
Wherefore was I born?
If that my cousin king be King in England,  
    It must be granted I am Duke of Lancaster.
I am denied to sue my livery here,
    And yet my letters patents give me leave.
I am a subject,
    And I challenge law-attorneys are denied me;
    And therefore personally I lay my claim
    To my inheritance of free descent.
My lords of England, let me tell you this:
    I have had feeling of my cousin's wrongs,
    And labour'd all I could to do him right;
    But in this kind to come, in braving arms,  
    Be his own carver and cut out his way,
    To find out right with wrong-it may not be;
    And you that do abet him in this kind
    Cherish rebellion, and are rebels all.
Well, well, I see the issue of these arms.
I cannot mend it, I must needs confess,
    Because my power is weak and all ill left;
    But if I could, by Him that gave me life,
    I would attach you all and make you stoop
    Unto the sovereign mercy of the King;
    But since I cannot, be it known unto you
    I do remain as neuter.
But we must win your Grace to go with us  
    To Bristow Castle, which they say is held
    By Bushy, Bagot, and their complices,
    The caterpillars of the commonwealth,
    Which I have sworn to weed and pluck away.
It may be I will go with you; but yet I'll pause,
    For I am loath to break our country's laws.
Ah, Richard, with the eyes of heavy mind,
    I see thy glory like a shooting star
    Fall to the base earth from the firmament!
SCENE I.
Bushy and Green, I will not vex your souls-
    Since presently your souls must part your bodies-
    With too much urging your pernicious lives,
    For 'twere no charity; yet, to wash your blood
    From off my hands, here in the view of men
    I will unfold some causes of your deaths:
    You have misled a prince, a royal king,
    A happy gentleman in blood and lineaments,
    By you unhappied and disfigured clean;
    You have in manner with your sinful hours
    Made a divorce betwixt his queen and him;
    Broke the possession of a royal bed,
    And stain'd the beauty of a fair queen's cheeks
    With tears drawn from her eyes by your foul wrongs;
    Myself-a prince by fortune of my birth,  
    Near to the King in blood, and near in love
    Till you did make him misinterpret me-
    Have stoop'd my neck under your injuries
    And sigh'd my English breath in foreign clouds,
    Eating the bitter bread of banishment,
    Whilst you have fed upon my signories,
    Dispark'd my parks and fell'd my forest woods,
    From my own windows torn my household coat,
    Raz'd out my imprese, leaving me no sign
    Save men's opinions and my living blood
    To show the world I am a gentleman.
Tell her I send to her my kind commends;
    Take special care my greetings be delivered.
A gentleman of mine I have dispatch'd
    With letters of your love to her at large.
Needs must I like it well.
I weep for joy
    To stand upon my kingdom once again.
Dear earth, I do salute thee with my hand,
    Though rebels wound thee with their horses' hoofs.
As a long-parted mother with her child
    Plays fondly with her tears and smiles in meeting,
    So weeping-smiling greet I thee, my earth,
    And do thee favours with my royal hands.
Feed not thy sovereign's foe, my gentle earth,
    Nor with thy sweets comfort his ravenous sense;
    But let thy spiders, that suck up thy venom,
    And heavy-gaited toads, lie in their way,
    Doing annoyance to the treacherous feet  
    Which with usurping steps do trample thee;
    Yield stinging nettles to mine enemies;
    And when they from thy bosom pluck a flower,
    Guard it, I pray thee, with a lurking adder,
    Whose double tongue may with a mortal touch
    Throw death upon thy sovereign's enemies.
One day too late, I fear me, noble lord,
    Hath clouded all thy happy days on earth.
But now the blood of twenty thousand men
    Did triumph in my face, and they are fled;
    And, till so much blood thither come again,
    Have I not reason to look pale and dead?
I had forgot myself; am I not King?
I know my uncle York
    Hath power enough to serve our turn.
Glad am I that your Highness is so arm'd
    To bear the tidings of calamity.
White-beards have arm'd their thin and hairless scalps
    Against thy majesty; boys, with women's voices,
    Strive to speak big, and clap their female joints
    In stiff unwieldy arms against thy crown;
    Thy very beadsmen learn to bend their bows
    Of double-fatal yew against thy state;
    Yea, distaff-women manage rusty bills
    Against thy seat: both young and old rebel,
    And all goes worse than I have power to tell.
I warrant they have made peace with Bolingbroke.
Sweet love, I see, changing his property,
    Turns to the sourest and most deadly hate.
I live with bread like you, feel want,
    Taste grief, need friends: subjected thus,
    How can you say to me I am a king?
Proud Bolingbroke, I come
    To change blows with thee for our day of doom.
I play the torturer, by small and small
    To lengthen out the worst that must be spoken:
    Your uncle York is join'd with Bolingbroke;
    And all your northern castles yielded up,
    And all your southern gentlemen in arms
    Upon his party.
[To AUMERLE] Beshrew thee, cousin, which didst lead me forth
    Of that sweet way I was in to despair!
By heaven, I'll hate him everlastingly
    That bids me be of comfort any more.
Go to Flint Castle; there I'll pine away;  
    A king, woe's slave, shall kingly woe obey.
That power I have, discharge; and let them go
    To ear the land that hath some hope to grow,
    For I have none.
Your Grace mistakes; only to be brief,
    Left I his title out.
I know it, uncle; and oppose not myself
    Against their will.
Yes, my good lord,
    It doth contain a king; King Richard lies
    Within the limits of yon lime and stone;
    And with him are the Lord Aumerle, Lord Salisbury,
    Sir Stephen Scroop, besides a clergyman
    Of holy reverence; who, I cannot learn.
[To NORTHUMBERLAND] Noble lord,  
    Go to the rude ribs of that ancient castle;
    Through brazen trumpet send the breath of parley
    Into his ruin'd ears, and thus deliver:
    Henry Bolingbroke
    On both his knees doth kiss King Richard's hand,
    And sends allegiance and true faith of heart
    To his most royal person; hither come
    Even at his feet to lay my arms and power,
    Provided that my banishment repeal'd
    And lands restor'd again be freely granted;
    If not, I'll use the advantage of my power
    And lay the summer's dust with showers of blood
    Rain'd from the wounds of slaughtered Englishmen;
    The which how far off from the mind of Bolingbroke
    It is such crimson tempest should bedrench
    The fresh green lap of fair King Richard's land,
    My stooping duty tenderly shall show.
Be he the fire, I'll be the yielding water;
    The rage be his, whilst on the earth I rain
    My waters-on the earth, and not on him.
This swears he, as he is a prince, is just;
    And as I am a gentleman I credit him.
O that I were as great
    As is my grief, or lesser than my name!
Or that I could forget what I have been!
Or not remember what I must be now!
I'll give thee scope to beat,
    Since foes have scope to beat both thee and me.
I'll give my jewels for a set of beads,
    My gorgeous palace for a hermitage,
    My gay apparel for an almsman's gown,
    My figur'd goblets for a dish of wood,
    My sceptre for a palmer's walking staff,
    My subjects for a pair of carved saints,
    And my large kingdom for a little grave,
    A little little grave, an obscure grave-
    Or I'll be buried in the king's high way,
    Some way of common trade, where subjects' feet
    May hourly trample on their sovereign's head;
    For on my heart they tread now whilst I live,
    And buried once, why not upon my head?
Well, well, I see
    I talk but idly, and you laugh at me.
Down, down I come, like glist'ring Phaethon,
    Wanting the manage of unruly jades.
Up, cousin, up; your heart is up, I know,
    [Touching his own head] Thus high at least, although your
      knee be low.
My gracious lord, I come but for mine own.
Your own is yours, and I am yours, and all.
Cousin, I am too young to be your father,
    Though you are old enough to be my heir.
What you will have, I'll give, and willing too;
    For do we must what force will have us do.
Then I must not say no.
Of neither, girl;
    For if of joy, being altogether wanting,
    It doth remember me the more of sorrow;
    Or if of grief, being altogether had,
    It adds more sorrow to my want of joy;  
    For what I have I need not to repeat,
    And what I want it boots not to complain.
Madam, I'll sing.
I could weep, madam, would it do you good.
And I could sing, would weeping do me good,
    And never borrow any tear of thee.
You thus employ'd, I will go root away
    The noisome weeds which without profit suck
    The soil's fertility from wholesome flowers.
He that hath suffer'd this disorder'd spring
    Hath now himself met with the fall of leaf;
    The weeds which his broad-spreading leaves did shelter,  
    That seem'd in eating him to hold him up,
    Are pluck'd up root and all by Bolingbroke-
    I mean the Earl of Wiltshire, Bushy, Green.
O, I am press'd to death through want of speaking!
Pardon me, madam; little joy have
    To breathe this news; yet what I say is true.
Post you to London, and you will find it so;
    I speak no more than every one doth know.
Nimble mischance, that art so light of foot,
    Doth not thy embassage belong to me,
    And am I last that knows it?
O, thou thinkest
    To serve me last, that I may longest keep
    Thy sorrow in my breast.
What, was I born to this, that my sad look
    Should grace the triumph of great Bolingbroke?
Poor Queen, so that thy state might be no worse,
    I would my skill were subject to thy curse.
Here did she fall a tear; here in this place
    I'll set a bank of rue, sour herb of grace.
My Lord Aumerle, I know your daring tongue
    Scorns to unsay what once it hath deliver'd.
In that dead time when Gloucester's death was plotted
    I heard you say 'Is not my arm of length,
    That reacheth from the restful English Court
    As far as Calais, to mine uncle's head?
'
    Amongst much other talk that very time  
    I heard you say that you had rather refuse
    The offer of an hundred thousand crowns
    Than Bolingbroke's return to England;
    Adding withal, how blest this land would be
    In this your cousin's death.
Princes, and noble lords,
    What answer shall I make to this base man?
Shall I so much dishonour my fair stars
    On equal terms to give him chastisement?
Either I must, or have mine honour soil'd
    With the attainder of his slanderous lips.
I say thou liest,
    And will maintain what thou hast said is false
    In thy heart-blood, through being all too base
    To stain the temper of my knightly sword.
Excepting one, I would he were the best
    In all this presence that hath mov'd me so.
By that fair sun which shows me where thou stand'st,
    I heard thee say, and vauntingly thou spak'st it,
    That thou wert cause of noble Gloucester's death.
If thou deniest it twenty times, thou liest;
    And I will turn thy falsehood to thy heart,
    Where it was forged, with my rapier's point.
Now, by my soul, I would it were this hour.
Aumerle, thou liest; his honour is as true
    In this appeal as thou art an unjust;
    And that thou art so, there I throw my gage,
    To prove it on thee to the extremest point
    Of mortal breathing.
An if I do not, may my hands rot of
    And never brandish more revengeful steel
    Over the glittering helmet of my foe!
I task the earth to the like, forsworn Aumerle;
    And spur thee on with fun as many lies  
    As may be halloa'd in thy treacherous ear
    From sun to sun.
By heaven, I'll throw at all!
I have a thousand spirits in one breast
    To answer twenty thousand such as you.
My Lord Fitzwater, I do remember well
    The very time Aumerle and you did talk.
If I dare eat, or drink, or breathe, or live,
    I dare meet Surrey in a wilderness,
    And spit upon him whilst I say he lies,
    And lies, and lies.
As I intend to thrive in this new world,
    Aumerle is guilty of my true appeal.
Besides, I heard the banish'd Norfolk say
    That thou, Aumerle, didst send two of thy men
    To execute the noble Duke at Calais.
Here do I throw down this,
    If he may be repeal'd to try his honour.
As surely as I live, my lord.
Great Duke of Lancaster, I come to the
    From plume-pluck'd Richard, who with willing soul
    Adopts thee heir, and his high sceptre yields  
    To the possession of thy royal hand.
In God's name, I'll ascend the regal throne.
Worst in this royal presence may I speak,
    Yet best beseeming me to speak the truth.
I speak to subjects, and a subject speaks,
    Stirr'd up by God, thus boldly for his king.
I will be his conduct.
Alack, why am I sent for to a king,
    Before I have shook off the regal thoughts
    Wherewith I reign'd?
I hardly yet have learn'd  
    To insinuate, flatter, bow, and bend my knee.
Yet I well remember
    The favours of these men.
So Judas did to Christ; but he, in twelve,
    Found truth in all but one; I, in twelve thousand, none.
Am I both priest and clerk?
although I be not he;
    And yet, amen, if heaven do think him me.
To do what service am I sent for hither?
That bucket down and fun of tears am I,
    Drinking my griefs, whilst you mount up on high.
I thought you had been willing to resign.
My crown I am; but still my griefs are mine.
You may my glories and my state depose,
    But not my griefs; still am I king of those.
The cares I give I have, though given away;
    They tend the crown, yet still with me they stay.
Ay, no; no, ay; for I must nothing be;
    Therefore no no, for I resign to thee.
Now mark me how I will undo myself:
    I give this heavy weight from off my head,  
    And this unwieldy sceptre from my hand,
    The pride of kingly sway from out my heart;
    With mine own tears I wash away my balm,
    With mine own hands I give away my crown,
    With mine own tongue deny my sacred state,
    With mine own breath release all duteous oaths;
    All pomp and majesty I do forswear;
    My manors, rents, revenues, I forgo;
    My acts, decrees, and statutes, I deny.
Must I do so?
And must I ravel out
    My weav'd-up follies?
Mine eyes are full of tears; I cannot see.
Nay, if I turn mine eyes upon myself,
    I find myself a traitor with the rest;
    For I have given here my soul's consent
    T'undeck the pompous body of a king;
    Made glory base, and sovereignty a slave,
    Proud majesty a subject, state a peasant.
No lord of thine, thou haught insulting man,
    Nor no man's lord; I have no name, no tide-
    No, not that name was given me at the font-
    But 'tis usurp'd.
Alack the heavy day,
    That I have worn so many winters out,
    And know not now what name to call myself!
O that I were a mockery king of snow,
    Standing before the sun of Bolingbroke
    To melt myself away in water drops!
Good king, great king, and yet not greatly good,
    An if my word be sterling yet in England,
    Let it command a mirror hither straight,
    That it may show me what a face I have
    Since it is bankrupt of his majesty.
Fiend, thou torments me ere I come to hell.
I'll read enough,
    When I do see the very book indeed
    Where all my sins are writ, and that's myself.
Re-enter attendant with glass

    Give me that glass, and therein will I read.
There lies the substance; and I thank thee, king,
    For thy great bounty, that not only giv'st
    Me cause to wail, but teachest me the way
    How to lament the cause.
I'll beg one boon,
    And then be gone and trouble you no more.
Shall I obtain it?
I am greater than a king;
    For when I was a king, my flatterers
    Were then but subjects; being now a subject,
    I have a king here to my flatterer.
Being so great, I have no need to beg.
And shall I have?
Whither you will, so I were from your sights.
My lord,
    Before I freely speak my mind herein,
    You shall not only take the sacrament
    To bury mine intents, but also to effect
    Whatever I shall happen to devise.
I see your brows are full of discontent,
    Your hearts of sorrow, and your eyes of tears.
Come home with me to supper; I will lay
    A plot shall show us all a merry day.
Learn, good soul,
    To think our former state a happy dream;
    From which awak'd, the truth of what we are
    Shows us but this: I am sworn brother, sweet,
    To grim Necessity; and he and
    Will keep a league till death.
If aught but beasts,
    I had been still a happy king of men.
Think I am dead, and that even here thou takest,
    As from my death-bed, thy last living leave.
Part us, Northumberland; I towards the north,
    Where shivering cold and sickness pines the clime;
    My wife to France, from whence set forth in pomp,
    She came adorned hither like sweet May,
    Sent back like Hallowmas or short'st of day.
Weep thou for me in France, I for thee here;
    Better far off than near, be ne'er the near.
Go, count thy way with sighs; I mine with groans.
Twice for one step I'll groan, the way being short,  
    And piece the way out with a heavy heart.
One kiss shall stop our mouths, and dumbly part;
    Thus give I mine, and thus take I thy heart.
So, now I have mine own again, be gone.
That I may strive to kill it with a groan.
Where did I leave?
Then, as I said, the Duke, great Bolingbroke,
    Mounted upon a hot and fiery steed
    Which his aspiring rider seem'd to know,
    With slow but stately pace kept on his course,
    Whilst all tongues cried 'God save thee, Bolingbroke!
'
    Whilst he, from the one side to the other turning,
    Bareheaded, lower than his proud steed's neck,
    Bespake them thus, 'I thank you, countrymen.
To Bolingbroke are we sworn subjects now,
    Whose state and honour I for aye allow.
I am in Parliament pledge for his truth
    And lasting fealty to the new-made king.
Madam, I know not, nor I greatly care not.
God knows I had as lief be none as one.
For aught I know, my lord, they do.
You will be there, I know.
If God prevent not, I purpose so.
I will be satisfied; let me see the writing.
I do beseech your Grace to pardon me;
    It is a matter of small consequence
    Which for some reasons I would not have seen.
Which for some reasons, sir, I mean to see.
I fear, I fear-
  DUCHESS.
I do beseech you, pardon me; I may not show it.
I will be satisfied; let me see it, I say.
Give me my boots, I say; saddle my horse.
Exit servant
    Now, by mine honour, by my life, my troth,
    I will appeach the villain.
I will not peace.
I will unto the King.
Give me my boots, I say.
were he twenty times my son
    I would appeach him.
Hadst thou groan'd for him
    As I have done, thou wouldst be more pitiful.
But now I know thy mind: thou dost suspect
    That I have been disloyal to thy bed
    And that he is a bastard, not thy son.
He is as like thee as a man may be
    Not like to me, or any of my kin,
    And yet I love him.
I'll not be long behind; though I be old,
    I doubt not but to ride as fast as York;
    And never will I rise up from the ground  
    Till Bolingbroke have pardon'd thee.
'Tis full three months since I did see him last.
I would to God, my lords, he might be found.
My lord, some two days since I saw the Prince,
    And told him of those triumphs held at Oxford.
As dissolute as desperate; yet through both
    I see some sparks of better hope, which elder years
    May happily bring forth.
I do beseech your Majesty,
    To have some conference with your Grace alone.
For ever may my knees grow to the earth,
                                                    [Kneels]
    My tongue cleave to my roof within my mouth,
    Unless a pardon ere I rise or speak.
If on the first, how heinous e'er it be,
    To win thy after-love I pardon thee.
Then give me leave that I may turn the key,
    That no man enter till my tale be done.
[Drawing] Villain, I'll make thee safe.
Shall I, for love, speak treason to thy face?
Open the door, or I will break it open.
I do repent me; read not my name there;
    My heart is not confederate with my hand.
I tore it from the traitor's bosom, King;
    Fear, and not love, begets his penitence.
[Within] I What ho, my liege, for God's sake, let me in.
[Within] A woman, and thine aunt, great King; 'tis I.
I know she is come to pray for your foul sin.
Not yet, I thee beseech.
For ever will I walk upon my knees,
    And never see day that the happy sees
    Till thou give joy; until thou bid me joy
    By pardoning Rutland, my transgressing boy.
Unto my mother's prayers I bend my knee.
His weary joints would gladly rise, I know;
    Our knees still kneel till to the ground they grow.
'
    An if I were thy nurse, thy tongue to teach,
    'Pardon' should be the first word of thy speech.
I never long'd to hear a word till now;
    Say 'pardon,' King; let pity teach thee how.
I do not sue to stand;
    Pardon is all the suit I have in hand.
I pardon him, as God shall pardon me.
Yet am I sick for fear.
With all my heart
    I pardon him.
They shall not live within this world, I swear,
    But I will have them, if I once know where.
Come, my old son; I pray God make thee new.
'Have I no friend will rid me of this living fear?
'Have I no friend?
And, speaking it, he wishtly look'd on me,
    As who should say 'I would thou wert the man
    That would divorce this terror from my heart';
    Meaning the King at Pomfret.
I am the King's friend, and will rid his foe.
I have been studying how I may compare
    This prison where I live unto the world
    And, for because the world is populous
    And here is not a creature but myself,
    I cannot do it.
Yet I'll hammer it out.
My brain I'll prove the female to my soul,
    My soul the father; and these two beget
    A generation of still-breeding thoughts,
    And these same thoughts people this little world,
    In humours like the people of this world,
    For no thought is contented.
Thus play I in one person many people,
    And none contented.
Sometimes am I king;
    Then treasons make me wish myself a beggar,
    And so I am.
Then crushing penury
    Persuades me I was better when a king;
    Then am I king'd again; and by and by
    Think that I am unking'd by Bolingbroke,  
    And straight am nothing.
But whate'er I be,
    Nor I, nor any man that but man is,
    With nothing shall be pleas'd till he be eas'd
    With being nothing.
[The music plays]
    Music do I hear?
And here have I the daintiness of ear
    To check time broke in a disorder'd string;
    But, for the concord of my state and time,
    Had not an ear to hear my true time broke.
I wasted time, and now doth time waste me;
    For now hath time made me his numb'ring clock:
    My thoughts are minutes; and with sighs they jar
    Their watches on unto mine eyes, the outward watch,
    Whereto my finger, like a dial's point,
    Is pointing still, in cleansing them from tears.
So sighs, and tears, and groans,
    Show minutes, times, and hours; but my time
    Runs posting on in Bolingbroke's proud joy,
    While I stand fooling here, his Jack of the clock.
I was a poor groom of thy stable, King,  
    When thou wert king; who, travelling towards York,
    With much ado at length have gotten leave
    To look upon my sometimes royal master's face.
O, how it ern'd my heart, when I beheld,
    In London streets, that coronation-day,
    When Bolingbroke rode on roan Barbary-
    That horse that thou so often hast bestrid,
    That horse that I so carefully have dress'd!
Why do I rail on thee,
    Since thou, created to be aw'd by man,
    Wast born to bear?
I was not made a horse;  
    And yet I bear a burden like an ass,
    Spurr'd, gall'd, and tir'd, by jauncing Bolingbroke.
My lord, I dare not.
Patience is stale, and I am weary of it.
Both have I spill'd.
For now the devil, that told me I did well,
    Says that this deed is chronicled in hell.
This dead King to the living King I'll bear.
First, to thy sacred state wish I all happiness.
The next news is, I have to London sent
    The heads of Salisbury, Spencer, Blunt, and Kent.
My lord, I have from Oxford sent to London
    The heads of Brocas and Sir Bennet Seely;
    Two of the dangerous consorted traitors
    That sought at Oxford thy dire overthrow.
Thy pains, Fitzwater, shall not be forgot;
    Right noble is thy merit, well I wot.
Carlisle, this is your doom:
    Choose out some secret place, some reverend room,
    More than thou hast, and with it joy thy life;
    So as thou liv'st in peace, die free from strife;  
    For though mine enemy thou hast ever been,
    High sparks of honour in thee have I seen.
Great King, within this coffin I present
    Thy buried fear.
Exton, I thank thee not; for thou hast wrought
    A deed of slander with thy fatal hand
    Upon my head and all this famous land.
From your own mouth, my lord, did I this deed.
They love not poison that do poison need,
    Nor do I thee.
Though I did wish him dead,
    I hate the murderer, love him murdered.
Lords, I protest my soul is full of woe
    That blood should sprinkle me to make me grow.
Come, mourn with me for what I do lament,
    And put on sullen black incontinent.
I'll make a voyage to the Holy Land,
    To wash this blood off from my guilty hand.
>>



SCENE: England

King Richard the Third



ACT I.
But I-that am not shap'd for sportive tricks,
    Nor made to court an amorous looking-glass-
    I-that am rudely stamp'd, and want love's majesty
    To strut before a wanton ambling nymph-  
    I-that am curtail'd of this fair proportion,
    Cheated of feature by dissembling nature,
    Deform'd, unfinish'd, sent before my time
    Into this breathing world scarce half made up,
    And that so lamely and unfashionable
    That dogs bark at me as I halt by them-
    Why, I, in this weak piping time of peace,
    Have no delight to pass away the time,
    Unless to spy my shadow in the sun
    And descant on mine own deformity.
And therefore, since I cannot prove a lover
    To entertain these fair well-spoken days,
    I am determined to prove a villain
    And hate the idle pleasures of these days.
Plots have I laid, inductions dangerous,
    By drunken prophecies, libels, and dreams,
    To set my brother Clarence and the King
    In deadly hate the one against the other;
    And if King Edward be as true and just
    As I am subtle, false, and treacherous,  
    This day should Clarence closely be mew'd up-
    About a prophecy which says that G
    Of Edward's heirs the murderer shall be.
May I know?
Yea, Richard, when I know; for I protest  
    As yet I do not; but, as I can learn,
    He hearkens after prophecies and dreams,
    And from the cross-row plucks the letter G,
    And says a wizard told him that by G
    His issue disinherited should be;
    And, for my name of George begins with G,
    It follows in his thought that I am he.
These, as I learn, and such like toys as these
    Hath mov'd his Highness to commit me now.
By heaven, I think there is no man is secure
    But the Queen's kindred, and night-walking heralds  
    That trudge betwixt the King and Mistress Shore.
I'll tell you what-I think it is our way,
    If we will keep in favour with the King,
    To be her men and wear her livery:
    The jealous o'er-worn widow, and herself,
    Since that our brother dubb'd them gentlewomen,
    Are mighty gossips in our monarchy.
I beseech your Graces both to pardon me:
    His Majesty hath straitly given in charge
    That no man shall have private conference,
    Of what degree soever, with your brother.
I tell thee,
    fellow,
    He that doth naught with her, excepting one,
    Were best to do it secretly alone.
I do beseech your Grace to pardon me, and
    withal
    Forbear your conference with the noble Duke.
Brother, farewell; I will unto the King;
    And whatsoe'er you will employ me in-
    Were it to call King Edward's widow sister-  
    I will perform it to enfranchise you.
I know it pleaseth neither of us well.
Well, your imprisonment shall not be long;
    I will deliver or else lie for you.
I must perforce.
Simple, plain Clarence, I do love thee so
    That I will shortly send thy soul to heaven,
    If heaven will take the present at our hands.
With patience, noble lord, as prisoners must;
    But I shall live, my lord, to give them thanks
    That were the cause of my imprisonment.
Go you before, and I will follow you.
Exit HASTINGS
    He cannot live, I hope, and must not die
    Till George be pack'd with posthorse up to heaven.
I'll in to urge his hatred more to Clarence
    With lies well steel'd with weighty arguments;
    And, if I fail not in my deep intent,
    Clarence hath not another day to live;
    Which done, God take King Edward to his mercy,
    And leave the world for me to bustle in!
For then I'll marry Warwick's youngest daughter.
What though I kill'd her husband and her father?
The readiest way to make the wench amends
    Is to become her husband and her father;
    The which will I-not all so much for love
    As for another secret close intent
    By marrying her which I must reach unto.
But yet I run before my horse to market.
Clarence still breathes; Edward still lives and reigns;
    When they are gone, then must I count my gains.
Set down, set down your honourable load-
    If honour may be shrouded in a hearse;
    Whilst I awhile obsequiously lament
    Th' untimely fall of virtuous Lancaster.
Be it lawful that I invocate thy ghost
    To hear the lamentations of poor Anne,
    Wife to thy Edward, to thy slaughtered son,
    Stabb'd by the self-same hand that made these wounds.
Lo, in these windows that let forth thy life
    I pour the helpless balm of my poor eyes.
More direful hap betide that hated wretch
    That makes us wretched by the death of thee
    Than I can wish to adders, spiders, toads,
    Or any creeping venom'd thing that lives!
If ever he have wife, let her be made
    More miserable by the death of him
    Than I am made by my young lord and thee!
Come, now towards Chertsey with your holy load,
    Taken from Paul's to be interred there;
    And still as you are weary of this weight
    Rest you, whiles I lament King Henry's corse.
Villains, set down the corse; or, by Saint Paul,
    I'll make a corse of him that disobeys!
Stand thou, when I command.
Advance thy halberd higher than my breast,
    Or, by Saint Paul, I'll strike thee to my foot
    And spurn upon thee, beggar, for thy boldness.
Alas, I blame you not, for you are mortal,
    And mortal eyes cannot endure the devil.
But I know none, and therefore am no beast.
By such despair I should accuse myself.
Say that I slew them not?
I did not kill your husband.
I was provoked by her sland'rous tongue
    That laid their guilt upon my guiltless shoulders.
I grant ye.
So will it, madam, till I lie with you.
I hope so.
I know so.
Your beauty was the cause of that effect-
    Your beauty that did haunt me in my sleep  
    To undertake the death of all the world
    So I might live one hour in your sweet bosom.
If I thought that, I tell thee, homicide,
    These nails should rend that beauty from my cheeks.
These eyes could not endure that beauty's
    wreck;
    You should not blemish it if I stood by.
As all the world is cheered by the sun,
    So I by that; it is my day, my life.
I would I were, to be reveng'd on thee.
I would they were, that I might die at once;
    For now they kill me with a living death.
I never sued to friend nor enemy;
    My tongue could never learn sweet smoothing word;
    But, now thy beauty is propos'd my fee,
    My proud heart sues, and prompts my tongue to speak.
If thy revengeful heart cannot forgive,
    Lo here I lend thee this sharp-pointed sword;
    Which if thou please to hide in this true breast
    And let the soul forth that adoreth thee,  
    I lay it naked to the deadly stroke,
    And humbly beg the death upon my knee.
[He lays his breast open; she offers at it with his sword]
    Nay, do not pause; for I did kill King Henry-
    But 'twas thy beauty that provoked me.
Nay, now dispatch; 'twas I that stabb'd young Edward-
    But 'twas thy heavenly face that set me on.
Arise, dissembler; though I wish thy death,
    I will not be thy executioner.
Then bid me kill myself, and I will do it;
  ANNE.
I have already.
I would I knew thy heart.
I fear me both are false.
But shall I live in hope?
All men, I hope, live so.
That it may please you leave these sad designs
    To him that hath most cause to be a mourner,
    And presently repair to Crosby House;
    Where-after I have solemnly interr'd  
    At Chertsey monast'ry this noble king,
    And wet his grave with my repentant tears-
    I will with all expedient duty see you.
For divers unknown reasons, I beseech you,
    Grant me this boon.
'Tis more than you deserve;
    But since you teach me how to flatter you,
    Imagine I have said farewell already.
I'll have her; but I will not keep her long.
I that kill'd her husband and his father-
    To take her in her heart's extremest hate,
    With curses in her mouth, tears in her eyes,
    The bleeding witness of my hatred by;
    Having God, her conscience, and these bars against me,
    And I no friends to back my suit at all
    But the plain devil and dissembling looks,
    And yet to win her, all the world to nothing!
Hath she forgot already that brave prince,
    Edward, her lord, whom I, some three months since,
    Stabb'd in my angry mood at Tewksbury?
My dukedom to a beggarly denier,
    I do mistake my person all this while.
Upon my life, she finds, although I cannot,
    Myself to be a marv'llous proper man.
I'll be at charges for a looking-glass,
    And entertain a score or two of tailors
    To study fashions to adorn my body.
Since I am crept in favour with myself,
    I will maintain it with some little cost.
But first I'll turn yon fellow in his grave,
    And then return lamenting to my love.
Shine out, fair sun, till I have bought a glass,
    That I may see my shadow as I pass.
Yet, Derby, notwithstanding she's your wife
    And loves not me, be you, good lord, assur'd
    I hate not you for her proud arrogance.
I do beseech you, either not believe
    The envious slanders of her false accusers;
    Or, if she be accus'd on true report,
    Bear with her weakness, which I think proceeds
    From wayward sickness and no grounded malice.
But now the Duke of Buckingham and I
    Are come from visiting his Majesty.
I fear our happiness is at the height.
They do me wrong, and I will not endure it.
Who is it that complains unto the King
    That I, forsooth, am stern and love them not?
Because I cannot flatter and look fair,
    Smile in men's faces, smooth, deceive, and cog,
    Duck with French nods and apish courtesy,
    I must be held a rancorous enemy.
When have I injur'd thee?
I cannot tell; the world is grown so bad
    That wrens make prey where eagles dare not perch.
Meantime, God grants that I have need of you.
By Him that rais'd me to this careful
    height
    From that contented hap which I enjoy'd,
    I never did incense his Majesty
    Against the Duke of Clarence, but have been
    An earnest advocate to plead for him.
My Lord of Gloucester, I have too long
    borne
    Your blunt upbraidings and your bitter scoffs.
By heaven, I will acquaint his Majesty
    Of those gross taunts that oft I have endur'd.
I had rather be a country servant-maid
    Than a great queen with this condition-
    To be so baited, scorn'd, and stormed at.
Enter old QUEEN MARGARET, behind

    Small joy have I in being England's Queen.
And less'ned be that small, God, I
    beseech Him!
Look what I have said
    I will avouch't in presence of the King.
I dare adventure to be sent to th' Tow'r.
I do remember them to
    well:
    Thou kill'dst my husband Henry in the Tower,
    And Edward, my poor son, at Tewksbury.
Ere you were queen, ay, or your husband
    King,
    I was a pack-horse in his great affairs,
    A weeder-out of his proud adversaries,
    A liberal rewarder of his friends;
    To royalize his blood I spent mine own.
Let me put in your minds, if you forget,
    What you have been ere this, and what you are;
    Withal, what I have been, and what I am.
I would to God my heart were flint like Edward's,
    Or Edward's soft and pitiful like mine.
I am too childish-foolish for this world.
If I should be!
I had rather be a pedlar.
As little joy, my lord, as you suppose
    You should enjoy were you this country's king,
    As little joy you may suppose in me
    That I enjoy, being the Queen thereof.
As little joy enjoys the Queen thereof;
    For I am she, and altogether joyless.
I can no longer hold me patient.
If not that, I am Queen, you bow like subjects,
    Yet that, by you depos'd, you quake like rebels?
But repetition of what thou hast marr'd,
    That will I make before I let thee go.
I was; but I do find more pain in  
    banishment
    Than death can yield me here by my abode.
This sorrow that I have by right is yours;
    And all the pleasures you usurp are mine.
What, were you snarling all before I came,
    Ready to catch each other by the throat,
    And turn you all your hatred now on me?
Long mayest thou live to wail thy children's death,
    And see another, as I see thee now,
    Deck'd in thy rights, as thou art stall'd in mine!
God, I pray him,
    That none of you may live his natural age,
    But by some unlook'd accident cut off!
If heaven have any grievous plague in store
    Exceeding those that I can wish upon thee,
    O, let them keep it till thy sins be ripe,
    And then hurl down their indignation
    On thee, the troubler of the poor world's peace!
I call thee not.
I cry thee mercy then, for I did think
    That thou hadst call'd me all these bitter names.
Why, so I did, but look'd for no reply.
Ay, and much more; but I was born so high,
    Our aery buildeth in the cedar's top,
    And dallies with the wind, and scorns the sun.
O princely Buckingham, I'll kiss thy
    hand
    In sign of league and amity with thee.
I will not think but they ascend the sky
    And there awake God's gentle-sleeping peace.
Nothing that I respect, my gracious lord.
What, dost thou scorn me for my gentle
    counsel,
    And soothe the devil that I warn thee from?
I muse why she's at liberty.
I cannot blame her; by God's holy Mother,
    She hath had too much wrong; and I repent
    My part thereof that I have done to her.
I never did her any to my knowledge.
I was too hot to do somebody good
    That is too cold in thinking of it now.
So do I ever-  [Aside]  being well advis'd;
    For had I curs'd now, I had curs'd myself.
Catesby, I come.
I do the wrong, and first begin to brawl.
The secret mischiefs that I set abroach
    I lay unto the grievous charge of others.
Clarence, who I indeed have cast in darkness,
    I do beweep to many simple gulls;
    Namely, to Derby, Hastings, Buckingham;
    And tell them 'tis the Queen and her allies  
    That stir the King against the Duke my brother.
Now they believe it, and withal whet me
    To be reveng'd on Rivers, Dorset, Grey;
    But then I sigh and, with a piece of Scripture,
    Tell them that God bids us do good for evil.
And thus I clothe my naked villainy
    With odd old ends stol'n forth of holy writ,
    And seem a saint when most I play the devil.
Well thought upon; I have it here about me.
I like you, lads; about your business straight;
    Go, go, dispatch.
O, I have pass'd a miserable night,
    So full of fearful dreams, of ugly sights,
    That, as I am a Christian faithful man,
    I would not spend another such a night
    Though 'twere to buy a world of happy days-
    So full of dismal terror was the time!
I pray you
    tell me.
Methoughts that I had broken from the Tower
    And was embark'd to cross to Burgundy;
    And in my company my brother Gloucester,
    Who from my cabin tempted me to walk
    Upon the hatches.
Methoughts I saw a thousand fearful wrecks,
    A thousand men that fishes gnaw'd upon,
    Wedges of gold, great anchors, heaps of pearl,
    Inestimable stones, unvalued jewels,
    All scatt'red in the bottom of the sea;
    Some lay in dead men's skulls, and in the holes
    Where eyes did once inhabit there were crept,
    As 'twere in scorn of eyes, reflecting gems,
    That woo'd the slimy bottom of the deep
    And mock'd the dead bones that lay scatt'red by.
Methought I had; and often did I strive  
    To yield the ghost, but still the envious flood
    Stopp'd in my soul and would not let it forth
    To find the empty, vast, and wand'ring air;
    But smother'd it within my panting bulk,
    Who almost burst to belch it in the sea.
I pass'd, methought, the melancholy flood
    With that sour ferryman which poets write of,
    Unto the kingdom of perpetual night.
'
    With that, methoughts, a legion of foul fiends
    Environ'd me, and howled in mine ears
    Such hideous cries that, with the very noise,
    I trembling wak'd, and for a season after
    Could not believe but that I was in hell,
    Such terrible impression made my dream.
No marvel, lord, though it affrighted you;
    I am afraid, methinks, to hear you tell it.
Ah, Keeper, Keeper, I have done these things
    That now give evidence against my soul
    For Edward's sake, and see how he requites me!
KEEPER, I prithee sit by me awhile;
    My soul is heavy, and I fain would sleep.
I will, my lord.
I would speak with Clarence, and I came
    hither on my legs.
I am, in this, commanded to deliver
    The noble Duke of Clarence to your hands.
I will not reason what is meant hereby,
    Because I will be guiltless from the meaning.
I'll to the King and signify to him
    That thus I have resign'd to you my charge.
What, shall I stab him as he sleeps?
I thought thou hadst been resolute.
So I am, to let him live.
I'll back to the Duke of Gloucester and
    tell him so.
Nay, I prithee, stay a little.
I hope this
    passionate humour of mine will change; it was wont to
    hold me but while one tells twenty.
Zounds, he dies; I had forgot the reward.
I'll not meddle with it-it makes a man
    coward: a man cannot steal, but it accuseth him; a man
    cannot swear, but it checks him; a man cannot lie with his
    neighbour's wife, but it detects him.
'Tis a blushing shame-
    fac'd spirit that mutinies in a man's bosom; it fills a man
    full of obstacles: it made me once restore a purse of gold
    that-by chance I found.
I am strong-fram'd; he cannot prevail with
    me.
But not as I am, royal.
Wherein, my friends, have I offended you?
I shall be reconcil'd to him again.
Before I be convict by course of law,
    To threaten me with death is most unlawful.
I charge you, as you hope to have redemption
    By Christ's dear blood shed for our grievous sins,
    That you depart and lay no hands on me.
for whose sake did I that ill deed?
He sends you not to murder me for this,
    For in that sin he is as deep as I.
If you do love my brother, hate not me;
    I am his brother, and I love him well.
If you are hir'd for meed, go back again,
    And I will send you to my brother Gloucester,
    Who shall reward you better for my life
    Than Edward will for tidings of my death.
Which of you, if you were a prince's son,
    Being pent from liberty as I am now,
    If two such murderers as yourselves came to you,
    Would not entreat for life?
My friend, I spy some pity in thy looks;
    O, if thine eye be not a flatterer,
    Come thou on my side and entreat for me-
    As you would beg were you in my distress.
If all
    this will not do,
    I'll drown you in the malmsey-butt within.
How fain, like Pilate, would I wash my hands
    Of this most grievous murder!
I would he knew that I had sav'd his
    brother!
Take thou the fee, and tell him what I say;
    For I repent me that the Duke is slain.
So do not I.
Well, I'll go hide the body in some hole,
    Till that the Duke give order for his burial;
    And when I have my meed, I will away;
    For this will out, and then I must not stay.
Now have I done a good day's
    work.
I every day expect an embassage
    From my Redeemer to redeem me hence;
    And more at peace my soul shall part to heaven,
    Since I have made my friends at peace on earth.
By heaven, my soul is purg'd from grudging hate;
    And with my hand I seal my true heart's love.
So thrive I, as I truly swear the like!
So prosper I, as I swear perfect love!
And I, as I love Hastings with my heart!
There, Hastings; I will never more
    remember
    Our former hatred, so thrive I and mine!
This interchange of love, I here protest,
    Upon my part shall be inviolable.
And so swear I.
[To the QUEEN]  Whenever Buckingham
    doth turn his hate
    Upon your Grace, but with all duteous love
    Doth cherish you and yours, God punish me
    With hate in those where I expect most love!
When I have most need to employ a friend
    And most assured that he is a friend,
    Deep, hollow, treacherous, and full of guile,
    Be he unto me!
This do I beg of God
    When I am cold in love to you or yours.
Among this princely heap, if any here,
    By false intelligence or wrong surmise,
    Hold me a foe-
    If I unwittingly, or in my rage,
    Have aught committed that is hardly borne
    To any in this presence, I desire
    To reconcile me to his friendly peace:
    'Tis death to me to be at enmity;
    I hate it, and desire all good men's love.
First, madam, I entreat true peace of you,
    Which I will purchase with my duteous service;
    Of you, my noble cousin Buckingham,  
    If ever any grudge were lodg'd between us;
    Of you, and you, Lord Rivers, and of Dorset,
    That all without desert have frown'd on me;
    Of you, Lord Woodville, and, Lord Scales, of you;
    Dukes, earls, lords, gentlemen-indeed, of all.
I do not know that Englishman alive
    With whom my soul is any jot at odds
    More than the infant that is born to-night.
I thank my God for my humility.
I would to God all strifes were well compounded.
My sovereign lord, I do beseech your Highness
    To take our brother Clarence to your grace.
Why, madam, have I off'red love for this,
    To be so flouted in this royal presence?
Look I so pale, Lord Dorset, as the rest?
I prithee, peace; my soul is full of sorrow.
I Will not rise unless your Highness hear me.
Have I a tongue to doom my brother's death,
    And shall that tongue give pardon to a slave?
But when your carters or your waiting-vassals
    Have done a drunken slaughter and defac'd
    The precious image of our dear Redeemer,
    You straight are on your knees for pardon, pardon;
    And I, unjustly too, must grant it you.
[DERBY rises]
    But for my brother not a man would speak;
    Nor I, ungracious, speak unto myself
    For him, poor soul.
O God, I fear thy justice will take hold
    On me, and you, and mine, and yours, for this!
My pretty cousins, you mistake me both;
    I do lament the sickness of the King,
    As loath to lose him, not your father's death;
    It were lost sorrow to wail one that's lost.
God will revenge it; whom I will importune
    With earnest prayers all to that effect.
And so will I.
I cannot think it.
I'll join with black despair against my soul
    And to myself become an enemy.
Ah, so much interest have I in thy sorrow
    As I had title in thy noble husband!
I have bewept a worthy husband's death,
    And liv'd with looking on his images;  
    But now two mirrors of his princely semblance
    Are crack'd in pieces by malignant death,
    And I for comfort have but one false glass,
    That grieves me when I see my shame in him.
O, what cause have I-
    Thine being but a moiety of my moan-
    To overgo thy woes and drown thy cries?
Give me no help in lamentation;
    I am not barren to bring forth complaints.
All springs reduce their currents to mine eyes
    That I, being govern'd by the watery moon,
    May send forth plenteous tears to drown the world!
What stay had I but Edward?
What stays had I but they?
Alas, I am the mother of these griefs!
She for an Edward weeps, and so do I:
    I for a Clarence weep, so doth not she.
These babes for Clarence weep, and so do I:
    I for an Edward weep, so do not they.
I am your sorrow's nurse,
    And I will pamper it with lamentation.
Madam, my mother, I do cry you mercy;
    I did not see your Grace.
Humbly on my knee  
    I crave your blessing.
That is the butt end of a mother's blessing;
    I marvel that her Grace did leave it out.
I hope the King made peace with all of us;
    And the compact is firm and true in me.
And so in me; and so, I think, in an.
Yet, since it is but green, it should be put
    To no apparent likelihood of breach,
    Which haply by much company might be urg'd;
    Therefore I say with noble Buckingham
    That it is meet so few should fetch the Prince.
And so say I.
My lord, whoever journeys to the Prince,
    For God sake, let not us two stay at home;
    For by the way I'll sort occasion,
    As index to the story we late talk'd of,
    To part the Queen's proud kindred from the Prince.
My other self, my counsel's consistory,
    My oracle, my prophet, my dear cousin,
    I, as a child, will go by thy direction.
I promise you, I scarcely know myself.
I fear, I fear 'twill prove a giddy world.
All may be well; but, if God sort it so,
    'Tis more than we deserve or I expect.
And so was I; I'll bear you company.
Last night, I hear, they lay at Stony Stratford,
    And at Northampton they do rest to-night;
    To-morrow or next day they will be here.
I long with all my heart to see the Prince.
I hope he is much grown since last I saw him.
But I hear no; they say my son of York
    Has almost overta'en him in his growth.
Ay, mother; but I would not have it so.
Grandam, one night as we did sit at supper,
    My uncle Rivers talk'd how I did grow
    More than my brother.
'
    And since, methinks, I would not grow so fast,
    Because sweet flow'rs are slow and weeds make haste.
I hope he is; but yet let mothers doubt.
Now, by my troth, if I had been rememb'red,
    I could have given my uncle's Grace a flout
    To touch his growth nearer than he touch'd mine.
I prithee let me hear it.
'Twas full two years ere I could get a tooth.
I prithee, pretty York, who told thee this?
If 'twere not she, I cannot tell who told me.
The sum of all I can, I have disclos'd.
Ay me, I see the ruin of my house!
I see, as in a map, the end of all.
Stay, I will go with you.
For my part, I'll resign unto your Grace
    The seal I keep; and so betide to me
    As well I tender you and all of yours!
Go, I'll conduct you to the sanctuary.
I want more uncles here to welcome me.
I thank you, good my lord, and thank you all.
I thought my mother and my brother York
    Would long ere this have met us on the way.
On what occasion, God He knows, not I,
    The Queen your mother and your brother York
    Have taken sanctuary.
Not for all this land
    Would I be guilty of so deep a sin.
Oft have I heard of sanctuary men;
    But sanctuary children never till now.
I go, my lord.
If I may counsel you, some day or two
    Your Highness shall repose you at the Tower,
    Then where you please and shall be thought most fit
    For your best health and recreation.
I do not like the Tower, of any place.
I say, without characters, fame lives long.
[Aside]  Thus, like the formal vice, Iniquity,  
    I moralize two meanings in one word.
I'll tell you what, my cousin Buckingham-
  BUCKINGHAM.
An if I live until I be a man,
    I'll win our ancient right in France again,
    Or die a soldier as I liv'd a king.
Well, my dread lord; so must I can you now.
I thank you, gentle uncle.
O, my fair cousin, I must not say so.
Then he is more beholding to you than I.
I pray you, uncle, give me this dagger.
Of my kind uncle, that I know will give,
    And being but a toy, which is no grief to give.
A greater gift than that I'll give my cousin.
O, then, I see you will part but with light gifts:
    In weightier things you'll say a beggar nay.
I weigh it lightly, were it heavier.
I would, that I might thank you as you call me.
Uncle, my brother mocks both you and me;
    Because that I am little, like an ape,
    He thinks that you should bear me on your shoulders.
I shall not sleep in quiet at the Tower.
I fear no uncles dead.
Nor none that live, I hope.
An if they live, I hope I need not fear.
But come, my lord; and with a heavy heart,
    Thinking on them, go I unto the Tower.
My good lords both, with all the heed I can.
And, look when I am King, claim thou of me
    The earldom of Hereford and all the movables
    Whereof the King my brother was possess'd.
I'll claim that promise at your Grace's hand.
So it appears by that I have to say.
Go, fellow, go, return unto thy lord;
    Bid him not fear the separated council:
    His honour and myself are at the one,
    And at the other is my good friend Catesby;
    Where nothing can proceed that toucheth us
    Whereof I shall not have intelligence.
Tell him his fears are shallow, without instance;
    And for his dreams, I wonder he's so simple
    To trust the mock'ry of unquiet slumbers.
I'll go, my lord, and tell him what you say.
It is a reeling world indeed, my lord;
    And I believe will never stand upright
    Till Richard wear the garland of the realm.
I'll have this crown of mine cut from my
    shoulders
    Before I'll see the crown so foul misplac'd.
Indeed, I am no mourner for that news,
    Because they have been still my adversaries;
    But that I'll give my voice on Richard's side
    To bar my master's heirs in true descent,
    God knows I will not do it to the death.
But I shall laugh at this a twelve month hence,
    That they which brought me in my master's hate,
    I live to look upon their tragedy.
Well, Catesby, ere a fortnight make me older,
    I'll send some packing that yet think not on't.
And so falls it out
    With Rivers, Vaughan, Grey; and so 'twill do
    With some men else that think themselves as safe
    As thou and I, who, as thou knowest, are dear  
    To princely Richard and to Buckingham.
I know they do, and I have well deserv'd it.
You may jest on, but, by the holy rood,
    I do not like these several councils, I.
My lord, I hold my life as dear as yours,
    And never in my days, I do protest,
    Was it so precious to me as 'tis now.
Think you, but that I know our state secure,
    I would be so triumphant as I am?
This sudden stab of rancour I misdoubt;
    Pray God, I say, I prove a needless coward.
Go on before; I'll talk with this good fellow.
I tell thee, man, 'tis better with me now  
    Than when thou met'st me last where now we meet:
    Then was I going prisoner to the Tower
    By the suggestion of the Queen's allies;
    But now, I tell thee-keep it to thyself-
    This day those enernies are put to death,
    And I in better state than e'er I was.
I thank your honour.
Well met, my lord; I am glad to see your honour.
I thank thee, good Sir John, with all my heart.
I am in your debt for your last exercise;
    Come the next Sabbath, and I will content you.
I'll wait upon your lordship.
Good faith, and when I met this holy man,
    The men you talk of came into my mind.
I do, my lord, but long I cannot stay there;
    I shall return before your lordship thence.
Nay, like enough, for I stay dinner there.
I'll wait upon your lordship.
Now Margaret's curse is fall'n upon our heads,
    When she exclaim'd on Hastings, you, and I,  
    For standing by when Richard stabb'd her son.
To-morrow then I judge a happy day.
We know each other's faces; for our hearts,
    He knows no more of mine than I of yours;
    Or I of his, my lord, than you of mine.
I thank his Grace, I know he loves me well;
    But for his purpose in the coronation
    I have not sounded him, nor he deliver'd
    His gracious pleasure any way therein.
But you, my honourable lords, may name the time;
    And in the Duke's behalf I'll give my voice,
    Which, I presume, he'll take in gentle part.
I have been long a sleeper, but I trust
    My absence doth neglect no great design
    Which by my presence might have been concluded.
Had you not come upon your cue, my lord,
  WILLIAM Lord Hastings had pronounc'd your part-
    I mean, your voice for crowning of the King.
My lord of Ely, when I was last in Holborn
    I saw good strawberries in your garden there.
I do beseech you send for some of them.
Withdraw yourself awhile; I'll go with you.
To-morrow, in my judgment, is too sudden;
    For I myself am not so well provided
    As else I would be, were the day prolong'd.
I have sent for these strawberries.
I think there's never a man in Christendom
    Can lesser hide his love or hate than he;
    For by his face straight shall you know his heart.
I pray you all, tell me what they deserve
    That do conspire my death with devilish plots  
    Of damned witchcraft, and that have prevail'd
    Upon my body with their hellish charms?
The tender love I bear your Grace, my lord,
    Makes me most forward in this princely presence
    To doom th' offenders, whosoe'er they be.
I say, my lord, they have deserved death.
Look how I am bewitch'd; behold, mine arm
    Is like a blasted sapling wither'd up.
Now by Saint Paul I swear
    I will not dine until I see the same.
not a whit for me;
    For I, too fond, might have prevented this.
STANLEY did dream the boar did raze our helms,
    And I did scorn it and disdain to fly.
O, now I need the priest that spake to me!
I now repent I told the pursuivant,
    As too triumphing, how mine enemies
    To-day at Pomfret bloodily were butcher'd,
    And I myself secure in grace and favour.
I prophesy the fearfull'st time to thee
    That ever wretched age hath look'd upon.
Tut, I can counterfeit the deep tragedian;
    Speak and look back, and pry on every side,
    Tremble and start at wagging of a straw,
    Intending deep suspicion.
So dear I lov'd the man that I must weep.
I took him for the plainest harmless creature
    That breath'd upon the earth a Christian;
    Made him my book, wherein my soul recorded
    The history of all her secret thoughts.
So smooth he daub'd his vice with show of virtue  
    That, his apparent open guilt omitted,
    I mean his conversation with Shore's wife-
    He liv'd from all attainder of suspects.
I never look'd for better at his hands
    After he once fell in with Mistress Shore.
Yet had we not determin'd he should die
    Until your lordship came to see his end-
    Which now the loving haste of these our friends,
    Something against our meanings, have prevented-
    Because, my lord, I would have had you heard
    The traitor speak, and timorously confess
    The manner and the purpose of his treasons:
    That you might well have signified the same
    Unto the citizens, who haply may
    Misconster us in him and wail his death.
But, my good lord, your Grace's words shall serve
    As well as I had seen and heard him speak;
    And do not doubt, right noble Princes both,
    But I'll acquaint our duteous citizens
    With all your just proceedings in this cause.
Doubt not, my lord, I'll play the orator
    As if the golden fee for which I plead
    Were for myself; and so, my lord, adieu.
I go; and towards three or four o'clock
    Look for the news that the Guildhall affords.
Exeunt all but GLOUCESTER  
    Now will I go to take some privy order
    To draw the brats of Clarence out of sight,
    And to give order that no manner person
    Have any time recourse unto the Princes.
And mark how well the sequel hangs together:
    Eleven hours I have spent to write it over,
    For yesternight by Catesby was it sent me;
    The precedent was full as long a-doing;
    And yet within these five hours Hastings liv'd,
    Untainted, unexamin'd, free, at liberty.
I did; with his contract with Lady Lucy,
    And his contract by deputy in France;
    Th' insatiate greediness of his desire,
    And his enforcement of the city wives;
    His tyranny for trifles; his own bastardy,
    As being got, your father then in France,
    And his resemblance, being not like the Duke.
Withal I did infer your lineaments,
    Being the right idea of your father,
    Both in your form and nobleness of mind;
    Laid open all your victories in Scotland,
    Your discipline in war, wisdom in peace,  
    Your bounty, virtue, fair humility;
    Indeed, left nothing fitting for your purpose
    Untouch'd or slightly handled in discourse.
And when mine oratory drew toward end
    I bid them that did love their country's good
    Cry 'God save Richard, England's royal King!
Which when I saw, I reprehended them,
    And ask'd the Mayor what meant this wilfull silence.
'  
    And thus I took the vantage of those few-
    'Thanks, gentle citizens and friends,' quoth I
    'This general applause and cheerful shout
    Argues your wisdoms and your love to Richard.
Intend some fear;
    Be not you spoke with but by mighty suit;
    And look you get a prayer-book in your hand,
    And stand between two churchmen, good my lord;
    For on that ground I'll make a holy descant;
    And be not easily won to our requests.
I go; and if you plead as well for them
    As I can say nay to thee for myself,
    No doubt we bring it to a happy issue.
I dance attendance here;
    I think the Duke will not be spoke withal.
I'll signify so much unto him straight.
Happy were England would this virtuous prince
    Take on his Grace the sovereignty thereof;
    But, sure, I fear we shall not win him to it.
I fear he will.
Sorry I am my noble cousin should
    Suspect me that I mean no good to him.
My lord, there needs no such apology:
    I do beseech your Grace to pardon me,
    Who, earnest in the service of my God,
    Deferr'd the visitation of my friends.
Even that, I hope, which pleaseth God above,
    And all good men of this ungovern'd isle.
I do suspect I have done some offence
    That seems disgracious in the city's eye,
    And that you come to reprehend my ignorance.
Else wherefore breathe I in a Christian land?
For this, consorted with the citizens,
    Your very worshipful and loving friends,
    And by their vehement instigation,  
    In this just cause come I to move your Grace.
I cannot tell if to depart in silence
    Or bitterly to speak in your reproof
    Best fitteth my degree or your condition.
If not to answer, you might haply think
    Tongue-tied ambition, not replying, yielded
    To bear the golden yoke of sovereignty,
    Which fondly you would here impose on me;
    If to reprove you for this suit of yours,
    So season'd with your faithful love to me,
    Then, on the other side, I check'd my friends.
Therefore-to speak, and to avoid the first,
    And then, in speaking, not to incur the last-
    Definitively thus I answer you:
    Your love deserves my thanks, but my desert
    Unmeritable shuns your high request.
First, if all obstacles were cut away,
    And that my path were even to the crown,
    As the ripe revenue and due of birth,
    Yet so much is my poverty of spirit,  
    So mighty and so many my defects,
    That I would rather hide me from my greatness-
    Being a bark to brook no mighty sea-
    Than in my greatness covet to be hid,
    And in the vapour of my glory smother'd.
But, God be thank'd, there is no need of me-
    And much I need to help you, were there need.
On him I lay that you would lay on me-
    The right and fortune of his happy stars,
    Which God defend that I should wring from him.
More bitterly could I expostulate,
    Save that, for reverence to some alive,
    I give a sparing limit to my tongue.
I am unfit for state and majesty.
I do beseech you, take it not amiss:
    I cannot nor I will not yield to you.
Zounds, I'll entreat no more.
I am not made of stones,
    But penetrable to your kind entreaties,
    Albeit against my conscience and my soul.
Re-enter BUCKINGHAM and the rest

    Cousin of Buckingham, and sage grave men,
    Since you will buckle fortune on my back,
    To bear her burden, whe'er I will or no,
    I must have patience to endure the load;
    But if black scandal or foul-fac'd reproach
    Attend the sequel of your imposition,
    Your mere enforcement shall acquittance me
    From all the impure blots and stains thereof;  
    For God doth know, and you may partly see,
    How far I am from the desire of this.
Then I salute you with this royal title-
    Long live King Richard, England's worthy King!
No farther than the Tower; and, as I guess,
    Upon the like devotion as yourselves,
    To gratulate the gentle Princes there.
By your patience,
    I may not suffer you to visit them.
I mean the Lord Protector.
I am their mother; who shall bar me from them?
I am their father's mother; I will see them.
Their aunt I am in law, in love their mother.
Then bring me to their sights; I'll bear thy blame,
    And take thy office from thee on my peril.
I may not leave it so;
    I am bound by oath, and therefore pardon me.
Let me but meet you, ladies, one hour hence,
    And I'll salute your Grace of York as mother
    And reverend looker-on of two fair queens.
Ah, cut my lace asunder
    That my pent heart may have some scope to beat,
    Or else I swoon with this dead-killing news!
Come, madam, come; I in all haste was sent.
And I with all unwillingness will go.
Go, go, poor soul; I envy not thy glory.
When he that is my husband now
    Came to me, as I follow'd Henry's corse;
    When scarce the blood was well wash'd from his hands
    Which issued from my other angel husband,
    And that dear saint which then I weeping follow'd-
    O, when, I say, I look'd on Richard's face,
    This was my wish: 'Be thou' quoth I 'accurs'd
    For making me, so young, so old a widow;
    And when thou wed'st, let sorrow haunt thy bed;
    And be thy wife, if any be so mad,
    More miserable by the life of thee
    Than thou hast made me by my dear lord's death.
'
    Lo, ere I can repeat this curse again,
    Within so small a time, my woman's heart
    Grossly grew captive to his honey words
    And prov'd the subject of mine own soul's curse,  
    Which hitherto hath held my eyes from rest;
    For never yet one hour in his bed
    Did I enjoy the golden dew of sleep,
    But with his timorous dreams was still awak'd.
I pity thy complaining.
No more than with my soul I mourn for yours.
I to my grave, where peace and rest lie with me!
Eighty odd years of sorrow have I seen,
    And each hour's joy wreck'd with a week of teen.
Ah, Buckingham, now do I play the touch,
    To try if thou be current gold indeed.
Young Edward lives-think now what I would speak.
Why, Buckingham, I say I would be King.
am I King?
Shall I be plain?
I wish the bastards dead.
And I would have it suddenly perform'd.
Say, have I thy consent that they shall die?
Give me some little breath, some pause,
    dear Lord,
    Before I positively speak in this.
I will resolve you herein presently.
I will converse with iron-witted fools
                                      [Descends from the throne]
    And unrespective boys; none are for me  
    That look into me with considerate eyes.
I know a discontented gentleman
    Whose humble means match not his haughty spirit.
I partly know the man.
Know, my loving lord,
    The Marquis Dorset, as I hear, is fled
    To Richmond, in the parts where he abides.
Rumour it abroad
    That Anne, my wife, is very grievous sick;
    I will take order for her keeping close.
Inquire me out some mean poor gentleman,
    Whom I will marry straight to Clarence' daughter-
    The boy is foolish, and I fear not him.
I say again, give out
    That Anne, my queen, is sick and like to die.
Exit CATESBY
    I must be married to my brother's daughter,
    Or else my kingdom stands on brittle glass.
But I am in
    So far in blood that sin will pluck on sin.
Please you;
    But I had rather kill two enemies.
Two deep enemies,
    Foes to my rest, and my sweet sleep's disturbers,
    Are they that I would have thee deal upon.
TYRREL, I mean those bastards in the Tower.
Let me have open means to come to them,
    And soon I'll rid you from the fear of them.
[Whispers]
    There is no more but so: say it is done,
    And I will love thee and prefer thee for it.
I will dispatch it straight.
My lord, I have consider'd in my mind
    The late request that you did sound me in.
I hear the news, my lord.
My lord, I claim the gift, my due by promise,
    For which your honour and your faith is pawn'd:
    Th' earldom of Hereford and the movables
    Which you have promised I shall possess.
I do remember me: Henry the Sixth
    Did prophesy that Richmond should be King,
    When Richmond was a little peevish boy.
How chance the prophet could not at that
    time
    Have told me, I being by, that I should kill him?
When last I was at Exeter,
    The mayor in courtesy show'd me the castle
    And call'd it Rugemount, at which name I started,
    Because a bard of Ireland told me once
    I should not live long after I saw Richmond.
I am thus bold to put your Grace in mind
    Of what you promis'd me.
I am not in the giving vein to-day.
Thou troublest me; I am not in the vein.
Made I him King for this?
Dighton and Forrest, who I did suborn
    To do this piece of ruthless butchery,
    Albeit they were flesh'd villains, bloody dogs,
    Melted with tenderness and mild compassion,
    Wept like two children in their deaths' sad story.
'
    Hence both are gone with conscience and remorse
    They could not speak; and so I left them both,
    To bear this tidings to the bloody King.
Kind Tyrrel, am I happy in thy news?
I did, my lord.
The chaplain of the Tower hath buried them;
    But where, to say the truth, I do not know.
Meantime, but think how I may do thee good
    And be inheritor of thy desire.
I humbly take my leave.
The son of Clarence have I pent up close;
    His daughter meanly have I match'd in marriage;
    The sons of Edward sleep in Abraham's bosom,
    And Anne my wife hath bid this world good night.
Now, for I know the Britaine Richmond aims
    At young Elizabeth, my brother's daughter,
    And by that knot looks proudly on the crown,
    To her go I, a jolly thriving wooer.
Come, I have learn'd that fearful commenting
    Is leaden servitor to dull delay;
    Delay leads impotent and snail-pac'd beggary.
Here in these confines slily have I lurk'd
    To watch the waning of mine enemies.
A dire induction am I witness to,
    And will to France, hoping the consequence
    Will prove as bitter, black, and tragical.
Then would I hide my bones, not rest them here.
I had an Edward, till a Richard kill'd him;
    I had a husband, till a Richard kill'd him:
    Thou hadst an Edward, till a Richard kill'd him;
    Thou hadst a Richard, till a Richard kill'd him.
I had a Richard too, and thou didst kill him;
    I had a Rutland too, thou holp'st to kill him.
O upright, just, and true-disposing God,
    How do I thank thee that this carnal cur
    Preys on the issue of his mother's body
    And makes her pew-fellow with others' moan!
God witness with me, I have wept for thine.
Bear with me; I am hungry for revenge,
    And now I cloy me with beholding it.
Cancel his bond of life, dear God, I pray,
    That I may live and say 'The dog is dead.
O, thou didst prophesy the time would
      come
    That I should wish for thee to help me curse
    That bottled spider, that foul bunch-back'd toad!
I Call'd thee then vain flourish of my
      fortune;
    I call'd thee then poor shadow, painted queen,
    The presentation of but what I was,  
    The flattering index of a direful pageant,
    One heav'd a-high to be hurl'd down below,
    A mother only mock'd with two fair babes,
    A dream of what thou wast, a garish flag
    To be the aim of every dangerous shot,
    A sign of dignity, a breath, a bubble,
    A queen in jest, only to fill the scene.
Now thy proud neck bears half my burden'd yoke,
    From which even here I slip my weary head
    And leave the burden of it all on thee.
Strike, I say!
Alarums]
    Either be patient and entreat me fair,
    Or with the clamorous report of war  
    Thus will I drown your exclamations.
Ay, I thank God, my father, and yourself.
Madam, I have a touch of your condition
    That cannot brook the accent of reproof.
Do, then; but I'll not hear.
I will be mild and gentle in my words.
And brief, good mother; for I am in haste.
I have stay'd for thee,
    God knows, in torment and in agony.
And came I not at last to comfort you?
If I be so disgracious in your eye,
    Let me march on and not offend you, madam.
I prithee hear me speak.
Hear me a word;
    For I shall never speak to thee again.
Either thou wilt die by God's just ordinance
    Ere from this war thou turn a conqueror;
    Or I with grief and extreme age shall perish
    And never more behold thy face again.
Though far more cause, yet much less
      spirit to curse
    Abides in me; I say amen to her.
Stay, madam, I must talk a word with you.
I have no moe sons of the royal blood
    For thee to slaughter.
O, let her
      live,
    And I'll corrupt her manners, stain her beauty,  
    Slander myself as false to Edward's bed,
    Throw over her the veil of infamy;
    So she may live unscarr'd of bleeding slaughter,
    I will confess she was not Edward's daughter.
To save her life I'll say she is not so.
You speak as if that I had slain my cousins.
But that stiff use of grief makes wild grief tame,
    My tongue should to thy ears not name my boys
    Till that my nails were anchor'd in thine eyes;
    And I, in such a desp'rate bay of death,
    Like a poor bark, of sails and tackling reft,
    Rush all to pieces on thy rocky bosom.
Madam, so thrive I in my enterprise
    And dangerous success of bloody wars,
    As I intend more good to you and yours
    Than ever you or yours by me were harm'd!
Even all I have-ay, and myself and all
    Will I withal endow a child of thine;
    So in the Lethe of thy angry soul
    Thou drown the sad remembrance of those wrongs
    Which thou supposest I have done to thee.
Then know, that from my soul I love thy
    daughter.
So from thy soul's love didst thou love her brothers,
    And from my heart's love I do thank thee for it.
I mean that with my soul I love thy daughter
    And do intend to make her Queen of England.
That would I learn of you,
    As one being best acquainted with her humour.
Say that I did all this for love of her.
If I did take the kingdom from your sons,
    To make amends I'll give it to your daughter.
If I have kill'd the issue of your womb,
    To quicken your increase I will beget
    Mine issue of your blood upon your daughter.
I cannot make you what amends I would,
    Therefore accept such kindness as I can.
And when this arm of mine hath chastised
    The petty rebel, dull-brain'd Buckingham,
    Bound with triumphant garlands will I come,
    And lead thy daughter to a conqueror's bed;
    To whom I will retail my conquest won,
    And she shall be sole victoress, Caesar's Caesar.
What were I best to say?
Or shall I say her uncle?
Under what title shall I woo for thee
    That God, the law, my honour, and her love
    Can make seem pleasing to her tender years?
Say I will love her everlastingly.
Say I, her sovereign, am her subject low.
Harp on it still shall I till heartstrings
    break.
I swear-
  QUEEN ELIZABETH.
That thou hast wronged in the time
    o'erpast;
    For I myself have many tears to wash
    Hereafter time, for time past wrong'd by thee.
As I intend to prosper and repent,
    So thrive I in my dangerous affairs
    Of hostile arms!
-if, with dear heart's love,
    Immaculate devotion, holy thoughts,
    I tender not thy beauteous princely daughter.
Therefore, dear mother-I must call you so-
    Be the attorney of my love to her;
    Plead what I will be, not what I have been;
    Not my deserts, but what I will deserve.
Shall I be tempted of the devil thus?
Shall I forget myself to be myself?
But in your daughter's womb I bury them;
    Where, in that nest of spicery, they will breed
    Selves of themselves, to your recomforture.
Shall I go win my daughter to thy will?
I go.
I will my lord, with all convenient haste.
First, mighty liege, tell me your Highness' pleasure,
    What from your Grace I shall deliver to him.
I go.
What, may it please you, shall I do at Salisbury?
Why, what wouldst thou do there before I
    go?
Your Highness told me I should post before.
I know not, mighty sovereign, but by guess.
Unless for that, my liege, I cannot guess.
Thou wilt revolt and fly to him, I fear.
Pleaseth your Majesty to give me leave,
    I'll muster up my friends and meet your Grace
    Where and what time your Majesty shall please.
Ay, ay, thou wouldst be gone to join with
    Richmond;
    But I'll not trust thee.
I never was nor never will be false.
So deal with him as I prove true to you.
My gracious sovereign, now in Devonshire,
    As I by friends am well advertised,
    Sir Edward Courtney and the haughty prelate,
    Bishop of Exeter, his elder brother,
    With many moe confederates, are in arms.
The news I have to tell your Majesty
    Is that by sudden floods and fall of waters
    Buckingham's army is dispers'd and scatter'd;
    And he himself wand'red away alone,
    No man knows whither.
I cry thee mercy.
But this good comfort bring I to your Highness-
    The Britaine navy is dispers'd by tempest.
Sir Christopher, tell Richmond this from me:
    That in the sty of the most deadly boar
    My son George Stanley is frank'd up in hold;
    If I revolt, off goes young George's head;
    The fear of that holds off my present aid.
Well, hie thee to thy lord; I kiss his hand;
    My letter will resolve him of my mind.
This is the day which in King Edward's time  
    I wish'd might fall on me when I was found
    False to his children and his wife's allies;
    This is the day wherein I wish'd to fall
    By the false faith of him whom most I trusted;
    This, this All-Souls' day to my fearful soul
    Is the determin'd respite of my wrongs;
    That high All-Seer which I dallied with
    Hath turn'd my feigned prayer on my head
    And given in earnest what I begg'd in jest.
I doubt not but his friends will turn to us.
Here will I lie to-night;
                      [Soldiers begin to set up the KING'S tent]
    But where to-morrow?
I'll draw the form and model of our battle,
    Limit each leader to his several charge,
    And part in just proportion our small power.
Unless I have mista'en his colours much-
    Which well I am assur'd I have not done-
    His regiment lies half a mile at least
    South from the mighty power of the King.
Upon my life, my lord, I'll undertake it;
    And so, God give you quiet rest to-night!
I will not sup to-night.
I go, my lord.
I warrant you, my lord.
So, I am satisfied.
I have not that alacrity of spirit
    Nor cheer of mind that I was wont to have.
Leave me, I say.
I, by attorney, bless thee from thy mother,
    Who prays continually for Richmond's good.
I, as I may-that which I would I cannot-  
    With best advantage will deceive the time
    And aid thee in this doubtful shock of arms;
    But on thy side I may not be too forward,
    Lest, being seen, thy brother, tender George,
    Be executed in his father's sight.
I'll strive with troubled thoughts to take a nap,
    Lest leaden slumber peise me down to-morrow
    When I should mount with wings of victory.
Exeunt all but RICHMOND
    O Thou, whose captain I account myself,
    Look on my forces with a gracious eye;
    Put in their hands Thy bruising irons of wrath,  
    That they may crush down with a heavy fall
    The usurping helmets of our adversaries!
To Thee I do commend my watchful soul
    Ere I let fall the windows of mine eyes.
[To RICHARD]  When I was mortal, my anointed
    body
    By thee was punched full of deadly holes.
I that was wash'd to death with fulsome wine,
    Poor Clarence, by thy guile betray'd to death!
[To RICHARD]  The first was I that help'd thee
    to the crown;
    The last was I that felt thy tyranny.
[To RICHMOND]  I died for hope ere I could lend thee aid;
    But cheer thy heart and be thou not dismay'd:  
    God and good angels fight on Richmond's side;
    And Richard falls in height of all his pride.
I did but dream.
What do I fear?
Richard loves Richard; that is, I am I.
No-yes, I am.
Great reason why-
    Lest I revenge.
Alack, I love myself.
For any good
    That I myself have done unto myself?
Alas, I rather hate myself
    For hateful deeds committed by myself!
I am a villain; yet I lie, I am not.
'
    I shall despair.
There is no creature loves me;
    And if I die no soul will pity me:
    And wherefore should they, since that I myself
    Find in myself no pity to myself?
Methought the souls of all that I had murder'd
    Came to my tent, and every one did threat
    To-morrow's vengeance on the head of Richard.
Ratcliff, my lord; 'tis I.
O Ratcliff, I have dream'd a fearful dream!
O Ratcliff, I fear, I fear.
Come, go with me;
    Under our tents I'll play the eaves-dropper,
    To see if any mean to shrink from me.
The sweetest sleep and fairest-boding dreams
    That ever ent'red in a drowsy head
    Have I since your departure had, my lords.
I promise you my soul is very jocund
    In the remembrance of so fair a dream.
His ORATION to his SOLDIERS

    More than I have said, loving countrymen,
    The leisure and enforcement of the time
    Forbids to dwell upon; yet remember this:
    God and our good cause fight upon our side;
    The prayers of holy saints and wronged souls,
    Like high-rear'd bulwarks, stand before our faces;
    Richard except, those whom we fight against  
    Had rather have us win than him they follow.
For me, the ransom of my bold attempt
    Shall be this cold corpse on the earth's cold face;
    But if I thrive, the gain of my attempt
    The least of you shall share his part thereof.
Not I, my lord.
I would these dewy tears were from the ground.
I will lead forth my soldiers to the plain,  
    And thus my battle shall be ordered:
    My foreward shall be drawn out all in length,
    Consisting equally of horse and foot;
    Our archers shall be placed in the midst.
This found I on my tent this morning.
His ORATION to his ARMY

    What shall I say more than I have inferr'd?
I hear their
    drum.
I'll help you to a horse.
Slave, I have set my life upon a cast
    And I Will stand the hazard of the die.
I think there be six Richmonds in the field;
    Five have I slain to-day instead of him.
Lo, here, this long-usurped royalty
    From the dead temples of this bloody wretch
    Have I pluck'd off, to grace thy brows withal.
>>



ACT I.
Scene I.
I mean, an we be in choler, we'll draw.
I strike quickly, being moved.
I will take the
    wall of any man or maid of Montague's.
Therefore I will push Montague's men
    from the wall and thrust his maids to the wall.
I will show myself a tyrant.
When I have fought
    with the men, I will be cruel with the maids- I will cut off
    their heads.
Me they shall feel while I am able to stand; and 'tis known I
    am a pretty piece of flesh.
I will back thee.
I fear thee!
I will frown as I pass by, and let them take it as they list.
I will bite my thumb at them; which is
    disgrace to them, if they bear it.
I do bite my thumb, sir.
[aside to Gregory] Is the law of our side if I say ay?
No, sir, I do not bite my thumb at you, sir; but I bite my
    thumb, sir.
I serve as good a man as you.
I do but keep the peace.
I hate the word
    As I hate hell, all Montagues, and thee.
My sword, I say!
Here were the servants of your adversary
    And yours, close fighting ere I did approach.
I drew to part them.
Right glad I am he was not at this fray.
Madam, an hour before the worshipp'd sun
    Peer'd forth the golden window of the East,
    A troubled mind drave me to walk abroad;
    Where, underneath the grove of sycamore
    That westward rooteth from the city's side,  
    So early walking did I see your son.
Towards him I made; but he was ware of me
    And stole into the covert of the wood.
I- measuring his affections by my own,
    Which then most sought where most might not be found,
    Being one too many by my weary self-
    Pursu'd my humour, not Pursuing his,
    And gladly shunn'd who gladly fled from me.
I neither know it nor can learn of him
  Ben.
Both by myself and many other friend;
    But he, his own affections' counsellor,
    Is to himself- I will not say how true-
    But to himself so secret and so close,
    So far from sounding and discovery,
    As is the bud bit with an envious worm
    Ere he can spread his sweet leaves to the air
    Or dedicate his beauty to the sun.
So please you step aside,
    I'll know his grievance, or be much denied.
I would thou wert so happy by thy stay
    To hear true shrift.
Out of her favour where I am in love.
Yet tell me not, for I have heard it all.
Still-waking sleep, that is not what it is
    This love feel I, that feel no love in this.
No, coz, I rather weep.
I will go along.
I have lost myself; I am not here:
    This is not Romeo, he's some other where.
What, shall I groan and tell thee?
In sadness, cousin, I do love a woman.
I aim'd so near when I suppos'd you lov'd.
And she's fair I love.
She hath forsworn to love, and in that vow
    Do I live dead that live to tell it now.
O, teach me how I should forget to think!
Show me a mistress that is passing fair,
    What doth her beauty serve but as a note
    Where I may read who pass'd that passing fair?
I'll pay that doctrine, or else die in debt.
But Montague is bound as well as I,
    In penalty alike; and 'tis not hard, I think,
    For men so old as we to keep the peace.
But saying o'er what I have said before:
    My child is yet a stranger in the world,
    She hath not seen the change of fourteen years;
    Let two more summers wither in their pride
    Ere we may think her ripe to be a bride.
This night I hold an old accustom'd feast,
    Whereto I have invited many a guest,
    Such as I love; and you among the store,
    One more, most welcome, makes my number more.
It is written
    that the shoemaker should meddle with his yard and the tailor
    with his last, the fisher with his pencil and the painter with
    his nets; but I am sent to find those persons whose names are
    here writ, and can never find what names the writing person hath
    here writ.
I must to the learned.
For what, I pray thee?
I pray, sir, can you read?
But I pray, can you
    read anything you see?
Ay, If I know the letters and the language.
Stay, fellow; I can read.
Indeed I should have ask'd you that before.
Now I'll tell you without asking.
My master is the great rich
    Capulet; and if you be not of the house of Montagues, I pray come
    and crush a cup of wine.
Go thither, and with unattainted eye
    Compare her face with some that I shall show,
    And I will make thee think thy swan a crow.
you saw her fair, none else being by,
    Herself pois'd with herself in either eye;
    But in that crystal scales let there be weigh'd
    Your lady's love against some other maid
    That I will show you shining at this feast,
    And she shall scant show well that now seems best.
I'll go along, no such sight to be shown,
    But to rejoice in splendour of my own.
Now, by my maidenhead at twelve year old,
    I bade her come.
Madam, I am here.
Nurse, come back again;
    I have rememb'red me, thou's hear our counsel.
Faith, I can tell her age unto an hour.
I'll lay fourteen of my teeth-
    And yet, to my teen be it spoken, I have but four-
    She is not fourteen.
But, as I said,
    On Lammas Eve at night shall she be fourteen;
    That shall she, marry; I remember it well.
'Tis since the earthquake now eleven years;
    And she was wean'd (I never shall forget it),
    Of all the days of the year, upon that day;
    For I had then laid wormwood to my dug,
    Sitting in the sun under the dovehouse wall.
Nay, I do bear a brain.
But, as I said,
    When it did taste the wormwood on the nipple  
    Of my dug and felt it bitter, pretty fool,
    To see it tetchy and fall out with the dug!
'Twas no need, I trow,
    To bid me trudge.
I warrant, an I should live a thousand yeas,
    I never should forget it.
I pray thee hold thy peace.
Yet I cannot choose but laugh  
    To think it should leave crying and say 'Ay.
'
    And yet, I warrant, it bad upon it brow
    A bump as big as a young cock'rel's stone;
    A perilous knock; and it cried bitterly.
And stint thou too, I pray thee, nurse, say I.
Peace, I have done.
Thou wast the prettiest babe that e'er I nurs'd.
An I might live to see thee married once, I have my wish.
Marry, that 'marry' is the very theme
    I came to talk of.
It is an honour that I dream not of.
Were not I thine only nurse,
    I would say thou hadst suck'd wisdom from thy teat.
By my count,  
    I was your mother much upon these years
    That you are now a maid.
I'll look to like, if looking liking move;
    But no more deep will I endart mine eye
    Than your consent gives strength to make it fly.
I must hence to wait.
I beseech you
    follow straight.
I am not for this ambling.
Being but heavy, I will bear the light.
Not I, believe me.
You have dancing shoes
    With nimble soles; I have a soul of lead
    So stakes me to the ground I cannot move.
I am too sore enpierced with his shaft
    To soar with his light feathers; and so bound
    I cannot bound a pitch above dull woe.
Under love's heavy burthen do I sink.
What care I
    What curious eye doth quote deformities?
Let wantons light of heart
    Tickle the senseless rushes with their heels;  
    For I am proverb'd with a grandsire phrase,
    I'll be a candle-holder and look on;
    The game was ne'er so fair, and I am done.
I mean, sir, in delay
    We waste our lights in vain, like lamps by day.
I dreamt a dream to-night.
And so did I.
O, then I see Queen Mab hath been with you.
True, I talk of dreams;
    Which are the children of an idle brain,
    Begot of nothing but vain fantasy;
    Which is as thin of substance as the air,
    And more inconstant than the wind, who wooes
    Even now the frozen bosom of the North
    And, being anger'd, puffs away from thence,
    Turning his face to the dew-dropping South.
I fear, too early; for my mind misgives
    Some consequence, yet hanging in the stars,
    Shall bitterly begin his fearful date
    With this night's revels and expire the term
    Of a despised life, clos'd in my breast,  
    By some vile forfeit of untimely death.
She that makes dainty,
    She I'll swear hath corns.
Am I come near ye now?
I have seen the day
    That I have worn a visor and could tell
    A whispering tale in a fair lady's ear,
    Such as would please.
Nay, sit, nay, sit, good cousin Capulet,
    For you and I are past our dancing days.
How long is't now since last yourself and I
    Were in a mask?
I know not, sir.
The measure done, I'll watch her place of stand
    And, touching hers, make blessed my rude hand.
For I ne'er saw true beauty till this night.
Now, by the stock and honour of my kin,
    To strike him dead I hold it not a sin.
I would not for the wealth of all this town
    Here in my house do him disparagement.
I'll not endure him.
I say he shall.
Am I the master here, or you?
I know what.
I'll make you quiet; what!
I will withdraw; but this intrusion shall,
    Now seeming sweet, convert to bitt'rest gall.
If I profane with my unworthiest hand
    This holy shrine, the gentle fine is this:
    My lips, two blushing pilgrims, ready stand
    To smooth that rough touch with a tender kiss.
Then move not while my prayer's effect I take.
I nurs'd her daughter that you talk'd withal.
I tell you, he that can lay hold of her
    Shall have the chinks.
Ay, so I fear; the more is my unrest.
Why then, I thank you all.
I thank you, honest gentlemen.
Ah, sirrah, by my fay, it waxes late;
    I'll to my rest.
Marry, that, I think, be young Petruchio.
I know not.
Prodigious birth of love it is to me
    That I must love a loathed enemy.
A rhyme I learnt even now
    Of one I danc'd withal.
Scene I.
Can I go forward when my heart is here?
Nay, I'll conjure too.
Appear thou in the likeness of a sigh;
    Speak but one rhyme, and I am satisfied!
He heareth not, he stirreth not, be moveth not;
    The ape is dead, and I must conjure him.
I conjure thee by Rosaline's bright eyes.
That were some spite; my invocation
    Is fair and honest: in his mistress' name,
    I conjure only but to raise up him.
I'll to my truckle-bed;
    This field-bed is too cold for me to sleep.
Her eye discourses; I will answer it.
I am too bold; 'tis not to me she speaks.
O that I were a glove upon that hand,
    That I might touch that cheek!
Or, if thou wilt not, be but sworn my love,
    And I'll no longer be a Capulet.
[aside] Shall I hear more, or shall I speak at this?
I take thee at thy word.
Call me but love, and I'll be new baptiz'd;
    Henceforth I never will be Romeo.
By a name
    I know not how to tell thee who I am.
Had I it written, I would tear the word.
My ears have yet not drunk a hundred words
    Of that tongue's utterance, yet I know the sound.
With love's light wings did I o'erperch these walls;
    For stony limits cannot hold love out,
    And what love can do, that dares love attempt.
Look thou but sweet,
    And I am proof against their enmity.
I would not for the world they saw thee here.
I have night's cloak to hide me from their sight;
    And but thou love me, let them find me here.
He lent me counsel, and I lent him eyes.
I am no pilot; yet, wert thou as far
    As that vast shore wash'd with the farthest sea,
    I would adventure for such merchandise.
Fain would I dwell on form- fain, fain deny
    What I have spoke; but farewell compliment!
Dost thou love me, I know thou wilt say 'Ay';  
    And I will take thy word.
Or if thou thinkest I am too quickly won,
    I'll frown, and be perverse, and say thee nay,
    So thou wilt woo; but else, not for the world.
In truth, fair Montague, I am too fond,
    And therefore thou mayst think my haviour light;
    But trust me, gentleman, I'll prove more true
    Than those that have more cunning to be strange.
I should have been more strange, I must confess,
    But that thou overheard'st, ere I was ware,
    My true-love passion.
Lady, by yonder blessed moon I swear,
    That tips with silver all these fruit-tree tops-
  Jul.
What shall I swear by?
Do not swear at all;
    Or if thou wilt, swear by thy gracious self,
    Which is the god of my idolatry,
    And I'll believe thee.
Although I joy in thee,
    I have no joy of this contract to-night.
I gave thee mine before thou didst request it;  
    And yet I would it were to give again.
And yet I wish but for the thing I have.
My bounty is as boundless as the sea,
    My love as deep; the more I give to thee,
    The more I have, for both are infinite.
I hear some noise within.
Stay but a little, I will come again.
I am afeard,
    Being in night, all this is but a dream,
    Too flattering-sweet to be substantial.
If that thy bent of love be honourable,
    Thy purpose marriage, send me word to-morrow,  
    By one that I'll procure to come to thee,
    Where and what time thou wilt perform the rite;
    And all my fortunes at thy foot I'll lay
    And follow thee my lord throughout the world.
I come, anon.
- But if thou meanest not well,
    I do beseech thee-
  Nurse.
By-and-by I come.
To-morrow will I send.
Bondage is hoarse and may not speak aloud;
    Else would I tear the cave where Echo lies,
    And make her airy tongue more hoarse than mine
    With repetition of my Romeo's name.
At what o'clock to-morrow
    Shall I send to thee?
I will not fail.
I have forgot why I did call thee back.
I shall forget, to have thee still stand there,
    Rememb'ring how I love thy company.
And I'll still stay, to have thee still forget,  
    Forgetting any other home but this.
I would have thee gone-
    And yet no farther than a wanton's bird,
    That lets it hop a little from her hand,
    Like a poor prisoner in his twisted gyves,
    And with a silk thread plucks it back again,
    So loving-jealous of his liberty.
I would I were thy bird.
Sweet, so would I.
Yet I should kill thee with much cherishing.
Parting is such sweet sorrow,
    That I shall say good night till it be morrow.
Would I were sleep and peace, so sweet to rest!
Hence will I to my ghostly father's cell,
    His help to crave and my dear hap to tell.
Non, ere the sun advance his burning eye
    The day to cheer and night's dank dew to dry,
    I must up-fill this osier cage of ours
    With baleful weeds and precious-juiced flowers.
Therefore thy earliness doth me assure
    Thou art uprous'd with some distemp'rature;
    Or if not so, then here I hit it right-
    Our Romeo hath not been in bed to-night.
I have forgot that name, and that name's woe.
I'll tell thee ere thou ask it me again.
I have been feasting with mine enemy,
    Where on a sudden one hath wounded me
    That's by me wounded.
I bear no hatred, blessed man, for, lo,  
    My intercession likewise steads my foe.
When, and where, and how
    We met, we woo'd, and made exchange of vow,
    I'll tell thee as we pass; but this I pray,
    That thou consent to marry us to-day.
I pray thee chide not.
She whom I love now
    Doth grace for grace and love for love allow.
In one respect I'll thy assistant be;
    For this alliance may so happy prove  
    To turn your households' rancour to pure love.
I stand on sudden haste.
I spoke with his man.
More than Prince of Cats, I can tell you.
What counterfeit did I give you?
Nay, I am the very pink of courtesy.
or I'll cry a match.
Nay, if our wits run the wild-goose chase, I am done; for thou
    hast more of the wild goose in one of thy wits than, I am sure, I
    have in my whole five.
Was I with you there for the goose?
I will bite thee by the ear for that jest.
I stretch it out for that word 'broad,' which, added to the
    goose, proves thee far and wide a broad goose.
I would have made it short; for I was
    come to the whole depth of my tale, and meant indeed to occupy
    the argument no longer.
'Tis no less, I tell ye; for the bawdy hand of the dial is now
    upon the prick of noon.
Gentlemen, can any of you tell me where I may find the young
    Romeo?
I can tell you; but young Romeo will be older when you have
    found him than he was when you sought him.
I am the youngest of
    that name, for fault of a worse.
If you be he, sir, I desire some confidence with you.
I will follow you.
I Pray you, Sir, what saucy merchant was
    this that was so full of his ropery?
An 'a speak anything against me, I'll take him down, an 'a
    were lustier than he is, and twenty such jacks; and if I cannot,
    I'll find those that shall.
I am none of his
    flirt-gills; I am none of his skains-mates.
I saw no man use you at his pleasure.
If I had, my weapon
    should quickly have been out, I warrant you.
I dare draw as soon
    as another man, if I see occasion in a good quarrel, and the law
    on my side.
Now, afore God, I am so vexed that every part about me
    quivers.
Pray you, sir, a word; and, as I told you,
    my young lady bid me enquire you out.
What she bid me say, I will
    keep to myself; but first let me tell ye, if ye should lead her
    into a fool's paradise, as they say, it were a very gross kind of
    behaviour, as they say; for the gentlewoman is young; and
    therefore, if you should deal double with her, truly it were an
    ill thing to be off'red to any gentlewoman, and very weak dealing.
I protest unto
    thee-  
  Nurse.
Good heart, and I faith I will tell her as much.
I will tell her, sir, that you do protest, which, as I take
    it, is a gentlemanlike offer.
I say you shall.
Be trusty, and I'll quit thy pains.
I warrant thee my man's as true as steel.
I anger
    her sometimes, and tell her that Paris is the properer man; but
    I'll warrant you, when I say so, she looks as pale as any clout
    in the versal world.
R is for the- No; I know
    it begins with some other letter; and she hath the prettiest
    sententious of it, of you and rosemary, that it would do you good
    to hear it.
The clock struck nine when I did send the nurse;
    In half an hour she 'promis'd to return.
I am aweary, give me leave awhile.
What a jaunce have I had!
I would thou hadst my bones, and I thy news.
Nay, come, I pray thee speak.
Do you not see that I am out of breath?
Say either, and I'll stay the circumstance.
He is not the flower of courtesy, but, I'll
    warrant him, as gentle as a lamb.
But all this did I know before.
What a head have I!
I' faith, I am sorry that thou art not well.
Your love says, like an honest gentleman, and a courteous,
    and a kind, and a handsome; and, I warrant, a virtuous- Where is
    your mother?
Marry come up, I trow.
I have.
Hie you to church; I must another way,
    To fetch a ladder, by the which your love  
    Must climb a bird's nest soon when it is dark.
I am the drudge, and toil in your delight;
    But you shall bear the burthen soon at night.
Go; I'll to dinner; hie you to the cell.
Do thou but close our hands with holy words,
    Then love-devouring death do what he dare-
    It is enough I may but call her mine.
Scene I.
I pray thee, good Mercutio, let's retire.
Am I like such a fellow?
An I were so apt to quarrel as thou art, any man should buy
    the fee simple of my life for an hour and a quarter.
By my heel, I care not.
Follow me close, for I will speak to them.
I will not budge for no man's pleasure,

                        Enter Romeo.
But I'll be hang'd, sir, if he wear your livery.
Romeo, the love I bear thee can afford
    No better term than this: thou art a villain.
Tybalt, the reason that I have to love thee
    Doth much excuse the appertaining rage
    To such a greeting.
Villain am I none.
I see thou knowest me not.
I do protest I never injur'd thee,
    But love thee better than thou canst devise
    Till thou shalt know the reason of my love;
    And so good Capulet, which name I tender
    As dearly as mine own, be satisfied.
That I
    mean to make bold withal, and, as you shall use me hereafter,  
    dry-beat the rest of the eight.
I am for you.
I am hurt.
I am sped.
I am peppered, I warrant, for this
    world.
I was hurt under your arm.
I thought all for the best.
Help me into some house, Benvolio,
    Or I shall faint.
I have it,
    And soundly too.
Either thou or I, or both, must go with him.
O, I am fortune's fool!
I charge thee in the Prince's name obey.
I can discover all
    The unlucky manage of this fatal brawl.
' and swifter than his tongue,
    His agile arm beats down their fatal points,
    And 'twixt them rushes; underneath whose arm
    An envious thrust from Tybalt hit the life
    Of stout Mercutio, and then Tybalt fled;
    But by-and-by comes back to Romeo,
    Who had but newly entertain'd revenge,
    And to't they go like lightning; for, ere I
    Could draw to part them, was stout Tybalt slain;
    And, as he fell, did Romeo turn and fly.
I beg for justice, which thou, Prince, must give.
I have an interest in your hate's proceeding,
    My blood for your rude brawls doth lie a-bleeding;
    But I'll amerce you with so strong a fine
    That you shall all repent the loss of mine.
I will be deaf to pleading and excuses;
    Nor tears nor prayers shall purchase out abuses.
O, I have bought the mansion of a love,
    But not possess'd it; and though I am sold,
    Not yet enjoy'd.
Say thou but 'I,'
    And that bare vowel 'I' shall poison more
    Than the death-darting eye of cockatrice.
I am not I, if there be such an 'I';
    Or those eyes shut that make thee answer 'I.
'
    If be be slain, say 'I'; or if not, 'no.
I saw the wound, I saw it with mine eyes,
    (God save the mark!
I swounded at the sight.
O Tybalt, Tybalt, the best friend I had!
honest gentleman
    That ever I should live to see thee dead!
O, what a beast was I to chide at him!
Shall I speak ill of him that is my husband?
Ah, poor my lord, what tongue shall smooth thy name
    When I, thy three-hours wife, have mangled it?
All this is comfort; wherefore weep I then?
I would forget it fain;  
    But O, it presses to my memory
    Like damned guilty deeds to sinners' minds!
I will bring you thither.
Poor ropes, you are beguil'd,
    Both you and I, for Romeo is exil'd.
He made you for a highway to my bed;
    But I, a maid, die maiden-widowed.
I'll to my wedding bed;
    And death, not Romeo, take my maidenhead!
I'll find Romeo
    To comfort you.
I wot well where he is.
I'll to him; he is hid at Laurence' cell.
What is the Prince's doom
    What sorrow craves acquaintance at my hand
    That I yet know not?
I bring thee tidings of the Prince's doom.
This may flies do, when I from this must fly;
    They are free men, but I am banished.
I'll give thee armour to keep off that word;
    Adversity's sweet milk, philosophy,
    To comfort thee, though thou art banished.
O, then I see that madmen have no ears.
Wert thou as young as I, Juliet thy love,
    An hour but married, Tybalt murdered,
    Doting like me, and like me banished,
    Then mightst thou speak, then mightst thou tear thy hair,
    And fall upon the ground, as I do now,
    Taking the measure of an unmade grave.
Not I; unless the breath of heartsick groans,  
    Mist-like infold me from the search of eyes.
- I come, I come!
I come from Lady Juliet.
Doth not she think me an old murtherer,
    Now I have stain'd the childhood of our joy
    With blood remov'd but little from her own?
Tell me, that I may sack
    The hateful mansion.
By my holy order,
    I thought thy disposition better temper'd.
O Lord, I could have stay'd here all the night
    To hear good counsel.
My lord, I'll tell my lady you will come.
I'll find out your man,
    And he shall signify from time to time
    Every good hap to you that chances here.
Look you, she lov'd her kinsman Tybalt dearly,
    And so did I.
I promise you, but for your company,
    I would have been abed an hour ago.
I will, and know her mind early to-morrow;
    To-night she's mew'd up to her heaviness.
Sir Paris, I will make a desperate tender
    Of my child's love.
I think she will be rul'd
    In all respects by me; nay more, I doubt it not.
My lord, I would that Thursday were to-morrow.
I must be gone and live, or stay and die.
Yond light is not daylight; I know it, I.
I am content, so thou wilt have it so.
I'll say yon grey is not the morning's eye,
    'Tis but the pale reflex of Cynthia's brow;
    Nor that is not the lark whose notes do beat
    The vaulty heaven so high above our heads.
I have more care to stay than will to go.
Some say the lark and loathed toad chang'd eyes;
    O, now I would they had chang'd voices too,
    Since arm from arm that voice doth us affray,
    Hunting thee hence with hunt's-up to the day!
One kiss, and I'll descend.
I must hear from thee every day in the hour,
    For in a minute there are many days.
O, by this count I shall be much in years
    Ere I again behold my Romeo!
I will omit no opportunity
    That may convey my greetings, love, to thee.
I doubt it not; and all these woes shall serve  
    For sweet discourses in our time to come.
O God, I have an ill-divining soul!
Methinks I see thee, now thou art below,
    As one dead in the bottom of a tomb.
Be fickle, Fortune,
    For then I hope thou wilt not keep him long
    But send him back.
Madam, I am not well.
Feeling so the loss,
    I cannot choose but ever weep the friend.
I do, with all my heart;
    And yet no man like he doth grieve my heart.
Would none but I might venge my cousin's death!
I'll send to one in Mantua,
    Where that same banish'd runagate doth live,
    Shall give him such an unaccustom'd dram
    That he shall soon keep Tybalt company;
    And then I hope thou wilt be satisfied.
Indeed I never shall be satisfied
    With Romeo till I behold him- dead-
    Is my poor heart so for a kinsman vex'd.
Madam, if you could find out but a man
    To bear a poison, I would temper it;
    That Romeo should, upon receipt thereof,
    Soon sleep in quiet.
O, how my heart abhors
    To hear him nam'd and cannot come to him,
    To wreak the love I bore my cousin Tybalt
    Upon his body that hath slaughter'd him!
Find thou the means, and I'll find such a man.
But now I'll tell thee joyful tidings, girl.
What are they, I beseech your ladyship?
Well, well, thou hast a careful father, child;
    One who, to put thee from thy heaviness,
    Hath sorted out a sudden day of joy
    That thou expects not nor I look'd not for.
I wonder at this haste, that I must wed
    Ere he that should be husband comes to woo.
I pray you tell my lord and father, madam,
    I will not marry yet; and when I do, I swear
    It shall be Romeo, whom you know I hate,
    Rather than Paris.
In one little body
    Thou counterfeit'st a bark, a sea, a wind:
    For still thy eyes, which I may call the sea,
    Do ebb and flow with tears; the bark thy body is
    Sailing in this salt flood; the winds, thy sighs,
    Who, raging with thy tears and they with them,
    Without a sudden calm will overset
    Thy tempest-tossed body.
I would the fool were married to her grave!
Proud can I never be of what I hate,
    But thankful even for hate that is meant love.
'Proud'- and 'I thank you'- and 'I thank you not'-
    And yet 'not proud'?
Mistress minion you,
    Thank me no thankings, nor proud me no prouds,
    But fettle your fine joints 'gainst Thursday next
    To go with Paris to Saint Peter's Church,
    Or I will drag thee on a hurdle thither.
Out, you green-sickness carrion I out, you baggage!
Good father, I beseech you on my knees,
    Hear me with patience but to speak a word.
I tell thee what- get thee to church a Thursday
    Or never after look me in the face.
Wife, we scarce thought us blest
    That God had lent us but this only child;
    But now I see this one is one too much,
    And that we have a curse in having her.
I speak no treason.
God's bread I it makes me mad.
Day, night, late, early,  
    At home, abroad, alone, in company,
    Waking or sleeping, still my care hath been
    To have her match'd; and having now provided
    A gentleman of princely parentage,
    Of fair demesnes, youthful, and nobly train'd,
    Stuff'd, as they say, with honourable parts,
    Proportion'd as one's thought would wish a man-
    And then to have a wretched puling fool,
    A whining mammet, in her fortune's tender,
    To answer 'I'll not wed, I cannot love;
    I am too young, I pray you pardon me'!
But, an you will not wed, I'll pardon you.
Look to't, think on't; I do not use to jest.
Thursday is near; lay hand on heart, advise:
    An you be mine, I'll give you to my friend;
    An you be not, hang, beg, starve, die in the streets,
    For, by my soul, I'll ne'er acknowledge thee,
    Nor what is mine shall never do thee good.
I'll not be forsworn.
Talk not to me, for I'll not speak a word.
Do as thou wilt, for I have done with thee.
Then, since the case so stands as now it doth,
    I think it best you married with the County.
Beshrew my very heart,
    I think you are happy in this second match,
    For it excels your first; or if it did not,
    Your first is dead- or 'twere as good he were
    As living here and you no use of him.
Go in; and tell my lady I am gone,
    Having displeas'd my father, to Laurence' cell,
    To make confession and to be absolv'd.
Marry, I will; and this is wisely done.
I'll to the friar to know his remedy.
Scene I.
My father Capulet will have it so,
    And I am nothing slow to slack his haste.
Uneven is the course; I like it not.
Immoderately she weeps for Tybalt's death,
    And therefore have I little talk'd of love;
    For Venus smiles not in a house of tears.
[aside] I would I knew not why it should be slow'd.
That may be, sir, when I may be a wife.
To answer that, I should confess to you.
I will confess to you that I love him.
So will ye, I am sure, that you love me.
If I do so, it will be of more price,
    Being spoke behind your back, than to your face.
That is no slander, sir, which is a truth;  
    And what I spake, I spake it to my face.
Are you at leisure, holy father, now,
    Or shall I come to you at evening mass
  Friar.
God shield I should disturb devotion!
Juliet, on Thursday early will I rouse ye.
Ah, Juliet, I already know thy grief;
    It strains me past the compass of my wits.
I hear thou must, and nothing may prorogue it,
    On Thursday next be married to this County.
Tell me not, friar, that thou hear'st of this,
    Unless thou tell me how I may prevent it.
If in thy wisdom thou canst give no help,
    Do thou but call my resolution wise  
    And with this knife I'll help it presently.
I long to die
    If what thou speak'st speak not of remedy.
I do spy a kind of hope,
    Which craves as desperate an execution
    As that is desperate which we would prevent.
If, rather than to marry County Paris
    Thou hast the strength of will to slay thyself,
    Then is it likely thou wilt undertake  
    A thing like death to chide away this shame,
    That cop'st with death himself to scape from it;
    And, if thou dar'st, I'll give thee remedy.
O, bid me leap, rather than marry Paris,
    From off the battlements of yonder tower,
    Or walk in thievish ways, or bid me lurk
    Where serpents are; chain me with roaring bears,
    Or shut me nightly in a charnel house,
    O'ercover'd quite with dead men's rattling bones,
    With reeky shanks and yellow chapless skulls;
    Or bid me go into a new-made grave
    And hide me with a dead man in his shroud-
    Things that, to hear them told, have made me tremble-
    And I will do it without fear or doubt,
    To live an unstain'd wife to my sweet love.
In the mean time, against thou shalt awake,  
    Shall Romeo by my letters know our drift;
    And hither shall he come; and he and I
    Will watch thy waking, and that very night
    Shall Romeo bear thee hence to Mantua.
I'll send a friar with speed
    To Mantua, with my letters to thy lord.
You shall have none ill, sir; for I'll try if they can lick
    their fingers.
Where I have learnt me to repent the sin
    Of disobedient opposition
    To you and your behests, and am enjoin'd
    By holy Laurence to fall prostrate here
    To beg your pardon.
Pardon, I beseech you!
Henceforward I am ever rul'd by you.
I'll have this knot knit up to-morrow morning.
I met the youthful lord at Laurence' cell
    And gave him what becomed love I might,
    Not stepping o'er the bounds of modesty.
Why, I am glad on't.
Ay, marry, go, I say, and fetch him hither.
Tush, I will stir about,
    And all things shall be well, I warrant thee, wife.
I'll not to bed to-night; let me alone.
I'll play the housewife for this once.
They are all forth; well, I will walk myself
    To County Paris, to prepare him up
    Against to-morrow.
Ay, those attires are best; but, gentle nurse,
    I pray thee leave me to myself to-night;
    For I have need of many orisons
    To move the heavens to smile upon my state,
    Which, well thou knowest, is cross and full of sin.
So please you, let me now be left alone,
    And let the nurse this night sit up with you;
    For I am sure you have your hands full all
    In this so sudden business.
I have a faint cold fear thrills through my veins
    That almost freezes up the heat of life.
I'll call them back again to comfort me.
My dismal scene I needs must act alone.
Shall I be married then to-morrow morning?
I fear it is; and yet methinks it should not,
    For he hath still been tried a holy man.
I will not entertain so bad a thought.
How if, when I am laid into the tomb,  
    I wake before the time that Romeo
    Come to redeem me?
Shall I not then be stifled in the vault,
    To whose foul mouth no healthsome air breathes in,
    And there die strangled ere my Romeo comes?
Or, if I live, is it not very like
    The horrible conceit of death and night,
    Together with the terror of the place-
    As in a vault, an ancient receptacle
    Where for this many hundred years the bones
    Of all my buried ancestors are pack'd;
    Where bloody Tybalt, yet but green in earth,
    Lies fest'ring in his shroud; where, as they say,
    At some hours in the night spirits resort-
    Alack, alack, is it not like that I,
    So early waking- what with loathsome smells,
    And shrieks like mandrakes torn out of the earth,
    That living mortals, hearing them, run mad-
    O, if I wake, shall I not be distraught,
    Environed with all these hideous fears,  
    And madly play with my forefathers' joints,
    And pluck the mangled Tybalt from his shroud.
methinks I see my cousin's ghost
    Seeking out Romeo, that did spit his body
    Upon a rapier's point.
Romeo, I come!
this do I drink to thee.
What, I have watch'd ere now
    All night for lesser cause, and ne'er been sick.
Ay, you have been a mouse-hunt in your time;
    But I will watch you from such watching now.
Things for the cook, sir; but I know not what.
I have a head, sir, that will find out logs
    And never trouble Peter for the matter.
I hear him near.
What, nurse, I say!
I'll go and chat with Paris.
The bridegroom he is come already:
    Make haste, I say.
Fast, I warrant her, she.
Why, love, I say!
Sleep for a week; for the next night, I warrant,
    The County Paris hath set up his rest
    That you shall rest but little.
I needs must wake her.
I must needs wake you.
O weraday that ever I was born!
Revive, look up, or I will die with thee!
I will die
    And leave him all.
Have I thought long to see this morning's face,
    And doth it give me such a sight as this?
Most lamentable day, most woful day
    That ever ever I did yet behold!
I will then give it you soundly.
I will give you the
     minstrel.
Then will I give you the serving-creature.
Then will I lay the serving-creature's dagger on your pate.
I will carry no crotchets.
I'll re you, I'll fa you.
I will dry-beat you with an iron
    wit, and put up my iron dagger.
I say 'silver sound' because musicians sound for silver.
Faith, I know not what to say.
O, I cry you mercy!
I will say for you.
Scene I.
If I may trust the flattering truth of sleep
    My dreams presage some joyful news at hand.
I dreamt my lady came and found me dead
    (Strange dream that gives a dead man leave to think!
)
    And breath'd such life with kisses in my lips
    That I reviv'd and was an emperor.
That I ask again,
    For nothing can be ill if she be well.
I saw her laid low in her kindred's vault
    And presently took post to tell it you.
Then I defy you, stars!
I will hence to-night.
I do beseech you, sir, have patience.
Leave me and do the thing I bid thee do.
I'll be with thee straight.
Well, Juliet, I will lie with thee to-night.
I do remember an apothecary,
    And hereabouts 'a dwells, which late I noted
    In tatt'red weeds, with overwhelming brows,
    Culling of simples.
Noting this penury, to myself I said,
    'An if a man did need a poison now
    Whose sale is present death in Mantua,  
    Here lives a caitiff wretch would sell it him.
As I remember, this should be the house.
I see that thou art poor.
Such mortal drugs I have; but Mantua's law
    Is death to any he that utters them.
I pay thy poverty and not thy will.
I sell thee poison; thou hast sold me none.
Come, cordial and not poison, go with me
    To Juliet's grave; for there must I use thee.
I could not send it- here it is again-  
    Nor get a messenger to bring it thee,
    So fearful were they of infection.
Brother, I'll go and bring it thee.
Now, must I to the monument alone.
She will beshrew me much that Romeo
    Hath had no notice of these accidents;
    But I will write again to Mantua,
    And keep her at my cell till Romeo come-
    Poor living corse, clos'd in a dead man's tomb!
Yet put it out, for I would not be seen.
Do as I bid thee, go.
[aside] I am almost afraid to stand alone
    Here in the churchyard; yet I will adventure.
Sweet flower, with flowers thy bridal bed I strew
    (O woe!
thy canopy is dust and stones)
    Which with sweet water nightly I will dew;
    Or, wanting that, with tears distill'd by moans.
The obsequies that I for thee will keep
    Nightly shall be to strew, thy grave and weep.
Upon thy life I charge thee,
    Whate'er thou hearest or seest, stand all aloof
    And do not interrupt me in my course.
Why I descend into this bed of death
    Is partly to behold my lady's face,
    But chiefly to take thence from her dead finger
    A precious ring- a ring that I must use
    In dear employment.
But if thou, jealous, dost return to pry
    In what I farther shall intend to do,
    By heaven, I will tear thee joint by joint
    And strew this hungry churchyard with thy limbs.
I will be gone, sir, and not trouble you.
[aside] For all this same, I'll hide me hereabout.
His looks I fear, and his intents I doubt.
Thou detestable maw, thou womb of death,
    Gorg'd with the dearest morsel of the earth,
    Thus I enforce thy rotten jaws to open,
    And in despite I'll cram thee with more food.
I will apprehend him.
Condemned villain, I do apprehend thee.
I must indeed; and therefore came I hither.
I beseech thee, youth,
    But not another sin upon my head
    By urging me to fury.
By heaven, I love thee better than myself,
    For I come hither arm'd against myself.
I do defy thy, conjuration
    And apprehend thee for a felon here.
I will go call the watch.
O, I am slain!
In faith, I will.
I think
    He told me Paris should have married Juliet.
or did I dream it so?
Or am I mad, hearing him talk of Juliet
    To think it was so?
I'll bury thee in a triumphant grave.
O, how may I
    Call this a lightning?
O, what more favour can I do to thee
    Than with that hand that cut thy youth in twain
    To sunder his that was thine enemy?
Shall I believe
    That unsubstantial Death is amorous,
    And that the lean abhorred monster keeps
    Thee here in dark to be his paramour?
For fear of that I still will stay with thee
    And never from this palace of dim night
    Depart again.
Here, here will I remain  
    With worms that are thy chambermaids.
O, here
    Will I set up my everlasting rest
    And shake the yoke of inauspicious stars
    From this world-wearied flesh.
Thus with a kiss I die.
As I discern,
    It burneth in the Capels' monument.
I dare not, sir.
My master knows not but I am gone hence,
    And fearfully did menace me with death
    If I did stay to look on his intents.
Stay then; I'll go alone.
O, much I fear some ill unthrifty thing.
As I did sleep under this yew tree here,
    I dreamt my master and another fought,
    And that my master slew him.
I do remember well where I should be,
    And there I am.
I hear some noise.
Come, I'll dispose of thee
    Among a sisterhood of holy nuns.
I dare no longer stay.
Go, get thee hence, for I will not away.
Poison, I see, hath been his timeless end.
I will kiss thy lips.
Then I'll be brief.
Seal up the mouth of outrage for a while,
    Till we can clear these ambiguities  
    And know their spring, their head, their true descent;
    And then will I be general of your woes
    And lead you even to death.
I am the greatest, able to do least,
    Yet most suspected, as the time and place
    Doth make against me, of this direful murther;
    And here I stand, both to impeach and purge
    Myself condemned and myself excus'd.
I will be brief, for my short date of breath
    Is not so long as is a tedious tale.
I married them; and their stol'n marriage day
    Was Tybalt's doomsday, whose untimely death
    Banish'd the new-made bridegroom from this city;
    For whom, and not for Tybalt, Juliet pin'd.
Then gave I her (so tutored by my art)
    A sleeping potion; which so took effect
    As I intended, for it wrought on her
    The form of death.
Meantime I writ to Romeo
    That he should hither come as this dire night
    To help to take her from her borrowed grave,
    Being the time the potion's force should cease.
Then all alone
    At the prefixed hour of her waking
    Came I to take her from her kindred's vault;
    Meaning to keep her closely at my cell
    Till I conveniently could send to Romeo.
But when I came, some minute ere the time  
    Of her awaking, here untimely lay
    The noble Paris and true Romeo dead.
She wakes; and I entreated her come forth
    And bear this work of heaven with patience;
    But then a noise did scare me from the tomb,
    And she, too desperate, would not go with me,
    But, as it seems, did violence on herself.
All this I know, and to the marriage
    Her nurse is privy; and if aught in this
    Miscarried by my fault, let my old life
    Be sacrific'd, some hour before his time,
    Unto the rigour of severest law.
I brought my master news of Juliet's death;
    And then in post he came from Mantua
    To this same place, to this same monument.
This letter he early bid me give his father,
    And threat'ned me with death, going in the vault,
    If I departed not and left him there.
I will look on it.
He came with flowers to strew his lady's grave;
    And bid me stand aloof, and so I did.
Anon comes one with light to ope the tomb;
    And by-and-by my master drew on him;
    And then I ran away to call the watch.
And I, for winking at you, discords too,
    Have lost a brace of kinsmen.
This is my daughter's jointure, for no more  
    Can I demand.
But I can give thee more;
    For I will raise her Statue in pure gold,
    That whiles Verona by that name is known,
    There shall no figure at such rate be set
    As that of true and faithful Juliet.
SCENE I.
I'll pheeze you, in faith.
I know my remedy; I must go fetch the third-borough.
Third, or fourth, or fifth borough, I'll answer him by law.
I'll not budge an inch, boy; let him come, and kindly.
Huntsman, I charge thee, tender well my hounds;  
    Brach Merriman, the poor cur, is emboss'd;
    And couple Clowder with the deep-mouth'd brach.
I would not lose the dog for twenty pound.
Why, Belman is as good as he, my lord;
    He cried upon it at the merest loss,
    And twice to-day pick'd out the dullest scent;
    Trust me, I take him for the better dog.
Thou art a fool; if Echo were as fleet,
    I would esteem him worth a dozen such.
But sup them well, and look unto them all;
    To-morrow I intend to hunt again.
I will, my lord.
Sirs, I will practise on this drunken man.
Believe me, lord, I think he cannot choose.
My lord, I warrant you we will play our part
    As he shall think by our true diligence
    He is no less than what we say he is.
This fellow I remember
    Since once he play'd a farmer's eldest son;
    'Twas where you woo'd the gentlewoman so well.
I have forgot your name; but, sure, that part
    Was aptly fitted and naturally perform'd.
I think 'twas Soto that your honour means.
Well, you are come to me in happy time,
    The rather for I have some sport in hand
    Wherein your cunning can assist me much.
There is a lord will hear you play to-night;
    But I am doubtful of your modesties,
    Lest, over-eying of his odd behaviour,
    For yet his honour never heard a play,
    You break into some merry passion
    And so offend him; for I tell you, sirs,
    If you should smile, he grows impatient.
See this dispatch'd with all the haste thou canst;
    Anon I'll give thee more instructions.
Exit a SERVINGMAN
    I know the boy will well usurp the grace,
    Voice, gait, and action, of a gentlewoman;
    I long to hear him call the drunkard 'husband';
    And how my men will stay themselves from laughter
    When they do homage to this simple peasant.
I'll in to counsel them; haply my presence
    May well abate the over-merry spleen,
    Which otherwise would grow into extremes.
I am Christophero Sly; call not me 'honour' nor 'lordship.
' I
    ne'er drank sack in my life; and if you give me any conserves,
    give me conserves of beef.
Ne'er ask me what raiment I'll wear,
    for I have no more doublets than backs, no more stockings than
    legs, nor no more shoes than feet- nay, sometime more feet than
    shoes, or such shoes as my toes look through the overleather.
Am not I Christopher Sly, old
    Sly's son of Burton Heath; by birth a pedlar, by education a  
    cardmaker, by transmutation a bear-herd, and now by present
    profession a tinker?
Ask Marian Hacket, the fat ale-wife of
    Wincot, if she know me not; if she say I am not fourteen pence on
    the score for sheer ale, score me up for the lying'st knave in
    Christendom.
I am not bestraught.
Am I a lord and have I such a lady?
Or do I dream?
Or have I dream'd till now?
I do not sleep: I see, I hear, I speak;
    I smell sweet savours, and I feel soft things.
Upon my life, I am a lord indeed,
    And not a tinker, nor Christopher Sly.
But did I never speak of all that time?
I thank thee; thou shalt not lose by it.
Marry, I fare well; for here is cheer enough.
My men should call me 'lord'; I am your goodman.
My husband and my lord, my lord and husband;
    I am your wife in all obedience.
I know it well.
What must I call her?
Madam wife, they say that I have dream'd
    And slept above some fifteen year or more.
For your physicians have expressly charg'd,
    In peril to incur your former malady,
    That I should yet absent me from your bed.
I hope this reason stands for my excuse.
Ay, it stands so that I may hardly tarry so long.
But I would
    be loath to fall into my dreams again.
I will therefore tarry in
    despite of the flesh and the blood.
Marry, I will; let them play it.
>>



ACT I.
SCENE I.
Tranio, since for the great desire I had
    To see fair Padua, nursery of arts,
    I am arriv'd for fruitful Lombardy,
    The pleasant garden of great Italy,
    And by my father's love and leave am arm'd
    With his good will and thy good company,
    My trusty servant well approv'd in all,
    Here let us breathe, and haply institute
    A course of learning and ingenious studies.
And therefore, Tranio, for the time I study,  
    Virtue and that part of philosophy
    Will I apply that treats of happiness
    By virtue specially to be achiev'd.
Tell me thy mind; for I have Pisa left
    And am to Padua come as he that leaves
    A shallow plash to plunge him in the deep,
    And with satiety seeks to quench his thirst.
Mi perdonato, gentle master mine;
    I am in all affected as yourself;
    Glad that you thus continue your resolve
    To suck the sweets of sweet philosophy.
Only, good master, while we do admire
    This virtue and this moral discipline,
    Let's be no Stoics nor no stocks, I pray,
    Or so devote to Aristotle's checks
    As Ovid be an outcast quite abjur'd.
Gentlemen, importune me no farther,
    For how I firmly am resolv'd you know;
    That is, not to bestow my youngest daughter
    Before I have a husband for the elder.
If either of you both love Katherina,  
    Because I know you well and love you well,
    Leave shall you have to court her at your pleasure.
[To BAPTISTA]  I pray you, sir, is it your will
    To make a stale of me amongst these mates?
I' faith, sir, you shall never need to fear;
    Iwis it is not halfway to her heart;
    But if it were, doubt not her care should be
    To comb your noddle with a three-legg'd stool,
    And paint your face, and use you like a fool.
But in the other's silence do I see
    Maid's mild behaviour and sobriety.
Gentlemen, that I may soon make good
    What I have said- Bianca, get you in;
    And let it not displease thee, good Bianca,
    For I will love thee ne'er the less, my girl.
Sir, to your pleasure humbly I subscribe;
    My books and instruments shall be my company,
    On them to look, and practise by myself.
Sorry am I that our good will effects
    Bianca's grief.
Gentlemen, content ye; I am resolv'd.
Exit BIANCA  
    And for I know she taketh most delight
    In music, instruments, and poetry,
    Schoolmasters will I keep within my house
    Fit to instruct her youth.
If you, Hortensio,
    Or, Signior Gremio, you, know any such,
    Prefer them hither; for to cunning men
    I will be very kind, and liberal
    To mine own children in good bringing-up;
    And so, farewell.
Katherina, you may stay;
    For I have more to commune with Bianca.
Why, and I trust I may go too, may I not?
shall I be appointed hours, as though, belike,
    I knew not what to take and what to leave?
Farewell; yet, for the love
    I bear my sweet Bianca, if I can by any means light on a fit man
    to teach her that wherein she delights, I will wish him to her
    father.
SO Will I, Signior Gremio; but a word, I pray.
What's that, I pray?
I say a husband.
I say a devil.
I cannot tell; but I had as lief take her dowry with this
    condition: to be whipp'd at the high cross every morning.
I am agreed; and would I had given him the best horse in
    Padua to begin his wooing that would thoroughly woo her, wed her,
    and bed her, and rid the house of her!
I pray, sir, tell me, is it possible
    That love should of a sudden take such hold?
O Tranio, till I found it to be true,
    I never thought it possible or likely.
while idly I stood looking on,
    I found the effect of love in idleness;
    And now in plainness do confess to thee,
    That art to me as secret and as dear
    As Anna to the Queen of Carthage was-
    Tranio, I burn, I pine, I perish, Tranio,
    If I achieve not this young modest girl.
Counsel me, Tranio, for I know thou canst;  
    Assist me, Tranio, for I know thou wilt.
O, yes, I saw sweet beauty in her face,
    Such as the daughter of Agenor had,
    That made great Jove to humble him to her hand,
    When with his knees he kiss'd the Cretan strand.
Tranio, I saw her coral lips to move,
    And with her breath she did perfume the air;
    Sacred and sweet was all I saw in her.
I pray, awake, sir.
Ay, marry, am I, sir, and now 'tis plotted.
I have it, Tranio.
Basta, content thee, for I have it full.
Then it follows thus:
    Thou shalt be master, Tranio, in my stead,
    Keep house and port and servants, as I should;
    I will some other be- some Florentine,
    Some Neapolitan, or meaner man of Pisa.
When Biondello comes, he waits on thee;
    But I will charm him first to keep his tongue.
[They exchange habits]
    In brief, sir, sith it your pleasure is,
    And I am tied to be obedient-
    For so your father charg'd me at our parting:
    'Be serviceable to my son' quoth he,  
    Although I think 'twas in another sense-
    I am content to be Lucentio,
    Because so well I love Lucentio.
Where have I been!
Your fellow Tranio here, to save my life,
    Puts my apparel and my count'nance on,
    And I for my escape have put on his;
    For in a quarrel since I came ashore
    I kill'd a man, and fear I was descried.
Wait you on him, I charge you, as becomes,
    While I make way from hence to save my life.
I, sir?
The better for him; would I were so too!
So could I, faith, boy, to have the next wish after,
    That Lucentio indeed had Baptista's youngest daughter.
But, sirrah, not for my sake but your master's, I advise
    You use your manners discreetly in all kind of companies.
When I am alone, why, then I am Tranio;
    But in all places else your master Lucentio.
Yes, by Saint Anne do I.
Verona, for a while I take my leave,
    To see my friends in Padua; but of all
    My best beloved and approved friend,
    Hortensio; and I trow this is his house.
Here, sirrah Grumio, knock, I say.
Whom should I knock?
Villain, I say, knock me here soundly.
Why, sir, what am I, sir, that I
    should knock you here, sir?
Villain, I say, knock me at this gate,
    And rap me well, or I'll knock your knave's pate.
I should knock you first,
    And then I know after who comes by the worst.
Faith, sirrah, an you'll not knock I'll ring it;
    I'll try how you can sol-fa, and sing it.
Now knock when I bid you, sirrah villain!
'Con tutto il cuore ben trovato' may I say.
Well, was it fit
    for a servant to use his master so; being, perhaps, for aught I
    see, two and thirty, a pip out?
Whom would to God I had well knock'd at first,
    Then had not Grumio come by the worst.
Good Hortensio,  
    I bade the rascal knock upon your gate,
    And could not get him for my heart to do it.
Sirrah, be gone, or talk not, I advise you.
Petruchio, patience; I am Grumio's pledge;
    Why, this's a heavy chance 'twixt him and you,
    Your ancient, trusty, pleasant servant Grumio.
But in a few,
    Signior Hortensio, thus it stands with me:
    Antonio, my father, is deceas'd,
    And I have thrust myself into this maze,
    Haply to wive and thrive as best I may;
    Crowns in my purse I have, and goods at home,
    And so am come abroad to see the world.
Petruchio, shall I then come roundly to thee
    And wish thee to a shrewd ill-favour'd wife?
Thou'dst thank me but a little for my counsel,
    And yet I'll promise thee she shall be rich,
    And very rich; but th'art too much my friend,
    And I'll not wish thee to her.
I come to wive it wealthily in Padua;
    If wealthily, then happily in Padua.
Petruchio, since we are stepp'd thus far in,
    I will continue that I broach'd in jest.
I can, Petruchio, help thee to a wife
    With wealth enough, and young and beauteous;
    Brought up as best becomes a gentlewoman;
    Her only fault, and that is faults enough,
    Is- that she is intolerable curst,
    And shrewd and froward so beyond all measure
    That, were my state far worser than it is,
    I would not wed her for a mine of gold.
Tell me her father's name, and 'tis enough;
    For I will board her though she chide as loud
    As thunder when the clouds in autumn crack.
I know her father, though I know not her;
    And he knew my deceased father well.
I will not sleep, Hortensio, till I see her;
    And therefore let me be thus bold with you
    To give you over at this first encounter,
    Unless you will accompany me thither.
I pray you, sir, let him go while the humour lasts.
O' my
    word, and she knew him as well as I do, she would think scolding
    would do little good upon him.
I'll tell you what, sir: an she stand
    him but a little, he will throw a figure in her face, and so
    disfigure her with it that she shall have no more eyes to see
    withal than a cat.
Tarry, Petruchio, I must go with thee,
    For in Baptista's keep my treasure is.
He hath the jewel of my life in hold,
    His youngest daughter, beautiful Bianca;
    And her withholds from me, and other more,  
    Suitors to her and rivals in my love;
    Supposing it a thing impossible-
    For those defects I have before rehears'd-
    That ever Katherina will be woo'd.
Now shall my friend Petruchio do me grace,
    And offer me disguis'd in sober robes
    To old Baptista as a schoolmaster
    Well seen in music, to instruct Bianca;
    That so I may by this device at least
    Have leave and leisure to make love to her,
    And unsuspected court her by herself.
O, very well; I have perus'd the note.
Hark you, sir; I'll have them very fairly bound-
    All books of love, see that at any hand;
    And see you read no other lectures to her.
You understand me- over and beside
    Signior Baptista's liberality,
    I'll mend it with a largess.
Whate'er I read to her, I'll plead for you
    As for my patron, stand you so assur'd,
    As firmly as yourself were still in place;
    Yea, and perhaps with more successful words  
    Than you, unless you were a scholar, sir.
Trow you whither I am going?
I promis'd to enquire carefully
    About a schoolmaster for the fair Bianca;
    And by good fortune I have lighted well
    On this young man; for learning and behaviour
    Fit for her turn, well read in poetry
    And other books- good ones, I warrant ye.
'Tis well; and I have met a gentleman
    Hath promis'd me to help me to another,
    A fine musician to instruct our mistress;
    So shall I no whit be behind in duty
    To fair Bianca, so beloved of me.
Listen to me, and if you speak me fair
    I'll tell you news indifferent good for either.
Here is a gentleman whom by chance I met,
    Upon agreement from us to his liking,
    Will undertake to woo curst Katherine;
    Yea, and to marry her, if her dowry please.
I know she is an irksome brawling scold;
    If that be all, masters, I hear no harm.
My father dead, my fortune lives for me;
    And I do hope good days and long to see.
Will I live?
Ay, or I'll hang her.
Why came I hither but to that intent?
Have I not in my time heard lions roar?
Have I not heard the sea, puff'd up with winds,
    Rage like an angry boar chafed with sweat?
Have I not heard great ordnance in the field,
    And heaven's artillery thunder in the skies?
Have I not in a pitched battle heard
    Loud 'larums, neighing steeds, and trumpets' clang?
I promis'd we would be contributors  
    And bear his charge of wooing, whatsoe'er.
I would I were as sure of a good dinner.
If I may be bold,
    Tell me, I beseech you, which is the readiest way
    To the house of Signior Baptista Minola?
Not her that chides, sir, at any hand, I pray.
I love no chiders, sir.
And if I be, sir, is it any offence?
Why, sir, I pray, are not the streets as free
    For me as for you?
For what reason, I beseech you?
Sir, give him head; I know he'll prove a jade.
No, sir, but hear I do that he hath two:
    The one as famous for a scolding tongue
    As is the other for beauteous modesty.
Sir, I shall not be slack; in sign whereof,
    Please ye we may contrive this afternoon,
    And quaff carouses to our mistress' health;
    And do as adversaries do in law-
    Strive mightily, but eat and drink as friends.
Petruchio, I shall be your ben venuto.
SCENE I.
Good sister, wrong me not, nor wrong yourself,
    To make a bondmaid and a slave of me-
    That I disdain; but for these other gawds,
    Unbind my hands, I'll pull them off myself,
    Yea, all my raiment, to my petticoat;
    Or what you will command me will I do,
    So well I know my duty to my elders.
Of all thy suitors here I charge thee tell
    Whom thou lov'st best.
Believe me, sister, of all the men alive
    I never yet beheld that special face
    Which I could fancy more than any other.
If you affect him, sister, here I swear
    I'll plead for you myself but you shall have him.
Nay, then you jest; and now I well perceive
    You have but jested with me all this while.
I prithee, sister Kate, untie my hands.
Her silence flouts me, and I'll be reveng'd.
Nay, now I see  
    She is your treasure, she must have a husband;
    I must dance bare-foot on her wedding-day,
    And for your love to her lead apes in hell.
Talk not to me; I will go sit and weep,
    Till I can find occasion of revenge.
Was ever gentleman thus griev'd as I?
I have a daughter, sir, call'd Katherina.
I am a gentleman of Verona, sir,
    That, hearing of her beauty and her wit,
    Her affability and bashful modesty,
    Her wondrous qualities and mild behaviour,
    Am bold to show myself a forward guest
    Within your house, to make mine eye the witness
    Of that report which I so oft have heard.
And, for an entrance to my entertainment,
    I do present you with a man of mine,
                                          [Presenting HORTENSIO]
    Cunning in music and the mathematics,
    To instruct her fully in those sciences,
    Whereof I know she is not ignorant.
Y'are welcome, sir, and he for your good sake;
    But for my daughter Katherine, this I know,
    She is not for your turn, the more my grief.
I see you do not mean to part with her;
    Or else you like not of my company.
Mistake me not; I speak but as I find.
What may I call your name?
I know him well; you are welcome for his sake.
Saving your tale, Petruchio, I pray,
    Let us that are poor petitioners speak too.
I would fain be doing.
I doubt it not, sir; but you will curse your wooing.
Neighbour, this is a gift very grateful, I am sure of it.
May I be so bold to know the cause of your coming?
This liberty is all that I request-
    That, upon knowledge of my parentage,
    I may have welcome 'mongst the rest that woo,
    And free access and favour as the rest.
And toward the education of your daughters
    I here bestow a simple instrument,
    And this small packet of Greek and Latin books.
Of whence, I pray?
By report
    I know him well.
You are passing welcome,
    And so I pray you all to think yourselves.
Signior Baptista, my business asketh haste,
    And every day I cannot come to woo.
You knew my father well, and in him me,
    Left solely heir to all his lands and goods,
    Which I have bettered rather than decreas'd.
Then tell me, if I get your daughter's love,  
    What dowry shall I have with her to wife?
And for that dowry, I'll assure her of
    Her widowhood, be it that she survive me,
    In all my lands and leases whatsoever.
Why, that is nothing; for I tell you, father,
    I am as peremptory as she proud-minded;
    And where two raging fires meet together,
    They do consume the thing that feeds their fury.
So I to her, and so she yields to me;
    For I am rough, and woo not like a babe.
For fear, I promise you, if I look pale.
I think she'll sooner prove a soldier:
    Iron may hold with her, but never lutes.
I did but tell her she mistook her frets,
    And bow'd her hand to teach her fingering,
    When, with a most impatient devilish spirit,
    'Frets, call you these?
' quoth she 'I'll fume with them.
'
    And with that word she struck me on the head,
    And through the instrument my pate made way;
    And there I stood amazed for a while,
    As on a pillory, looking through the lute,  
    While she did call me rascal fiddler
    And twangling Jack, with twenty such vile terms,
    As she had studied to misuse me so.
Now, by the world, it is a lusty wench;
    I love her ten times more than e'er I did.
O, how I long to have some chat with her!
Signior Petruchio, will you go with us,
    Or shall I send my daughter Kate to you?
I pray you do.
Exeunt all but PETRUCHIO
    I'll attend her here,
    And woo her with some spirit when she comes.
Say that she rail; why, then I'll tell her plain
    She sings as sweetly as a nightingale.
Say that she frown; I'll say she looks as clear
    As morning roses newly wash'd with dew.
Say she be mute, and will not speak a word;
    Then I'll commend her volubility,  
    And say she uttereth piercing eloquence.
If she do bid me pack, I'll give her thanks,
    As though she bid me stay by her a week;
    If she deny to wed, I'll crave the day
    When I shall ask the banns, and when be married.
Enter KATHERINA

    Good morrow, Kate- for that's your name, I hear.
I knew you at the first
    You were a moveable.
Alas, good Kate, I will not burden thee!
If I be waspish, best beware my sting.
Nay, come again,
    Good Kate; I am a gentleman.
That I'll try.
I swear I'll cuff you, if you strike again.
It is my fashion, when I see a crab.
Had I a glass I would.
Now, by Saint George, I am too young for you.
I care not.
I chafe you, if I tarry; let me go.
No, not a whit; I find you passing gentle.
'Twas told me you were rough, and coy, and sullen,
    And now I find report a very liar;
    For thou art pleasant, gamesome, passing courteous,
    But slow in speech, yet sweet as springtime flowers.
Am I not wise?
Marry, so I mean, sweet Katherine, in thy bed.
And therefore, setting all this chat aside,  
    Thus in plain terms: your father hath consented
    That you shall be my wife your dowry greed on;
    And will you, nill you, I will marry you.
Now, Kate, I am a husband for your turn;
    For, by this light, whereby I see thy beauty,
    Thy beauty that doth make me like thee well,
    Thou must be married to no man but me;
    For I am he am born to tame you, Kate,
    And bring you from a wild Kate to a Kate
    Conformable as other household Kates.
Never make denial;
    I must and will have Katherine to my wife.
It were impossible I should speed amiss.
Now I promise you  
    You have show'd a tender fatherly regard
    To wish me wed to one half lunatic,
    A mad-cap ruffian and a swearing Jack,
    That thinks with oaths to face the matter out.
I'll see thee hang'd on Sunday first.
I choose her for myself;
    If she and I be pleas'd, what's that to you?
I tell you 'tis incredible to believe.
Give me thy hand, Kate; I will unto Venice,
    To buy apparel 'gainst the wedding-day.
Provide the feast, father, and bid the guests;
    I will be sure my Katherine shall be fine.
I know not what to say; but give me your hands.
I will to Venice; Sunday comes apace;
    We will have rings and things, and fine array;
    And kiss me, Kate; we will be married a Sunday.
Faith, gentlemen, now I play a merchant's part,
    And venture madly on a desperate mart.
The gain I seek is quiet in the match.
But now, Baptista, to your younger daughter:
    Now is the day we long have looked for;
    I am your neighbour, and was suitor first.
And I am one that love Bianca more
    Than words can witness or your thoughts can guess.
Youngling, thou canst not love so dear as I.
Content you, gentlemen; I will compound this strife.
First, as you know, my house within the city
    Is richly furnished with plate and gold,
    Basins and ewers to lave her dainty hands;
    My hangings all of Tyrian tapestry;
    In ivory coffers I have stuff'd my crowns;
    In cypress chests my arras counterpoints,
    Costly apparel, tents, and canopies,
    Fine linen, Turkey cushions boss'd with pearl,
    Valance of Venice gold in needle-work;
    Pewter and brass, and all things that belongs
    To house or housekeeping.
Then at my farm
    I have a hundred milch-kine to the pail,
    Six score fat oxen standing in my stalls,
    And all things answerable to this portion.
Myself am struck in years, I must confess;
    And if I die to-morrow this is hers,
    If whilst I live she will be only mine.
Sir, list to me:  
    I am my father's heir and only son;
    If I may have your daughter to my wife,
    I'll leave her houses three or four as good
    Within rich Pisa's walls as any one
    Old Signior Gremio has in Padua;
    Besides two thousand ducats by the year
    Of fruitful land, all which shall be her jointure.
What, have I pinch'd you, Signior Gremio?
What, have I chok'd you with an argosy?
These I will assure her,
    And twice as much whate'er thou off'rest next.
Nay, I have off'red all; I have no more;
    And she can have no more than all I have;
    If you like me, she shall have me and mine.
I must confess your offer is the best;
    And let your father make her the assurance,
    She is your own.
That's but a cavil; he is old, I young.
Well, gentlemen,
    I am thus resolv'd: on Sunday next you know
    My daughter Katherine is to be married;
    Now, on the Sunday following shall Bianca
    Be bride to you, if you make this assurance;
    If not, to Signior Gremio.
And so I take my leave, and thank you both.
Exit BAPTISTA
    Now, I fear thee not.
Yet I have fac'd it with a card of ten.
'Tis in my head to do my master good:
    I see no reason but suppos'd Lucentio
    Must get a father, call'd suppos'd Vincentio;
    And that's a wonder- fathers commonly
    Do get their children; but in this case of wooing
    A child shall get a sire, if I fail not of my cunning.
SCENE I.
Then give me leave to read philosophy,
    And while I pause serve in your harmony.
Sirrah, I will not bear these braves of thine.
I arn no breeching scholar in the schools,
    I'll not be tied to hours nor 'pointed times,
    But learn my lessons as I please myself.
You'll leave his lecture when I am in tune?
'Hic ibat' as I told you before- 'Simois' I am Lucentio-
    'hic est' son unto Vincentio of Pisa- 'Sigeia tellus' disguised
    thus to get your love- 'Hic steterat' and that Lucentio that
    comes a-wooing- 'Priami' is my man Tranio- 'regia' bearing my
    port- 'celsa senis' that we might beguile the old pantaloon.
Now let me see if I can construe it: 'Hic ibat Simois' I
    know you not- 'hic est Sigeia tellus' I trust you not- 'Hic
    steterat Priami' take heed he hear us not- 'regia' presume not-
   'celsa senis' despair not.
Pedascule, I'll watch you better yet.
In time I may believe, yet I mistrust.
I must believe my master; else, I promise you,
    I should be arguing still upon that doubt;
    But let it rest.
Good master, take it not unkindly, pray,
    That I have been thus pleasant with you both.
Well, I must wait,
    [Aside]  And watch withal; for, but I be deceiv'd,
    Our fine musician groweth amorous.
Madam, before you touch the instrument
    To learn the order of my fingering,
    I must begin with rudiments of art,
    To teach you gamut in a briefer sort,
    More pleasant, pithy, and effectual,
    Than hath been taught by any of my trade;
    And there it is in writing fairly drawn.
Why, I am past my gamut long ago.
[Reads]
         '"Gamut" I am, the ground of all accord-
         "A re" to plead Hortensio's passion-
         "B mi" Bianca, take him for thy lord-
         "C fa ut" that loves with all affection-
         "D sol re" one clef, two notes have I-  
         "E la mi" show pity or I die.
Tut, I like it not!
Old fashions please me best; I am not so nice
    To change true rules for odd inventions.
Farewell, sweet masters, both; I must be gone.
Faith, mistress, then I have no cause to stay.
But I have cause to pry into this pedant;
    Methinks he looks as though he were in love.
If once I find thee ranging,
  HORTENSIO will be quit with thee by changing.
No shame but mine; I must, forsooth, be forc'd
    To give my hand, oppos'd against my heart,
    Unto a mad-brain rudesby, full of spleen,
    Who woo'd in haste and means to wed at leisure.
I told you, I, he was a frantic fool,
    Hiding his bitter jests in blunt behaviour;
    And, to be noted for a merry man,
    He'll woo a thousand, 'point the day of marriage,
    Make friends invited, and proclaim the banns;  
    Yet never means to wed where he hath woo'd.
Though he be blunt, I know him passing wise;
    Though he be merry, yet withal he's honest.
Go, girl, I cannot blame thee now to weep,
    For such an injury would vex a very saint;
    Much more a shrew of thy impatient humour.
When he stands where I am and sees you there.
I am glad he's come, howsoe'er he comes.
No, sir; I say his horse comes with him on his back.
Nay, by Saint Jamy,
             I hold you a penny,
             A horse and a man
             Is more than one,
             And yet not many.
And yet I come not well.
Not so well apparell'd
    As I wish you were.
Were it better, I should rush in thus.
Tedious it were to tell, and harsh to hear;
    Sufficeth I am come to keep my word,
    Though in some part enforced to digress,
    Which at more leisure I will so excuse
    As you shall well be satisfied withal.
I stay too long from her;
    The morning wears, 'tis time we were at church.
Not I, believe me; thus I'll visit her.
But thus, I trust, you will not marry her.
Could I repair what she will wear in me
    As I can change these poor accoutrements,
    'Twere well for Kate and better for myself.
But what a fool am I to chat with you,
    When I should bid good-morrow to my bride
    And seal the title with a lovely kiss!
I'll after him and see the event of this.
But to her love concerneth us to ad
    Her father's liking; which to bring to pass,
    As I before imparted to your worship,
    I am to get a man- whate'er he be
    It skills not much; we'll fit him to our turn-
    And he shall be Vincentio of Pisa,
    And make assurance here in Padua  
    Of greater sums than I have promised.
Were it not that my fellow schoolmaster
    Doth watch Bianca's steps so narrowly,
    'Twere good, methinks, to steal our marriage;
    Which once perform'd, let all the world say no,
    I'll keep mine own despite of all the world.
As willingly as e'er I came from school.
I'll tell you, Sir Lucentio: when the priest
    Should ask if Katherine should be his wife,
    'Ay, by gogs-wouns' quoth he, and swore so loud
    That, all amaz'd, the priest let fall the book;
    And as he stoop'd again to take it up,
    This mad-brain'd bridegroom took him such a cuff
    That down fell priest and book, and book and priest.
And I, seeing this, came thence for very shame;
    And after me, I know, the rout is coming.
I hear the minstrels play.
Gentlemen and friends, I thank you for your pains.
I know you think to dine with me to-day,
    And have prepar'd great store of wedding cheer
    But so it is- my haste doth call me hence,  
    And therefore here I mean to take my leave.
I must away to-day before night come.
And, honest company, I thank you all
    That have beheld me give away myself
    To this most patient, sweet, and virtuous wife.
For I must hence; and farewell to you all.
I am content.
I am content you shall entreat me stay;
    But yet not stay, entreat me how you can.
Nay, then,
    Do what thou canst, I will not go to-day;
    No, nor to-morrow, not till I please myself.
The door is open, sir; there lies your way;
    You may be jogging whiles your boots are green;
    For me, I'll not be gone till I please myself.
I will be angry; what hast thou to do?
I see a woman may be made a fool
    If she had not a spirit to resist.
Nay, look not big, nor stamp, nor stare, nor fret;
    I will be master of what is mine own-
    She is my goods, my chattels, she is my house,
    My household stuff, my field, my barn,
    My horse, my ox, my ass, my any thing,
    And here she stands; touch her whoever dare;
    I'll bring mine action on the proudest he
    That stops my way in Padua.
Fear not, sweet wench; they shall not touch thee, Kate;
    I'll buckler thee against a million.
Went they not quickly, I should die with laughing.
I warrant him, Petruchio is Kated.
SCENE I.
I am sent before to make a fire, and they are
    coming after to warm them.
Now were not I a little pot and soon
    hot, my very lips might freeze to my teeth, my tongue to the roof
    of my mouth, my heart in my belly, ere I should come by a fire to
    thaw me.
But I with blowing the fire shall warm myself; for,
    considering the weather, a taller man than I will take cold.
I am no beast.
Am I but three inches?
Why, thy horn is a foot, and so long
    am I at the least.
But wilt thou make a fire, or shall I complain
    on thee to our mistress, whose hand- she being now at hand- thou
    shalt soon feel, to thy cold comfort, for being slow in thy hot
    office?
I prithee, good Grumio, tell me how goes the world?
Why, therefore, fire; for I have caught extreme cold.
All ready; and therefore, I pray thee, news.
Now I begin:
    Imprimis, we came down a foul hill, my master riding behind my
    mistress-  
  CURTIS.
But hadst thou not cross'd me, thou
    shouldst have heard how her horse fell and she under her horse;
    thou shouldst have heard in how miry a place, how she was
    bemoil'd, how he left her with the horse upon her, how he beat me
    because her horse stumbled, how she waded through the dirt to
    pluck him off me, how he swore, how she pray'd that never pray'd
    before, how I cried, how the horses ran away, how her bridle was
    burst, how I lost my crupper- with many things of worthy memory,
    which now shall die in oblivion, and thou return unexperienc'd to
    thy grave.
But what talk I of this?
I call them forth to credit her.
I hear my master.
Where is the foolish knave I sent before?
Here, sir; as foolish as I was before.
Did I not bid thee meet me in the park
    And bring along these rascal knaves with thee?
Exeunt some of the SERVINGMEN

    [Sings]  Where is the life that late I led?
Re-enter SERVANTS with supper

    Why, when, I say?
Shall I have some water?
Patience, I pray you; 'twas a fault unwilling.
Come, Kate, sit down; I know you have a stomach.
Will you give thanks, sweet Kate, or else shall I?
I.
I'll be with you straight.
I pray you, husband, be not so disquiet;
    The meat was well, if you were so contented.
I tell thee, Kate, 'twas burnt and dried away,
    And I expressly am forbid to touch it;
    For it engenders choler, planteth anger;
    And better 'twere that both of us did fast,
    Since, of ourselves, ourselves are choleric,  
    Than feed it with such over-roasted flesh.
Come, I will bring thee to thy bridal chamber.
Thus have I politicly begun my reign,
    And 'tis my hope to end successfully.
Another way I have to man my haggard,
    To make her come, and know her keeper's call,
    That is, to watch her, as we watch these kites
    That bate and beat, and will not be obedient.
She eat no meat to-day, nor none shall eat;
    Last night she slept not, nor to-night she shall not;
    As with the meat, some undeserved fault
    I'll find about the making of the bed;
    And here I'll fling the pillow, there the bolster,
    This way the coverlet, another way the sheets;
    Ay, and amid this hurly I intend
    That all is done in reverend care of her-
    And, in conclusion, she shall watch all night;
    And if she chance to nod I'll rail and brawl  
    And with the clamour keep her still awake.
This is a way to kill a wife with kindness,
    And thus I'll curb her mad and headstrong humour.
I tell you, sir, she bears me fair in hand.
Sir, to satisfy you in what I have said,
    Stand by and mark the manner of his teaching.
I read that I profess, 'The Art to Love.
Now tell me, I pray,
    You that durst swear that your Mistress Blanca  
    Lov'd none in the world so well as Lucentio.
I tell thee, Licio, this is wonderful.
Mistake no more; I am not Licio.
Nor a musician as I seem to be;
    But one that scorn to live in this disguise
    For such a one as leaves a gentleman
    And makes a god of such a cullion.
Know, sir, that I am call'd Hortensio.
Signior Hortensio, I have often heard
    Of your entire affection to Bianca;
    And since mine eyes are witness of her lightness,
    I will with you, if you be so contented,
    Forswear Bianca and her love for ever.
Signior Lucentio,
    Here is my hand, and here I firmly vow
    Never to woo her more, but do forswear her,
    As one unworthy all the former favours
    That I have fondly flatter'd her withal.
And here I take the like unfeigned oath,  
    Never to marry with her though she would entreat;
    Fie on her!
For me, that I may surely keep mine oath,
    I will be married to a wealtlly widow
    Ere three days pass, which hath as long lov'd me
    As I have lov'd this proud disdainful haggard.
Kindness in women, not their beauteous looks,
    Shall win my love; and so I take my leave,
    In resolution as I swore before.
Nay, I have ta'en you napping, gentle love,
    And have forsworn you with Hortensio.
I' faith, he'll have a lusty widow now,
    That shall be woo'd and wedded in a day.
O master, master, have watch'd so long
    That I am dog-weary; but at last I spied
    An ancient angel coming down the hill
    Will serve the turn.
Master, a mercatante or a pedant,
    I know not what; but formal in apparel,
    In gait and countenance surely like a father.
If he be credulous and trust my tale,
    I'll make him glad to seem Vincentio,
    And give assurance to Baptista Minola
    As if he were the right Vincentio.
What countryman, I pray?
How, I pray?
For I have bills for money by exchange
    From Florence, and must here deliver them.
Well, sir, to do you courtesy,
    This will I do, and this I will advise you-
    First, tell me, have you ever been at Pisa?
Ay, sir, in Pisa have I often been,
    Pisa renowned for grave citizens.
I know him not, but I have heard of him,
    A merchant of incomparable wealth.
To save your life in this extremity,
    This favour will I do you for his sake;
    And think it not the worst of all your fortunes
    That you are like to Sir Vincentio.
O, sir, I do; and will repute you ever
    The patron of my life and liberty.
This, by the way, I let you understand:
    My father is here look'd for every day
    To pass assurance of a dow'r in marriage
    'Twixt me and one Baptista's daughter here.
In all these circumstances I'll instruct you.
No, no, forsooth; I dare not for my life.
Beggars that come unto my father's door
    Upon entreaty have a present alms;
    If not, elsewhere they meet with charity;
    But I, who never knew how to entreat,
    Nor never needed that I should entreat,
    Am starv'd for meat, giddy for lack of sleep;
    With oaths kept waking, and with brawling fed;
    And that which spites me more than all these wants-
    He does it under name of perfect love;
    As who should say, if I should sleep or eat,
    'Twere deadly sickness or else present death.
I prithee go and get me some repast;
    I care not what, so it be wholesome food.
'Tis passing good; I prithee let me have it.
I fear it is too choleric a meat.
I like it well; good Grumio, fetch it me.
I cannot tell; I fear 'tis choleric.
A dish that I do love to feed upon.
Nay, then I will not; you shall have the mustard,
    Or else you get no beef of Grumio.
Go, get thee gone, I say.
Here, love, thou seest how diligent I am,
    To dress thy meat myself, and bring it thee.
I am sure, sweet Kate, this kindness merits thanks.
I pray you, let it stand.
I thank you, sir.
Come, Mistress Kate, I'll bear you company.
I'll have no bigger; this doth fit the time,
    And gentlewomen wear such caps as these.
Why, sir, I trust I may have leave to speak;
    And speak I will.
I am no child, no babe.
My tongue will tell the anger of my heart,
    Or else my heart, concealing it, will break;
    And rather than it shall, I will be free
    Even to the uttermost, as I please, in words.
Why, thou say'st true; it is a paltry cap,
    A custard-coffin, a bauble, a silken pie;
    I love thee well in that thou lik'st it not.
Love me or love me not, I like the cap;
    And it I will have, or I will have none.
[Aside]  I see she's like to have neither cap nor gown.
Marry, and did; but if you be rememb'red,
    I did not bid you mar it to the time.
I'll none of it; hence!
I never saw a better fashion'd gown,
    More quaint, more pleasing, nor more commendable;
    Belike you mean to make a puppet of me.
Away, thou rag, thou quantity, thou remnant;
    Or I shall so bemete thee with thy yard
    As thou shalt think on prating whilst thou liv'st!
I tell thee, I, that thou hast marr'd her gown.
I gave him no order; I gave him the stuff.
I have.
I
    will neither be fac'd nor brav'd.
I say unto thee, I bid thy
    master cut out the gown; but I did not bid him cut it to pieces.
The note lies in's throat, if he say I said so.
Master, if ever I said loose-bodied gown, sew me in the
    skirts of it and beat me to death with a bottom of brown bread; I
    said a gown.
I confess the cape.
I confess two sleeves.
I commanded the
    sleeves should be cut out, and sew'd up again; and that I'll  
    prove upon thee, though thy little finger be armed in a thimble.
This is true that I say; an I had thee in place where, thou
    shouldst know it.
I am for thee straight; take thou the bill, give me thy
    meteyard, and spare not me.
Tailor, I'll pay thee for thy gown to-morrow;
    Take no unkindness of his hasty words.
Away, I say; commend me to thy master.
Let's see; I think 'tis now some seven o'clock,
    And well we may come there by dinner-time.
I dare assure you, sir, 'tis almost two,
    And 'twill be supper-time ere you come there.
It shall be seven ere I go to horse.
Look what I speak, or do, or think to do,
    You are still crossing it.
Sirs, let 't alone;
    I will not go to-day; and ere I do,
    It shall be what o'clock I say it is.
Sir, this is the house; please it you that I call?
And, but I be deceived,
    Signior Baptista may remember me
    Near twenty years ago in Genoa,
    Where we were lodgers at the Pegasus.
I warrant you.
Sirrah Biondello,
    Now do your duty throughly, I advise you.
I told him that your father was at Venice,
    And that you look'd for him this day in Padua.
[To To the PEDANT] Sir, this is the gentleman I told you of;
    I pray you stand good father to me now;
    Give me Bianca for my patrimony.
Sir, by your leave: having come to Padua
    To gather in some debts, my son Lucentio
    Made me acquainted with a weighty cause
    Of love between your daughter and himself;
    And- for the good report I hear of you,
    And for the love he beareth to your daughter,
    And she to him- to stay him not too long,  
    I am content, in a good father's care,
    To have him match'd; and, if you please to like
    No worse than I, upon some agreement
    Me shall you find ready and willing
    With one consent to have her so bestow'd;
    For curious I cannot be with you,
    Signior Baptista, of whom I hear so well.
Sir, pardon me in what I have to say.
I thank you, sir.
Not in my house, Lucentio, for you know
    Pitchers have ears, and I have many servants;
    Besides, old Gremio is heark'ning still,
    And happily we might be interrupted.
I pray the gods she may, with all my heart.
Exit BIONDELLO
    Signior Baptista, shall I lead the way?
I follow you.
I pray thee moralize them.
I cannot tell, except they are busied about a
    counterfeit assurance.
If this be not that you look for, I have more to say,
    But bid Bianca farewell for ever and a day.
I cannot tarry.
I knew a wench married in an afternoon
    as she went to the garden for parsley to stuff a rabbit; and so
    may you, sir; and so adieu, sir.
I may and will, if she be so contented.
She will be pleas'd; then wherefore should I doubt?
Hap what hap may, I'll roundly go about her;
    It shall go hard if Cambio go without her.
I say it is the moon that shines so bright.
I know it is the sun that shines so bright.
Now by my mother's son, and that's myself,
    It shall be moon, or star, or what I list,
    Or ere I journey to your father's house.
Forward, I pray, since we have come so far,
    And be it moon, or sun, or what you please;
    And if you please to call it a rush-candle,
    Henceforth I vow it shall be so for me.
I say it is the moon.
I know it is the moon.
Why, how now, Kate, I hope thou art not mad!
Pardon, old father, my mistaking eyes,
    That have been so bedazzled with the sun
    That everything I look on seemeth green;
    Now I perceive thou art a reverend father.
Pardon, I pray thee, for my mad mistaking.
Fair sir, and you my merry mistress,
    That with your strange encounter much amaz'd me,  
    My name is call'd Vincentio, my dwelling Pisa,
    And bound I am to Padua, there to visit
    A son of mine, which long I have not seen.
And now by law, as well as reverend age,
    I may entitle thee my loving father:
    The sister to my wife, this gentlewoman,
    Thy son by this hath married.
I do assure thee, father, so it is.
SCENE I.
I fly, Biondello; but they may chance to need the at
    home, therefore leave us.
Nay, faith, I'll see the church a your back, and then
    come back to my master's as soon as I can.
I marvel Cambio comes not all this while.
Sir, here's the door; this is Lucentio's house;
    My father's bears more toward the market-place;
    Thither must I, and here I leave you, sir.
You shall not choose but drink before you go;
    I think I shall command your welcome here,  
    And by all likelihood some cheer is toward.
Keep your hundred pounds to yourself; he shall need none so
    long as I live.
Nay, I told you your son was well beloved in Padua.
To leave frivolous circumstances, I pray you tell
    Signior Lucentio that his father is come from Pisa, and is here
    at the door to speak with him.
Ay, sir; so his mother says, if I may believe her.
Lay hands on the villain; I believe 'a means to cozen
    somebody in this city under my countenance.
I have seen them in the church together.
I hope I may choose, sir.
I could not forget you, for I never
    saw you before in all my life.
What am I, sir?
O, I am undone!
I am undone!
While I play the
    good husband at home, my son and my servant spend all at the
    university.
Why, sir, what 'cerns it you if I
    wear pearl and gold?
I thank my good father, I am able to
    maintain it.
As if I knew not his name!
I have brought him
    up ever since he was three years old, and his name is Tranio.
Lay hold on
    him, I charge you, in the Duke's name.
Father Baptista, I charge you
    see that he be forthcoming.
Talk not, Signior Gremio; I say he shall go to prison.
Take heed, Signior Baptista, lest you be cony-catch'd in
    this business; I dare swear this is the right Vincentio.
Nay, I dare not swear it.
Then thou wert best say that I am not Lucentio.
Yes, I know thee to be Signior Lucentio.
Bianca's love
    Made me exchange my state with Tranio,
    While he did bear my countenance in the town;
    And happily I have arrived at the last
    Unto the wished haven of my bliss.
I'll slit the villain's nose that would have sent me to
    the gaol.
Fear not, Baptista; we will content you, go to; but I
    will in to be revenged for this villainy.
And I to sound the depth of this knavery.
My cake is dough, but I'll in among the rest;
    Out of hope of all but my share of the feast.
Nay, I will give thee a kiss; now pray thee, love, stay.
My fair Bianca, bid my father welcome,
    While I with self-same kindness welcome thine.
For both our sakes I would that word were true.
Then never trust me if I be afeard.
YOU are very sensible, and yet you miss my sense:
    I mean Hortensio is afeard of you.
Thus I conceive by him.
'
    I pray you tell me what you meant by that.
Right, I mean you.
And I am mean, indeed, respecting you.
Ay, but not frighted me; therefore I'll sleep again.
Am I your bird?
I mean to shift my bush,
    And then pursue me as you draw your bow.
I thank thee for that gird, good Tranio.
'A has a little gall'd me, I confess;
    And, as the jest did glance away from me,
    'Tis ten to one it maim'd you two outright.
Now, in good sadness, son Petruchio,
    I think thou hast the veriest shrew of all.
Well, I say no; and therefore, for assurance,
    Let's each one send unto his wife,
    And he whose wife is most obedient,
    To come at first when he doth send for her,
    Shall win the wager which we will propose.
I'll venture so much of my hawk or hound,
    But twenty times so much upon my wife.
That will I.
I go.
Son, I'll be your half Bianca comes.
I'll have no halves; I'll bear it all myself.
I hope better.
I am afraid, sir,
    Do what you can, yours will not be entreated.
Sirrah Grumio, go to your mistress;
    Say I command her come to me.
I know her answer.
Away, I say, and bring them hither straight.
I wonder what it bodes.
The wager thou hast won; and I will ad
    Unto their losses twenty thousand crowns;
    Another dowry to another daughter,
    For she is chang'd, as she had never been.
Nay, I will win my wager better yet,
    And show more sign of her obedience,
    Her new-built virtue and obedience.
Lord, let me never have a cause to sigh
    Till I be brought to such a silly pass!
I would your duty were as foolish too;  
    The wisdom of your duty, fair Bianca,
    Hath cost me a hundred crowns since supper-time!
Katherine, I charge thee, tell these headstrong women
    What duty they do owe their lords and husbands.
Come on, I say; and first begin with her.
I say she shall.
I am asham'd that women are so simple
    To offer war where they should kneel for peace;
    Or seek for rule, supremacy, and sway,
    When they are bound to serve, love, and obey.
My mind hath been as big as one of yours,
    My heart as great, my reason haply more,
    To bandy word for word and frown for frown;
    But now I see our lances are but straws,
    Our strength as weak, our weakness past compare,
    That seeming to be most which we indeed least are.
[To LUCENTIO]  'Twas I won the wager, though you hit the white;  
    And being a winner, God give you good night!
>>



SCENE:
A ship at sea; afterwards an uninhabited island



THE TEMPEST
ACT I.
I pray now, keep below.
None that I more love than myself.
-Out of our way, I say.
I have great comfort from this fellow.
I'll warrant him for drowning, though the ship were
    no stronger than a nutshell, and as leaky as an unstanched
    wench.
I am out of patience.
Now would I give a thousand furlongs of sea for
    an acre of barren ground-long heath, brown furze, any
    thing.
The wills above be done, but I would fain die
    dry death.
O, I have suffered
    With those that I saw suffer!
Had I been any god of power, I would
    Have sunk the sea within the earth or ere
    It should the good ship so have swallow'd and
    The fraughting souls within her.
I have done nothing but in care of thee,
    Of thee, my dear one, thee, my daughter, who
    Art ignorant of what thou art, nought knowing
    Of whence I am, nor that I am more better
    Than Prospero, master of a full poor cell,
    And thy no greater father.
'Tis time
    I should inform thee farther.
The direful spectacle of the wreck, which touch'd
    The very virtue of compassion in thee,
    I have with such provision in mine art
    So safely ordered that there is no soul-
    No, not so much perdition as an hair
    Betid to any creature in the vessel  
    Which thou heard'st cry, which thou saw'st sink.
You have often
    Begun to tell me what I am; but stopp'd,
    And left me to a bootless inquisition,
    Concluding 'Stay; not yet.
I do not think thou canst; for then thou wast not
    Out three years old.
Certainly, sir, I can.
Had I not
    Four, or five, women once, that tended me?
But that I do not.
O, my heart bleeds
    To think o' th' teen that I have turn'd you to,
    Which is from my remembrance.
My brother and thy uncle, call'd Antonio-
    I pray thee, mark me that a brother should
    Be so perfidious.
He, whom next thyself
    Of all the world I lov'd, and to him put
    The manage of my state; as at that time
    Through all the signories it was the first,
    And Prospero the prime duke, being so reputed
    In dignity, and for the liberal arts
    Without a parallel, those being all my study-
    The government I cast upon my brother
    And to my state grew stranger, being transported
    And rapt in secret studies.
Being once perfected how to grant suits,
    How to deny them, who t' advance, and who
    To trash for over-topping, new created  
    The creatures that were mine, I say, or chang'd 'em,
    Or else new form'd 'em; having both the key
    Of officer and office, set all hearts i' th' state
    To what tune pleas'd his ear; that now he was
    The ivy which had hid my princely trunk
    And suck'd my verdure out on't.
O, good sir, I do!
I pray thee, mark me.
I thus neglecting worldly ends, all dedicated
    To closeness and the bettering of my mind
    With that which, but by being so retir'd,
    O'er-priz'd all popular rate, in my false brother
    Awak'd an evil nature; and my trust,
    Like a good parent, did beget of him
    A falsehood, in its contrary as great
    As my trust was; which had indeed no limit,
    A confidence sans bound.
I should sin
    To think but nobly of my grandmother:
    Good wombs have borne bad sons.
Now the condition:
    This King of Naples, being an enemy
    To me inveterate, hearkens my brother's suit;
    Which was, that he, in lieu o' th' premises,
    Of homage, and I know not how much tribute,
    Should presently extirpate me and mine
    Out of the dukedom, and confer fair Milan
    With all the honours on my brother.
I, not rememb'ring how I cried out then,
    Will cry it o'er again; it is a hint
    That wrings mine eyes to't.
Hear a little further,
    And then I'll bring thee to the present busines
    Which now's upon 's; without the which this story
    Were most impertinent.
Alack, what trouble  
    Was I then to you!
Thou didst smile,
    Infused with a fortitude from heaven,
    When I have deck'd the sea with drops full salt,
    Under my burden groan'd; which rais'd in me
    An undergoing stomach, to bear up
    Against what should ensue.
Some food we had and some fresh water that
    A noble Neapolitan, Gonzalo,
    Out of his charity, who being then appointed
    Master of this design, did give us, with
    Rich garments, linens, stuffs, and necessaries,
    Which since have steaded much; so, of his gentleness,
    Knowing I lov'd my books, he furnish'd me
    From mine own library with volumes that
    I prize above my dukedom.
Would I might  
    But ever see that man!
Now I arise.
Here in this island we arriv'd; and here
    Have I, thy schoolmaster, made thee more profit
    Than other princess' can, that have more time
    For vainer hours, and tutors not so careful.
And now, I pray you,
      sir,
    For still 'tis beating in my mind, your reason
    For raising this sea-storm?
Know thus far forth:
    By accident most strange, bountiful Fortune,
    Now my dear lady, hath mine enemies
    Brought to this shore; and by my prescience
    I find my zenith doth depend upon
    A most auspicious star, whose influence
    If now I court not, but omit, my fortunes
    Will ever after droop.
I know thou canst not choose.
[MIRANDA sleeps]
    Come away, servant; come; I am ready now.
I come
    To answer thy best pleasure; be't to fly,
    To swim, to dive into the fire, to ride
    On the curl'd clouds.
Hast thou, spirit,
    Perform'd to point the tempest that I bade thee?
I boarded the King's ship; now on the beak,
    Now in the waist, the deck, in every cabin,
    I flam'd amazement.
Sometime I'd divide,
    And burn in many places; on the topmast,
    The yards, and bowsprit, would I flame distinctly,  
    Then meet and join Jove's lightning, the precursors
    O' th' dreadful thunder-claps, more momentary
    And sight-outrunning were not; the fire and cracks
    Of sulphurous roaring the most mighty Neptune
    Seem to besiege, and make his bold waves tremble,
    Yea, his dread trident shake.
Not a hair perish'd;
    On their sustaining garments not a blemish,
    But fresher than before; and, as thou bad'st me,
    In troops I have dispers'd them 'bout the isle.
The King's son have I landed by himself,
    Whom I left cooling of the air with sighs
    In an odd angle of the isle, and sitting,
    His arms in this sad knot.
Safely in harbour
    Is the King's ship; in the deep nook, where once
    Thou call'dst me up at midnight to fetch dew
    From the still-vex'd Bermoothes, there she's hid;
    The mariners all under hatches stowed,
    Who, with a charm join'd to their suff'red labour,
    I have left asleep; and for the rest o' th' fleet,
    Which I dispers'd, they all have met again,  
    And are upon the Mediterranean flote
    Bound sadly home for Naples,
    Supposing that they saw the King's ship wreck'd,
    And his great person perish.
I prithee,
    Remember I have done thee worthy service,
    Told thee no lies, made thee no mistakings, serv'd  
    Without or grudge or grumblings.
Dost thou forget
    From what a torment I did free thee?
I do not, sir.
I must
    Once in a month recount what thou hast been,  
    Which thou forget'st.
Dull thing, I say so; he, that Caliban
    Whom now I keep in service.
Thou best know'st
    What torment I did find thee in; thy groans
    Did make wolves howl, and penetrate the breasts
    Of ever-angry bears; it was a torment
    To lay upon the damn'd, which Sycorax
    Could not again undo.
It was mine art,
    When I arriv'd and heard thee, that made gape
    The pine, and let thee out.
I thank thee, master.
If thou more murmur'st, I will rend an oak
    And peg thee in his knotty entrails, till
    Thou hast howl'd away twelve winters.
Pardon, master;
    I will be correspondent to command,
    And do my spriting gently.
Do so; and after two days  
    I will discharge thee.
What shall I do?
What shall I do?
'Tis a villain, sir,
    I do not love to look on.
Come forth, I say; there's other business for thee.
I must eat my dinner.
When thou cam'st first,
    Thou strok'st me and made much of me, wouldst give me
    Water with berries in't, and teach me how
    To name the bigger light, and how the less,
    That burn by day and night; and then I lov'd thee,
    And show'd thee all the qualities o' th' isle,
    The fresh springs, brine-pits, barren place and fertile.
Curs'd be I that did so!
For I am all the subjects that you have,
    Which first was mine own king; and here you sty me
    In this hard rock, whiles you do keep from me  
    The rest o' th' island.
I have us'd thee,
    Filth as thou art, with human care, and lodg'd thee
    In mine own cell, till thou didst seek to violate
    The honour of my child.
Thou didst prevent me; I had peopl'd else
    This isle with Calibans.
I pitied thee,
    Took pains to make thee speak, taught thee each hour
    One thing or other.
When thou didst not, savage,
    Know thine own meaning, but wouldst gabble like
    A thing most brutish, I endow'd thy purposes
    With words that made them known.
You taught me language, and my profit on't
    Is, I know how to curse.
If thou neglect'st, or dost unwillingly
    What I command, I'll rack thee with old cramps,
    Fill all thy bones with aches, make thee roar,
    That beasts shall tremble at thy din.
[Aside]  I must obey.
I hear
            The strain of strutting chanticleer
              Cry, Cock-a-diddle-dow.
I' th' air or th'
    earth?
Sitting on a bank,
    Weeping again the King my father's wreck,
    This music crept by me upon the waters,  
    Allaying both their fury and my passion
    With its sweet air; thence I have follow'd it,
    Or it hath drawn me rather.
now I hear them-Ding-dong bell.
I hear it now above me.
I might call him
    A thing divine; for nothing natural
    I ever saw so noble.
[Aside]  It goes on, I see,
    As my soul prompts it.
I'll free thee
    Within two days for this.
Vouchsafe my pray'r
    May know if you remain upon this island;
    And that you will some good instruction give  
    How I may bear me here.
My prime request,
    Which I do last pronounce, is, O you wonder!
I am the best of them that speak this speech,
    Were I but where 'tis spoken.
A single thing, as I am now, that wonders
    To hear thee speak of Naples.
He does hear me;
    And that he does I weep.
Delicate Ariel,
    I'll set thee free for this.
[To FERDINAND]  A word, good
    sir;
    I fear you have done yourself some wrong; a word.
This
    Is the third man that e'er I saw; the first
    That e'er I sigh'd for.
O, if a virgin,
    And your affection not gone forth, I'll make you
    The Queen of Naples.
[Aside]  They are both in either's pow'rs; but this swift
    busines
    I must uneasy make, lest too light winning
    Make the prize light.
[To FERDINAND]  One word more; I
    charge thee
    That thou attend me; thou dost here usurp
    The name thou ow'st not; and hast put thyself  
    Upon this island as a spy, to win it
    From me, the lord on't.
No, as I am a man.
Come;
    I'll manacle thy neck and feet together.
No;
    I will resist such entertainment till
    Mine enemy has more power.
What, I say,  
    My foot my tutor?
Come from thy ward;
    For I can here disarm thee with this stick
    And make thy weapon drop.
Sir, have pity;
    I'll be his surety.
My affections
    Are then most humble; I have no ambition
    To see a goodlier man.
My father's loss, the weakness which I feel,
    The wreck of all my friends, nor this man's threats
    To whom I am subdu'd, are but light to me,
    Might I but through my prison once a day
    Behold this maid.
All corners else o' th' earth
    Let liberty make use of; space enough
    Have I in such a prison.
Our hint of woe
    Is common; every day, some sailor's wife,
    The masters of some merchant, and the merchant,
    Have just our theme of woe; but for the miracle,
    I mean our preservation, few in millions
    Can speak like us.
You have taken it wiselier than I meant you
    should.
I prithee, spare.
Well, I have done; but yet-
  SEBASTIAN.
I assure you, Carthage.
I think he will carry this island home in his
    pocket, and give it his son for an apple.
Bate, I beseech you, widow Dido.
Is not, sir, my doublet as fresh as the first day I
    wore it?
I mean, in a sort.
When I wore it at your daughter's marriage?
Would I had never
    Married my daughter there; for, coming thence,
    My son is lost; and, in my rate, she too,
    Who is so far from Italy removed
    I ne'er again shall see her.
Sir, he may live;
    I saw him beat the surges under him,
    And ride upon their backs; he trod the water,
    Whose enmity he flung aside, and breasted  
    The surge most swoln that met him; his bold head
    'Bove the contentious waves he kept, and oared
    Himself with his good arms in lusty stroke
    To th' shore, that o'er his wave-worn basis bowed,
    As stooping to relieve him.
I not doubt
    He came alive to land.
We have lost your son,
    I fear, for ever.
Had I plantation of this isle, my lord-
  ANTONIO.
And were the king on't, what would I do?
I' th' commonwealth I would by contraries
    Execute all things; for no kind of traffic
    Would I admit; no name of magistrate;  
    Letters should not be known; riches, poverty,
    And use of service, none; contract, succession,
    Bourn, bound of land, tilth, vineyard, none;
    No use of metal, corn, or wine, or oil;
    No occupation; all men idle, all;
    And women too, but innocent and pure;
    No sovereignty-
  SEBASTIAN.
Treason, felony,
    Sword, pike, knife, gun, or need of any engine,
    Would I not have; but nature should bring forth,
    Of it own kind, all foison, all abundance,
    To feed my innocent people.
I would with such perfection govern, sir,
    T' excel the golden age.
I do well believe your Highness; and did it to
    minister occasion to these gentlemen, who are of such
    sensible and nimble lungs that they always use to laugh
    at nothing.
No, I warrant you; I will not adventure my
    discretion so weakly.
Will you laugh me asleep, for I am
    very heavy?
I wish mine eyes
    Would, with themselves, shut up my thoughts; I find
    They are inclin'd to do so.
I find not
    Myself dispos'd to sleep.
Nor I; my spirits are nimble.
And yet methinks I see it in thy face,
    What thou shouldst be; th' occasion speaks thee; and
    My strong imagination sees a crown
    Dropping upon thy head.
I do; and surely
    It is a sleepy language, and thou speak'st
    Out of thy sleep.
I am more serious than my custom; you
    Must be so too, if heed me; which to do
    Trebles thee o'er.
Well, I am standing water.
I'll teach you how to flow.
I have no hope
    That he's undrown'd.
There be that can rule Naples  
    As well as he that sleeps; lords that can prate
    As amply and unnecessarily
    As this Gonzalo; I myself could make
    A chough of as deep chat.
O, that you bore
    The mind that I do!
Methinks I do.
I remember
    You did supplant your brother Prospero.
If 'twere a kibe,
    'Twould put me to my slipper; but I feel not
    This deity in my bosom; twenty consciences
    That stand 'twixt me and Milan, candied be they  
    And melt, ere they molest!
Here lies your brother,
    No better than the earth he lies upon,
    If he were that which now he's like-that's dead;
    Whom I with this obedient steel, three inches of it,
    Can lay to bed for ever; whiles you, doing thus,
    To the perpetual wink for aye might put
    This ancient morsel, this Sir Prudence, who
    Should not upbraid our course.
Thy case, dear friend,
    Shall be my precedent; as thou got'st Milan,
    I'll come by Naples.
One stroke
    Shall free thee from the tribute which thou payest;
    And I the King shall love thee.
Draw together;
    And when I rear my hand, do you the like,
    To fall it on Gonzalo.
I heard nothing.
Upon mine honour, sir, I heard a humming,
    And that a strange one too, which did awake me;
    I shak'd you, sir, and cried; as mine eyes open'd,
    I saw their weapons drawn-there was a noise,
    That's verily.
Prospero my lord shall know what I have done;
    So, King, go safely on to seek thy son.
His spirits hear me,
    And yet I needs must curse.
But they'll nor pinch,
    Fright me with urchin-shows, pitch me i' th' mire,
    Nor lead me, like a firebrand, in the dark
    Out of my way, unless he bid 'em; but
    For every trifle are they set upon me;
    Sometime like apes that mow and chatter at me,
    And after bite me; then like hedgehogs which
    Lie tumbling in my barefoot way, and mount
    Their pricks at my footfall; sometime am I
    All wound with adders, who with cloven tongues
    Do hiss me into madness.
I'll fall flat;
    Perchance he will not mind me.
Here's neither bush nor shrub to bear off any
    weather at all, and another storm brewing; I hear it
    sing i' th' wind.
If
    it should thunder as it did before, I know not where to
    hide my head.
Were I in England now, as once I was, and
    had but this fish painted, not a holiday fool there but
    would give a piece of silver.
I do now
    let loose my opinion; hold it no longer: this is no
    fish, but an islander, that hath lately suffered by
    thunderbolt.
I will here shroud till the dregs
    of the storm be past.
I shall no more to sea, to sea,
    Here shall I die ashore-
    This is a very scurvy tune to sing at a man's funeral;
    well, here's my comfort.
[Drinks]

    The master, the swabber, the boatswain, and I,
    The gunner, and his mate,
    Lov'd Mall, Meg, and Marian, and Margery,
    But none of us car'd for Kate;  
    For she had a tongue with a tang,
    Would cry to a sailor 'Go hang!
I
    have not scap'd drowning to be afeard now of your four
    legs; for it hath been said: As proper a man as ever
    went on four legs cannot make him give ground; and it
    shall be said so again, while Stephano breathes at
    nostrils.
This is some monster of the isle with four legs,
    who hath got, as I take it, an ague.
I will give him some  
    relief, if it be but for that.
If I can recover him, and
    keep him tame, and get to Naples with him, he's a
    present for any emperor that ever trod on neat's
    leather.
Do not torment me, prithee; I'll bring my wood
    home faster.
If
    I can recover him, and keep him tame, I will not take
    too much for him; he shall pay for him that hath him,
    and that soundly.
Thou dost me yet but little hurt; thou wilt anon,
    I know it by thy trembling; now Prosper works upon thee.
Open your
    mouth; this will shake your shaking, I can tell you, and
    that soundly; you cannot tell who's your friend.
I should know that voice; it should be-but he is  
    drown'd; and these are devils.
If all the wine in my bottle will recover
    him, I will help his ague.
I will pour some
    in thy other mouth.
This is a devil, and no monster; I will leave him; I
    have no long spoon.
If thou beest Stephano, touch me, and
    speak to me; for I am Trinculo-be not afeard-thy good
    friend Trinculo.
If thou beest Trinculo, come forth; I'll pull
    the by the lesser legs; if any be Trinculo's legs, these
    are they.
I took him to be kill'd with a thunderstroke.
I hope now thou are
    not drown'd.
I hid me under the
    dead moon-calf's gaberdine for fear of the storm.
I will kneel to him.
Swear by this bottle how thou cam'st hither-I escap'd
    upon a butt of sack, which the sailors heaved o'erboard-
    by this bottle, which I made of the bark of a tree, with
    mine own hands, since I was cast ashore.
I'll swear upon that bottle to be thy true
    subject, for the liquor is not earthly.
Swum ashore, man, like a duck; I can swim like  
    a duck, I'll be sworn.
Out o' th' moon, I do assure thee; I was the Man
    i' th' Moon, when time was.
I have seen thee in her, and I do adore thee.
I will
    furnish it anon with new contents.
I afeard of him!
I'll show thee every fertile inch o' th' island;
    and will kiss thy foot.
I prithee be my god.
I'll kiss thy foot; I'll swear myself thy
    subject.
I shall laugh myself to death at this puppy-
    headed monster.
I could find in
    my heart to beat him-
  STEPHANO.
I'll show thee the best springs; I'll pluck thee
    berries;
    I'll fish for thee, and get thee wood enough.
A plague upon the tyrant that I serve!
I'll bear him no more sticks, but follow thee,
    Thou wondrous man.
I prithee let me bring thee where crabs grow;
    And I with my long nails will dig thee pig-nuts;
    Show thee a jay's nest, and instruct thee how
    To snare the nimble marmoset; I'll bring thee
    To clust'ring filberts, and sometimes I'll get thee
    Young scamels from the rock.
I prithee now, lead the way without any more
    talking.
No more dams I'll make for fish;
    Nor fetch in firing
    At requiring,
    Nor scrape trenchering, nor wash dish.
This my mean task
    Would be as heavy to me as odious, but
    The mistress which I serve quickens what's dead,
    And makes my labours pleasures.
I must remove
    Some thousands of these logs, and pile them up,
    Upon a sore injunction; my sweet mistress
    Weeps when she sees me work, and says such baseness
    Had never like executor.
I forget;
    But these sweet thoughts do even refresh my labours,
    Most busy, least when I do it.
Alas, now; pray you,
    Work not so hard; I would the lightning had
    Burnt up those logs that you are enjoin'd to pile.
O most dear mistress,
    The sun will set before I shall discharge
    What I must strive to do.
If you'll sit down,
    I'll bear your logs the while; pray give me that;
    I'll carry it to the pile.
No, precious creature;
    I had rather crack my sinews, break my back,
    Than you should such dishonour undergo,
    While I sit lazy by.
It would become me  
    As well as it does you; and I should do it
    With much more ease; for my good will is to it,
    And yours it is against.
I do beseech you,
    Chiefly that I might set it in my prayers,
    What is your name?
Miranda-O my father,
    I have broke your hest to say so!
Full many a lady
    I have ey'd with best regard; and many a time
    Th' harmony of their tongues hath into bondage
    Brought my too diligent ear; for several virtues
    Have I lik'd several women, never any
    With so full soul, but some defect in her
    Did quarrel with the noblest grace she ow'd,  
    And put it to the foil; but you, O you,
    So perfect and so peerless, are created
    Of every creature's best!
I do not know
    One of my sex; no woman's face remember,
    Save, from my glass, mine own; nor have I seen
    More that I may call men than you, good friend,
    And my dear father.
How features are abroad,
    I am skilless of; but, by my modesty,
    The jewel in my dower, I would not wish
    Any companion in the world but you;
    Nor can imagination form a shape,
    Besides yourself, to like of.
But I prattle
    Something too wildly, and my father's precepts
    I therein do forget.
I am, in my condition,
    A prince, Miranda; I do think, a king-
    I would not so!
Hear my soul speak:  
    The very instant that I saw you, did
    My heart fly to your service; there resides
    To make me slave to it; and for your sake
    Am I this patient log-man.
O heaven, O earth, bear witness to this sound,
    And crown what I profess with kind event,
    If I speak true!
I,
    Beyond all limit of what else i' th' world,
    Do love, prize, honour you.
I am a fool
    To weep at what I am glad of.
At mine unworthiness, that dare not offer
    What I desire to give, and much less take
    What I shall die to want.
I am your wife, if you will marry me;
    If not, I'll die your maid.
To be your fellow
    You may deny me; but I'll be your servant,
    Whether you will or no.
My mistress, dearest;
    And I thus humble ever.
So glad of this as they I cannot be,
    Who are surpris'd withal; but my rejoicing
    At nothing can be more.
I'll to my book;
    For yet ere supper time must I perform  
    Much business appertaining.
Drink, servant-monster, when I bid thee; thy
    eyes are almost set in thy head.
For my part, the sea cannot drown me; I swam, ere
    I could recover the shore, five and thirty leagues, off
    and on.
I'll not serve him; he is not valiant.
Thou liest, most ignorant monster: I am in case
    to justle a constable.
Why, thou debosh'd fish, thou,
    was there ever man a coward that hath drunk so much sack
    as I to-day?
Bite him to death, I prithee.
I thank my noble lord.
Wilt thou be pleas'd to
    hearken once again to the suit I made to thee?
Marry will I; kneel and repeat it; I will stand,
    and so shall Trinculo.
As I told thee before, I am subject to a tyrant,
    sorcerer, that by his cunning hath cheated me of the
    island.
Thou liest, thou jesting monkey, thou;
    I would my valiant master would destroy thee.
I do not lie.
Trinculo, if you trouble him any more in's tale,
    by this hand, I will supplant some of your teeth.
Why, I said nothing.
I say, by sorcery he got this isle;
    From me he got it.
If thy greatness will  
    Revenge it on him-for I know thou dar'st,
    But this thing dare not-
  STEPHANO.
Thou shalt be lord of it, and I'll serve thee.
Yea, yea, my lord; I'll yield him thee asleep,
    Where thou mayst knock a nail into his head.
I do beseech thy greatness, give him blows,
    And take his bottle from him.
When that's gone
    He shall drink nought but brine; for I'll not show him
    Where the quick freshes are.
Trinculo, run into no further danger; interrupt
    the monster one word further and, by this hand, I'll turn
    my mercy out o' doors, and make a stock-fish of thee.
Why, what did I?
I did nothing.
I'll go farther
    off.
Do I so?
I did not give the lie.
Beat him enough; after a little time, I'll beat
    him too.
Why, as I told thee, 'tis a custom with him
    I' th' afternoon to sleep; there thou mayst brain him,
    Having first seiz'd his books; or with a log
    Batter his skull, or paunch him with a stake,
    Or cut his wezand with thy knife.
Remember
    First to possess his books; for without them
    He's but a sot, as I am, nor hath not  
    One spirit to command; they all do hate him
    As rootedly as I.
I never saw a woman
    But only Sycorax my dam and she;
    But she as far surpasseth Sycorax
    As great'st does least.
Ay, lord; she will become thy bed, I warrant,
    And bring thee forth brave brood.
Monster, I will kill this man; his daughter and I
    will be King and Queen-save our Graces!
Give me thy hand; I am sorry I beat thee; but
    while thou liv'st, keep a good tongue in thy head.
This will I tell my master.
Thou mak'st me merry; I am full of pleasure.
At thy request, monster, I will do reason, any
    reason.
I defy thee.
No, monster, not I.
Sometimes a thousand twangling instruments
    Will hum about mine ears; and sometimes voices,
    That, if I then had wak'd after long sleep,
    Will make me sleep again; and then, in dreaming,
    The clouds methought would open and show riches
    Ready to drop upon me, that, when I wak'd,
    I cried to dream again.
This will prove a brave kingdom to me, where I
    shall have my music for nothing.
That shall be by and by; I remember the story.
I would I could see
    this taborer; he lays it on.
I'll follow, Stephano.
By'r lakin, I can go no further, sir;
    My old bones ache.
By your patience,
    I needs must rest me.
Old lord, I cannot blame thee,
    Who am myself attach'd with weariness
    To th' dulling of my spirits; sit down and rest.
Even here I will put off my hope, and keep it
    No longer for my flatterer; he is drown'd
    Whom thus we stray to find, and the sea mocks
    Our frustrate search on land.
[Aside to SEBASTIAN]  I am right glad that he's
    so out of hope.
[Aside to ANTONIO]  I say, to-night; no more.
Now I will believe
    That there are unicorns; that in Arabia
    There is one tree, the phoenix' throne, one phoenix
    At this hour reigning-there.
I'll believe both;
    And what does else want credit, come to me,
    And I'll be sworn 'tis true; travellers ne'er did lie,
    Though fools at home condemn 'em.
If in Naples
    I should report this now, would they believe me?
If I should say, I saw such islanders,
    For certes these are people of the island,
    Who though they are of monstrous shape yet, note,
    Their manners are more gentle-kind than of
    Our human generation you shall find
    Many, nay, almost any.
I cannot too much muse
    Such shapes, such gesture, and such sound, expressing,
    Although they want the use of tongue, a kind
    Of excellent dumb discourse.
Not I.
I will stand to, and feed,
    Although my last; no matter, since I feel
    The best is past.
I have made you mad;
    And even with such-like valour men hang and drown
    Their proper selves.
I and my fellows
    Are ministers of Fate; the elements
    Of whom your swords are temper'd may as well
    Wound the loud winds, or with bemock'd-at stabs
    Kill the still-closing waters, as diminish
    One dowle that's in my plume; my fellow-ministers
    Are like invulnerable.
They now are in my pow'r;
    And in these fits I leave them, while I visit
    Young Ferdinand, whom they suppose is drown'd,
    And his and mine lov'd darling.
I' th' name of something holy, sir, why stand you
    In this strange stare?
Therefore my son i' th' ooze is bedded; and
    I'll seek him deeper than e'er plummet sounded,
    And with him there lie mudded.
But one fiend at a time,  
    I'll fight their legions o'er.
I'll be thy second.
I do beseech you,
    That are of suppler joints, follow them swiftly,
    And hinder them from what this ecstasy
    May now provoke them to.
Follow, I pray you.
If I have too austerely punish'd you,
    Your compensation makes amends; for
    Have given you here a third of mine own life,
    Or that for which I live; who once again
    I tender to thy hand.
All thy vexations
    Were but my trials of thy love, and thou
    Hast strangely stood the test; here, afore heaven,
    I ratify this my rich gift.
Do not smile at me that I boast her off,
    For thou shalt find she will outstrip all praise,
    And make it halt behind her.
I do believe it
    Against an oracle.
As I hope
    For quiet days, fair issue, and long life,
    With such love as 'tis now, the murkiest den,
    The most opportune place, the strong'st suggestion
    Our worser genius can, shall never melt
    Mine honour into lust, to take away
    The edge of that day's celebration,
    When I shall think or Phoebus' steeds are founder'd
    Or Night kept chain'd below.
Here I am.
Thou and thy meaner fellows your last service
    Did worthily perform; and I must use you
    In such another trick.
Go bring the rabble,
    O'er whom I give thee pow'r, here to this place.
Incite them to quick motion; for I must
    Bestow upon the eyes of this young couple
    Some vanity of mine art; it is my promise,
    And they expect it from me.
I conceive.
I warrant you, sir,
    The white cold virgin snow upon my heart
    Abates the ardour of my liver.
Ceres, most bounteous lady, thy rich leas
    Of wheat, rye, barley, vetches, oats, and pease;
    Thy turfy mountains, where live nibbling sheep,
    And flat meads thatch'd with stover, them to keep;
    Thy banks with pioned and twilled brims,  
    Which spongy April at thy hest betrims,
    To make cold nymphs chaste crowns; and thy broom groves,
    Whose shadow the dismissed bachelor loves,
    Being lass-lorn; thy pole-clipt vineyard;
    And thy sea-marge, sterile and rocky hard,
    Where thou thyself dost air-the Queen o' th' sky,
    Whose wat'ry arch and messenger am I,
    Bids thee leave these; and with her sovereign grace,
    Here on this grass-plot, in this very place,
    To come and sport.
Since they did plot
    The means that dusky Dis my daughter got,
    Her and her blind boy's scandal'd company
    I have forsworn.
I met her Deity
    Cutting the clouds towards Paphos, and her son
    Dove-drawn with her.
Highest Queen of State,
    Great Juno, comes; I know her by her gait.
May I be bold
    To think these spirits?
Spirits, which by mine art
    I have from their confines call'd to enact
    My present fancies.
[Aside]  I had forgot that foul conspiracy
    Of the beast Caliban and his confederates
    Against my life; the minute of their plot
    Is almost come.
Never till this day
    Saw I him touch'd with anger so distemper'd.
These our actors,
    As I foretold you, were all spirits, and
    Are melted into air, into thin air;
    And, like the baseless fabric of this vision,
    The cloud-capp'd towers, the gorgeous palaces,
    The solemn temples, the great globe itself,
    Yea, all which it inherit, shall dissolve,
    And, like this insubstantial pageant faded,
    Leave not a rack behind.
Sir, I am vex'd;
    Bear with my weakness; my old brain is troubled;
    Be not disturb'd with my infirmity.
If you be pleas'd, retire into my cell  
    And there repose; a turn or two I'll walk
    To still my beating mind.
I thank thee, Ariel; come.
Thy thoughts I cleave to.
When I presented 'Ceres.
'
    I thought to have told thee of it; but I fear'd
    Lest I might anger thee.
I told you, sir, they were red-hot with drinking;
    So full of valour that they smote the air
    For breathing in their faces; beat the ground
    For kissing of their feet; yet always bending
    Towards their project.
Then I beat my tabor,
    At which like unback'd colts they prick'd their ears,  
    Advanc'd their eyelids, lifted up their noses
    As they smelt music; so I charm'd their cars,
    That calf-like they my lowing follow'd through
    Tooth'd briers, sharp furzes, pricking goss, and thorns,
    Which ent'red their frail shins.
At last I left them
    I' th' filthy mantled pool beyond your cell,
    There dancing up to th' chins, that the foul lake
    O'erstunk their feet.
I go, I go.
I will plague them all,
    Even to roaring.
Monster, I do smell all horse-piss at which my
    nose is in great indignation.
If I should
    take a displeasure against you, look you-
  TRINCULO.
Be patient, for the prize I'll bring thee to
    Shall hoodwink this mischance; therefore speak softly.
I will fetch off my bottle, though I be o'er
    ears for my labour.
Do that good mischief which may make this island
    Thine own for ever, and I, thy Caliban,
    For aye thy foot-licker.
I do begin to have bloody
    thoughts.
Put off that gown, Trinculo; by this hand, I'll  
    have that gown.
I thank thee for that jest; here's a garment
    for't.
Wit shall not go unrewarded while I am king of
    this country.
I will have none on't.
Monster, lay-to your fingers; help to bear this
    away where my hogshead of wine is, or I'll turn you out
    of my kingdom.
I did say so,
    When first I rais'd the tempest.
Mine would, sir, were I human.
Though with their high wrongs I am struck to th' quick,
    Yet with my nobler reason 'gainst my fury
    Do I take part; the rarer action is
    In virtue than in vengeance; they being penitent,
    The sole drift of my purpose doth extend
    Not a frown further.
Go release them, Ariel;
    My charms I'll break, their senses I'll restore,
    And they shall be themselves.
I'll fetch them, sir.
Ye elves of hills, brooks, standing lakes, and
    groves;
    And ye that on the sands with printless foot
    Do chase the ebbing Neptune, and do fly him
    When he comes back; you demi-puppets that
    By moonshine do the green sour ringlets make,
    Whereof the ewe not bites; and you whose pastime
    Is to make midnight mushrooms, that rejoice
    To hear the solemn curfew; by whose aid-
    Weak masters though ye be-I have be-dimm'd
    The noontide sun, call'd forth the mutinous winds,
    And 'twixt the green sea and the azur'd vault
    Set roaring war.
To the dread rattling thunder
    Have I given fire, and rifted Jove's stout oak
    With his own bolt; the strong-bas'd promontory
    Have I made shake, and by the spurs pluck'd up
    The pine and cedar.
But this rough magic
    I here abjure; and, when I have requir'd  
    Some heavenly music-which even now I do-
    To work mine end upon their senses that
    This airy charm is for, I'll break my staff,
    Bury it certain fathoms in the earth,
    And deeper than did ever plummet sound
    I'll drown my book.
I will pay thy graces
    Home both in word and deed.
Flesh and blood,
    You, brother mine, that entertain'd ambition,
    Expell'd remorse and nature, who, with Sebastian-
    Whose inward pinches therefore are most strong-
    Would here have kill'd your king, I do forgive thee,
    Unnatural though thou art.
Ariel,  
    Fetch me the hat and rapier in my cell;           Exit ARIEL
    I will discase me, and myself present
    As I was sometime Milan.
ARIEL, on returning, sings and helps to attire him

    Where the bee sucks, there suck I;
    In a cowslip's bell I lie;
    There I couch when owls do cry.
On the bat's back I do fly
    After summer merrily.
Merrily, merrily shall I live now
    Under the blossom that hangs on the bough.
I shall miss thee;
    But yet thou shalt have freedom.
To the King's ship, invisible as thou art;
    There shalt thou find the mariners asleep
    Under the hatches; the master and the boatswain  
    Being awake, enforce them to this place;
    And presently, I prithee.
I drink the air before me, and return
    Or ere your pulse twice beat.
For more assurance that a living prince
    Does now speak to thee, I embrace thy body;
    And to thee and thy company I bid
    A hearty welcome.
Whe'er thou be'st he or no,
    Or some enchanted trifle to abuse me,
    As late I have been, I not know.
Thy pulse
    Beats, as of flesh and blood; and, since I saw thee,
    Th' affliction of my mind amends, with which,
    I fear, a madness held me.
Thy dukedom I resign, and do entreat
    Thou pardon me my wrongs.
Whether this be
    Or be not, I'll not swear.
[Aside to SEBASTIAN and ANTONIO]  But you, my brace of
      lords, were I so minded,
    I here could pluck his Highness' frown upon you,
    And justify you traitors; at this time
    I will tell no tales.
For you, most wicked sir, whom to call brother
    Would even infect my mouth, I do forgive  
    Thy rankest fault-all of them; and require
    My dukedom of thee, which perforce I know
    Thou must restore.
If thou beest Prospero,
    Give us particulars of thy preservation;
    How thou hast met us here, whom three hours since
    Were wreck'd upon this shore; where I have lost-
    How sharp the point of this remembrance is!
I am woe for't, sir.
I rather think
    You have not sought her help, of whose soft grace
    For the like loss I have her sovereign aid,
    And rest myself content.
As great to me as late; and, supportable
    To make the dear loss, have I means much weaker
    Than you may call to comfort you, for I  
    Have lost my daughter.
That they were, I wish
    Myself were mudded in that oozy bed
    Where my son lies.
I perceive these lords
    At this encounter do so much admire
    That they devour their reason, and scarce think
    Their eyes do offices of truth, their words
    Are natural breath; but, howsoe'er you have
    Been justled from your senses, know for certain
    That I am Prospero, and that very duke
    Which was thrust forth of Milan; who most strangely
    Upon this shore, where you were wrecked, was landed
    To be the lord on't.
Welcome, sir;
    This cell's my court; here have I few attendants,  
    And subjects none abroad; pray you, look in.
My dukedom since you have given me again,
    I will requite you with as good a thing;
    At least bring forth a wonder, to content ye
    As much as me my dukedom.
No, my dearest love,
    I would not for the world.
Yes, for a score of kingdoms you should wrangle
    And I would call it fair play.
If this prove
    A vision of the island, one dear son
    Shall I twice lose.
Though the seas threaten, they are merciful;
    I have curs'd them without cause.
I chose her when I could not ask my father
    For his advice, nor thought I had one.
She
    Is daughter to this famous Duke of Milan,
    Of whom so often I have heard renown
    But never saw before; of whom I have
    Receiv'd a second life; and second father  
    This lady makes him to me.
I am hers.
But, O, how oddly will it sound that I
    Must ask my child forgiveness!
I have inly wept,
    Or should have spoke ere this.
I say, Amen, Gonzalo!
I prophesied, if a gallows were on land,
    This fellow could not drown.
[Aside to PROSPERO]  Sir, all this service
    Have I done since I went.
If I did think, sir, I were well awake,
    I'd strive to tell you.
Sir, my liege,
    Do not infest your mind with beating on
    The strangeness of this business; at pick'd leisure,
    Which shall be shortly, single I'll resolve you,
    Which to you shall seem probable, of every
    These happen'd accidents; till when, be cheerful
    And think of each thing well.
If these be true spies which I wear in my head,
    here's a goodly sight.
I am afraid
    He will chastise me.
Two of these fellows you
    Must know and own; this thing of darkness I
    Acknowledge mine.
I shall be pinch'd to death.
I have been in such a pickle since I saw you
    last that, I fear me, will never out of my bones.
I
    shall not fear fly-blowing.
O, touch me not; I am not Stephano, but a
    cramp.
I should have been a sore one, then.
[Pointing to CALIBAN]  This is as strange a thing
    as e'er I look'd on.
Ay, that I will; and I'll be wise hereafter,
    And seek for grace.
What a thrice-double ass
    Was I to take this drunkard for a god,
    And worship this dull fool!
Sir, I invite your Highness and your train
    To my poor cell, where you shall take your rest
    For this one night; which, part of it, I'll waste
    With such discourse as, I not doubt, shall make it
    Go quick away-the story of my life,
    And the particular accidents gone by
    Since I came to this isle.
And in the morn
    I'll bring you to your ship, and so to Naples,  
    Where I have hope to see the nuptial
    Of these our dear-belov'd solemnized,
    And thence retire me to my Milan, where
    Every third thought shall be my grave.
I long
    To hear the story of your life, which must
    Take the ear strangely.
I'll deliver all;
    And promise you calm seas, auspicious gales,
    And sail so expeditious that shall catch
    Your royal fleet far off.
Exeunt



EPILOGUE
                             EPILOGUE
                        Spoken by PROSPERO

          Now my charms are all o'erthrown,
          And what strength I have's mine own,
          Which is most faint.
Now 'tis true,
          I must be here confin'd by you,
          Or sent to Naples.
Let me not,
          Since I have my dukedom got,
          And pardon'd the deceiver, dwell
          In this bare island by your spell;
          But release me from my bands
          With the help of your good hands.
Now I want
          Spirits to enforce, art to enchant;
          And my ending is despair
          Unless I be reliev'd by prayer,
          Which pierces so that it assaults
          Mercy itself, and frees all faults.
>>



SCENE:
Athens and the neighbouring woods


ACT I.
SCENE I.
I am glad y'are well.
I have not seen you long; how goes the world?
I know the merchant.
I know them both; th' other's a jeweller.
I have a jewel here-  
  MERCHANT.
I will say of it
    It tutors nature.
I have in this rough work shap'd out a man
    Whom this beneath world doth embrace and hug  
    With amplest entertainment.
No levell'd malice
    Infects one comma in the course I hold,
    But flies an eagle flight, bold and forth on,
    Leaving no tract behind.
How shall I understand you?
I will unbolt to you.
I saw them speak together.
Sir, I have upon a high and pleasant hill
    Feign'd Fortune to be thron'd.
Amongst them all
    Whose eyes are on this sovereign lady fix'd
    One do I personate of Lord Timon's frame,
    Whom Fortune with her ivory hand wafts to her;
    Whose present grace to present slaves and servants
    Translates his rivals.
A thousand moral paintings I can show
    That shall demonstrate these quick blows of Fortune's
    More pregnantly than words.
I am not of that feather to shake of
    My friend when he must need me.
I do know him
    A gentleman that well deserves a help,
    Which he shall have.
I'll pay the debt, and free him.
Commend me to him; I will send his ransom;
    And being enfranchis'd, bid him come to me.
I have so; what of him?
I am a man
    That from my first have been inclin'd to thrift,
    And my estate deserves an heir more rais'd
    Than one which holds a trencher.
One only daughter have I, no kin else,
    On whom I may confer what I have got.
The maid is fair, o' th' youngest for a bride,
    And I have bred her at my dearest cost
    In qualities of the best.
This man of thine
    Attempts her love; I prithee, noble lord,  
    Join with me to forbid him her resort;
    Myself have spoke in vain.
If in her marriage my consent be missing,
    I call the gods to witness I will choose
    Mine heir from forth the beggars of the world,
    And dispossess her all.
To build his fortune I will strain a little,
    For 'tis a bond in men.
Give him thy daughter:
    What you bestow, in him I'll counterpoise,
    And make him weigh with her.
Humbly I thank your lordship.
I thank you; you shall hear from me anon;
    Go not away.
A piece of painting, which I do beseech
    Your lordship to accept.
I like your work,
    And you shall find I like it; wait attendance
    Till you hear further from me.
A mere satiety of commendations;
    If I should pay you for't as 'tis extoll'd,
    It would unclew me quite.
Till I be gentle, stay thou for thy good morrow;
    When thou art Timon's dog, and these knaves honest.
Then I repent not.
Thou know'st I do; I call'd thee by thy name.
Of nothing so much as that I am not like Timon.
Thy mother's of my generation; what's she, if I be a dog?
No; I eat not lords.
Then I lie not.
Heavens, that I were a lord!
That I had no angry wit to be a lord.
Go not you hence
    Till I have thank'd you.
I am joyful of your sights.
Sir, you have sav'd my longing, and I feed
    Most hungerly on your sight.
Shouldst have kept one to thyself, for I mean to give
    thee none.
No, I will do nothing at thy bidding; make thy requests
    to thy friend.
Away, unpeaceable dog, or I'll spurn thee hence.
I will fly, like a dog, the heels o' th' ass.
I'll keep you company.
Then, as in grateful virtue I am bound
    To your free heart, I do return those talents,
    Doubled with thanks and service, from whose help
    I deriv'd liberty.
You mistake my love;
    I gave it freely ever; and there's none
    Can truly say he gives, if he receives.
I come to have thee thrust me out of doors.
I come to observe; I give thee warning on't.
I take no heed of thee.
I myself would have no power; prithee let my meat make
    thee silent.
I scorn thy meat; 't'would choke me, for I should ne'er
    flatter thee.
I wonder men dare trust themselves with men.
If
    I were a huge man I should fear to drink at meals.
APEMANTUS' Grace

           Immortal gods, I crave no pelf;
           I pray for no man but myself.
Grant I may never prove so fond
           To trust man on his oath or bond,
           Or a harlot for her weeping,
           Or a dog that seems a-sleeping,
           Or a keeper with my freedom,
           Or my friends, if I should need 'em.
Rich men sin, and I eat root.
So they were bleeding new, my lord, there's no meat
    like 'em; I could wish my best friend at such a feast.
O, no doubt, my good friends, but the gods themselves have
    provided that I shall have much help from you.
I have told
    more of you to myself than you can with modesty speak in your own
    behalf; and thus far I confirm you.
O you gods, think I, what
    need we have any friends if we should ne'er have need of 'em?
Why, I have
    often wish'd myself poorer, that I might come nearer to you.
To forget their
    faults, I drink to you.
I laugh to think that babe a bastard.
I promise you, my lord, you mov'd me much.
I pray let them be admitted.
I should fear those that dance before me now
    Would one day stamp upon me.
You have done our pleasures much grace, fair ladies,
    Set a fair fashion on our entertainment,
    Which was not half so beautiful and kind;
    You have added worth unto't and lustre,
    And entertain'd me with mine own device;
    I am to thank you for't.
Faith, for the worst is filthy, and would not hold
    taking, I doubt me.
There is no crossing him in's humour,
    Else I should tell him- well i' faith, I should-
    When all's spent, he'd be cross'd then, an he could.
O my friends,
    I have one word to say to you.
Look you, my good lord,
    I must entreat you honour me so much
    As to advance this jewel; accept it and wear it,
    Kind my lord.
I am so far already in your gifts-
  ALL.
I beseech your honour, vouchsafe me a word; it does
    concern you near.
Why then, another time I'll hear thee.
I prithee let's
    be provided to show them entertainment.
[Aside] I scarce know how.
I shall accept them fairly.
I'll hunt with him; and let them be receiv'd,
    Not without fair reward.
Well, would I were gently put out of office
    Before I were forc'd out!
I bleed inwardly for my lord.
With more than common thanks I will receive it.
And now I remember, my lord, you gave good words the other
    day of a bay courser I rode on.
O, I beseech you pardon me, my lord, in that.
You may take my word, my lord: I know no man
    Can justly praise but what he does affect.
I weigh my friend's affection with mine own.
I'll tell you true; I'll call to you.
I take all and your several visitations
    So kind to heart 'tis not enough to give;
    Methinks I could deal kingdoms to my friends
    And ne'er be weary.
And so am I to you.
I doubt whether their legs be worth the sums
    That are given for 'em.
Now, Apemantus, if thou wert not sullen
    I would be good to thee.
No, I'll nothing; for if I should be brib'd too, there
    would be none left to rail upon thee, and then thou wouldst sin
    the faster.
Thou giv'st so long, Timon, I fear me thou wilt give
    away thyself in paper shortly.
Nay, an you begin to rail on society once, I am sworn not to
    give regard to you.
I'll
    lock thy heaven from thee.
SCENE I.
If I want gold, steal but a beggar's dog
    And give it Timon, why, the dog coins gold.
If I would sell my horse and buy twenty moe
    Better than he, why, give my horse to Timon,
    Ask nothing, give it him, it foals me straight,
    And able horses.
Caphis, I say!
Get on your cloak and haste you to Lord Timon;
    Importune him for my moneys; be not ceas'd
    With slight denial, nor then silenc'd when
    'Commend me to your master' and the cap
    Plays in the right hand, thus; but tell him
    My uses cry to me, I must serve my turn
    Out of mine own; his days and times are past,
    And my reliances on his fracted dates
    Have smit my credit.
I love and honour him,
    But must not break my back to heal his finger.
Get you gone;
    Put on a most importunate aspect,
    A visage of demand; for I do fear,
    When every feather sticks in his own wing,
    Lord Timon will be left a naked gull,
    Which flashes now a phoenix.
I go, sir.
I will, sir.
I must be round with him.
I fear it.
Mine honest friend,
    I prithee but repair to me next morning.
Your steward puts me off, my lord; and
    I am sent expressly to your lordship.
I do beseech you, good my lords, keep on;
    I'll wait upon you instantly.
Pray you,
    How goes the world that I am thus encount'red
    With clamorous demands of date-broke bonds
    And the detention of long-since-due debts,
    Against my honour?
Your importunacy cease till after dinner,
    That I may make his lordship understand
    Wherefore you are not paid.
I speak not to thee.
Would I had a rod in my mouth, that I might answer thee  
    profitably!
Prithee, Apemantus, read me the superscription of these
    letters; I know not which is which.
Answer not: I am gone.
Fool, I will go with you to Lord Timon's.
So would I- as good a trick as ever hangman serv'd
    thief.
I think no usurer but has a fool to his servant.
My mistress  
    is one, and I am her fool.
I could render one.
As much foolery as I have, so much wit thou lack'st.
I do not always follow lover, elder brother, and woman;
    sometime the philosopher.
Pray you walk near; I'll speak with you anon.
You make me marvel wherefore ere this time
    Had you not fully laid my state before me,
    That I might so have rated my expense
    As I had leave of means.
You would not hear me
    At many leisures I propos'd.
O my good lord,
    At many times I brought in my accounts,  
    Laid them before you; you would throw them off
    And say you found them in mine honesty.
When, for some trifling present, you have bid me
    Return so much, I have shook my head and wept;
    Yea, 'gainst th' authority of manners, pray'd you
    To hold your hand more close.
I did endure
    Not seldom, nor no slight checks, when I have
    Prompted you in the ebb of your estate
    And your great flow of debts.
So the gods bless me,
    When all our offices have been oppress'd
    With riotous feeders, when our vaults have wept
    With drunken spilth of wine, when every room
    Hath blaz'd with lights and bray'd with minstrelsy,
    I have retir'd me to a wasteful cock
    And set mine eyes at flow.
'Heavens,' have I said 'the bounty of this lord!
No villainous bounty yet hath pass'd my heart;
    Unwisely, not ignobly, have I given.
Canst thou the conscience lack
    To think I shall lack friends?
Secure thy heart:
    If I would broach the vessels of my love,
    And try the argument of hearts by borrowing,
    Men and men's fortunes could I frankly use
    As I can bid thee speak.
And, in some sort, these wants of mine are crown'd
    That I account them blessings; for by these
    Shall I try friends.
You shall perceive how you
    Mistake my fortunes; I am wealthy in my friends.
I will dispatch you severally- you to Lord Lucius; to Lord
    Lucullus you; I hunted with his honour to-day.
Commend me to their loves; and I am proud, say, that my occasions
    have found time to use 'em toward a supply of money.
Go you, sir, to the senators,
    Of whom, even to the state's best health, I have
    Deserv'd this hearing.
I have been bold,
    For that I knew it the most general way,
    To them to use your signet and your name;
    But they do shake their heads, and I am here
    No richer in return.
Prithee be not sad,
    Thou art true and honest; ingeniously I speak,
    No blame belongs to thee.
When he was poor,  
    Imprison'd, and in scarcity of friends,
    I clear'd him with five talents.
I would I could not think it.
SCENE I.
I have told my lord of you; he is coming down to you.
I thank you, sir.
A gift, I warrant.
Why,
    this hits right; I dreamt of a silver basin and ewer to-night-
    Flaminius, honest Flaminius, you are very respectively welcome,
    sir.
I am right glad that his health is well, sir.
Faith, nothing but an empty box, sir, which in my lord's  
    behalf I come to entreat your honour to supply;  who, having
    great and instant occasion to use fifty talents, hath sent to
    your lordship to furnish him, nothing doubting your present
    assistance therein.
Many a time and often I ha' din'd with him and told him
    on't; and come again to supper to him of purpose to have him
    spend less; and yet he would embrace no counsel, take no warning
    by my coming.
I ha'
    told him on't, but I could ne'er get him from't.
Flaminius, I have noted thee always wise.
I have observed thee always for a towardly prompt spirit,
    give thee thy due, and one that knows what belongs to reason, and
    canst use the time well, if the time use thee well.
Now I see thou art a fool, and fit for thy master.
O you gods,
    I feel my master's passion!
But I can tell you one thing, my lord, and
    which I hear from common rumours: now Lord Timon's happy hours
    are done and past, and his estate shrinks from him.
I tell you, denied, my lord.
Now, before the gods, I am
    asham'd on't.
For my own part, I must needs confess I have
    received some small kindnesses from him, as money, plate, jewels,  
    and such-like trifles, nothing comparing to his; yet, had he
    mistook him and sent to me, I should ne'er have denied his
    occasion so many talents.
See, by good hap, yonder's my lord; I have sweat to see
    his honour.
I am so much endeared to that lord:
    he's ever sending.
How shall I thank him, think'st thou?
I know his lordship is but merry with me;
    He cannot want fifty-five hundred talents.
If his occasion were not virtuous
    I should not urge it half so faithfully.
What a wicked beast was I to disfurnish myself against such
    a good time, when I might ha' shown myself honourable!
How
    unluckily it happ'ned that I should purchase the day before for a
    little part and undo a great deal of honour!
Servilius, now
    before the gods, I am not able to do- the more beast, I say!
I
    was sending to use Lord Timon myself, these gentlemen can
    witness; but I would not for the wealth of Athens I had done't
    now.
Commend me bountifully to his good lordship, and I hope his
    honour will conceive the fairest of me, because I have no power
    to be kind.
And tell him this from me: I count it one of my
    greatest afflictions, say, that I cannot pleasure such an
    honourable gentleman.
Yes, sir, I shall.
I'll look you out a good turn, Servilius.
For mine own part,
    I never tasted Timon in my life,  
    Nor came any of his bounties over me
    To mark me for his friend; yet I protest,
    For his right noble mind, illustrious virtue,
    And honourable carriage,
    Had his necessity made use of me,
    I would have put my wealth into donation,
    And the best half should have return'd to him,
    So much I love his heart.
But I perceive
    Men must learn now with pity to dispense;
    For policy sits above conscience.
Must I be his last refuge?
Must I take th' cure upon me?
Has much disgrac'd me in't; I'm angry at him,
    That might have known my place.
I see no sense for't,
    But his occasions might have woo'd me first;  
    For, in my conscience, I was the first man
    That e'er received gift from him.
And does he think so backwardly of me now
    That I'll requite it last?
No;
    So it may prove an argument of laughter
    To th' rest, and I 'mongst lords be thought a fool.
I'd rather than the worth of thrice the sum
    Had sent to me first, but for my mind's sake;
    I'd such a courage to do him good.
The devil
    knew not what he did when he made man politic- he cross'd himself
    by't; and I cannot think but, in the end, the villainies of man
    will set him clear.
Ay, and I think one business does command us all;
    for mine is money.
I wonder on't; he was wont to shine at seven.
I fear
    'Tis deepest winter in Lord Timon's purse;
    That is, one may reach deep enough and yet
    Find little.
I am of your fear for that.
I'll show you how t' observe a strange event.
And he wears jewels now of Timon's gift,
    For which I wait for money.
I'm weary of this charge, the gods can witness;
    I know my lord hath spent of Timon's wealth,
    And now ingratitude makes it worse than stealth.
I need not tell him that; he knows you are to diligent.
Believe't, my lord and I have made an end:
    I have no more to reckon, he to spend.
If I might beseech you, gentlemen, to repair some other
    hour, I should derive much from't; for take't of my soul, my lord
    leans wondrously to discontent.
Have I been ever free, and must my house
    Be my retentive enemy, my gaol?
The place which I have feasted, does it now,
    Like all mankind, show me an iron heart?
Faith, I perceive our masters may throw their caps at
    their money.
I'll have it so.
I'll once more feast the rascals.
Go, I charge thee, invite them all; let in the tide
    Of knaves once more; my cook and I'll provide.
I am an humble suitor to your virtues;
    For pity is the virtue of the law,
    And none but tyrants use it cruelly.
My lords, then, under favour, pardon me
    If I speak like a captain:
    Why do fond men expose themselves to battle,
    And not endure all threats?
To kill, I grant, is sin's extremest gust;  
    But, in defence, by mercy, 'tis most just.
Why, I say, my lords, has done fair service,
    And slain in fight many of your enemies;
    How full of valour did he bear himself
    In the last conflict, and made plenteous wounds!
My lords, if not for any parts in him-
    Though his right arm might purchase his own time,
    And be in debt to none- yet, more to move you,
    Take my deserts to his, and join 'em both;
    And, for I know your reverend ages love
    Security, I'll pawn my victories, all
    My honours to you, upon his good returns.
My lords,
    I do beseech you, know me.
I cannot think but your age has forgot me;
    It could not else be I should prove so base
    To sue, and be denied such common grace.
I'm worse than mad; I have kept back their foes,
    While they have told their money and let out
    Their coin upon large interest, I myself
    Rich only in large hurts.
It comes not ill; I hate not to be banish'd;
    It is a cause worthy my spleen and fury,
    That I may strike at Athens.
I'll cheer up
    My discontented troops, and lay for hearts.
I also wish it to you.
I think this honourable lord
    did but try us this other day.
I hope it is not so low with him as he made it seem in the trial
    of his several friends.
I should think so.
He hath sent me an earnest inviting,
    which many my near occasions did urge me to put off; but he hath
    conjur'd me beyond them, and I must needs appear.
In like manner was I in debt to my importunate
    business, but he would not hear my excuse.
I am sorry, when he
    sent to borrow of me, that my provision was out.
I am sick of that grief too, as I understand how all
    things go.
I hope it remains not unkindly with your lordship that
    I return'd you an empty messenger.
My most honourable lord, I am e'en sick of shame that,
    when your lordship this other day sent to me, I was so
    unfortunate a beggar.
Royal cheer, I warrant you.
I pray you, upon what?
I'll tell you more anon.
I do conceive.
I know not.
Stay, I will lend thee money, borrow none.
I have lost my gown.
I feel't upon my bones.
SCENE I.
Nothing I'll bear from thee
    But nakedness, thou detestable town!
Alack, my fellows, what should I say to you?
Let me be recorded by the righteous gods,
    I am as poor as you.
Yet do our hearts wear Timon's livery;
    That see I by our faces.
Good fellows all,
    The latest of my wealth I'll share amongst you.
I'll follow and enquire him out.
I'll ever serve his mind with my best will;  
    Whilst I have gold, I'll be his steward still.
No, gods,
    I am no idle votarist.
Come, damn'd earth,
    Thou common whore of mankind, that puts odds
    Among the rout of nations, I will make thee
    Do thy right nature.
Th'art quick,
    But yet I'll bury thee.
I am Misanthropos, and hate mankind.
For thy part, I do wish thou wert a dog,
    That I might love thee something.
I know thee well;
    But in thy fortunes am unlearn'd and strange.
I know thee too; and more than that I know thee
    I not desire to know.
I will not kiss thee; then the rot returns
    To thine own lips again.
But then renew I could not, like the moon;
    There were no suns to borrow of.
Noble Timon,
    What friendship may I do thee?
I have heard in some sort of thy miseries.
Thou saw'st them when I had prosperity.
I see them now; then was a blessed time.
I have but little gold of late, brave Timon,
    The want whereof doth daily make revolt
    In my penurious band.
I have heard, and griev'd,
    How cursed Athens, mindless of thy worth,
    Forgetting thy great deeds, when neighbour states,
    But for thy sword and fortune, trod upon them-
  TIMON.
I prithee beat thy drum and get thee gone.
I am thy friend, and pity thee, dear Timon.
I had rather be alone.
Keep it: I cannot eat it.
When I have laid proud Athens on a heap-
  TIMON.
I'll take the gold thou givest me,
    Not all thy counsel.
Hold up, you sluts,
    Your aprons mountant; you are not oathable,
    Although I know you'll swear, terribly swear,
    Into strong shudders and to heavenly agues,
    Th' immortal gods that hear you.
Spare your oaths;
    I'll trust to your conditions.
More whore, more mischief first; I have given you earnest.
Farewell, Timon;
    If I thrive well, I'll visit thee again.
If I hope well, I'll never see thee more.
I never did thee harm.
I was directed hither.
'Tis, then, because thou dost not keep a dog,
    Whom I would imitate.
Were I like thee, I'd throw away myself.
I love thee better now than e'er I did.
I hate thee worse.
I flatter not, but say thou art a caitiff.
But myself,
    Who had the world as my confectionary;
    The mouths, the tongues, the eyes, and hearts of men
    At duty, more than I could frame employment;
    That numberless upon me stuck, as leaves
    Do on the oak, have with one winter's brush
    Fell from their boughs, and left me open, bare
    For every storm that blows- I to bear this,
    That never knew but better, is some burden.
Ay, that I am not thee.
I, that I was
    No prodigal.
I, that I am one now.
Were all the wealth I have shut up in thee,
    I'd give thee leave to hang it.
Thus would I eat it.
I will mend thy feast.
So I shall mend mine own by th' lack of thine.
If not, I would it were.
If thou wilt,
    Tell them there I have gold; look, so I have.
finds meat; or rather, where I eat it.
On what I hate I feed not.
I understand thee: thou hadst some means to keep a dog.
I will fear to catch it, and give way.
When I
    know not what else to do, I'll see thee again.
I had rather be a beggar's dog than Apemantus.
If I name thee.
I'll beat thee- but I should infect my hands.
I would my tongue could rot them off!
Choler does kill me that thou art alive;
    I swoon to see thee.
I am sorry I shall lose
    A stone by thee.
I am sick of this false world, and will love nought
    But even the mere necessities upon't.
But not till I am dead.
I'll say th' hast gold.
Thy back, I prithee.
[Exit APEMANTUS] I am quit.
He; I know him.
Yet thanks I must you con
    That you are thieves profess'd, that you work not
    In holier shapes; for there is boundless theft
    In limited professions.
I'll example you with thievery:
    The sun's a thief, and with his great attraction
    Robs the vast sea; the moon's an arrant thief,
    And her pale fire she snatches from the sun;
    The sea's a thief, whose liquid surge resolves
    The moon into salt tears; the earth's a thief,
    That feeds and breeds by a composture stol'n  
    From gen'ral excrement- each thing's a thief.
Steal not less for this
    I give you; and gold confound you howsoe'er!
I'll believe him as an enemy, and give over my
    trade.
Grant I may ever love, and rather woo
    Those that would mischief me than those that do!
Has caught me in his eye; I will present
    My honest grief unto him, and as my lord
    Still serve him with my life.
I have forgot all men;
    Then, if thou grant'st th'art a man, I have forgot thee.
Then I know thee not.
I never had honest man about me, I.
All I kept were knaves, to serve in meat to villains.
Then I love thee
    Because thou art a woman and disclaim'st
    Flinty mankind, whose eyes do never give
    But thorough lust and laughter.
I beg of you to know me, good my lord,
    T' accept my grief, and whilst this poor wealth lasts
    To entertain me as your steward still.
Had I a steward
    So true, so just, and now so comfortable?
I do proclaim
    One honest man- mistake me not, but one;
    No more, I pray- and he's a steward.
How fain would I have hated all mankind!
But all, save thee,
    I fell with curses.
But tell me true,
    For I must ever doubt though ne'er so sure,
    Is not thy kindness subtle, covetous,
    If not a usuring kindness, and as rich men deal gifts,
    Expecting in return twenty for one?
That which I show, heaven knows, is merely love,  
    Duty, and zeal, to your unmatched mind,
    Care of your food and living; and believe it,
    My most honour'd lord,
    For any benefit that points to me,
    Either in hope or present, I'd exchange
    For this one wish, that you had power and wealth
    To requite me by making rich yourself.
SCENE I.
As I took note of the place, it cannot be far where he
    abides.
Nothing at this time but my visitation; only I will
    promise him an excellent piece.
I must serve him so too, tell him of an intent that's coming
    toward him.
I am thinking what I shall say I have provided for him.
Do so, I have  
    gold for thee.
[Aside] I'll meet you at the turn.
Fit I meet them.
Have I once liv'd to see two honest men?
I am rapt, and cannot cover
    The monstrous bulk of this ingratitude
    With any size of words.
Why, how shall I requite you?
Y'have heard that I have gold;
    I am sure you have.
So it is said, my noble lord; but therefore
    Came not my friend nor I.
E'en so, sir, as I say.
But for all this, my honest-natur'd friends,
    I must needs say you have a little fault.
Marry, 'tis not monstrous in you; neither wish I
    You take much pains to mend.
I know not such, my lord.
Nor I.
Look you, I love you well; I'll give you gold,
    Rid me these villains from your companies.
Hang them or stab them, drown them in a draught,
    Confound them by some course, and come to me,
    I'll give you gold enough.
I thank them; and would send them back the plague,
    Could I but catch it for them.
Lend me a fool's heart and a woman's eyes,
    And I'll beweep these comforts, worthy senators.
Well, sir, I will.
Therefore I will, sir, thus:
    If Alcibiades kill my countrymen,
    Let Alcibiades know this of Timon,
    That Timon cares not.
But if he sack fair Athens,
    And take our goodly aged men by th' beards,
    Giving our holy virgins to the stain
    Of contumelious, beastly, mad-brain'd war,  
    Then let him know- and tell him Timon speaks it
    In pity of our aged and our youth-
    I cannot choose but tell him that I care not,
    And let him take't at worst; for their knives care not,
    While you have throats to answer.
For myself,
    There's not a whittle in th' unruly camp
    But I do prize it at my love before
    The reverend'st throat in Athens.
So I leave you
    To the protection of the prosperous gods,
    As thieves to keepers.
Why, I was writing of my epitaph;
    It will be seen to-morrow.
But yet I love my country, and am not
    One that rejoices in the common wreck,  
    As common bruit doth put it.
Commend me to them,
    And tell them that, to ease them of their griefs,
    Their fears of hostile strokes, their aches, losses,
    Their pangs of love, with other incident throes
    That nature's fragile vessel doth sustain
    In life's uncertain voyage, I will some kindness do them-
    I'll teach them to prevent wild Alcibiades' wrath.
I like this well; he will return again.
I have a tree, which grows here in my close,
    That mine own use invites me to cut down,
    And shortly must I fell it.
I pray you do my greeting.
I have spoke the least.
I met a courier, one mine ancient friend,
    Whom, though in general part we were oppos'd,
    Yet our old love had a particular force,
    And made us speak like friends.
Ours is the fall, I fear; our foes the snare.
What's on this tomb
    I cannot read; the character I'll take with wax.
My noble General, Timon is dead;
    Entomb'd upon the very hem o' th' sea;
    And on his grave-stone this insculpture, which
    With wax I brought away, whose soft impression
    Interprets for my poor ignorance.
Here lie I, Timon, who alive all living men did hate.
Bring me into your city,
    And I will use the olive, with my sword;
    Make war breed peace, make peace stint war, make each
    Prescribe to other, as each other's leech.
SCENE I.
I am his first born son that was the last
    That ware the imperial diadem of Rome;
    Then let my father's honours live in me,
    Nor wrong mine age with this indignity.
Marcus Andronicus, so I do affy
    In thy uprightness and integrity,  
    And so I love and honour thee and thine,
    Thy noble brother Titus and his sons,
    And her to whom my thoughts are humbled all,
    Gracious Lavinia, Rome's rich ornament,
    That I will here dismiss my loving friends,
    And to my fortunes and the people's favour
    Commit my cause in balance to be weigh'd.
Friends, that have been thus forward in my right,
    I thank you all and here dismiss you all,
    And to the love and favour of my country
    Commit myself, my person, and the cause.
Exeunt the soldiers of SATURNINUS
    Rome, be as just and gracious unto me
    As I am confident and kind to thee.
These that survive let Rome reward with love;
    These that I bring unto their latest home,
    With burial amongst their ancestors.
I give him you- the noblest that survives,
    The eldest son of this distressed queen.
Gracious conqueror,
    Victorious Titus, rue the tears I shed,
    A mother's tears in passion for her son;
    And if thy sons were ever dear to thee,
    O, think my son to be as dear to me!
Lo, at this tomb my tributary tears
    I render for my brethren's obsequies;
    And at thy feet I kneel, with tears of joy
    Shed on this earth for thy return to Rome.
What should I don this robe and trouble you?
Rome, I have been thy soldier forty years,
    And led my country's strength successfully,
    And buried one and twenty valiant sons,
    Knighted in field, slain manfully in arms,
    In right and service of their noble country.
Content thee, Prince; I will restore to thee
    The people's hearts, and wean them from themselves.
Andronicus, I do not flatter thee,
    But honour thee, and will do till I die.
My faction if thou strengthen with thy friends,
    I will most thankful be; and thanks to men
    Of noble minds is honourable meed.
People of Rome, and people's Tribunes here,  
    I ask your voices and your suffrages:
    Will ye bestow them friendly on Andronicus?
Tribunes, I thank you; and this suit I make,
    That you create our Emperor's eldest son,
    Lord Saturnine; whose virtues will, I hope,
    Reflect on Rome as Titan's rays on earth,
    And ripen justice in this commonweal.
Titus Andronicus, for thy favours done
    To us in our election this day
    I give thee thanks in part of thy deserts,  
    And will with deeds requite thy gentleness;
    And for an onset, Titus, to advance
    Thy name and honourable family,
    Lavinia will I make my emperess,
    Rome's royal mistress, mistress of my heart,
    And in the sacred Pantheon her espouse.
It doth, my worthy lord, and in this match
    I hold me highly honoured of your Grace,
    And here in sight of Rome, to Saturnine,
    King and commander of our commonweal,
    The wide world's Emperor, do I consecrate
    My sword, my chariot, and my prisoners,
    Presents well worthy Rome's imperious lord;
    Receive them then, the tribute that I owe,
    Mine honour's ensigns humbled at thy feet.
How proud I am of thee and of thy gifts
    Rome shall record; and when I do forget
    The least of these unspeakable deserts,  
    Romans, forget your fealty to me.
[Aside]  A goodly lady, trust me; of the hue
    That I would choose, were I to choose anew.
Not I, my lord, sith true nobility
    Warrants these words in princely courtesy.
Brothers, help to convey her hence away,
    And with my sword I'll keep this door safe.
Follow, my lord, and I'll soon bring her back.
I'll trust by leisure him that mocks me once;
    Thee never, nor thy traitorous haughty sons,
    Confederates all thus to dishonour me.
Full well, Andronicus,
    Agree these deeds with that proud brag of thine
    That saidst I begg'd the empire at thy hands.
And therefore, lovely Tamora, Queen of Goths,
    That, like the stately Phoebe 'mongst her nymphs,
    Dost overshine the gallant'st dames of Rome,
    If thou be pleas'd with this my sudden choice,
    Behold, I choose thee, Tamora, for my bride
    And will create thee Emperess of Rome.
And here I swear by all the Roman gods-
    Sith priest and holy water are so near,
    And tapers burn so bright, and everything
    In readiness for Hymenaeus stand-
    I will not re-salute the streets of Rome,
    Or climb my palace, till from forth this place
    I lead espous'd my bride along with me.
And here in sight of heaven to Rome I swear,
    If Saturnine advance the Queen of Goths,
    She will a handmaid be to his desires,
    A loving nurse, a mother to his youth.
I am not bid to wait upon this bride.
This monument five hundred years hath stood,
    Which I have sumptuously re-edified;
    Here none but soldiers and Rome's servitors
    Repose in fame; none basely slain in brawls.
My foes I do repute you every one;
    So trouble me no more, but get you gone.
Not I, till Mutius' bones be buried.
Rise, Marcus, rise;
    The dismal'st day is this that e'er I saw,
    To be dishonoured by my sons in Rome!
I know not, Marcus, but I know it is-
    Whether by device or no, the heavens can tell.
I say no more,
    Nor wish no less; and so I take my leave.
But let the laws of Rome determine all;
    Meanwhile am I possess'd of that is mine.
My lord, what I have done, as best I may,
    Answer I must, and shall do with my life.
Only thus much I give your Grace to know:
    By all the duties that I owe to Rome,
    This noble gentleman, Lord Titus here,
    Is in opinion and in honour wrong'd,
    That, in the rescue of Lavinia,
    With his own hand did slay his youngest son,
    In zeal to you, and highly mov'd to wrath
    To be controll'd in that he frankly gave.
Rome and the righteous heavens be my judge
    How I have lov'd and honoured Saturnine!
Not so, my lord; the gods of Rome forfend
    I should be author to dishonour you!
But on mine honour dare I undertake
    For good Lord Titus' innocence in all,
    Whose fury not dissembled speaks his griefs.
You are but newly planted in your throne;
    Lest, then, the people, and patricians too,
    Upon a just survey take Titus' part,
    And so supplant you for ingratitude,  
    Which Rome reputes to be a heinous sin,
    Yield at entreats, and then let me alone:
    I'll find a day to massacre them all,
    And raze their faction and their family,
    The cruel father and his traitorous sons,
    To whom I sued for my dear son's life;
    And make them know what 'tis to let a queen
    Kneel in the streets and beg for grace in vain.
I thank your Majesty and her, my lord;
    These words, these looks, infuse new life in me.
Titus, I am incorporate in Rome,
    A Roman now adopted happily,
    And must advise the Emperor for his good.
This day all quarrels die, Andronicus;
    And let it be mine honour, good my lord,
    That I have reconcil'd your friends and you.
For you, Prince Bassianus, I have pass'd
    My word and promise to the Emperor
    That you will be more mild and tractable.
That on mine honour here do I protest.
I will not be denied.
Marcus, for thy sake, and thy brother's here,
    And at my lovely Tamora's entreats,
    I do remit these young men's heinous faults.
Lavinia, though you left me like a churl,
    I found a friend; and sure as death I swore  
    I would not part a bachelor from the priest.
SCENE I.
I will be bright and shine in pearl and gold,
    To wait upon this new-made emperess.
To wait, said I?
Chiron, thy years wants wit, thy wits wants edge
    And manners, to intrude where I am grac'd,
    And may, for aught thou knowest, affected be.
'Tis not the difference of a year or two
    Makes me less gracious or thee more fortunate:
    I am as able and as fit as thou
    To serve and to deserve my mistress' grace;  
    And that my sword upon thee shall approve,
    And plead my passions for Lavinia's love.
Meanwhile, sir, with the little skill I have,
    Full well shalt thou perceive how much I dare.
Full well I wot the ground of all this grudge:
    I would not for a million of gold
    The cause were known to them it most concerns;
    Nor would your noble mother for much more
    Be so dishonoured in the court of Rome.
Not I, till I have sheath'd
    My rapier in his bosom, and withal
    Thrust those reproachful speeches down his throat
    That he hath breath'd in my dishonour here.
For that I am prepar'd and full resolv'd,
    Foul-spoken coward, that thund'rest with thy tongue,
    And with thy weapon nothing dar'st perform.
Away, I say!
I care not, I, knew she and all the world:  
    I love Lavinia more than all the world.
I tell you, lords, you do but plot your deaths
    By this device.
Aaron, a thousand deaths
    Would I propose to achieve her whom I love.
Nor me, so I were one.
A speedier course than ling'ring languishment
    Must we pursue, and I have found the path.
Sit fas aut nefas, till I find the stream
    To cool this heat, a charm to calm these fits,
    Per Styga, per manes vehor.
I have been troubled in my sleep this night,
    But dawning day new comfort hath inspir'd.
I promised your Grace a hunter's peal.
I say no;
    I have been broad awake two hours and more.
I have dogs, my lord,
    Will rouse the proudest panther in the chase,
    And climb the highest promontory top.
And I have horse will follow where the game
    Makes way, and run like swallows o'er the plain.
He that had wit would think that I had none,
    To bury so much gold under a tree
    And never after to inherit it.
Take it up, I pray thee,
    And give the King this fatal-plotted scroll.
Be cross with him; and I'll go fetch thy sons
    To back thy quarrels, whatsoe'er they be.
Had I the pow'r that some say Dian had,
    Thy temples should be planted presently
    With horns, as was Actaeon's; and the hounds
    Should drive upon thy new-transformed limbs,
    Unmannerly intruder as thou art!
I pray you let us hence,
    And let her joy her raven-coloured love;
    This valley fits the purpose passing well.
Why, I have patience to endure all this.
Have I not reason, think you, to look pale?
This is a witness that I am thy son.
An if she do, I would I were an eunuch.
I warrant you, madam, we will make that sure.
I will not hear her speak; away with her!
Yet have I heard- O, could I find it now!
I know not what it means; away with her!
Hadst thou in person ne'er offended me,
    Even for his sake am I pitiless.
Remember, boys, I pour'd forth tears in vain
    To save your brother from the sacrifice;
    But fierce Andronicus would not relent.
For 'tis not life that I have begg'd so long;
    Poor I was slain when Bassianus died.
'Tis present death I beg; and one thing more,
    That womanhood denies my tongue to tell:
    O, keep me from their worse than killing lust,
    And tumble me into some loathsome pit,
    Where never man's eye may behold my body;
    Do this, and be a charitable murderer.
So should I rob my sweet sons of their fee;
    No, let them satisfy their lust on thee.
Nay, then I'll stop your mouth.
Now will I hence to seek my lovely Moor,
    And let my spleenful sons this trull deflower.
Come on, my lords, the better foot before;
    Straight will I bring you to the loathsome pit
    Where I espied the panther fast asleep.
And mine, I promise you; were it not for shame,  
    Well could I leave our sport to sleep awhile.
[Aside]  Now will I fetch the King to find them here,
    That he thereby may have a likely guess
    How these were they that made away his brother.
I am surprised with an uncouth fear;
    A chilling sweat o'er-runs my trembling joints;
    My heart suspects more than mine eye can see.
Aaron is gone, and my compassionate heart
    Will not permit mine eyes once to behold
    The thing whereat it trembles by surmise;
    O, tell me who it is, for ne'er till now
    Was I a child to fear I know not what.
Reach me thy hand, that I may help thee out,
    Or, wanting strength to do thee so much good,
    I may be pluck'd into the swallowing womb
    Of this deep pit, poor Bassianus' grave.
I have no strength to pluck thee to the brink.
Nor I no strength to climb without thy help.
Thy hand once more; I will not loose again,
    Till thou art here aloft, or I below.
Thou canst not come to me- I come to thee.
I'll see what hole is here,
    And what he is that now is leapt into it.
I know thou dost but jest:
    He and his lady both are at the lodge
    Upon the north side of this pleasant chase;
    'Tis not an hour since I left them there.
Then all too late I bring this fatal writ,
    The complot of this timeless tragedy;
    And wonder greatly that man's face can fold
    In pleasing smiles such murderous tyranny.
High Emperor, upon my feeble knee
    I beg this boon, with tears not lightly shed,
    That this fell fault of my accursed sons-
    Accursed if the fault be prov'd in them-
  SATURNINUS.
I did, my lord, yet let me be their bail;
    For, by my fathers' reverend tomb, I vow
    They shall be ready at your Highness' will
    To answer their suspicion with their lives.
Andronicus, I will entreat the King.
An 'twere my cause, I should go hang myself.
If I do dream, would all my wealth would wake me!
If I do wake, some planet strike me down,
    That I may slumber an eternal sleep!
Shall I speak for thee?
Shall I say 'tis so?
O, that I knew thy heart, and knew the beast,
    That I might rail at him to ease my mind!
SCENE I.
For pity of mine age, whose youth was spent
    In dangerous wars whilst you securely slept;
    For all my blood in Rome's great quarrel shed,
    For all the frosty nights that I have watch'd,
    And for these bitter tears, which now you see
    Filling the aged wrinkles in my cheeks,
    Be pitiful to my condemned sons,
    Whose souls are not corrupted as 'tis thought.
For two and twenty sons I never wept,
    Because they died in honour's lofty bed.
[ANDRONICUS lieth down, and the judges
                     pass by him with the prisoners, and exeunt]
    For these, Tribunes, in the dust I write  
    My heart's deep languor and my soul's sad tears.
O earth, I will befriend thee more with rain
    That shall distil from these two ancient urns,
    Than youthful April shall with all his show'rs.
In summer's drought I'll drop upon thee still;
    In winter with warm tears I'll melt the snow
    And keep eternal spring-time on thy face,
    So thou refuse to drink my dear sons' blood.
Grave Tribunes, once more I entreat of you.
Why, 'tis no matter, man: if they did hear,
    They would not mark me; if they did mark,
    They would not pity me; yet plead I must,
    And bootless unto them.
Therefore I tell my sorrows to the stones;
    Who though they cannot answer my distress,
    Yet in some sort they are better than the Tribunes,
    For that they will not intercept my tale.
When I do weep, they humbly at my feet
    Receive my tears, and seem to weep with me;
    And were they but attired in grave weeds,
    Rome could afford no tribunes like to these.
I bring consuming sorrow to thine age.
Give me a sword, I'll chop off my hands too,
    For they have fought for Rome, and all in vain;
    And they have nurs'd this woe in feeding life;
    In bootless prayer have they been held up,
    And they have serv'd me to effectless use.
Now all the service I require of them
    Is that the one will help to cut the other.
O, thus I found her straying in the park,
    Seeking to hide herself as doth the deer
    That hath receiv'd some unrecuring wound.
It was my dear, and he that wounded her
    Hath hurt me more than had he kill'd me dead;
    For now I stand as one upon a rock,
    Environ'd with a wilderness of sea,
    Who marks the waxing tide grow wave by wave,
    Expecting ever when some envious surge
    Will in his brinish bowels swallow him.
Had I but seen thy picture in this plight,
    It would have madded me; what shall I do  
    Now I behold thy lively body so?
When I did name her brothers, then fresh tears
    Stood on her cheeks, as doth the honey dew
    Upon a gath'red lily almost withered.
Gentle Lavinia, let me kiss thy lips,
    Or make some sign how I may do thee ease.
Shall thy good uncle and thy brother Lucius
    And thou and I sit round about some fountain,
    Looking all downwards to behold our cheeks  
    How they are stain'd, like meadows yet not dry
    With miry slime left on them by a flood?
Brother, well I wot
    Thy napkin cannot drink a tear of mine,
    For thou, poor man, hast drown'd it with thine own.
Ah, my Lavinia, I will wipe thy cheeks.
I understand her signs.
Had she a tongue to speak, now would she say  
    That to her brother which I said to thee:
    His napkin, with his true tears all bewet,
    Can do no service on her sorrowful cheeks.
With all my heart I'll send the Emperor my hand.
My hand hath been but idle; let it serve
    To ransom my two nephews from their death;
    Then have I kept it to a worthy end.
Sweet father, if I shall be thought thy son,
    Let me redeem my brothers both from death.
Agree between you; I will spare my hand.
Then I'll go fetch an axe.
But I will use the axe.
Come hither, Aaron, I'll deceive them both;
    Lend me thy hand, and I will give thee mine.
[Aside]  If that be call'd deceit, I will be honest,
    And never whilst I live deceive men so;
    But I'll deceive you in another sort,
    And that you'll say ere half an hour pass.
As for my sons, say I account of them
    As jewels purchas'd at an easy price;
    And yet dear too, because I bought mine own.
I go, Andronicus; and for thy hand
    Look by and by to have thy sons with thee.
[Aside]  Their heads I mean.
O, here I lift this one hand up to heaven,
    And bow this feeble ruin to the earth;
    If any power pities wretched tears,
    To that I call!
If there were reason for these miseries,
    Then into limits could I bind my woes.
I am the sea; hark how her sighs do blow.
She is the weeping welkin, I the earth;
    Then must my sea be moved with her sighs;
    Then must my earth with her continual tears
    Become a deluge, overflow'd and drown'd;
    For why my bowels cannot hide her woes,
    But like a drunkard must I vomit them.
Thou dost not slumber: see thy two sons' heads,
    Thy warlike hand, thy mangled daughter here;
    Thy other banish'd son with this dear sight
    Struck pale and bloodless; and thy brother, I,
    Even like a stony image, cold and numb.
now no more will I control thy griefs.
Why, I have not another tear to shed;
    Besides, this sorrow is an enemy,
    And would usurp upon my wat'ry eyes
    And make them blind with tributary tears.
Then which way shall I find Revenge's cave?
For these two heads do seem to speak to me,
    And threat me I shall never come to bliss  
    Till all these mischiefs be return'd again
    Even in their throats that have committed them.
Come, let me see what task I have to do.
You heavy people, circle me about,
    That I may turn me to each one of you
    And swear unto my soul to right your wrongs.
Come, brother, take a head,
    And in this hand the other will I bear.
Hie to the Goths and raise an army there;
    And if ye love me, as I think you do,
    Let's kiss and part, for we have much to do.
Now will I to the Goths, and raise a pow'r
    To be reveng'd on Rome and Saturnine.
Marcus, unknit that sorrow-wreathen knot;
    Thy niece and I, poor creatures, want our hands,
    And cannot passionate our tenfold grief
    With folded arms.
This poor right hand of mine
    Is left to tyrannize upon my breast;
    Who, when my heart, all mad with misery,
    Beats in this hollow prison of my flesh,
    Then thus I thump it down.
Why, Marcus, no man should be mad but I.
Fie, fie, how franticly I square my talk,
    As if we should forget we had no hands,
    If Marcus did not name the word of hands!
Hark, Marcus, what she says-
    I can interpret all her martyr'd signs;  
    She says she drinks no other drink but tears,
    Brew'd with her sorrow, mesh'd upon her cheeks.
Speechless complainer, I will learn thy thought;
    In thy dumb action will I be as perfect
    As begging hermits in their holy prayers.
Thou shalt not sigh, nor hold thy stumps to heaven,
    Nor wink, nor nod, nor kneel, nor make a sign,
    But I of these will wrest an alphabet,
    And by still practice learn to know thy meaning.
At that that I have kill'd, my lord- a fly.
Get thee gone;
    I see thou art not for my company.
Alas, my lord, I have but kill'd a fly.
Pardon me, sir; it was a black ill-favour'd fly,
    Like to the Empress' Moor; therefore I kill'd him.
Give me thy knife, I will insult on him,
    Flattering myself as if it were the Moor
    Come hither purposely to poison me.
Yet, I think, we are not brought so low
    But that between us we can kill a fly
    That comes in likeness of a coal-black Moor.
Lavinia, go with me;
    I'll to thy closet, and go read with thee
    Sad stories chanced in the times of old.
SCENE I.
my aunt Lavinia
    Follows me everywhere, I know not why.
Alas, sweet aunt, I know not what you mean.
My lord, I know not, I, nor can I guess,
    Unless some fit or frenzy do possess her;
    For I have heard my grandsire say full oft
    Extremity of griefs would make men mad;
    And I have read that Hecuba of Troy
    Ran mad for sorrow.
That made me to fear;
    Although, my lord, I know my noble aunt
    Loves me as dear as e'er my mother did,
    And would not, but in fury, fright my youth;
    Which made me down to throw my books, and fly-
    Causeless, perhaps.
But pardon me, sweet aunt;
    And, madam, if my uncle Marcus go,
    I will most willingly attend your ladyship.
Lucius, I will.
I think she means that there were more than one
    Confederate in the fact; ay, more there was,
    Or else to heaven she heaves them for revenge.
Lavinia, shall I read?
This is the tragic tale of Philomel
    And treats of Tereus' treason and his rape;
    And rape, I fear, was root of thy annoy.
Apollo, Pallas, Jove, or Mercury,
    Inspire me, that I may this treason find!
I have writ my name
    Without the help of any hand at all.
although I know
    There is enough written upon this earth
    To stir a mutiny in the mildest thoughts,
    And arm the minds of infants to exclaims.
You are a young huntsman, Marcus; let alone;
    And come, I will go get a leaf of brass,
    And with a gad of steel will write these words,
    And lay it by.
I say, my lord, that if I were a man
    Their mother's bedchamber should not be safe
    For these base bondmen to the yoke of Rome.
And, uncle, so will I, an if I live.
Lucius, I'll fit thee; and withal my boy
    Shall carry from me to the Empress' sons
    Presents that I intend to send them both.
No, boy, not so; I'll teach thee another course.
Lucius and I'll go brave it at the court;
    Ay, marry, will we, sir!
My lords, with all the humbleness I may,
    I greet your honours from Andronicus-
    [Aside]  And pray the Roman gods confound you both!
- May it please you,
    My grandsire, well advis'd, hath sent by me
    The goodliest weapons of his armoury
    To gratify your honourable youth,
    The hope of Rome; for so he bid me say;
    And so I do, and with his gifts present
    Your lordships, that, whenever you have need,  
    You may be armed and appointed well.
And so I leave you both-  [Aside]  like bloody villains.
O, 'tis a verse in Horace, I know it well;
    I read it in the grammar long ago.
I would we had a thousand Roman dames
    At such a bay, by turn to serve our lust.
O, that which I would hide from heaven's eye:
    Our Empress' shame and stately Rome's disgrace!
I mean she is brought a-bed.
Villain, I have done thy mother.
Then let no man but I
    Do execution on my flesh and blood.
I'll broach the tadpole on my rapier's point.
I tell you, younglings, not Enceladus,
    With all his threat'ning band of Typhon's brood,
    Nor great Alcides, nor the god of war,
    Shall seize this prey out of his father's hands.
Tell the Empress from me I am of age
    To keep mine own- excuse it how she can.
This before all the world do I prefer;
    This maugre all the world will I keep safe,
    Or some of you shall smoke for it in Rome.
I blush to think upon this ignomy.
Look how the black slave smiles upon the father,
    As who should say 'Old lad, I am thine own.
Aaron, what shall I say unto the Empress?
My son and I will have the wind of you:
    Keep there; now talk at pleasure of your safety.
When we join in league
    I am a lamb; but if you brave the Moor,
    The chafed boar, the mountain lioness,
    The ocean swells not so as Aaron storms.
Two may keep counsel when the third's away:
    Go to the Empress, tell her this I said.
You see I have given her physic,
                                         [Pointing to the NURSE]
    And you must needs bestow her funeral;  
    The fields are near, and you are gallant grooms.
Aaron, I see thou wilt not trust the air
    With secrets.
Come on, you thick-lipp'd slave, I'll bear you hence;
    For it is you that puts us to our shifts.
I'll make you feed on berries and on roots,
    And feed on curds and whey, and suck the goat,
    And cabin in a cave, and bring you up  
    To be a warrior and command a camp.
No; Publius and Sempronius, you must do it;
    'Tis you must dig with mattock and with spade,
    And pierce the inmost centre of the earth;
    Then, when you come to Pluto's region,
    I pray you deliver him this petition.
Well, well, I made thee miserable
    What time I threw the people's suffrages
    On him that thus doth tyrannize o'er me.
I'll dive into the burning lake below
    And pull her out of Acheron by the heels.
Marcus, loose when I bid.
Of my word, I have written to effect;
    There's not a god left unsolicited.
My lord, I aim a mile beyond the moon;
    Your letter is with Jupiter by this.
Shall I have justice?
But what says Jupiter, I ask thee?
Alas, sir, I know not Jupiter; I never drank with him in all
    my life.
Alas, sir, I never came there.
God forbid I
    should be so bold to press to heaven in my young days.
Why, I am
    going with my pigeons to the Tribunal Plebs, to take up a matter
    of brawl betwixt my uncle and one of the Emperal's men.
Nay, truly, sir, I could never say grace in all my life.
I'll
    be at hand, sir; see you do it bravely.
I warrant you, sir; let me alone.
God be with you, sir; I will.
But if I live, his feigned ecstasies
    Shall be no shelter to these outrages;
    But he and his shall know that justice lives
    In Saturninus' health; whom, if she sleep,
    He'll so awake as he in fury shall
    Cut off the proud'st conspirator that lives.
But, Titus, I have touch'd thee to the quick,
    Thy life-blood out; if Aaron now be wise,
    Then is all safe, the anchor in the port.
Empress I am, but yonder sits the Emperor.
I have
    brought you a letter and a couple of pigeons here.
How much money must I have?
by'r lady, then I have brought up a neck to a fair
    end.
Shall I endure this monstrous villainy?
I know from whence this same device proceeds.
For this proud mock I'll be thy slaughterman,
    Sly frantic wretch, that holp'st to make me great,
    In hope thyself should govern Rome and me.
These tidings nip me, and I hang the head
    As flowers with frost, or grass beat down with storms.
'Tis he the common people love so much;
    Myself hath often heard them say-
    When I have walked like a private man-
    That Lucius' banishment was wrongfully,
    And they have wish'd that Lucius were their emperor.
Then cheer thy spirit; for know thou, Emperor,
    I will enchant the old Andronicus  
    With words more sweet, and yet more dangerous,
    Than baits to fish or honey-stalks to sheep,
    When as the one is wounded with the bait,
    The other rotted with delicious feed.
If Tamora entreat him, then he will;
    For I can smooth and fill his aged ears
    With golden promises, that, were his heart
    Almost impregnable, his old ears deaf,
    Yet should both ear and heart obey my tongue.
Your bidding shall I do effectually.
Now will I to that old Andronicus,
    And temper him with all the art I have,  
    To pluck proud Lucius from the warlike Goths.
SCENE I.
Approved warriors and my faithful friends,
    I have received letters from great Rome
    Which signifies what hate they bear their Emperor
    And how desirous of our sight they are.
I humbly thank him, and I thank you all.
Renowned Lucius, from our troops I stray'd
    To gaze upon a ruinous monastery;
    And as I earnestly did fix mine eye
    Upon the wasted building, suddenly
    I heard a child cry underneath a wall.
I made unto the noise, when soon I heard
    The crying babe controll'd with this discourse:
    'Peace, tawny slave, half me and half thy dam!
'- even thus he rates the babe-  
    'For I must bear thee to a trusty Goth,
    Who, when he knows thou art the Empress' babe,
    Will hold thee dearly for thy mother's sake.
'
    With this, my weapon drawn, I rush'd upon him,
    Surpris'd him suddenly, and brought him hither
    To use as you think needful of the man.
If thou do this, I'll show thee wondrous things
    That highly may advantage thee to hear;
    If thou wilt not, befall what may befall,
    I'll speak no more but 'Vengeance rot you all!
Say on; an if it please me which thou speak'st,
    Thy child shall live, and I will see it nourish'd.
Why, assure thee, Lucius,
    'Twill vex thy soul to hear what I shall speak;
    For I must talk of murders, rapes, and massacres,
    Acts of black night, abominable deeds,
    Complots of mischief, treason, villainies,
    Ruthful to hear, yet piteously perform'd;
    And this shall all be buried in my death,
    Unless thou swear to me my child shall live.
Tell on thy mind; I say thy child shall live.
Swear that he shall, and then I will begin.
Who should I swear by?
What if I do not?
as indeed I do not;
    Yet, for I know thou art religious
    And hast a thing within thee called conscience,
    With twenty popish tricks and ceremonies
    Which I have seen thee careful to observe,
    Therefore I urge thy oath.
For that I know
    An idiot holds his bauble for a god,
    And keeps the oath which by that god he swears,
    To that I'll urge him.
Therefore thou shalt vow
    By that same god- what god soe'er it be
    That thou adorest and hast in reverence-
    To save my boy, to nourish and bring him up;
    Or else I will discover nought to thee.
Even by my god I swear to thee I will.
First know thou, I begot him on the Empress.
Indeed, I was their tutor to instruct them.
That codding spirit had they from their mother,
    As sure a card as ever won the set;
    That bloody mind, I think, they learn'd of me,
    As true a dog as ever fought at head.
I train'd thy brethren to that guileful hole
    Where the dead corpse of Bassianus lay;
    I wrote the letter that thy father found,
    And hid the gold within that letter mention'd,
    Confederate with the Queen and her two sons;
    And what not done, that thou hast cause to rue,
    Wherein I had no stroke of mischief in it?
I play'd the cheater for thy father's hand,  
    And, when I had it, drew myself apart
    And almost broke my heart with extreme laughter.
I pried me through the crevice of a wall,
    When, for his hand, he had his two sons' heads;
    Beheld his tears, and laugh'd so heartily
    That both mine eyes were rainy like to his;
    And when I told the Empress of this sport,
    She swooned almost at my pleasing tale,
    And for my tidings gave me twenty kisses.
Ay, that I had not done a thousand more.
Even now I curse the day- and yet, I think,
    Few come within the compass of my curse-
    Wherein I did not some notorious ill;
    As kill a man, or else devise his death;
    Ravish a maid, or plot the way to do it;
    Accuse some innocent, and forswear myself;
    Set deadly enmity between two friends;  
    Make poor men's cattle break their necks;
    Set fire on barns and hay-stacks in the night,
    And bid the owners quench them with their tears.
Oft have I digg'd up dead men from their graves,
    And set them upright at their dear friends' door
    Even when their sorrows almost was forgot,
    And on their skins, as on the bark of trees,
    Have with my knife carved in Roman letters
    'Let not your sorrow die, though I am dead.
'
    Tut, I have done a thousand dreadful things
    As willingly as one would kill a fly;
    And nothing grieves me heartily indeed
    But that I cannot do ten thousand more.
If there be devils, would I were a devil,
    To live and burn in everlasting fire,
    So I might have your company in hell
    But to torment you with my bitter tongue!
Thus, in this strange and sad habiliment,
    I will encounter with Andronicus,
    And say I am Revenge, sent from below
    To join with him and right his heinous wrongs.
You are deceiv'd; for what I mean to do  
    See here in bloody lines I have set down;
    And what is written shall be executed.
Titus, I am come to talk with thee.
How can I grace my talk,
    Wanting a hand to give it that accord?
I am not mad, I know thee well enough:
    Witness this wretched stump, witness these crimson lines;
    Witness these trenches made by grief and care;
    Witness the tiring day and heavy night;
    Witness all sorrow that I know thee well
    For our proud Empress, mighty Tamora.
Know thou, sad man, I am not Tamora:
    She is thy enemy and I thy friend.
I am Revenge, sent from th' infernal kingdom
    To ease the gnawing vulture of thy mind
    By working wreakful vengeance on thy foes.
Come down and welcome me to this world's light;  
    Confer with me of murder and of death;
    There's not a hollow cave or lurking-place,
    No vast obscurity or misty vale,
    Where bloody murder or detested rape
    Can couch for fear but I will find them out;
    And in their ears tell them my dreadful name-
    Revenge, which makes the foul offender quake.
I am; therefore come down and welcome me.
Do me some service ere I come to thee.
Lo, by thy side where Rape and Murder stands;
    Now give some surance that thou art Revenge-
    Stab them, or tear them on thy chariot wheels;
    And then I'll come and be thy waggoner
    And whirl along with thee about the globes.
Provide thee two proper palfreys, black as jet,
    To hale thy vengeful waggon swift away,
    And find out murderers in their guilty caves;
    And when thy car is loaden with their heads,  
    I will dismount, and by thy waggon wheel
    Trot, like a servile footman, all day long,
    Even from Hyperion's rising in the east
    Until his very downfall in the sea.
And day by day I'll do this heavy task,
    So thou destroy Rapine and Murder there.
O sweet Revenge, now do I come to thee;
    And, if one arm's embracement will content thee,
    I will embrace thee in it by and by.
Whate'er I forge to feed his brain-sick humours,
    Do you uphold and maintain in your speeches,
    For now he firmly takes me for Revenge;  
    And, being credulous in this mad thought,
    I'll make him send for Lucius his son,
    And whilst I at a banquet hold him sure,
    I'll find some cunning practice out of hand
    To scatter and disperse the giddy Goths,
    Or, at the least, make them his enemies.
See, here he comes, and I must ply my theme.
Long have I been forlorn, and all for thee.
For well I wot the Empress never wags
    But in her company there is a Moor;
    And, would you represent our queen aright,
    It were convenient you had such a devil.
Show me a murderer, I'll deal with him.
Show me a villain that hath done a rape,
    And I am sent to be reveng'd on him.
Show me a thousand that hath done thee wrong,
    And I will be revenged on them all.
I pray thee, do on them some violent death;
    They have been violent to me and mine.
But would it please thee, good Andronicus,
    To send for Lucius, thy thrice-valiant son,
    Who leads towards Rome a band of warlike Goths,
    And bid him come and banquet at thy house;
    When he is here, even at thy solemn feast,
    I will bring in the Empress and her sons,
    The Emperor himself, and all thy foes;
    And at thy mercy shall they stoop and kneel,
    And on them shalt thou ease thy angry heart.
This will I do, and soon return again.
Now will I hence about thy business,
    And take my ministers along with me.
Nay, nay, let Rape and Murder stay with me,
    Or else I'll call my brother back again,
    And cleave to no revenge but Lucius.
Will you abide
      with him,
    Whiles I go tell my lord the Emperor
    How I have govern'd our determin'd jest?
Yield to his humour, smooth and speak him fair,
    And tarry with him till I turn again.
[Aside]  I knew them all, though they suppos'd me mad,
    And will o'er reach them in their own devices,
    A pair of cursed hell-hounds and their dam.
I know thou dost; and, sweet Revenge, farewell.
Tut, I have work enough for you to do.
The Empress' sons, I take them: Chiron, Demetrius.
Oft have you heard me wish for such an hour,
    And now I find it; therefore bind them sure,
    And stop their mouths if they begin to cry.
Sirs, stop their mouths, let them not speak to me;
    But let them hear what fearful words I utter.
What would you say, if I should let you speak?
how I mean to martyr you.
I will grind your bones to dust,
    And with your blood and it I'll make a paste;
    And of the paste a coffin I will rear,
    And make two pasties of your shameful heads;
    And bid that strumpet, your unhallowed dam,
    Like to the earth, swallow her own increase.
This is the feast that I have bid her to,
    And this the banquet she shall surfeit on;
    For worse than Philomel you us'd my daughter,
    And worse than Progne I will be reveng'd.
Come, come, be every one officious
    To make this banquet, which I wish may prove
    More stern and bloody than the Centaurs' feast.
Now bring them in, for I will play the cook,
    And see them ready against their mother comes.
Uncle Marcus, since 'tis my father's mind
    That I repair to Rome, I am content.
And see the ambush of our friends be strong;
    I fear the Emperor means no good to us.
Because I would be sure to have all well
    To entertain your Highness and your Empress.
I am as woeful as Virginius was,
    And have a thousand times more cause than he
    To do this outrage; and it now is done.
Not I; 'twas Chiron and Demetrius.
My heart is not compact of flint nor steel;
    Nor can I utter all our bitter grief,
    But floods of tears will drown my oratory
    And break my utt'rance, even in the time
    When it should move ye to attend me most,
    And force you to commiseration.
Here's Rome's young Captain, let him tell the tale;
    While I stand by and weep to hear him speak.
I am the turned forth, be it known to you,
    That have preserv'd her welfare in my blood
    And from her bosom took the enemy's point,
    Sheathing the steel in my advent'rous body.
you know I am no vaunter, I;
    My scars can witness, dumb although they are,
    That my report is just and full of truth.
methinks I do digress too much,
    Citing my worthless praise.
Speak, Romans, speak; and if you say we shall,
    Lo, hand in hand, Lucius and I will fall.
Come, come, thou reverend man of Rome,
    And bring our Emperor gently in thy hand,
    Lucius our Emperor; for well I know  
    The common voice do cry it shall be so.
May I govern so
    To heal Rome's harms and wipe away her woe!
O, were the sum of these that I should pay  
    Countless and infinite, yet would I pay them!
ev'n with all my heart
    Would I were dead, so you did live again!
O Lord, I cannot speak to him for weeping;
    My tears will choke me, if I ope my mouth.
I am no baby, I, that with base prayers
    I should repent the evils I have done;
    Ten thousand worse than ever yet I did
    Would I perform, if I might have my will.
If one good deed in all my life I did,
    I do repent it from my very soul.
Now expectation, tickling skittish spirits
    On one and other side, Troyan and Greek,
    Sets all on hazard-and hither am I come
    A Prologue arm'd, but not in confidence
    Of author's pen or actor's voice, but suited
    In like conditions as our argument,
    To tell you, fair beholders, that our play
    Leaps o'er the vaunt and firstlings of those broils,
    Beginning in the middle; starting thence away,
    To what may be digested in a play.
>>



ACT I.
Call here my varlet; I'll unarm again.
Why should I war without the walls of Troy
    That find such cruel battle here within?
The Greeks are strong, and skilful to their strength,
    Fierce to their skill, and to their fierceness valiant;
    But I am weaker than a woman's tear,
    Tamer than sleep, fonder than ignorance,
    Less valiant than the virgin in the night,
    And skilless as unpractis'd infancy.
Well, I have told you enough of this; for my part,
    I'll not meddle nor make no farther.
Have I not tarried?
Have I not tarried?
Still have I tarried.
Patience herself, what goddess e'er she be,
    Doth lesser blench at suff'rance than I do.
At Priam's royal table do I sit;
    And when fair Cressid comes into my thoughts-
    So, traitor, then she comes when she is thence.
Well, she look'd yesternight fairer than ever I saw her
    look, or any woman else.
I was about to tell thee: when my heart,
    As wedged with a sigh, would rive in twain,
    Lest Hector or my father should perceive me,
    I have, as when the sun doth light a storm,
    Buried this sigh in wrinkle of a smile.
But, for
    my part, she is my kinswoman; I would not, as they term it,
    praise her, but I would somebody had heard her talk yesterday, as
    I did.
I  will not dispraise your sister Cassandra's wit; but-
  TROILUS.
I tell thee, Pandarus-
    When I do tell thee there my hopes lie drown'd,
    Reply not in how many fathoms deep
    They lie indrench'd.
I tell thee I am mad
    In Cressid's love.
This thou tell'st me,
    As true thou tell'st me, when I say I love her;
    But, saying thus, instead of oil and balm,  
    Thou lay'st in every gash that love hath given me
    The knife that made it.
I speak no more than truth.
Faith, I'll not meddle in it.
I have had my labour for my travail, ill thought on of
    her and ill thought on of you; gone between and between, but
    small thanks for my labour.
But what care I?
I care not an she were a
    blackamoor; 'tis all one to me.
Say I she is not fair?
I do not care whether you do or no.
Let her to the Greeks; and so I'll tell her
    the next time I see her.
For my part, I'll meddle nor make no  
    more i' th' matter.
Not I.
Pray you, speak no more to me: I will leave all
    as I found it, and there an end.
I cannot fight upon this argument;
    It is too starv'd a subject for my sword.
I cannot come to Cressid but by Pandar;
    And he's as tetchy to be woo'd to woo
    As she is stubborn-chaste against all suit.
Better at home, if 'would I might' were 'may.
Exeunt




ACT I.
What were you talking of when I came?
True, he was so; I know the cause too; he'll lay about  
    him today, I can tell them that.
And there's Troilus will not
    come far behind him; let them take heed of Troilus, I can tell
    them that too.
Ay, if I ever saw him before and knew him.
Well, I say Troilus is Troilus.
Then you say as I say, for I am sure he is not Hector.
I would he were!
Condition I had gone barefoot to India.
I would my heart were in her body!
Helen herself swore th'
    other day that Troilus, for a brown favour, for so 'tis, I must
    confess- not brown neither-
  CRESSIDA.
I had as lief Helen's golden tongue had commended
    Troilus for a copper nose.
I swear to you I think Helen loves him better than Paris.
Nay, I am sure she does.
I think his smiling becomes  
    him better than any man in all Phrygia.
Why, he esteems her no more than I esteem an
    addle egg.
I cannot choose but laugh to think how she tickled his
    chin.
Indeed, she has a marvell's white hand, I must needs
    confess.
An't had been a green hair I should have laugh'd too.
Well, cousin, I told you a thing yesterday; think on't.
So I do.
I'll be sworn 'tis true; he will weep you, and 'twere a
    man born in April.
And I'll spring up in his tears, an 'twere a nettle
    against May.
I'll tell you them all by their names as they pass
    by; but mark Troilus above the rest.
He's one of the  
    flowers of Troy, I can tell you.
He has a shrewd wit, I can tell you; and
    he's a man good enough; he's one o' th' soundest judgments in
    Troy, whosoever, and a proper man of person.
I'll show you Troilus anon.
Would I could
    see Troilus now!
I marvel where Troilus is.
I think he went not forth to-day.
I marvel
    where Troilus is.
Had I a sister were a grace or a daughter a
    goddess, he should take his choice.
Paris  
    is dirt to him; and, I warrant, Helen, to change, would give an
    eye to boot.
I could live and die in the eyes of Troilus.
I had rather be such a man as Troilus than
    Agamemnon and all Greece.
Upon my back, to defend my belly; upon my wit, to defend
    my wiles; upon my secrecy, to defend mine honesty; my mask, to
    defend my beauty; and you, to defend all these; and at all these
    wards I lie at, at a thousand watches.
Nay, I'll watch you for that; and that's one of the
    chiefest of them too.
If I cannot ward what I would not have hit,
    I can watch you for telling how I took the blow; unless it swell
    past hiding, and then it's past watching
  PANDARUS.
Good boy, tell him I come.
Exit Boy  
    I doubt he be hurt.
I will be with you, niece, by and by.
Exit PANDARUS
    Words, vows, gifts, tears, and love's full sacrifice,
    He offers in another's enterprise;
    But more in Troilus thousand-fold I see
    Than in the glass of Pandar's praise may be,
    Yet hold I off.
That she was never yet that ever knew
    Love got so sweet as when desire did sue;
    Therefore this maxim out of love I teach:
    Achievement is command; ungain'd, beseech.
Exit




ACT I.
Besides the applause and approbation
    The which, [To AGAMEMNON] most mighty, for thy place and sway,
    [To NESTOR] And, thou most reverend, for thy stretch'd-out life,
    I give to both your speeches- which were such
    As Agamemnon and the hand of Greece
    Should hold up high in brass; and such again
    As venerable Nestor, hatch'd in silver,
    Should with a bond of air, strong as the axle-tree
    On which heaven rides, knit all the Greekish ears
    To his experienc'd tongue-yet let it please both,
    Thou great, and wise, to hear Ulysses speak.
I shall split all
    In pleasure of my spleen.
Is this great Agamemnon's tent, I pray you?
Ay;
    I ask, that I might waken reverence,
    And bid the cheek be ready with a blush
    Modest as Morning when she coldly eyes
    The youthful Phoebus.
What's your affair, I pray you?
Nor I from Troy come not to whisper with him;
    I bring a trumpet to awake his ear,  
    To set his sense on the attentive bent,
    And then to speak.
If then one is, or hath, or means to be,
    That one meets Hector; if none else, I am he.
He is old now;
    But if there be not in our Grecian mould
    One noble man that hath one spark of fire
    To answer for his love, tell him from me
    I'll hide my silver beard in a gold beaver,
    And in my vantbrace put this wither'd brawn,
    And, meeting him, will tell him that my lady
    Was fairer than his grandame, and as chaste
    As may be in the world.
His youth in flood,
    I'll prove this truth with my three drops of blood.
Fair Lord Aeneas, let me touch your hand;
    To our pavilion shall I lead you, first.
I have a young conception in my brain;
    Be you my time to bring it to some shape.
I see them not with my old eyes.
Now, Ulysses, I begin to relish thy advice;
    And I will give a taste thereof forthwith
    To Agamemnon.
Then there would come some matter from him;
    I see none now.
I will beat thee
    into handsomeness.
I shall sooner rail thee into wit and holiness; but I
    think thy horse will sooner con an oration than thou learn a
    prayer without book.
Dost thou think I have no sense, thou strikest me thus?
Thou art proclaim'd, a fool, I think.
I would thou didst itch from head to foot and I had the
    scratching of thee; I would make thee the loathsomest scab in
    Greece.
I say, the proclamation.
Thou hast no more
    brain than I have in mine elbows; an assinico may tutor thee.
If thou use to beat me, I will begin at thy heel and tell
    what thou art by inches, thou thing of no bowels, thou!
So I do.
why, so I do.
I know that, fool.
Therefore I beat thee.
I have bobb'd his brain more than
    he has beat my bones.
I will buy nine sparrows for a penny, and
    his pia mater is not worth the ninth part of a sparrow.
This
    lord, Achilles, Ajax-who wears his wit in his belly and his guts
    in his head-I'll tell you what I say of him.
I say this Ajax-             [AJAX offers to strike him]
  ACHILLES.
Nay, I must hold you.
I would have peace and quietness, but the fool will not-
    he there; that he; look you there.
I shall-
  ACHILLES.
No, I warrant you, the fool's will shame it.
I bade the vile owl go learn me the tenour of the
    proclamation, and he rails upon me.
I serve thee not.
I serve here voluntary.
I shall cut out your tongue.
'Tis no matter; I shall speak as much as thou
    afterwards.
I will hold my peace when Achilles' brach bids me, shall
    I?
I will see you hang'd like clotpoles ere I come any more
    to your tents.
I will keep where there is wit stirring, and leave
    the faction of fools.
Marry, this, sir, is proclaim'd through all our host,
    That Hector, by the fifth hour of the sun,  
    Will with a trumpet 'twixt our tents and Troy,
    To-morrow morning, call some knight to arms
    That hath a stomach; and such a one that dare
    Maintain I know not what; 'tis trash.
I know not; 'tis put to lott'ry.
I will go learn more of it.
Though no man lesser fears the Greeks than I,
    As far as toucheth my particular,
    Yet, dread Priam,
    There is no lady of more softer bowels,
    More spongy to suck in the sense of fear,
    More ready to cry out 'Who knows what follows?
Since the first sword was drawn about this question,
    Every tithe soul 'mongst many thousand dismes
    Hath been as dear as Helen-I mean, of ours.
'Tis mad idolatry
    To make the service greater than the god-I
    And the will dotes that is attributive
    To what infectiously itself affects,
    Without some image of th' affected merit.
I take to-day a wife, and my election
    Is led on in the conduct of my will;
    My will enkindled by mine eyes and ears,
    Two traded pilots 'twixt the dangerous shores
    Of will and judgment: how may I avoid,
    Although my will distaste what it elected,
    The wife I chose?
'Tis our mad sister; I do know her voice.
Lend me ten thousand eyes,
    And I will fill them with prophetic tears.
For my private part,
    I am no more touch'd than all Priam's sons;
    And Jove forbid there should be done amongst us
    Such things as might offend the weakest spleen
    To fight for and maintain.
Else might the world convince of levity  
    As well my undertakings as your counsels;
    But I attest the gods, your full consent
    Gave wings to my propension, and cut of
    All fears attending on so dire a project.
Yet, I protest,
    Were I alone to pass the difficulties,
    And had as ample power as I have will,
    Paris should ne'er retract what he hath done
    Nor faint in the pursuit.
Sir, I propose not merely to myself
    The pleasures such a beauty brings with it;
    But I would have the soil of her fair rape
    Wip'd off in honourable keeping her.
Then, I say,
    Well may we fight for her whom we know well
    The world's large spaces cannot parallel.
Yet, ne'er the less,  
    My spritely brethren, I propend to you
    In resolution to keep Helen still;
    For 'tis a cause that hath no mean dependence
    Upon our joint and several dignities.
Were it not glory that we more affected
    Than the performance of our heaving spleens,
    I would not wish a drop of Troyan blood
    Spent more in her defence.
But, worthy Hector,
    She is a theme of honour and renown,
    A spur to valiant and magnanimous deeds,
    Whose present courage may beat down our foes,
    And fame in time to come canonize us;
    For I presume brave Hector would not lose
    So rich advantage of a promis'd glory
    As smiles upon the forehead of this action
    For the wide world's revenue.
I am yours,
    You valiant offspring of great Priamus.
I have a roisting challenge sent amongst  
    The dull and factious nobles of the Greeks
    Will strike amazement to their drowsy spirits.
I was advertis'd their great general slept,
    Whilst emulation in the army crept.
This, I presume, will wake him.
He beats me, and I
    rail at him.
Would it were otherwise: that
    I could beat him, whilst he rail'd at me!
'Sfoot, I'll learn to
    conjure and raise devils, but I'll see some issue of my spiteful
    execrations.
I have said my prayers; and devil Envy  
    say 'Amen.
If I could 'a rememb'red a gilt counterfeit, thou
    wouldst not have slipp'd out of my contemplation; but it is no
    matter; thyself upon thyself!
Then if she that lays thee out says
    thou art a fair corse, I'll be sworn and sworn upon't she never
    shrouded any but lazars.
Then tell me, I pray thee, what's
    Thersites?
I'll decline the whole question.
Agamemnon commands
    Achilles; Achilles is my lord; I am Patroclus' knower; and
    Patroclus is a fool.
I have not done.
Why am I a fool?
Come, Patroclus, I'll speak with nobody.
I shall say so to him.
I shall, and bring his answer presently.
Do you not think he thinks himself a better
    man than I am?
I know not
    what pride is.
I do hate a proud man as I do hate the engend'ring of toads.
What should I say?
If I go to him, with my armed fist I'll pash him o'er the
    face.
An 'a be proud with me I'll pheeze his pride.
I'll let his humours blood.
I will knead him, I'll make him supple.
Here is a man-but 'tis before his face;
    I will be silent.
I will not praise thy wisdom,
    Which, like a bourn, a pale, a shore, confines
    Thy spacious and dilated parts.
Shall I call you father?
You depend upon him, I mean?
Sir, I do depend upon the lord.
You depend upon a notable gentleman; I must needs praise
    him.
Friend, know me better: I am the Lord Pandarus.
I hope I shall know your honour better.
I do desire it.
I do but partly know, sir; it is music in parts.
Command, I mean, friend.
Who shall I command, sir?
Friend, we understand not one another: I am to courtly,
    and thou art too cunning.
I come to speak with Paris from the Prince Troilus; I
    will make a complimental assault upon him, for my business
    seethes.
I have business to my lord, dear queen.
Nay, I care not for such words; no, no.
I'll lay my life, with my disposer Cressida.
Well, I'll make's excuse.
I spy.
I'll hear no more of this; I'll sing you a
    song now.
I would fain have arm'd to-day, but my Nell would not
    have it so.
Not I, honey-sweet queen.
I long to hear how they spend
    to-day.
I will, sweet queen.
Sweet Helen, I must woo you
    To help unarm our Hector.
Sweet, above thought I love thee.
I stalk about her door
    Like a strange soul upon the Stygian banks
    Staying for waftage.
O, be thou my Charon,
    And give me swift transportance to these fields
    Where I may wallow in the lily beds
    Propos'd for the deserver!
Walk here i' th' orchard, I'll bring her straight.
I am giddy; expectation whirls me round.
Death, I fear me;
    Swooning destruction; or some joy too fine,
    Too subtle-potent, tun'd too sharp in sweetness,
    For the capacity of my ruder powers.
I fear it much; and I do fear besides
    That I shall lose distinction in my joys;
    As doth a battle, when they charge on heaps
    The enemy flying.
I'll fetch her.
Nay, you shall fight your hearts out ere I part you.
' Come in, come in; I'll go get a fire.
O Cressid, how often have I wish'd me thus!
Well, uncle, what folly I commit, I dedicate to you.
I thank you for that; if my lord get a boy of you, you'll
    give him me.
Nay, I'll give my word for her too: our kindred, though
    they be long ere they are wooed, they are constant being won;
    they are burs, I can tell you; they'll stick where they are
    thrown.
Prince Troilus, I have lov'd you night and day
    For many weary months.
Hard to seem won; but I was won, my lord,
    With the first glance that ever-pardon me.
If I confess much, you will play the tyrant.
I love you now; but till now not so much
    But I might master it.
In faith, I lie;
    My thoughts were like unbridled children, grown
    Too headstrong for their mother.
Why have I blabb'd?
But, though I lov'd you well, I woo'd you not;
    And yet, good faith, I wish'd myself a man,
    Or that we women had men's privilege
    Of speaking first.
Sweet, bid me hold my tongue,
    For in this rapture I shall surely speak
    The thing I shall repent.
My lord, I do beseech you, pardon me;
    'Twas not my purpose thus to beg a kiss.
I am asham'd.
what have I done?
For this time will I take my leave, my lord.
I have a kind of self resides with you;
    But an unkind self, that itself will leave
    To be another's fool.
I would be gone.
I know not what I speak.
Perchance, my lord, I show more craft than love;
    And fell so roundly to a large confession
    To angle for your thoughts; but you are wise-
    Or else you love not; for to be wise and love
    Exceeds man's might; that dwells with gods above.
O that I thought it could be in a woman-
    As, if it can, I will presume in you-  
    To feed for aye her lamp and flames of love;
    To keep her constancy in plight and youth,
    Outliving beauty's outward, with a mind
    That doth renew swifter than blood decays!
How were I then uplifted!
but, alas,
    I am as true as truth's simplicity,
    And simpler than the infancy of truth.
In that I'll war with you.
If I be false, or swerve a hair from truth,
    When time is old and hath forgot itself,
    When waterdrops have worn the stones of Troy,
    And blind oblivion swallow'd cities up,
    And mighty states characterless are grated
    To dusty nothing-yet let memory
    From false to false, among false maids in love,
    Upbraid my falsehood when th' have said 'As false
    As air, as water, wind, or sandy earth,
    As fox to lamb, or wolf to heifer's calf,
    Pard to the hind, or stepdame to her son'-
    Yea, let them say, to stick the heart of falsehood,
    'As false as Cressid.
Go to, a bargain made; seal it, seal it; I'll be the  
    witness.
Here I hold your hand; here my cousin's.
If ever you
    prove false one to another, since I have taken such pains to
    bring you together, let all pitiful goers- between be call'd to
    the world's end after my name-call them all Pandars; let all
    constant men be Troiluses, all false women Cressids, and all
    brokers between Pandars.
Whereupon I will show you a chamber
    and a bed; which bed, because it shall not speak of your
    pretty encounters, press it to death.
Now, Princes, for the service I have done,
    Th' advantage of the time prompts me aloud
    To call for recompense.
Appear it to your mind
    That, through the sight I bear in things to come,
    I have abandon'd Troy, left my possession,
    Incurr'd a traitor's name, expos'd myself
    From certain and possess'd conveniences
    To doubtful fortunes, sequest'ring from me all
    That time, acquaintance, custom, and condition,
    Made tame and most familiar to my nature;
    And here, to do you service, am become
    As new into the world, strange, unacquainted-
    I do beseech you, as in way of taste,
    To give me now a little benefit
    Out of those many regist'red in promise,
    Which you say live to come in my behalf.
Oft have you-often have you thanks therefore-
    Desir'd my Cressid in right great exchange,
    Whom Troy hath still denied; but this Antenor,
    I know, is such a wrest in their affairs
    That their negotiations all must slack
    Wanting his manage; and they will almost
    Give us a prince of blood, a son of Priam,
    In change of him.
Let him be sent, great Princes,
    And he shall buy my daughter; and her presence
    Shall quite strike off all service I have done
    In most accepted pain.
This shall I undertake; and 'tis a burden
    Which I am proud to bear.
I will come last.
If so, I have derision med'cinable
    To use between your strangeness and his pride,
    Which his own will shall have desire to drink.
I will lead the way.
I'll fight no more 'gainst Troy.
What, am I poor of late?
But 'tis not so with me:
    Fortune and I are friends; I do enjoy
    At ample point all that I did possess  
    Save these men's looks; who do, methinks, find out
    Something not worth in me such rich beholding
    As they have often given.
I'll interrupt his reading.
I do not strain at the position-
    It is familiar-but at the author's drift;
    Who, in his circumstance, expressly proves
    That no man is the lord of anything,
    Though in and of him there be much consisting,
    Till he communicate his parts to others;
    Nor doth he of himself know them for aught
    Till he behold them formed in th' applause
    Where th' are extended; who, like an arch, reverb'rate
    The voice again; or, like a gate of steel
    Fronting the sun, receives and renders back
    His figure and his heat.
I was much rapt in this;
    And apprehended here immediately
    Th' unknown Ajax.
I do believe it; for they pass'd by me
    As misers do by beggars-neither gave to me
    Good word nor look.
Of this my privacy
    I have strong reasons.
I as your lover speak.
To this effect, Achilles, have I mov'd you.
I stand condemn'd for this;
    They think my little stomach to the war
    And your great love to me restrains you thus.
I see my reputation is at stake;
    My fame is shrewdly gor'd.
I'll send the fool to Ajax, and desire him
    T' invite the Troyan lords, after the combat,
    To see us here unarm'd.
I have a woman's longing,
    An appetite that I am sick withal,
    To see great Hector in his weeds of peace;
    To talk with him, and to behold his visage,
    Even to my full of view.
I said 'Good  
    morrow, Ajax'; and he replies 'Thanks, Agamemnon.
Who, I?
I will put on his presence.
Tell him I humbly desire the valiant
    Ajax to invite the most valorous Hector to come unarm'd to my
    tent; and to procure safe conduct for his person of the
    magnanimous and most illustrious six-or-seven-times-honour'd
    Captain General of the Grecian army, et cetera, Agamemnon.
I come from the worthy Achilles-
  THERSITES.
What music will be in him
    when Hector has knock'd out his brains I know not; but, I am sure,
    none; unless the fiddler Apollo get his sinews to make catlings
    on.
My mind is troubled, like a fountain stirr'd;
    And I myself see not the bottom of it.
Would the fountain of your mind were clear again, that I
    might water an ass at it.
I had rather be a tick in a sheep than
    such a valiant ignorance.
Had I so good occasion to lie long
    As you, Prince Paris, nothing but heavenly business
    Should rob my bed-mate of my company.
Health to you, valiant sir,
    During all question of the gentle truce;
    But when I meet you arm'd, as black defiance
    As heart can think or courage execute.
But when contention and occasion meet,
    By Jove, I'll play the hunter for thy life
    With all my force, pursuit, and policy.
By Venus' hand I swear
    No man alive can love in such a sort
    The thing he means to kill, more excellently.
This is the most despiteful'st gentle greeting
    The noblest hateful love, that e'er I heard of.
I was sent for to the King; but why, I know not.
I constantly believe-
    Or rather call my thought a certain knowledge-
    My brother Troilus lodges there to-night.
Rouse him and give him note of our approach,
    With the whole quality wherefore; I fear
    We shall be much unwelcome.
That I assure you:
    Troilus had rather Troy were borne to Greece
    Than Cressid borne from Troy.
Then, sweet my lord, I'll call mine uncle down;
    He shall unbolt the gates.
I prithee now, to bed.
but that the busy day,
    Wak'd by the lark, hath rous'd the ribald crows,
    And dreaming night will hide our joys no longer,
    I would not from thee.
I might have still held off,
    And then you would have tarried.
I shall have such a life!
What have I brought you to do?
Did not I tell you?
You smile and mock me, as if I meant naughtily.
Come, you are deceiv'd, I think of no such thing.
Pray you come in:
    I would not for half Troy have you seen here.
By my troth,
    I knew you not.
It's more than I know, I'll be
    sworn.
For my own part, I came in late.
My lord, I scarce have leisure to salute you,
    My matter is so rash.
I will go meet them; and, my lord Aeneas,
    We met by chance; you did not find me here.
I
    would they had broke's neck.
Would I were as deep under the earth as I am above!
I knew thou wouldst be his death!
Good uncle, I beseech you, on my knees I beseech you,
    what's the matter?
I will not go.
I will not, uncle.
I have forgot my father;
    I know no touch of consanguinity,
    No kin, no love, no blood, no soul so near me
    As the sweet Troilus.
I'll go in and weep-
  PANDARUS.
' I will not go from Troy.
I'll bring her to the Grecian presently;
    And to his hand when I deliver her,
    Think it an altar, and thy brother Troilus
    A priest, there off'ring to it his own heart.
I know what 'tis to love,
    And would, as I shall pity, I could help!
The grief is fine, full, perfect, that I taste,
    And violenteth in a sense as strong
    As that which causeth it.
How can I moderate it?
If I could temporize with my affections
    Or brew it to a weak and colder palate,
    The like allayment could I give my grief.
Cressid, I love thee in so strain'd a purity
    That the bless'd gods, as angry with my fancy,
    More bright in zeal than the devotion which
    Cold lips blow to their deities, take thee from me.
And is it true that I must go from Troy?
I must then to the Grecians?
I true!
I speak not 'Be thou true' as fearing thee,
    For I will throw my glove to Death himself
    That there's no maculation in thy heart;
    But 'Be thou true' say I to fashion in
    My sequent protestation: be thou true,
    And I will see thee.
But I'll be true.
And I'll grow friend with danger.
When shall I see you?
I will corrupt the Grecian sentinels  
    To give thee nightly visitation.
Hear why I speak it, love.
How novelties may move, and parts with person,
    Alas, a kind of godly jealousy,
    Which I beseech you call a virtuous sin,
    Makes me afeard.
Die I a villain, then!
In this I do not call your faith in question
    So mainly as my merit.
I cannot sing,
    Nor heel the high lavolt, nor sweeten talk,
    Nor play at subtle games-fair virtues all,
    To which the Grecians are most prompt and pregnant;
    But I can tell that in each grace of these
    There lurks a still and dumb-discoursive devil  
    That tempts most cunningly.
Do you think I will?
Who, I?
Whiles others fish with craft for great opinion,
    I with great truth catch mere simplicity;
    Whilst some with cunning gild their copper crowns,
    With truth and plainness I do wear mine bare.
Here is the lady
    Which for Antenor we deliver you;
    At the port, lord, I'll give her to thy hand,
    And by the way possess thee what she is.
I tell thee, lord of Greece,
    She is as far high-soaring o'er thy praises  
    As thou unworthy to be call'd her servant.
I charge thee use her well, even for my charge;
    For, by the dreadful Pluto, if thou dost not,
    Though the great bulk Achilles be thy guard,
    I'll cut thy throat.
Let me be privileg'd by my place and message
    To be a speaker free: when I am hence
    I'll answer to my lust.
And know you, lord,
    I'll nothing do on charge: to her own worth
    She shall be priz'd.
But that you say 'Be't so,'
    I speak it in my spirit and honour, 'No.
I'll tell thee, Diomed,
    This brave shall oft make thee to hide thy head.
'Tis he, I ken the manner of his gait:
    He rises on the toe.
And very courtly counsel: I'll begin.
I'll take that winter from your lips, fair lady.
I had good argument for kissing once.
Paris and I kiss evermore for him.
I'll have my kiss, sir.
I'll make my match to live,
    The kiss you take is better than you give;
    Therefore no kiss.
I'll give you boot; I'll give you three for one.
No, I'll be sworn.
May I, sweet lady, beg a kiss of you?
I do desire it.
I am your debtor; claim it when 'tis due.
I'll bring you to your father.
O, I perceive you!
I am not warm yet; let us fight again.
Why, then will I no more.
I thank thee, Hector.
I came to kill thee, cousin, and bear hence
    A great addition earned in thy death.
If I might in entreaties find success,
    As seld I have the chance, I would desire
    My famous cousin to our Grecian tents.
Give me thy hand, my cousin;
    I will go eat with thee, and see your knights.
I thank thee, most imperious Agamemnon.
Mock not that I affect the untraded oath;
    Your quondam wife swears still by Venus' glove.
O, pardon; I offend.
I have, thou gallant Troyan, seen thee oft,
    Labouring for destiny, make cruel way
    Through ranks of Greekish youth; and I have seen thee,
    As hot as Perseus, spur thy Phrygian steed,
    Despising many forfeits and subduements,
    When thou hast hung thy advanced sword i' th' air,
    Not letting it decline on the declined;
    That I have said to some my standers-by
    'Lo, Jupiter is yonder, dealing life!
'
    And I have seen thee pause and take thy breath,
    When that a ring of Greeks have hemm'd thee in,
    Like an Olympian wrestling.
This have I seen;
    But this thy countenance, still lock'd in steel,
    I never saw till now.
I knew thy grandsire,
    And once fought with him.
Most reverend Nestor, I am glad to clasp thee.
I would my arms could match thee in contention
    As they contend with thee in courtesy.
I would they could.
By this white beard, I'd fight with thee to-morrow.
I have seen the time.
I wonder now how yonder city stands,
    When we have here her base and pillar by us.
I know your favour, Lord Ulysses, well.
Ah, sir, there's many a Greek and Troyan dead,
    Since first I saw yourself and Diomed
    In Ilion on your Greekish embassy.
Sir, I foretold you then what would ensue.
I must not believe you.
There they stand yet; and modestly I think
    The fall of every Phrygian stone will cost
    A drop of Grecian blood.
After the General, I beseech you next
    To feast with me and see me at my tent.
I shall forestall thee, Lord Ulysses, thou!
Now, Hector, I have fed mine eyes on thee;
    I have with exact view perus'd thee, Hector,
    And quoted joint by joint.
I am Achilles.
Stand fair, I pray thee; let me look on thee.
Nay, I have done already.
I will the second time,
    As I would buy thee, view thee limb by limb.
Tell me, you heavens, in which part of his body
    Shall I destroy him?
That I may give the local wound a name,
    And make distinct the very breach whereout
    Hector's great spirit flew.
I tell thee yea.
Wert thou an oracle to tell me so,
    I'd not believe thee.
Henceforth guard thee well;
    For I'll not kill thee there, nor there, nor there;  
    But, by the forge that stithied Mars his helm,
    I'll kill thee everywhere, yea, o'er and o'er.
His insolence draws folly from my lips;
    But I'll endeavour deeds to match these words,
    Or may I never-
  AJAX.
The general state, I fear,
    Can scarce entreat you to be odd with him.
I pray you let us see you in the field;
    We have had pelting wars since you refus'd
    The Grecians' cause.
To-morrow do I meet thee, fell as death;
    To-night all friends.
My Lord Ulysses, tell me, I beseech you,
    In what place of the field doth Calchas keep?
Shall I, sweet lord, be bound to you so much,
    After we part from Agamemnon's tent,
    To bring me thither?
I'll heat his blood with Greekish wine to-night,
    Which with my scimitar I'll cool to-morrow.
Prithee, be silent, boy; I profit not by thy talk; thou  
    art said to be Achilles' male varlet.
Do I curse thee?
My sweet Patroclus, I am thwarted quite
    From my great purpose in to-morrow's battle.
Here is a letter from Queen Hecuba,
    A token from her daughter, my fair love,
    Both taxing me and gaging me to keep
    An oath that I have sworn.
I will not break it.
Fall Greeks; fail fame; honour or go or stay;
    My major vow lies here, this I'll obey.
With too much blood and too little brain these two may
    run mad; but, if with too much brain and to little blood they do,
    I'll be a curer of madmen.
To be a dog, a mule, a cat, a fitchew, a toad, a
    lizard, an owl, a put-tock, or a herring without a roe, I would
    not care; but to be Menelaus, I would conspire against destiny.
Ask me not what I would be, if I were not Thersites; for I care
    not to be the louse of a lazar, so I were not Menelaus.
I trouble you.
So now, fair Prince of Troy, I bid good night;
    Ajax commands the guard to tend on you.
I cannot, lord; I have important business,
    The tide whereof is now.
[Aside to TROILUS] Follow his torch; he goes to
    Calchas' tent; I'll keep you company.
That same Diomed's a false-hearted rogue, a most unjust
    knave; I will no more trust him when he leers than I will a
    serpent when he hisses.
I will rather
    leave to see Hector than not to dog him.
I'll after.
Calchas, I think.
I'll tell you what-
  DIOMEDES.
In faith, I cannot.
I prithee, do not hold me to mine oath;
    Bid me do anything but that, sweet Greek.
No, no, good night; I'll be your fool no more.
You are moved, Prince; let us depart, I pray,
    Lest your displeasure should enlarge itself
    To wrathful terms.
This place is dangerous;
    The time right deadly; I beseech you, go.
Behold, I pray you.
I prithee stay.
I pray you, stay; by hell and all hell's torments,
    I will not speak a word.
By Jove, I will be patient.
In faith, I do not.
Nay, stay; by Jove, I will not speak a word:
    There is between my will and all offences
    A guard of patience.
In faith, I will, lo; never trust me else.
I'll fetch you one.
Fear me not, my lord;
    I will not be myself, nor have cognition
    Of what I feel.
I am all patience.
I will be patient; outwardly I will.
It is no matter, now I ha't again.
I will not meet with you to-morrow night.
I prithee, Diomed, visit me no more.
I shall have it.
Thy master now lies thinking on his bed
    Of thee and me, and sighs, and takes my glove,
    And gives memorial dainty kisses to it,
    As I kiss thee.
I had your heart before; this follows it.
I did swear patience.
You shall not have it, Diomed; faith, you shall not;
    I'll give you something else.
I will have this.
By all Diana's waiting women yond,
    And by herself, I will not tell you whose.
To-morrow will I wear it on my helm,  
    And grieve his spirit that dares not challenge it.
Well, well, 'tis done, 'tis past; and yet it is not;
    I will not keep my word.
I do not like this fooling.
Nor I, by Pluto; but that that likes not you
    Pleases me best.
What, shall I come?
I shall be plagu'd.
I prithee come.
this fault in us I find,
    The error of our eye directs our mind.
But if I tell how these two did coact,
    Shall I not lie in publishing a truth?
I cannot conjure, Troyan.
Hark, Greek: as much as I do Cressid love,
    So much by weight hate I her Diomed.
I have been seeking you this hour, my lord.
I'll bring you to the gates.
Would I could meet that rogue Diomed!
I would croak like
    a raven; I would bode, I would bode.
By all the everlasting gods, I'll go.
No more, I say.
Consort with me in loud and dear petition,
    Pursue we him on knees; for I have dreamt
    Of bloody turbulence, and this whole night
    Hath nothing been but shapes and forms of slaughter.
Be gone, I say.
Hold you still, I say.
No, faith, young Troilus; doff thy harness, youth;
    I am to-day i' th' vein of chivalry.
Unarm thee, go; and doubt thou not, brave boy,
    I'll stand to-day for thee and me and Troy.
Troilus, I would not have you fight to-day.
Thy wife hath dreamt; thy mother hath had visions;
    Cassandra doth foresee; and I myself
    Am like a prophet suddenly enrapt
    To tell thee that this day is ominous.
Aeneas is a-field;
    And I do stand engag'd to many Greeks,
    Even in the faith of valour, to appear
    This morning to them.
I must not break my faith.
Andromache, I am offended with you.
Hector, I take my leave.
Proud Diomed, believe,
    I come to lose my arm or win my sleeve.
A whoreson tisick, a whoreson rascally tisick so troubles
    me, and the foolish fortune of this girl, and what one thing,
    what another, that I shall leave you one o' th's days; and I have
    a rheum in mine eyes too, and such an ache in my bones that
    unless a man were curs'd I cannot tell what to think on't.
Now they are clapper-clawing one another; I'll go look
    on.
I would fain see them meet, that that same young Troyan ass
    that loves the whore there might send that Greekish whoremasterly
    villain with the sleeve back to the dissembling luxurious drab of
    a sleeve-less errand.
Fly not; for shouldst thou take the river Styx
    I would swim after.
I do not fly; but advantageous care
    Withdrew me from the odds of multitude.
No, no-I am a rascal; a scurvy railing knave; a very
    filthy rogue.
I do believe thee.
I think they have swallowed one another.
I would laugh at
    that miracle.
I'll seek
    them.
Fellow, commend my service to her beauty;
    Tell her I have chastis'd the amorous Troyan,
    And am her knight by proof.
I go, my lord.
I will none but Hector.
Troilus, I say!
I would correct him.
Were I the general, thou shouldst have my office
    Ere that correction.
Troilus, I say!
I'll fight with him alone.
I will not look upon.
Now do I see thee, ha!
I do disdain thy courtesy, proud Troyan.
I would have been much more a fresher man,
    Had I expected thee.
No, by the flame of yonder glorious heaven,
    He shall not carry him; I'll be ta'en too,
    Or bring him off.
Fate, hear me what I say:
    I reck not though thou end my life to-day.
I like thy armour well;
    I'll frush it and unlock the rivets all
    But I'll be master of it.
Why then, fly on; I'll hunt thee for thy hide.
Come here about me, you my Myrmidons;
    Mark what I say.
Attend me where I wheel;
    Strike not a stroke, but keep yourselves in breath;
    And when I have the bloody Hector found,
    Empale him with your weapons round about;
    In fellest manner execute your arms.
I am a bastard too; I love bastards.
I am a bastard
    begot, bastard instructed, bastard in mind, bastard in valour, in
    everything illegitimate.
Now is my day's work done; I'll take good breath:
    Rest, sword; thou hast thy fill of blood and death!
I am unarm'd; forego this vantage, Greek.
Strike, fellows, strike; this is the man I seek.
[Sheathes his sword]
    Come, tie his body to my horse's tail;
    Along the field I will the Troyan trail.
I say at once let your brief plagues be mercy,
    And linger not our sure destructions on.
I do not speak of flight, of fear of death,
    But dare all imminence that gods and men  
    Address their dangers in.
You vile abominable tents,
    Thus proudly pight upon our Phrygian plains,
    Let Titan rise as early as he dare,
    I'll through and through you.
And, thou great-siz'd coward,
    No space of earth shall sunder our two hates;
    I'll haunt thee like a wicked conscience still,
    That mouldeth goblins swift as frenzy's thoughts.
Till then I'll sweat and seek about for eases,
    And at that time bequeath you my diseases.
>>



SCENE:
A city in Illyria; and the sea-coast near it



ACT I.
SCENE I.
Why, so I do, the noblest that I have.
That instant was I turn'd into a hart,
    And my desires, like fell and cruel hounds,
    E'er since pursue me.
So please my lord, I might not be admitted,
    But from her handmaid do return this answer:
    The element itself, till seven years' heat,
    Shall not behold her face at ample view;
    But like a cloistress she will veiled walk,
    And water once a day her chamber round
    With eye-offending brine; all this to season
    A brother's dead love, which she would keep fresh  
    And lasting in her sad remembrance.
And what should I do in Illyria?
True, madam, and, to comfort you with chance,
    Assure yourself, after our ship did split,
    When you, and those poor number saved with you,
    Hung on our driving boat, I saw your brother,
    Most provident in peril, bind himself-
    Courage and hope both teaching him the practice-
    To a strong mast that liv'd upon the sea;
    Where, like Arion on the dolphin's back,
    I saw him hold acquaintance with the waves
    So long as I could see.
Ay, madam, well; for I was bred and born
    Not three hours' travel from this very place.
I have heard my father name him.
And so is now, or was so very late;
    For but a month ago I went from hence,
    And then 'twas fresh in murmur- as, you know,
    What great ones do the less will prattle of-
    That he did seek the love of fair Olivia.
O that I serv'd that lady,
    And might not be delivered to the world,
    Till I had made mine own occasion mellow,
    What my estate is!
There is a fair behaviour in thee, Captain;
    And though that nature with a beauteous wall
    Doth oft close in pollution, yet of thee
    I will believe thou hast a mind that suits
    With this thy fair and outward character.
I prithee, and I'll pay thee bounteously,
    Conceal me what I am, and be my aid
    For such disguise as haply shall become
    The form of my intent.
I'll serve this duke:  
    Thou shalt present me as an eunuch to him;
    It may be worth thy pains, for I can sing
    And speak to him in many sorts of music,
    That will allow me very worth his service.
What else may hap to time I will commit;
    Only shape thou silence to my wit.
Be you his eunuch and your mute I'll be;
    When my tongue blabs, then let mine eyes not see.
I thank thee.
I am sure care's an enemy to life.
I'll confine myself no finer than I am.
That quaffing and drinking will undo you; I heard my lady
    talk of it yesterday, and of a foolish knight that you brought in
    one night here to be her wooer.
With drinking healths to my niece; I'll drink to her as
    long as there is a passage in my throat and drink in Illyria.
Good Mistress Accost, I desire better acquaintance.
By my troth, I would not undertake her in this company.
An you part so, mistress, I would I might never draw
    sword again.
Sir, I have not you by th' hand.
I pray you, bring your hand to
    th' buttry-bar and let it drink.
Why, I think so; I am not such an ass but I can keep my
    hand dry.
Ay, sir, I have them at my fingers' ends; marry, now I let
    go your hand, I am barren.
When did I see
    thee so put down?
Never in your life, I think; unless you see canary put
    me down.
Methinks sometimes I have no more wit than a Christian
    or an ordinary man has; but I am great eater of beef, and I
    believe that does harm to my wit.
An I thought that, I'd forswear it.
I'll ride home  
    to-morrow, Sir Toby.
I would I had bestowed
    that time in the tongues that I have in fencing, dancing, and
    bear-baiting.
Oh, had I but followed the arts!
Excellent; it hangs like flax on a distaff, and I hope to
    see a huswife take thee between her legs and spin it off.
Faith, I'll home to-morrow, Sir Toby.
She'll none o' th' Count; she'll not match above her
    degree, neither in estate, years, nor wit; I have heard her
    swear't.
I'll stay a month longer.
I am a fellow o' th' strangest
    mind i' th' world; I delight in masques and revels sometimes
    altogether.
As any man in Illyria, whatsoever he be, under the
    degree of my betters; and yet I will not compare with an old man.
Faith, I can cut a caper.
And I can cut the mutton to't.
And I think I have the back-trick simply as strong as
    any man in Illyria.
My very walk should be a
    jig; I would not so much as make water but in a sink-a-pace.
I did think, by
    the excellent constitution of thy leg, it was form'd under the
    star of a galliard.
I thank you.
Cesario,
    Thou know'st no less but all; I have unclasp'd
    To thee the book even of my secret soul.
Say I do speak with her, my lord, what then?
I think not so, my lord.
I know thy constellation is right apt
    For this affair.
Some four or five attend him-
    All, if you will, for I myself am best
    When least in company.
I'll do my best
    To woo your lady.
Whoe'er I woo, myself would be his wife.
Nay, either tell me where thou hast been, or I will not open
    my lips so wide as a bristle may enter in way of thy excuse; my
    lady will hang thee for thy absence.
I can tell thee where that saying was
    born, of 'I fear no colours.
Not so, neither; but I am resolv'd on two points.
Those wits
    that think they have thee do very oft prove fools; and I that am
    sure I lack thee may pass for a wise man.
Go to, y'are a dry fool; I'll no more of you.
The lady bade take away the fool; therefore, I
    say again, take her away.
Sir, I bade them take away you.
Lady, 'Cucullus non facit
    monachum'; that's as much to say as I wear not motley in my
    brain.
I must catechize you for it, madonna.
Well, sir, for want of other idleness, I'll bide your
    proof.
I think his soul is in hell, madonna.
I know his soul is in heaven, fool.
Sir Toby will be sworn that I am no fox;
    but he will not pass his word for twopence that you are no fool.
I marvel your ladyship takes delight in such a barren
    rascal; I saw him put down the other day with an ordinary fool
    that has no more brain than a stone.
I protest I take these wise men that crow so at
    these set kind of fools no better than the fools' zanies.
I know not, madam; 'tis a fair young man, and well attended.
Fetch him off, I pray you; he speaks nothing but madman.
[Exit MARIA] Go you, Malvolio: if it be a suit from
    the Count, I am sick, or not at home- what you will to dismiss
    it.
I defy lechery.
Let him be the devil an he will, I care not; give me
    faith, say I.
I
    told him you were sick; he takes on him to understand so much,
     and therefore comes to speak with you.
I told him you were
    asleep; he seems to have a foreknowledge of that too, and
    therefore comes to speak with you.
Speak to me; I shall answer for her.
Most radiant, exquisite, and unmatchable beauty- I pray you
    tell me if this be the lady of the house, for I never saw her.
I
    would be loath to cast away my speech; for, besides that it is
    excellently well penn'd, I have taken great pains to con it.
Good
    beauties, let me sustain no scorn; I am very comptible, even to
    the least sinister usage.
I can say little more than I have studied, and that
    question's out of my part.
Good gentle one, give me modest
    assurance if you be the lady of the house, that I may proceed in
    my speech.
No, my profound heart; and yet, by the very fangs of malice
    I swear, I am not that I play.
If I do not usurp myself, I am.
I will on with my speech in your praise, and then
    show you the heart of my message.
I forgive you the praise.
Alas, I took great pains to study it, and 'tis poetical.
It is the more like to be feigned; I pray you keep it in.
I
    heard you were saucy at my gates, and allow'd your approach
    rather to wonder at you than to hear you.
No, good swabber, I am to hull here a little longer.
I am a messenger.
I bring no overture of war, no  
    taxation of homage: I hold the olive in my hand; my words are as
    full of peace as matter.
The rudeness that hath appear'd in me have I learn'd from my
    entertainment.
What I am and what I would are as secret as
    maidenhead- to your cars, divinity; to any other's, profanation.
O, I have read it; it is heresy.
[Unveiling] Look you, sir, such a one I
    was this present.
O, sir, I will not be so hard-hearted; I will give out
    divers schedules of my beauty.
I see you what you are: you are too proud;
    But, if you were the devil, you are fair.
Your lord does know my mind; I cannot love him.
Yet I suppose him virtuous, know him noble,
    Of great estate, of fresh and stainless youth;
    In voices well divulg'd, free, learn'd, and valiant,
    And in dimension and the shape of nature
    A gracious person; but yet I cannot love him.
If I did love you in my master's flame,
    With such a suff'ring, such a deadly life,
    In your denial I would find no sense;
    I would not understand it.
Above my fortunes, yet my state is well:
    I am a gentleman.
I cannot love him; let him send no more-
    Unless perchance you come to me again
    To tell me how he takes it.
I thank you for your pains; spend this for me.
I am no fee'd post, lady; keep your purse;
    My master, not myself, lacks recompense.
'
    'Above my fortunes, yet my state is well:
    I am a gentleman.
' I'll be sworn thou art;
    Thy tongue, thy face, thy limbs, actions, and spirit,
    Do give thee five-fold blazon.
Methinks I feel this youth's perfections
    With an invisible and subtle stealth
    To creep in at mine eyes.
He left this ring behind him,
    Would I or not.
Tell him I'll none of it.
Desire him not to flatter with his lord,
    Nor hold him up with hopes; I am not for him.
If that the youth will come this way to-morrow,
    I'll give him reasons for't.
Madam, I will.
I do I know not what, and fear to find
    Mine eye too great a flatterer for my mind.
SCENE I.
Will you stay no longer; nor will you not that I go with
    you?
My stars shine darkly over me; the
    malignancy of my fate might perhaps distemper yours; therefore I
    shall crave of you your leave that I may bear my evils alone.
But I perceive in you so excellent a touch of
    modesty that you will not extort from me what I am willing to
    keep in; therefore it charges me in manners the rather to express
    myself.
You must know of me then, Antonio, my name is Sebastian,
    which I call'd Roderigo; my father was that Sebastian of
    Messaline whom I know you have heard of.
A lady, sir, though it was said she much resembled me,
    was yet of many accounted beautiful; but though I could not with
    such estimable wonder overfar believe that, yet thus far I will
    boldly publish her: she bore mind that envy could not but call
    fair.
She is drown'd already, sir, with salt water, though I seem
    to drown her remembrance again with more.
Fare ye well at once;
    my bosom is full of kindness, and I am yet so near the manners of
    my mother that, upon the least occasion more, mine eyes will tell
    tales of me.
I am bound to the Count Orsino's court.
I have many cnemies in Orsino's court,  
    Else would I very shortly see thee there.
But come what may, I do adore thee so
    That danger shall seem sport, and I will go.
Even now, sir; on a moderate pace I have since arriv'd but
    hither.
She took the ring of me; I'll none of it.
I left no ring with her; what means this lady?
I am the man.
Disguise, I see thou art a wickedness
    Wherein the pregnant enemy does much.
My master loves her dearly,
    And I, poor monster, fond as much on him;
    And she, mistaken, seems to dote on me.
As I am man,
    My state is desperate for my master's love;
    As I am woman- now alas the day!
O Time, thou must untangle this, not I;
    It is too hard a knot for me t' untie!
Nay, by my troth, I know not; but I know to be up late
    is to be up late.
I hate it as an unfill'd can.
Faith, so they say; but I think it rather consists of
    eating and drinking.
Marian, I say!
I had
    rather than forty shillings I had such a leg, and so sweet a
    breath to sing, as the fool has.
I sent thee sixpence for thy leman; hadst it?
I did impeticos thy gratillity; for Malvolio's nose is no
    whipstock.
Ay, ay; I care not for good life.
A mellifluous voice, as I am true knight.
I am dog at a catch.
I shall be constrain'd
    in't to call thee knave, knight.
'Tis not the first time I have constrained one to call
    me knave.
I shall never begin if I hold my peace.
Am not I consanguineous?
Am I not of her blood?
Ay, he does well enough if he be dispos'd, and so do I
    too; he does it with a better grace, but I do it more natural.
Sir Toby, I must be round with you.
[Sings] Farewell, dear heart, since I must needs be gone.
[Sings] But I will never die.
[Sings] Shall I bid him go?
[Sings] Shall I bid him go, and spare not?
I'll write thee a challenge; or I'll
    deliver thy indignation to him by word of mouth.
For Monsieur Malvolio, let me alone with him; if I do not gull
    him into a nayword, and make him a common recreation, do not  
    think I have wit enough to lie straight in my bed.
I know I can
    do it.
O, if I thought that, I'd beat him like a dog.
I have no exquisite reason for't, but I have reason good
    enough.
I will drop in his way some obscure epistles of love;
    wherein, by the colour of his beard, the shape of his leg, the
    manner of his gait, the expressure of his eye, forehead, and
    complexion, he shall find himself most feelingly personated.
I  
    can write very like my lady, your niece; on forgotten matter we
    can hardly make distinction of our hands.
I smell a device.
I have't in my nose too.
Ass, I doubt not.
Sport royal, I warrant you.
I know my physic will work with
    him.
I will plant you two, and let the fool make a third, where
    he shall find the letter; observe his construction of it.
I was ador'd once too.
If I cannot recover your niece, I am a foul way out.
If I do not, never trust me; take it how you will.
Come, come, I'll go burn some sack; 'tis too late to go
    to bed now.
If ever thou shalt love,
    In the sweet pangs of it remember me;
    For such as I am all true lovers are,  
    Unstaid and skittish in all motions else
    Save in the constant image of the creature
    That is belov'd.
I think it well, my lord.
[Music]  

                     FESTE'S SONG

            Come away, come away, death;
          And in sad cypress let me be laid;
            Fly away, fly away, breath,
          I am slain by a fair cruel maid.
No pains, sir; I take pleasure in singing, sir.
I'll pay thy pleasure, then.
I
    would have men of such constancy put to sea, that their business
    might be everything, and their intent everywhere: for that's it
    that always makes a good voyage of nothing.
Tell her my love, more noble than the world,
    Prizes not quantity of dirty lands;
    The parts that fortune hath bestow'd upon her,
    Tell her I hold as giddily as Fortune;  
    But 'tis that miracle and queen of gems
    That Nature pranks her in attracts my soul.
I cannot be so answer'd.
Make no compare
    Between that love a woman can bear me
    And that I owe Olivia.
Ay, but I know-
  DUKE.
My father had a daughter lov'd a man,
    As it might be perhaps, were I a woman,
    I should your lordship.
I am all the daughters of my father's house,
    And all the brothers too- and yet I know not.
Sir, shall I to this lady?
Nay, I'll come; if I lose a scruple of this sport let me be
    boil'd to death with melancholy.
I would exult, man; you know he brought me out o' favour
    with my lady about a bear-baiting here.
Observe him, for the love of
    mockery, for I know this letter will make a contemplative idiot
    of him.
Maria once told me she
    did affect me; and I have heard herself come thus near, that,
    should she fancy, it should be one of my complexion.
What should I think on't?
'Slight, I could so beat the rogue-
  SIR TOBY.
Peace, I say.
Calling my officers about me, in my branch'd velvet gown,
    having come from a day-bed- where I have left Olivia sleeping-
  SIR TOBY.
And then to have the humour of state; and after a demure
    travel of regard, telling them I know my place as I would they
    should do theirs, to ask for my kinsman Toby-
  SIR TOBY.
I frown the while, and perchance wind up my watch, or play
    with my- some rich jewel.
I extend my hand to him thus, quenching my familiar smile
   with an austere regard of control-
  SIR TOBY.
That's me, I warrant you.
I knew 'twas I; for many do call me fool.
[Reads]

                    Jove knows I love,
                      But who?
[Reads]

             'I may command where I adore;
               But silence, like a Lucrece knife,
             With bloodless stroke my heart doth gore;
               M.
I.
Excellent wench, say I.
I.
'I may command where I adore.
' Why, she may command me: I
    serve her; she is my lady.
If I could make that  
    resemble something in me.
I.
Did not I say he would work it out?
And O shall end, I hope.
Ay, or I'll cudgel him, and make him cry 'O!
And then I comes behind.
I.
In my stars I am above
    thee; but be not afraid of greatness.
I say, remember, Go to,
    thou art made, if thou desir'st to be so; if not, let me see thee
    a steward still, the fellow of servants, and not worthy to touch
    Fortune's fingers.
I will be
    proud, I will read politic authors, I will baffle Sir Toby, I
    will wash off gross acquaintance, I will be point-devise the very
    man.
I do not now fool myself to let imagination jade me; for
    every reason excites to this, that my lady loves me.
I thank my stars I am happy.
I will be strange, stout, in
    yellow stockings, and cross-garter'd, even with the swiftness of
    putting on.
[Reads] 'Thou canst not choose but know who I am.
Therefore in my presence still smile, dear my
    sweet, I prithee.
'

    Jove, I thank thee.
I will smile; I will do everything that thou
    wilt have me.
I will not give my part of this sport for a pension of
    thousands to be paid from the Sophy.
I could marry this wench for this device.
So could I too.
Nor I neither.
Shall I play my freedom at tray-trip, and become thy
    bond-slave?
I' faith, or I either?
I'll make one too.
SCENE I.
No, sir, I live by the church.
No such matter, sir: I do live by the church; for I do live
    at my house, and my house doth stand by the church.
I would, therefore, my sister had had name, sir.
Troth, sir, I can yield you none without words, and words
    are grown so false I am loath to prove reason with them.
I warrant thou art a merry fellow and car'st for nothing.
Not so, sir; I do care for something; but in my conscience,
    sir, I do not care for you.
If that be to care for nothing, sir,
    I would it would make you invisible.
I am
    indeed not her fool, but her corrupter of words.
I saw thee late at the Count Orsino's.
I would be sorry, sir, but the fool should be
    as oft with your master as with my mistress: think I saw your
    wisdom there.
Nay, an thou pass upon me, I'll no more with thee.
By my troth, I'll tell thee, I am almost sick for one;
    [Aside] though I would not have it grow on my chin.
I would play Lord Pandarus of Phrygia, sir, to bring a
    Cressida to this Troilus.
I understand you, sir; 'tis well begg'd.
The matter, I hope, is not great, sir, begging but a beggar:
    Cressida was a beggar.
I will construe to
    them whence you come; who you are and what you would are out of
    my welkin- I might say 'element' but the word is overworn.
I hope, sir, you are; and I am yours.
I am bound to your niece, sir; I mean, she is the list of my
    voyage.
My legs do better understand me, sir, than I understand what
    you mean by bidding me taste my legs.
I mean, to go, sir, to enter.
I will answer you with gait and entrance.
'Odours,' 'pregnant,' and 'vouchsafed'- I'll get 'em all
    three all ready.
For him, I think not on him; for his thoughts,
    Would they were blanks rather than fill'd with me!
Madam, I come to whet your gentle thoughts
    On his behalf.
O, by your leave, I pray you:
    I bade you never speak again of him;
    But, would you undertake another suit,
    I had rather hear you to solicit that
    Than music from the spheres.
I did send,
    After the last enchantment you did here,
    A ring in chase of you; so did I abuse
    Myself, my servant, and, I fear me, you.
Under your hard construction must I sit,
    To force that on you in a shameful cunning
    Which you knew none of yours.
I Pity YOU.
Be not afraid, good youth; I will not have you;
    And yet, when wit and youth is come to harvest,
    Your wife is like to reap a proper man.
I prithee tell me what thou think'st of me.
If I think so, I think the same of you.
Then think you right: I am not what I am.
I would you were as I would have you be!
Would it be better, madam, than I am?
I wish it might, for now I am your fool.
Cesario, by the roses of the spring,
    By maidhood, honour, truth, and every thing,
    I love thee so that, maugre all thy pride,
    Nor wit nor reason can my passion hide.
Do not extort thy reasons from this clause,
    For that I woo, thou therefore hast no cause;
    But rather reason thus with reason fetter:
    Love sought is good, but given unsought is better.
By innocence I swear, and by my youth,
    I have one heart, one bosom, and one truth,
    And that no woman has; nor never none
    Shall mistress be of it, save I alone.
And so adieu, good madam; never more
    Will I my master's tears to you deplore.
No, faith, I'll not stay a jot longer.
Marry, I saw your niece do more favours to the Count's
    servingman than ever she bestow'd upon me; I saw't i' th'
    orchard.
As plain as I see you now.
I will prove it legitimate, sir, upon the oaths of judgment
    and reason.
An't be any way, it must be with valour, for policy I
    hate; I had as lief be a Brownist as a politician.
Where shall I find you?
I have been dear to him, lad- some two thousand strong,
    or so.
I think oxen and wainropes cannot hale them
    together.
For Andrew, if he were open'd and you find so much
    blood in his liver as will clog the foot of a flea, I'll eat the
    rest of th' anatomy.
I have dogg'd him like his murderer.
He does obey every
    point of the letter that I dropp'd to betray him.
You have not seen such a thing as
    'tis; I  can hardly forbear hurling things at him.
I know my lady
    will strike him; if she do, he'll smile and take't for a great
    favour.
I would not by my will have troubled you;
    But since you make your pleasure of your pains,
    I will no further chide you.
I could not stay behind you: my desire,
    More sharp than filed steel, did spur me forth;
    And not all love to see you- though so much
    As might have drawn one to a longer voyage-
    But jealousy what might befall your travel,
    Being skilless in these parts; which to a stranger,
    Unguided and unfriended, often prove
    Rough and unhospitable.
My kind Antonio,
    I can no other answer make but thanks,
    And thanks, and ever thanks; and oft good turns
    Are shuffl'd off with such uncurrent pay;  
    But were my worth as is my conscience firm,
    You should find better dealing.
I am not weary, and 'tis long to night;
    I pray you, let us satisfy our eyes
    With the memorials and the things of fame
    That do renown this city.
I do not without danger walk these streets:
    Once in a sea-fight 'gainst the Count his galleys
    I did some service; of such note, indeed,
    That, were I ta'en here, it would scarce be answer'd.
Only myself stood out;  
    For which, if I be lapsed in this place,
    I shall pay dear.
I will bespeak our diet,
    Whiles you beguile the time and feed your knowledge
    With viewing of the town; there shall you have me.
Why I your purse?
Haply your eye shall light upon some toy
    You have desire to purchase; and your store,
    I think, is not for idle markets, sir.
I'll be your purse-bearer, and leave you for
    An hour.
I do remember.
I have sent after him; he says he'll come.
How shall I feast him?
I speak too loud.
Exit MARIA
    I am as mad as he,
    If sad and merry madness equal be.
I sent for thee upon a sad occasion.
I could be sad.
I think we do know the sweet Roman hand.
Ay, sweetheart, and I'll come to thee.
Am I made?
Madam, the young gentleman of the Count Orsino's is
    return'd; I could hardly entreat him back; he attends your
    ladyship's pleasure.
I'll come to him.
Let some of my
    people have a special care of him; I would not have him miscarry
    for the half of my dowry.
This concurs directly with the letter: she
    sends him on purpose, that I may appear stubborn to him; for she
    incites me to that in the letter.
I have lim'd her; but it is
    Jove's doing, and Jove make me thankful!
Well, Jove, not I, is the doer of this, and he is to be
    thanked.
If all the
    devils of hell be drawn in little, and Legion himself possess'd
    him, yet I'll speak to him.
Go off; I discard you.
Did not I tell
    you?
Marry, and it shall be done to-morrow morning, if I live.
My
    lady would not lose him for more than I'll say.
No, I warrant you, he will not hear of godliness.
You are idle shallow things; I
    am not of your element; you shall know more hereafter.
If this were play'd upon a stage now, I could condemn it as
    an improbable fiction.
I warrant there's vinegar
    and pepper in't.
Ay, is't, I warrant him; do but read.
[Reads] 'Wonder not, nor admire not in thy mind, why I do
    call thee so, for I will show thee no reason for't.
[Reads] 'Thou com'st to the Lady Olivia, and in my sight
    she uses thee kindly; but thou liest in thy throat; that is not
    the matter I challenge thee for.
[Reads] 'I will waylay thee going home; where if it be
    thy chance to kill me'-
  FABIAN.
I'll give't him.
Now will not I deliver his letter; for the behaviour of
    the young gentleman gives him out to be of good capacity and
    breeding; his employment between his lord and my niece confirms
    no less.
But, sir, I will deliver his challenge by word of
    mouth, set upon Aguecheek notable report of valour, and drive the
    gentleman- as know his youth will aptly receive it- into a most
    hideous opinion of his rage, skill, fury, and impetuosity.
I will meditate the while upon some horrid message for a
    challenge.
I have said too much unto a heart of stone,
    And laid mine honour too unchary out;
    There's something in me that reproves my fault;
    But such a headstrong potent fault it is
    That it but mocks reproof.
And I beseech you come again to-morrow.
What shall you ask of me that I'll deny,
    That honour sav'd may upon asking give?
How with mine honour may I give him that
    Which I have given to you?
I will acquit you.
Of what nature
    the wrongs are thou hast done him, I know not; but thy  
    intercepter, full of despite, bloody as the hunter, attends
    thee at the orchard end.
You mistake, sir; I am sure no man hath any quarrel to me;
    my remembrance is very free and clear from any image of offence
    done to any man.
You'll find it otherwise, I assure you; therefore, if you
    hold your life at any price, betake you to your guard; for your
    opposite hath in him what youth, strength, skill, and wrath, can
    furnish man withal.
I pray you, sir, what is he?
I will return again into the house and desire some conduct
    of the lady.
I am no fighter.
I have heard of some kind of men
    that put quarrels purposely on others to taste their valour;
    belike this is a man of that quirk.
I beseech you do me this
    courteous office as to know of the knight what my offence to him
    is: it is something of my negligence, nothing of my purpose.
I Will do so.
I know the knight is incens'd against you, even to a mortal
    arbitrement; but nothing of the circumstance more.
I beseech you, what manner of man is he?
I will make your peace with him if I can.
I shall be much bound to you for't.
I am one that would
    rather go with sir priest than sir knight.
I care not who knows
    so much of my mettle.
Why, man, he's a very devil; I have not seen such a
    firago.
I had a pass with him, rapier, scabbard, and all, and he
    gives me the stuck in with such a mortal motion that it is
    inevitable; and on the answer, he pays you as surely as your feet
    hit the ground they step on.
Pox on't, I'll not meddle with him.
Plague on't; an I thought he had been valiant, and so
    cunning in fence, I'd have seen him damn'd ere I'd have
    challeng'd him.
Let him let the matter slip, and I'll give him
    my horse, grey Capilet.
I'll make the motion.
[Aside] Marry,
    I'll ride your horse as well as I ride you.
Re-enter FABIAN and VIOLA

    [To FABIAN] I have his horse to take up the quarrel; I have
    persuaded him the youth's a devil.
A little thing would make me
    tell them how much I lack of a man.
I do assure you 'tis against my will.
If this young gentleman
    Have done offence, I take the fault on me:
    If you offend him, I for him defy you.
Nay, if you be an undertaker, I am for you.
[To ANTONIO] I'll be with you anon.
Marry, will I, sir; and for that I promis'd you, I'll be
    as good as my word.
Antonio, I arrest thee at the suit
    Of Count Orsino.
No, sir, no jot; I know your favour well,
    Though now you have no sea-cap on your head.
Take him away; he knows I know him well.
I Must obey.
[To VIOLA] This comes with seeking you;
    But there's no remedy; I shall answer it.
It grieves me
    Much more for what I cannot do for you
    Than what befalls myself.
I must entreat of you some of that money.
For the fair kindness you have show'd me here,  
    And part being prompted by your present trouble,
    Out of my lean and low ability
    I'll lend you something.
My having is not much;
    I'll make division of my present with you;
    Hold, there's half my coffer.
Do not tempt my misery,
    Lest that it make me so unsound a man
    As to upbraid you with those kindnesses
    That I have done for you.
I know of none,
    Nor know I you by voice or any feature.
I hate ingratitude more in a man
    Than lying, vainness, babbling drunkenness,
    Or any taint of vice whose strong corruption
    Inhabits our frail blood.
Come, sir, I pray you go.
This youth that you see here  
    I snatch'd one half out of the jaws of death,
    Reliev'd him with such sanctity of love,
    And to his image, which methought did promise
    Most venerable worth, did I devotion.
Methinks his words do from such passion fly
    That he believes himself; so do not I.
Prove true, imagination, O, prove true,
    That I, dear brother, be now ta'en for you!
I my brother know
    Yet living in my glass; even such and so
    In favour was my brother; and he went
    Still in this fashion, colour, ornament,
    For him I imitate.
'Slid, I'll after him again and beat him.
And I do not-                                  Exit
  FABIAN.
I dare lay any money 'twill be nothing yet.
SCENE I.
Will you make me believe that I am not sent for you?
No, I do not know you; nor I am not
    sent to you by my lady, to bid you come speak with her; nor your
    name is not Master Cesario; nor this is not my nose neither.
I prithee vent thy folly somewhere else.
I am afraid this great
    lubber, the world, will prove a cockney.
I prithee now, ungird
    thy strangeness, and tell me what I shall vent to my lady.
Shall
    I vent to her that thou art coming?
I prithee, foolish Greek, depart from me;
    There's money for thee; if you tarry longer
    I shall give worse payment.
Now, sir, have I met you again?
Hold, sir, or I'll throw your dagger o'er the house.
This will I tell my lady straight.
I would not be in some of
    your coats for two-pence.
I'll go another way to work with
    him; I'll have an action of battery against him, if there be any
    law in Illyria; though I struck him first, yet it's no matter for
    that.
Come, sir, I will not let you go.
I will be free from thee.
Nay, then I must have an ounce or two of this
    malapert blood from you.
Hold, Toby; on thy life, I charge thee hold.
Exeunt SIR TOBY, SIR ANDREW, and FABIAN
    I prithee, gentle friend,
    Let thy fair wisdom, not thy passion, sway
    In this uncivil and unjust extent  
    Against thy peace.
Or I am mad, or else this is a dream.
Nay, come, I prithee.
Madam, I will.
Nay, I prithee, put on this gown and this beard; make him
    believe thou art Sir Topas the curate; do it quickly.
I'll call
    Sir Toby the whilst.
Well, I'll put it on, and I will dissemble myself in't; and
    I would I were the first that ever dissembled in such a gown.
I
    am not tall enough to become the function well nor lean enough to
    be thought a good student; but to be said an honest man and a
    good housekeeper goes as fairly as to say a careful man and a
    great scholar.
Bonos dies, Sir Toby; for as the old hermit of Prague, that
    never saw pen and ink, very wittily said to niece of King
    Gorboduc 'That that is is'; so I, being Master Parson, am Master
    Parson; for what is 'that' but that, and 'is' but is?
What ho, I say!
Good Sir Topas, do
    not think I am mad; they have laid me here in hideous darkness.
I call thee by the most modest
    terms, for I am one of those gentle ones that will use the devil
    himself with courtesy.
I am not mad, Sir Topas.
I say to you this house is dark.
I say there is no darkness but
    ignorance; in which thou art more puzzled than the Egyptians in
    their fog.
I say this house is as dark as ignorance, though
    ignorance were as dark as hell; and I say there was never man
    thus abus'd.
I am no more mad than you are; make the trial of it
    in any constant question.
I think nobly of the soul, and no way approve his
    opinion.
Remain thou still in darkness: thou shalt
   hold th' opinion of Pythagoras ere I will allow of thy wits; and
    fear to kill a woodcock, lest thou dispossess the soul of thy
    grandam.
Nay, I am for all waters.
I would we were well rid of this knavery.
If he may
    be conveniently deliver'd, I would he were; for I am now so far
    in offence with my niece that I cannot pursue with any safety
    this sport to the upshot.
Fool I say!
Good fool, as ever thou wilt deserve well at my hand,
    help me to a candle, and pen, ink, and paper; as I am a
    gentleman, I will live to be thankful to thee for't.
Fool, there was never man so notoriously abus'd;
    I am as well in my wits, fool, as thou art.
- Who, I, sir?
Not
    I, sir.
- I will sir, I
    will.
Fool, fool, fool, I say!
I am shent for
    speaking to you.
I tell thee I am as well in my wits as any man in Illyria.
By this hand, I am.
Good fool, some ink, paper, and
    light; and convey what I will set down to my lady.
I will help you to't.
Believe me, I am not; I tell thee true.
Nay, I'll ne'er believe a madman till I see his brains.
I will fetch you light and paper and ink.
Fool, I'll requite it in the highest degree; I prithe be
    gone.
[Singing]
                   I am gone, sir,
                   And anon, sir,
                 I'll be with you again,
                   In a trice,
                   Like to the old Vice,
                 Your need to sustain;

                 Who with dagger of lath,  
                 In his rage and his wrath,
                   Cries, Ah, ha!
This is the air; that is the glorious sun;
    This pearl she gave me, I do feel't and see't;
    And though 'tis wonder that enwraps me thus,
    Yet 'tis not madness.
I could not find him at the Elephant;
    Yet there he was; and there I found this credit,
    That he did range the town to seek me out.
His counsel now might do me golden service;
    For though my soul disputes well with my sense
    That this may be some error, but no madness,
    Yet doth this accident and flood of fortune
    So far exceed all instance, all discourse,
    That I am ready to distrust mine eyes
    And wrangle with my reason, that persuades me
    To any other trust but that I am mad,
    Or else the lady's mad; yet if 'twere so,
    She could not sway her house, command her followers,  
    Take and give back affairs and their dispatch
    With such a smooth, discreet, and stable bearing,
    As I perceive she does.
I'll follow this good man, and go with you;
    And, having sworn truth, ever will be true.
SCENE I.
I know thee well.
Now my
    foes tell me plainly I am an ass; so that by my foes, sir, I
    profit in the knowledge of myself, and by my friends I am abused;
    so that, conclusions to be as kisses, if your four negatives make
    your two affirmatives, why then, the worse for my friends, and
    the better for my foes.
But that it would be double-dealing, sir, I would you could
    make it another.
Well, I will be so much a sinner to be a double-dealer.
You can fool no more money out of me at this throw; if you
    will let your lady know I am here to speak with her, and bring
    her along with you, it may awake my bounty further.
Marry, sir, lullaby to your bounty till I come again.
I go,
    sir; but I would not have you to think that my desire of having
    is the sin of covetousness.
But, as you say, sir, let your bounty
    take a nap; I will awake it anon.
That face of his I do remember well;
    Yet when I saw it last it was besmear'd
    As black as Vulcan in the smoke of war.
I know not what 'twas but distraction.
Orsino, noble sir,
    Be pleas'd that I shake off these names you give me:
    Antonio never yet was thief or pirate,
    Though I confess, on base and ground enough,
    Orsino's enemy.
A witchcraft drew me hither:
    That most ingrateful boy there by your side  
    From the rude sea's enrag'd and foamy mouth
    Did I redeem; a wreck past hope he was.
His life I gave him, and did thereto ad
    My love without retention or restraint,
    All his in dedication; for his sake,
    Did I expose myself, pure for his love,
    Into the danger of this adverse town;
    Drew to defend him when he was beset;
    Where being apprehended, his false cunning,
    Not meaning to partake with me in danger,
    Taught him to face me out of his acquaintance,
    And grew a twenty years removed thing
    While one would wink; denied me mine own purse,
    Which I had recommended to his use
    Not half an hour before.
What shall I do?
Why should I not, had I the heart to do it,
    Like to the Egyptian thief at point of death,
    Kill what I love?
But hear me this:
    Since you to non-regardance cast my faith,
    And that I partly know the instrument
    That screws me from my true place in your favour,
    Live you the marble-breasted tyrant still;
    But this your minion, whom I know you love,
    And whom, by heaven I swear, I tender dearly,
    Him will I tear out of that cruel eye
    Where he sits crowned in his master's spite.
Come, boy, with me; my thoughts are ripe in mischief:
    I'll sacrifice the lamb that I do love
    To spite a raven's heart within a dove.
And I, most jocund, apt, and willingly,  
    To do you rest, a thousand deaths would die.
After him I love
    More than I love these eyes, more than my life,
    More, by all mores, than e'er I shall love wife.
If I do feign, you witnesses above
    Punish my life for tainting of my love!
How am I beguil'd!
No, my lord, not I.
Father, I charge thee, by thy reverence,
    Here to unfold- though lately we intended
    To keep in darkness what occasion now
    Reveals before 'tis ripe- what thou dost know
    Hath newly pass'd between this youth and me.
A contract of eternal bond of love,
    Confirm'd by mutual joinder of your hands,
    Attested by the holy close of lips,
    Strength'ned by interchangement of your rings;
    And all the ceremony of this compact
    Seal'd in my function, by my testimony;
    Since when, my watch hath told me, toward my grave,
    I have travell'd but two hours.
Farewell, and take her; but direct thy feet
    Where thou and I henceforth may never meet.
My lord, I do protest-
  OLIVIA.
I had rather
    than forty pound I were at home.
You broke my head for
    nothing; and that that did, I was set on to do't by Sir Toby.
I never hurt you.
You drew your sword upon me without cause;
    But I bespake you fair and hurt you not.
If a bloody coxcomb be a hurt, you have hurt me; I think
    you set nothing by a bloody coxcomb.
I hate a
    drunken rogue.
I'll help you, Sir Toby, because we'll be dress'd
    together.
I am sorry, madam, I have hurt your kinsman;
    But, had it been the brother of my blood,
    I must have done no less with wit and safety.
You throw a strange regard upon me, and by that
    I do perceive it hath offended you.
How have the hours rack'd and tortur'd me
    Since I have lost thee!
Do I stand there?
I never had a brother;
    Nor can there be that deity in my nature
    Of here and everywhere.
I had a sister
    Whom the blind waves and surges have devour'd.
A spirit I am indeed,  
    But am in that dimension grossly clad
    Which from the womb I did participate.
Were you a woman, as the rest goes even,
    I should my tears let fall upon your cheek,
    And say 'Thrice welcome, drowned Viola!
If nothing lets to make us happy both
    But this my masculine usurp'd attire,
    Do not embrace me till each circumstance
    Of place, time, fortune, do cohere and jump
    That I am Viola; which to confirm,
    I'll bring you to a captain in this town,
    Where lie my maiden weeds; by whose gentle help
    I was preserv'd to serve this noble Count.
If this be so, as yet the glass seems true,
    I shall have share in this most happy wreck.
And all those sayings will I overswear;
    And all those swearings keep as true in soul
    As doth that orbed continent the fire
    That severs day from night.
Fetch Malvolio hither;
    And yet, alas, now I remember me,
    They say, poor gentleman, he's much distract.
Has here writ a letter to you; I
    should have given 't you to-day morning, but as a madman's
    epistles are no gospels, so it skills not much when they are
    deliver'd.
No, madam, I do but read madness.
So I do, madonna; but to read his right wits is to read
    thus; therefore perpend, my Princess, and give ear.
Though you have put me into darkness and given
    your drunken cousin rule over me, yet have I the benefit of my
    senses as well as your ladyship.
I have your own letter that
    induced me to the semblance I put on, with the which I doubt not
    but to do myself much right or you much shame.
I leave my duty a little unthought of, and speak out of
    my injury.
Madam, I am most apt t' embrace your offer.
Have I, Malvolio?
Alas, Malvolio, this is not my writing,
    Though, I confess, much like the character;  
    But out of question 'tis Maria's hand.
And now I do bethink me, it was she
    First told me thou wast mad; then cam'st in smiling,
    And in such forms which here were presuppos'd
    Upon thee in the letter.
Good madam, hear me speak,
    And let no quarrel nor no brawl to come
    Taint the condition of this present hour,
    Which I have wond'red at.
In hope it shall not,
    Most freely I confess myself and Toby
    Set this device against Malvolio here,
    Upon some stubborn and uncourteous parts
    We had conceiv'd against him.
' I was one, sir, in this
    interlude- one Sir Topas, sir; but that's all one.
'By the Lord,
    fool, I am not mad!
I'll be reveng'd on the whole pack of you.
Exeunt all but the CLOWN

                        CLOWN sings

           When that I was and a little tiny boy,
             With hey, ho, the wind and the rain,
           A foolish thing was but a toy,
             For the rain it raineth every day.
But when I came to man's estate,
             With hey, ho, the wind and the rain,
           'Gainst knaves and thieves men shut their gate,
             For the rain it raineth every day.
But when I came, alas!
to wive,
             With hey, ho, the wind and the rain,
           By swaggering could I never thrive,
             For the rain it raineth every day.
But when I came unto my beds,
             With hey, ho, the wind and the rain,
           With toss-pots still had drunken heads,
             For the rain it raineth every day.
>>



SCENE:  
Verona; Milan; the frontiers of Mantua


ACT I.
SCENE I.
Were't not affection chains thy tender days
    To the sweet glances of thy honour'd love,
    I rather would entreat thy company
    To see the wonders of the world abroad,
    Than, living dully sluggardiz'd at home,
    Wear out thy youth with shapeless idleness.
But since thou lov'st, love still, and thrive therein,
    Even as I would, when I to love begin.
Wish me partaker in thy happiness
    When thou dost meet good hap; and in thy danger,
    If ever danger do environ thee,
    Commend thy grievance to my holy prayers,  
    For I will be thy headsman, Valentine.
Upon some book I love I'll pray for thee.
No, I will not, for it boots thee not.
So, by your circumstance, I fear you'll prove.
'Tis love you cavil at; I am not Love.
But wherefore waste I time to counsel the
    That art a votary to fond desire?
And thither will I bring thee, Valentine.
To Milan let me hear from thee by letters
    Of thy success in love, and what news else
    Betideth here in absence of thy friend;
    And I likewise will visit thee with mine.
He after honour hunts, I after love;
    He leaves his friends to dignify them more:
    I leave myself, my friends, and all for love.
Twenty to one then he is shipp'd already,  
    And I have play'd the sheep in losing him.
You conclude that my master is a shepherd then, and
    I a sheep?
I do.
Why then, my horns are his horns, whether I wake or sleep.
Nay, that I can deny by a circumstance.
It shall go hard but I'll prove it by another.
The shepherd seeks the sheep, and not the sheep the
    shepherd; but I seek my master, and my master seeks not me;
    therefore, I am no sheep.
Ay, sir; I, a lost mutton, gave your letter to her, a lac'd
    mutton; and she, a lac'd mutton, gave me, a lost mutton, nothing
    for my labour.
You mistake; I mean the pound- a pinfold.
You mistook, sir; I say she did nod; and you ask me if she
    did nod; and I say 'Ay.
Well, I perceive I must be fain to bear with you.
Truly, sir, I think you'll hardly win her.
Sir, I could perceive nothing at all from her; no, not so
    much as a ducat for delivering your letter; and being so hard to
    me that brought your mind, I fear she'll prove as hard to you in
    telling your mind.
' To testify  
    your bounty, I thank you, you have testern'd me; in requital
    whereof, henceforth carry your letters yourself; and so, sir,
    I'll commend you to my master.
Exit SPEED
    I must go send some better messenger.
I fear my Julia would not deign my lines,
    Receiving them from such a worthless post.
Please you, repeat their names; I'll show my mind
    According to my shallow simple skill.
As of a knight well-spoken, neat, and fine;
    But, were I you, he never should be mine.
Pardon, dear madam; 'tis a passing shame  
    That I, unworthy body as I am,
    Should censure thus on lovely gentlemen.
Then thus: of many good I think him best.
I have no other but a woman's reason:
    I think him so, because I think him so.
Yet he, of all the rest, I think, best loves ye.
I would I knew his mind.
Sir Valentine's page; and sent, I think, from Proteus.
He would have given it you; but I, being in the way,
    Did in your name receive it; pardon the fault, I pray.
And yet, I would I had o'erlook'd the letter.
It were a shame to call her back again,
    And pray her to a fault for which I chid her.
What fool is she, that knows I am a maid
    And would not force the letter to my view!
How churlishly I chid Lucetta hence,
    When willingly I would have had her here!
How angerly I taught my brow to frown,
    When inward joy enforc'd my heart to smile!
I would it were,
    That you might kill your stomach on your meat
    And not upon your maid.
To take a paper up that I let fall.
That I might sing it, madam, to a tune.
I cannot reach so high.
And yet methinks I do not like this tune.
Indeed, I bid the base for Proteus.
Nay, would I were so ang'red with the same!
I'll kiss each several paper for amends.
' Unkind Julia,
    As in revenge of thy ingratitude,
    I throw thy name against the bruising stones,
    Trampling contemptuously on thy disdain.
my bosom,,as a bed,
    Shall lodge thee till thy wound be throughly heal'd;
    And thus I search it with a sovereign kiss.
Be calm, good wind, blow not a word away
    Till I have found each letter in the letter-
    Except mine own name; that some whirlwind bear
    Unto a ragged, fearful, hanging rock,
    And throw it thence into the raging sea.
' That I'll tear away;
    And yet I will not, sith so prettily
    He couples it to his complaining names.
Thus will I fold them one upon another;  
    Now kiss, embrace, contend, do what you will.
Nay, I was taken up for laying them down;
    Yet here they shall not lie for catching cold.
I see you have a month's mind to them.
Ay, madam, you may say what sights you see;
    I see things too, although you judge I wink.
Nor need'st thou much importune me to that
    Whereon this month I have been hammering.
I have consider'd well his loss of time,
    And how he cannot be a perfect man,
    Not being tried and tutor'd in the world:
    Experience is by industry achiev'd,
    And perfected by the swift course of time.
Then tell me whither were I best to send him.
I think your lordship is not ignorant
    How his companion, youthful Valentine,
    Attends the Emperor in his royal court.
I know it well.
'Twere good, I think, your lordship sent him thither:
    There shall he practise tilts and tournaments,
    Hear sweet discourse, converse with noblemen,
    And be in eye of every exercise
    Worthy his youth and nobleness of birth.
I like thy counsel; well hast thou advis'd;
    And that thou mayst perceive how well I like it,
    The execution of it shall make known:  
    Even with the speediest expedition
    I will dispatch him to the Emperor's court.
Muse not that I thus suddenly proceed;
    For what I will, I will, and there an end.
I am resolv'd that thou shalt spend some time
    With Valentinus in the Emperor's court;
    What maintenance he from his friends receives,
    Like exhibition thou shalt have from me.
To-morrow be in readiness to go-
    Excuse it not, for I am peremptory.
My lord, I cannot be so soon provided;
    Please you, deliberate a day or two.
Thus have I shunn'd the fire for fear of burning,
    And drench'd me in the sea, where I am drown'd.
I fear'd to show my father Julia's letter,
    Lest he should take exceptions to my love;
    And with the vantage of mine own excuse
    Hath he excepted most against my love.
Sir Proteus, your father calls for you;
    He is in haste; therefore, I pray you, go.
SCENE I.
Your worship, sir; or else I mistook.
And yet I was last chidden for being too slow.
Why, how know you that I am in love?
And now you are metamorphis'd with a mistress, that, when I look
    on you, I can hardly think you my master.
Even she, I mean.
Why, sir, I know her not.
Sir, I know that well enough.
I mean that her beauty is exquisite, but her favour
    infinite.
I account of her beauty.
I have lov'd her ever since I saw her, and still
    I see her beautiful.
What should I see then?
True, sir; I was in love with my bed.
I thank you, you
    swing'd me for my love, which makes me the bolder to chide you
    for yours.
In conclusion, I stand affected to her.
I would you were set, so your affection would cease.
I have.
No, boy, but as well as I can do them.
As you enjoin'd me, I have writ your letter
    Unto the secret nameless friend of yours;
    Which I was much unwilling to proceed in,
    But for my duty to your ladyship.
I thank you, gentle servant.
Now trust me, madam, it came hardly off;
    For, being ignorant to whom it goes,
    I writ at random, very doubtfully.
No, madam; so it stead you, I will write,
    Please you command, a thousand times as much;
    And yet-
  SILVIA.
Well, I guess the sequel;
    And yet I will not name it- and yet I care not.
And yet take this again- and yet I thank you-
    Meaning henceforth to trouble you no more.
Ay, ay, you writ them, sir, at my request;
    But I will none of them; they are for you:  
    I would have had them writ more movingly.
Please you, I'll write your ladyship another.
Nay, I was rhyming: 'tis you that have the reason.
By a letter, I should say.
That's the letter I writ to her friend.
I would it were no worse.
I'll warrant you 'tis as well.
'
    All this I speak in print, for in print I found it.
I have din'd.
Ay, but hearken, sir; though the chameleon Love can feed on
    the air, I am one that am nourish'd by my victuals, and would
    fain have meat.
I must, where is no remedy.
When possibly I can, I will return.
Here is my hand for my true constancy;
    And when that hour o'erslips me in the day
    Wherein I sigh not, Julia, for thy sake,
    The next ensuing hour some foul mischance
    Torment me for my love's forgetfulness!
My father stays my coming; answer not;
    The tide is now- nay, not thy tide of tears:
    That tide will stay me longer than I should.
Go; I come, I come.
Nay, 'twill be this hour ere I have done weeping; all the
    kind of the Launces have this very fault.
I have receiv'd my
    proportion, like the Prodigious Son, and am going with Sir
    Proteus to the Imperial's court.
I think Crab my dog be the
    sourest-natured dog that lives: my mother weeping, my father
    wailing, my sister crying, our maid howling, our cat wringing her
    hands, and all our house in a great perplexity; yet did not this
    cruel-hearted cur shed one tear.
Nay, I'll show you
    the manner of it.
Now, sir, this staff is my sister,
    for, look you, she is as white as a lily and as small as a wand;  
    this hat is Nan our maid; I am the dog; no, the dog is himself,
    and I am the dog- O, the dog is me, and I am myself; ay, so, so.
Now come I to my father: 'Father, your blessing.
' Now should not
    the shoe speak a word for weeping; now should I kiss my father;
    well, he weeps on.
Now come I to my mother.
Well, I kiss her- why there 'tis;
    here's my mother's breath up and down.
Now come I to my sister;
    mark the moan she makes.
Now the dog all this while sheds not a
    tear, nor speaks a word; but see how I lay the dust with my
    tears.
Tut, man, I mean thou'lt lose the flood, and, in losing
    the flood, lose thy voyage, and, in losing thy voyage, lose thy
    master, and, in losing thy master, lose thy service, and, in
    losing thy service- Why dost thou stop my mouth?
Where should I lose my tongue?
Why, man, if the river were dry, I am able
    to fill it with my tears; if the wind were down, I could drive
    the boat with my sighs.
Come, come away, man; I was sent to call thee.
Well, I will go.
Indeed, madam, I seem so.
Haply I do.
What seem I that I am not?
I quote it in your jerkin.
Well, then, I'll double your folly.
I know it well, sir; you always end ere you begin.
Sir, if you spend word for word with me, I shall make your
    wit bankrupt.
I know it well, sir; you have an exchequer of words,
    and, I think, no other treasure to give your followers; for it
    appears by their bare liveries that they live by your bare words.
My lord, I will be thankful
    To any happy messenger from thence.
Ay, my good lord, I know the gentleman
    To be of worth and worthy estimation,
    And not without desert so well reputed.
I knew him as myself; for from our infancy
    We have convers'd and spent our hours together;
    And though myself have been an idle truant,
    Omitting the sweet benefit of time
    To clothe mine age with angel-like perfection,
    Yet hath Sir Proteus, for that's his name,
    Made use and fair advantage of his days:
    His years but young, but his experience old;
    His head unmellowed, but his judgment ripe;
    And, in a word, for far behind his worth
    Comes all the praises that I now bestow,
    He is complete in feature and in mind,
    With all good grace to grace a gentleman.
I think 'tis no unwelcome news to you.
Should I have wish'd a thing, it had been he.
Welcome him, then, according to his worth-
    Silvia, I speak to you, and you, Sir Thurio;
    For Valentine, I need not cite him to it.
I will send him hither to you presently.
This is the gentleman I told your ladyship
    Had come along with me but that his mistresss
    Did hold his eyes lock'd in her crystal looks.
Nay, sure, I think she holds them prisoners still.
Mistress, I beseech you
    Confirm his welcome with some special favour.
My duty will I boast of, nothing else.
I'll die on him that says so but yourself.
I wait upon his pleasure.
I'll leave you to confer of home affairs;
    When you have done we look to hear from you.
I left them all in health.
My tales of love were wont to weary you;
    I know you joy not in a love-discourse.
Ay, Proteus, but that life is alter'd now;
    I have done penance for contemning Love,
    Whose high imperious thoughts have punish'd me
    With bitter fasts, with penitential groans,  
    With nightly tears, and daily heart-sore sighs;
    For, in revenge of my contempt of love,
    Love hath chas'd sleep from my enthralled eyes
    And made them watchers of mine own heart's sorrow.
O gentle Proteus, Love's a mighty lord,
    And hath so humbled me as I confess
    There is no woe to his correction,
    Nor to his service no such joy on earth.
Now no discourse, except it be of love;
    Now can I break my fast, dine, sup, and sleep,
    Upon the very naked name of love.
Enough; I read your fortune in your eye.
I will not flatter her.
When I was sick you gave me bitter pills,
    And I must minister the like to you.
Have I not reason to prefer mine own?
And I will help thee to prefer her too:
    She shall be dignified with this high honour-
    To bear my lady's train, lest the base earth
    Should from her vesture chance to steal a kiss
    And, of so great a favour growing proud,
    Disdain to root the summer-swelling flow'r
    And make rough winter everlastingly.
Pardon me, Proteus; all I can is nothing
    To her, whose worth makes other worthies nothing;
    She is alone.
Why, man, she is mine own;  
    And I as rich in having such a jewel
    As twenty seas, if all their sand were pearl,
    The water nectar, and the rocks pure gold.
Forgive me that I do not dream on thee,
    Because thou seest me dote upon my love.
My foolish rival, that her father likes
    Only for his possessions are so huge,
    Is gone with her along; and I must after,
    For love, thou know'st, is full of jealousy.
Ay, and we are betroth'd; nay more, our marriage-hour,
    With all the cunning manner of our flight,
    Determin'd of- how I must climb her window,
    The ladder made of cords, and all the means
    Plotted and 'greed on for my happiness.
Go on before; I shall enquire you forth;
    I must unto the road to disembark
    Some necessaries that I needs must use;  
    And then I'll presently attend you.
I will.
She is fair; and so is Julia that I love-
    That I did love, for now my love is thaw'd;
    Which like a waxen image 'gainst a fire
    Bears no impression of the thing it was.
Methinks my zeal to Valentine is cold,
    And that I love him not as I was wont.
but I love his lady too too much,
    And that's the reason I love him so little.
How shall I dote on her with more advice
    That thus without advice begin to love her!
'Tis but her picture I have yet beheld,
    And that hath dazzled my reason's light;
    But when I look on her perfections,
    There is no reason but I shall be blind.
If I can check my erring love, I will;
    If not, to compass her I'll use my skill.
Forswear not thyself, sweet youth, for I am not welcome.
I
    reckon this always, that a man is never undone till he be hang'd,
    nor never welcome to a place till some certain shot be paid, and
    the hostess say 'Welcome!
Come on, you madcap; I'll to the alehouse with you
    presently; where, for one shot of five pence, thou shalt have
    five thousand welcomes.
I understand thee not.
Ay, and what I do too; look thee, I'll but lean, and my
    staff understands me.
'Tis well that I get it so.
I never knew him otherwise.
Why, fool, I meant not thee, I meant thy master.
I tell thee my master is become a hot lover.
Why, I tell thee I care not though he burn himself in love.
To leave my Julia, shall I be forsworn;
    To love fair Silvia, shall I be forsworn;
    To wrong my friend, I shall be much forsworn;
    And ev'n that pow'r which gave me first my oath
    Provokes me to this threefold perjury:
    Love bade me swear, and Love bids me forswear.
At first I did adore a twinkling star,
    But now I worship a celestial sun.
I cannot leave to love, and yet I do;  
    But there I leave to love where I should love.
Julia I lose, and Valentine I lose;
    If I keep them, I needs must lose myself;
    If I lose them, thus find I by their loss:
    For Valentine, myself; for Julia, Silvia.
I to myself am dearer than a friend;
    For love is still most precious in itself;
    And Silvia- witness heaven, that made her fair!
I will forget that Julia is alive,
    Rememb'ring that my love to her is dead;
    And Valentine I'll hold an enemy,
    Aiming at Silvia as a sweeter friend.
I cannot now prove constant to myself
    Without some treachery us'd to Valentine.
Now presently I'll give her father notice
    Of their disguising and pretended flight,  
    Who, all enrag'd, will banish Valentine,
    For Thurio, he intends, shall wed his daughter;
    But, Valentine being gone, I'll quickly cross
    By some sly trick blunt Thurio's dull proceeding.
Counsel, Lucetta; gentle girl, assist me;
    And, ev'n in kind love, I do conjure thee,
    Who art the table wherein all my thoughts
    Are visibly character'd and engrav'd,
    To lesson me and tell me some good mean
    How, with my honour, I may undertake
    A journey to my loving Proteus.
Pity the dearth that I have pined in
    By longing for that food so long a time.
I do not seek to quench your love's hot fire,
    But qualify the fire's extreme rage,
    Lest it should burn above the bounds of reason.
I'll be as patient as a gentle stream,
    And make a pastime of each weary step,
    Till the last step have brought me to my love;
    And there I'll rest as, after much turmoil,  
    A blessed soul doth in Elysium.
Not like a woman, for I would prevent
    The loose encounters of lascivious men;
    Gentle Lucetta, fit me with such weeds
    As may beseem some well-reputed page.
No, girl; I'll knit it up in silken strings
    With twenty odd-conceited true-love knots-
    To be fantastic may become a youth
    Of greater time than I shall show to be.
What fashion, madam, shall I make your breeches?
I fear me it will make me scandaliz'd.
Nay, that I will not.
I fear me he will scarce be pleas'd withal.
And presently go with me to my chamber,
    To take a note of what I stand in need of
    To furnish me upon my longing journey.
All that is mine I leave at thy dispose,
    My goods, my lands, my reputation;
    Only, in lieu thereof, dispatch me hence.
Come, answer not, but to it presently;
    I am impatient of my tarriance.
SCENE I.
Sir Thurio, give us leave, I pray, awhile;
    We have some secrets to confer about.
My gracious lord, that which I would discover
    The law of friendship bids me to conceal;
    But, when I call to mind your gracious favours
    Done to me, undeserving as I am,
    My duty pricks me on to utter that
    Which else no worldly good should draw from me.
I know you have determin'd to bestow her
    On Thurio, whom your gentle daughter hates;
    And should she thus be stol'n away from you,
    It would be much vexation to your age.
Thus, for my duty's sake, I rather chose  
    To cross my friend in his intended drift
    Than, by concealing it, heap on your head
    A pack of sorrows which would press you down,
    Being unprevented, to your timeless grave.
Proteus, I thank thee for thine honest care,
    Which to requite, command me while I live.
This love of theirs myself have often seen,
    Haply when they have judg'd me fast asleep,
    And oftentimes have purpos'd to forbid
    Sir Valentine her company and my court;
    But, fearing lest my jealous aim might err
    And so, unworthily, disgrace the man,
    A rashness that I ever yet have shunn'd,
    I gave him gentle looks, thereby to find
    That which thyself hast now disclos'd to me.
And, that thou mayst perceive my fear of this,
    Knowing that tender youth is soon suggested,
    I nightly lodge her in an upper tow'r,
    The key whereof myself have ever kept;
    And thence she cannot be convey'd away.
Upon mine honour, he shall never know
    That I had any light from thee of this.
Please it your Grace, there is a messenger
    That stays to bear my letters to my friends,
    And I am going to deliver them.
Nay then, no matter; stay with me awhile;
    I am to break with thee of some affairs
    That touch me near, wherein thou must be secret.
'Tis not unknown to thee that I have sought
    To match my friend Sir Thurio to my daughter.
I know it well, my lord; and, sure, the match
    Were rich and honourable; besides, the gentleman
    Is full of virtue, bounty, worth, and qualities
    Beseeming such a wife as your fair daughter.
No, trust me; she is peevish, sullen, froward,
    Proud, disobedient, stubborn, lacking duty;
    Neither regarding that she is my child
    Nor fearing me as if I were her father;
    And, may I say to thee, this pride of hers,
    Upon advice, hath drawn my love from her;
    And, where I thought the remnant of mine age  
    Should have been cherish'd by her childlike duty,
    I now am full resolv'd to take a wife
    And turn her out to who will take her in.
There is a lady, in Verona here,
    Whom I affect; but she is nice, and coy,
    And nought esteems my aged eloquence.
Now, therefore, would I have thee to my tutor-
    For long agone I have forgot to court;
    Besides, the fashion of the time is chang'd-
    How and which way I may bestow myself
    To be regarded in her sun-bright eye.
But she did scorn a present that I sent her.
That man that hath a tongue, I say, is no man,
    If with his tongue he cannot win a woman.
But she I mean is promis'd by her friends
    Unto a youthful gentleman of worth;
    And kept severely from resort of men,
    That no man hath access by day to her.
Why then I would resort to her by night.
Now, as thou art a gentleman of blood,
    Advise me where I may have such a ladder.
By seven o'clock I'll get you such a ladder.
But, hark thee; I will go to her alone;
    How shall I best convey the ladder thither?
I'll get me one of such another length.
How shall I fashion me to wear a cloak?
I pray thee, let me feel thy cloak upon me.
I'll be so bold to break the seal for once.
My herald thoughts in thy pure bosom rest them,
        While I, their king, that thither them importune,
      Do curse the grace that with such grace hath blest them,
        Because myself do want my servants' fortune.
I curse myself, for they are sent by me,
        That they should harbour where their lord should be.
'Silvia, this night I will enfranchise thee.
Thank me for this more than for all the favours
    Which, all too much, I have bestow'd on thee.
my wrath shall far exceed the love
    I ever bore my daughter or thyself.
Be gone; I will not hear thy vain excuse,
    But, as thou lov'st thy life, make speed from hence.
Except I be by Silvia in the night,
    There is no music in the nightingale;
    Unless I look on Silvia in the day,
    There is no day for me to look upon.
She is my essence, and I leave to be
    If I be not by her fair influence
    Foster'd, illumin'd, cherish'd, kept alive.
I fly not death, to fly his deadly doom:
    Tarry I here, I but attend on death;
    But fly I hence, I fly away from life.
Master, shall I strike?
Why, sir, I'll strike nothing.
I pray you-
  PROTEUS.
Sirrah, I say, forbear.
Then in dumb silence will I bury mine,
    For they are harsh, untuneable, and bad.
O, I have fed upon this woe already,
    And now excess of it will make me surfeit.
Doth Silvia know that I am banished?
No more; unless the next word that thou speak'st
    Have some malignant power upon my life:
    If so, I pray thee breathe it in mine ear,
    As ending anthem of my endless dolour.
Come, I'll convey thee through the city gate;
    And, ere I part with thee, confer at large
    Of all that may concern thy love affairs.
I pray thee, Launce, an if thou seest my boy,
    Bid him make haste and meet me at the Northgate.
I am but a fool, look you, and yet I have the wit to think
    my master is a kind of a knave; but that's all one if he be but
    one knave.
He lives not now that knows me to be in love; yet I am
    in love; but a team of horse shall not pluck that from me; nor
    who 'tis I love; and yet 'tis a woman; but what woman I will not
    tell myself; and yet 'tis a milkmaid; yet 'tis not a maid, for
    she hath had gossips; yet 'tis a maid, for she is her master's
    maid and serves for wages.
Thou liest; I can.
I will try thee.
Then may I set the world on wheels, when she can spin for  
    her living.
I pray thee, out with't; and
    place it for her chief virtue.
I care not for that neither, because I love crusts.
If her liquor be good, she shall; if she will not, I will;
    for good things should be praised.
Of her tongue she cannot, for that's writ down she is slow
    of; of her purse she shall not, for that I'll keep shut.
Now of
    another thing she may, and that cannot I help.
Stop there; I'll have her; she was mine, and not mine,
    twice or thrice in that last article.
It may be; I'll prove it: the cover of
    the salt hides the salt, and therefore it is more than the salt;
    the hair that covers the wit is more than the wit, for the  
    greater hides the less.
Well, I'll have
    her; an if it be a match, as nothing is impossible-
  SPEED.
Why, then will I tell thee- that thy master stays for thee
    at the Northgate.
And must I go to him?
I'll after, to
    rejoice in the boy's correction.
Since his exile she hath despis'd me most,
    Forsworn my company and rail'd at me,
    That I am desperate of obtaining her.
So I believe; but Thurio thinks not so.
Proteus, the good conceit I hold of thee-
    For thou hast shown some sign of good desert-
    Makes me the better to confer with thee.
Longer than I prove loyal to your Grace
    Let me not live to look upon your Grace.
Thou know'st how willingly I would effect
    The match between Sir Thurio and my daughter.
I do, my lord.
And also, I think, thou art not ignorant
    How she opposes her against my will.
And that, my lord, I shall be loath to do:
    'Tis an ill office for a gentleman,
    Especially against his very friend.
You have prevail'd, my lord; if I can do it
    By aught that I can speak in his dispraise,
    She shall not long continue love to him.
As much as I can do I will effect.
And thy advice this night I'll put in practice;
    Therefore, sweet Proteus, my direction-giver,
    Let us into the city presently
    To sort some gentlemen well skill'd in music.
I have a sonnet that will serve the turn
    To give the onset to thy good advice.
I will pardon you.
SCENE I.
Fellows, stand fast; I see a passenger.
Then know that I have little wealth to lose;
    A man I am cross'd with adversity;
    My riches are these poor habiliments,
    Of which if you should here disfurnish me,  
    You take the sum and substance that I have.
I was.
For that which now torments me to rehearse:
    I kill'd a man, whose death I much repent;
    But yet I slew him manfully in fight,
    Without false vantage or base treachery.
I was, and held me glad of such a doom.
My youthful travel therein made me happy,  
    Or else I often had been miserable.
And I from Mantua, for a gentleman
    Who, in my mood, I stabb'd unto the heart.
And I for such-like petty crimes as these.
I take your offer, and will live with you,
    Provided that you do no outrages
    On silly women or poor passengers.
Already have I been false to Valentine,
    And now I must be as unjust to Thurio.
Under the colour of commending him
    I have access my own love to prefer;
    But Silvia is too fair, too true, too holy,
    To be corrupted with my worthless gifts.
When I protest true loyalty to her,
    She twits me with my falsehood to my friend;
    When to her beauty I commend my vows,
    She bids me think how I have been forsworn
    In breaking faith with Julia whom I lov'd;
    And notwithstanding all her sudden quips,
    The least whereof would quell a lover's hope,
    Yet, spaniel-like, the more she spurns my love
    The more it grows and fawneth on her still.
Ay, but I hope, sir, that you love not here.
Sir, but I do; or else I would be hence.
I thank you for your own.
Now, my young guest, methinks you're allycholly; I pray you,
    why is it?
Marry, mine host, because I cannot be merry.
Come, we'll have you merry; I'll bring you where you shall
    hear music, and see the gentleman that you ask'd for.
But shall I hear him speak?
Ay, I would I were deaf; it makes me have a slow heart.
I perceive you delight not in music.
I would always have one play but one thing.
I tell you what Launce, his man, told me: he lov'd her out of
    all nick.
Sir Thurio, fear not you; I will so plead
    That you shall say my cunning drift excels.
I thank you for your music, gentlemen.
Sir Proteus, as I take it.
That I may compass yours.
Thou subtle, perjur'd, false, disloyal man,
    Think'st thou I am so shallow, so conceitless,
    To be seduced by thy flattery
    That hast deceiv'd so many with thy vows?
For me, by this pale queen of night I swear,
    I am so far from granting thy request
    That I despise thee for thy wrongful suit,
    And by and by intend to chide myself
    Even for this time I spend in talking to thee.
I grant, sweet love, that I did love a lady;  
    But she is dead.
[Aside]  'Twere false, if I should speak it;
    For I am sure she is not buried.
Say that she be; yet Valentine, thy friend,
    Survives, to whom, thyself art witness,
    I am betroth'd; and art thou not asham'd
    To wrong him with thy importunacy?
I likewise hear that Valentine is dead.
And so suppose am I; for in his grave
    Assure thyself my love is buried.
Madam, if your heart be so obdurate,
    Vouchsafe me yet your picture for my love,
    The picture that is hanging in your chamber;
    To that I'll speak, to that I'll sigh and weep;
    For, since the substance of your perfect self
    Is else devoted, I am but a shadow;  
    And to your shadow will I make true love.
[Aside]  If 'twere a substance, you would, sure, deceive it
    And make it but a shadow, as I am.
I am very loath to be your idol, sir;
    But since your falsehood shall become you well
    To worship shadows and adore false shapes,
    Send to me in the morning, and I'll send it;
    And so, good rest.
By my halidom, I was fast asleep.
Trust me, I think 'tis almost day.
Not so; but it hath been the longest night
    That e'er I watch'd, and the most heaviest.
According to your ladyship's impose,
    I am thus early come to know what service
    It is your pleasure to command me in.
O Eglamour, thou art a gentleman-
    Think not I flatter, for I swear I do not-  
    Valiant, wise, remorseful, well accomplish'd.
Thou art not ignorant what dear good will
    I bear unto the banish'd Valentine;
    Nor how my father would enforce me marry
    Vain Thurio, whom my very soul abhors.
Thyself hast lov'd; and I have heard thee say
    No grief did ever come so near thy heart
    As when thy lady and thy true love died,
    Upon whose grave thou vow'dst pure chastity.
Sir Eglamour, I would to Valentine,
    To Mantua, where I hear he makes abode;
    And, for the ways are dangerous to pass,
    I do desire thy worthy company,
    Upon whose faith and honour I repose.
I do desire thee, even from a heart  
    As full of sorrows as the sea of sands,
    To bear me company and go with me;
    If not, to hide what I have said to thee,
    That I may venture to depart alone.
Madam, I pity much your grievances;
    Which since I know they virtuously are plac'd,
    I give consent to go along with you,
    Recking as little what betideth me
    As much I wish all good befortune you.
Where shall I meet you?
At Friar Patrick's cell,
    Where I intend holy confession.
I will not fail your ladyship.
When a man's servant shall play the cur with him, look you,
    it goes hard- one that I brought up of a puppy; one that I sav'd
    from drowning, when three or four of his blind brothers and
    sisters went to it.
I have taught him, even as one would say
    precisely 'Thus I would teach a dog.
' I was sent to deliver him
    as a present to Mistress Silvia from my master; and I came no
    sooner into the dining-chamber, but he steps me to her trencher
    and steals her capon's leg.
I would have, as one should
    say, one that takes upon him to be a dog indeed, to be, as it
    were, a dog at all things.
If I had not had more wit than he, to
    take a fault upon me that he did, I think verily he had been
    hang'd for't; sure as I live, he had suffer'd for't.
I, having been acquainted with the smell before, knew it
    was Crab, and goes me to the fellow that whips the dogs.
'Friend,' quoth I 'you mean to whip the dog.
' 'Ay, marry do I'
    quoth he.
'You do him the more wrong,' quoth I; "twas I did the
    thing you wot of.
Nay,
    I'll be sworn, I have sat in the stock for puddings he hath
    stol'n, otherwise he had been executed; I have stood on the
    pillory for geese he hath kill'd, otherwise he had suffer'd
    for't.
Nay, I remember the trick
    you serv'd me when I took my leave of Madam Silvia.
Did not I bid
    thee still mark me and do as I do?
I like thee well,
    And will employ thee in some service presently.
In what you please; I'll do what I can.
I hope thou wilt.
Marry, sir, I carried Mistress Silvia the dog you bade me.
No, indeed, did she not; here have I brought him back
    again.
Ay, sir; the other squirrel was stol'n from me by the
    hangman's boys in the market-place; and then I offer'd her mine
    own, who is a dog as big as ten of yours, and therefore the gift
    the greater.
Away, I say.
Sebastian, I have entertained thee
    Partly that I have need of such a youth
    That can with some discretion do my business,
    For 'tis no trusting to yond foolish lout,
    But chiefly for thy face and thy behaviour,
    Which, if my augury deceive me not,
    Witness good bringing up, fortune, and truth;
    Therefore, know thou, for this I entertain thee.
Not so; I think she lives.
I cannot choose
    But pity her.
Tell my lady
    I claim the promise for her heavenly picture.
Alas, poor fool, why do I pity him
    That with his very heart despiseth me?
Because he loves her, he despiseth me;
    Because I love him, I must pity him.
This ring I gave him, when he parted from me,
    To bind him to remember my good will;
    And now am I, unhappy messenger,  
    To plead for that which I would not obtain,
    To carry that which I would have refus'd,
    To praise his faith, which I would have disprais'd.
I am my master's true confirmed love,
    But cannot be true servant to my master
    Unless I prove false traitor to myself.
Yet will I woo for him, but yet so coldly
    As, heaven it knows, I would not have him speed.
I pray you be my mean
    To bring me where to speak with Madam Silvia.
What would you with her, if that I be she?
If you be she, I do entreat your patience
    To hear me speak the message I am sent on.
Pardon me, madam; I have unadvis'd
    Deliver'd you a paper that I should not.
I pray thee let me look on that again.
I will not look upon your master's lines.
I know they are stuff'd with protestations,
    And full of new-found oaths, which he wul break
    As easily as I do tear his paper.
The more shame for him that he sends it me;
    For I have heard him say a thousand times
    His Julia gave it him at his departure.
I thank you, madam, that you tender her.
Almost as well as I do know myself.
To think upon her woes, I do protest
    That I have wept a hundred several times.
I think she doth, and that's her cause of sorrow.
When she did think my master lov'd her well,
    She, in my judgment, was as fair as you;
    But since she did neglect her looking-glass
    And threw her sun-expelling mask away,
    The air hath starv'd the roses in her cheeks
    And pinch'd the lily-tincture of her face,
    That now she is become as black as I.
About my stature; for at Pentecost,
    When all our pageants of delight were play'd,
    Our youth got me to play the woman's part,
    And I was trimm'd in Madam Julia's gown;
    Which served me as fit, by all men's judgments,
    As if the garment had been made for me;
    Therefore I know she is about my height.
And at that time I made her weep a good,
    For I did play a lamentable part.
Madam, 'twas Ariadne passioning
    For Theseus' perjury and unjust flight;
    Which I so lively acted with my tears
    That my poor mistress, moved therewithal,
    Wept bitterly; and would I might be dead
    If I in thought felt not her very sorrow.
I weep myself, to think upon thy words.
Here, youth, there is my purse; I give thee this  
    For thy sweet mistress' sake, because thou lov'st her.
I hope my master's suit will be but cold,
    Since she respects my mistress' love so much.
I think,
    If I had such a tire, this face of mine
    Were full as lovely as is this of hers;
    And yet the painter flatter'd her a little,
    Unless I flatter with myself too much.
Her hair is auburn, mine is perfect yellow;
    If that be all the difference in his love,
    I'll get me such a colour'd periwig.
What should it be that he respects in her
    But I can make respective in myself,
    If this fond Love were not a blinded god?
I'll use thee kindly for thy mistress' sake,
    That us'd me so; or else, by Jove I vow,
    I should have scratch'd out your unseeing eyes,
    To make my master out of love with thee.
SCENE I.
Go on, good Eglamour,
    Out at the postern by the abbey wall;
    I fear I am attended by some spies.
O, sir, I find her milder than she was;
    And yet she takes exceptions at your person.
I'll wear a boot to make it somewhat rounder.
[Aside]  'Tis true, such pearls as put out ladies' eyes;
    For I had rather wink than look on them.
But well when I discourse of love and peace?
Not I.
Nor I.
These likelihoods confirm her flight from hence;
    Therefore, I pray you, stand not to discourse,
    But mount you presently, and meet with me
    Upon the rising of the mountain foot
    That leads toward Mantua, whither they are fled.
I'll after, more to be reveng'd on Eglamour  
    Than for the love of reckless Silvia.
And I will follow, more for Silvia's love
    Than hate of Eglamour, that goes with her.
And I will follow, more to cross that love
    Than hate for Silvia, that is gone for love.
Come, I must bring you to our captain's cave;
    Fear not; he bears an honourable mind,
    And will not use a woman lawlessly.
O Valentine, this I endure for thee!
This shadowy desert, unfrequented woods,
    I better brook than flourishing peopled towns.
Here can I sit alone, unseen of any,
    And to the nightingale's complaining notes
    Tune my distresses and record my woes.
They love me well; yet I have much to do
    To keep them from uncivil outrages.
Madam, this service I have done for you,
    Though you respect not aught your servant doth,
    To hazard life, and rescue you from him
    That would have forc'd your honour and your love.
Vouchsafe me, for my meed, but one fair look;
    A smaller boon than this I cannot beg,
    And less than this, I am sure, you cannot give.
[Aside]  How like a dream is this I see and hear!
O miserable, unhappy that I am!
Unhappy were you, madam, ere I came;
    But by my coming I have made you happy.
Had I been seized by a hungry lion,  
    I would have been a breakfast to the beast
    Rather than have false Proteus rescue me.
O, heaven be judge how I love Valentine,
    Whose life's as tender to me as my soul!
And full as much, for more there cannot be,
    I do detest false, perjur'd Proteus.
What dangerous action, stood it next to death,
    Would I not undergo for one calm look?
Nay, if the gentle spirit of moving words
    Can no way change you to a milder form,
    I'll woo you like a soldier, at arms' end,
    And love you 'gainst the nature of love- force ye.
I'll force thee yield to my desire.
Now I dare not say
    I have one friend alive: thou wouldst disprove me.
Proteus,
    I am sorry I must never trust thee more,  
    But count the world a stranger for thy sake.
Forgive me, Valentine; if hearty sorrow
    Be a sufficient ransom for offence,
    I tender 't here; I do as truly suffer
    As e'er I did commit.
Then I am paid;
    And once again I do receive thee honest.
And, that my love may appear plain and free,
    All that was mine in Silvia I give thee.
Why, this is the ring I gave to Julia.
O, cry you mercy, sir, I have mistook;
    This is the ring you sent to Silvia.
At my depart I gave this unto Julia.
Be thou asham'd that I have took upon me
    Such an immodest raiment- if shame live
    In a disguise of love.
What is in Silvia's face but I may spy
    More fresh in Julia's with a constant eye?
Bear witness, heaven, I have my wish for ever.
And I mine.
Forbear, forbear, I say; it is my lord the Duke.
Here she stands
    Take but possession of her with a touch-
    I dare thee but to breathe upon my love.
Sir Valentine, I care not for her, I;
    I hold him but a fool that will endanger
    His body for a girl that loves him not.
I claim her not, and therefore she is thine.
Now, by the honour of my ancestry,
    I do applaud thy spirit, Valentine,
    And think thee worthy of an empress' love.
Know then, I here forget all former griefs,
    Cancel all grudge, repeal thee home again,
    Plead a new state in thy unrivall'd merit,
    To which I thus subscribe: Sir Valentine,  
    Thou art a gentleman, and well deriv'd;
    Take thou thy Silvia, for thou hast deserv'd her.
I thank your Grace; the gift hath made me happy.
I now beseech you, for your daughter's sake,
    To grant one boon that I shall ask of you.
I grant it for thine own, whate'er it be.
These banish'd men, that I have kept withal,
    Are men endu'd with worthy qualities;
    Forgive them what they have committed here,
    And let them be recall'd from their exile:
    They are reformed, civil, full of good,
    And fit for great employment, worthy lord.
Thou hast prevail'd; I pardon them, and thee;
    Dispose of them as thou know'st their deserts.
And, as we walk along, I dare be bold
    With our discourse to make your Grace to smile.
I think the boy hath grace in him; he blushes.
I warrant you, my lord- more grace than boy.
Please you, I'll tell you as we pass along,
    That you will wonder what hath fortuned.
>>



ACT I.
SCENE I.
If you shall chance, Camillo, to visit Bohemia, on the
    like occasion whereon my services are now on foot, you shall see,
    as I have said, great difference betwixt our Bohemia and your
    Sicilia.
I think this coming summer the King of Sicilia means to
    pay Bohemia the visitation which he justly owes him.
Verily, I speak it in the freedom of my knowledge: we
    cannot with such magnificence, in so rare- I know not what to
    say.
Believe me, I speak as my understanding instructs me
    and as mine honesty puts it to utterance.
I think there is not in the world either malice or
    matter to alter it.
I very well agree with you in the hopes of him.
And therefore, like a cipher,
    Yet standing in rich place, I multiply
    With one 'We thank you' many thousands moe
    That go before it.
I am question'd by my fears of what may chance
    Or breed upon our absence, that may blow
    No sneaping winds at home, to make us say
    'This is put forth too truly.
' Besides, I have stay'd  
    To tire your royalty.
We'll part the time between's then; and in that
    I'll no gainsaying.
So it should now,
    Were there necessity in your request, although
    'Twere needful I denied it.
I had thought, sir, to have held my peace until
    You had drawn oaths from him not to stay.
[To POLIXENES]  Yet of your royal presence I'll
    adventure the borrow of a week.
When at Bohemia
    You take my lord, I'll give him my commission
    To let him there a month behind the gest
    Prefix'd for's parting.
- Yet, good deed, Leontes,
    I love thee not a jar o' th' clock behind
    What lady she her lord.
I may not, verily.
You put me off with limber vows; but I,
    Though you would seek t' unsphere the stars with oaths,
    Should yet say 'Sir, no going.
Come, I'll question you
    Of my lord's tricks and yours when you were boys.
Of this make no conclusion, lest you say
    Your queen and I are devils.
Have I twice said well?
I prithee tell me; cram's with praise, and make's
    As fat as tame things.
It has an elder sister,
    Or I mistake you.
But once before I spoke to th' purpose- When?
Nay, let me have't; I long.
Why, that was when
    Three crabbed months had sour'd themselves to death,
    Ere I could make thee open thy white hand
    And clap thyself my love; then didst thou utter
    'I am yours for ever.
Why, lo you now, I have spoke to th' purpose twice:
    The one for ever earn'd a royal husband;
    Th' other for some while a friend.
I have tremor cordis on me; my heart dances,
    But not for joy, not joy.
'T may, I grant;
    But to be paddling palms and pinching fingers,
    As now they are, and making practis'd smiles
    As in a looking-glass; and then to sigh, as 'twere
    The mort o' th' deer.
I' fecks!
Thou want'st a rough pash and the shoots that I have,  
    To be full like me; yet they say we are
    Almost as like as eggs.
Then 'tis very credent
    Thou mayst co-join with something; and thou dost-
    And that beyond commission; and I find it,
    And that to the infection of my brains
    And hard'ning of my brows.
Looking on the lines
    Of my boy's face, methoughts I did recoil
    Twenty-three years; and saw myself unbreech'd,
    In my green velvet coat; my dagger muzzl'd,
    Lest it should bite its master and so prove,
    As ornaments oft do, too dangerous.
How like, methought, I then was to this kernel,
    This squash, this gentleman.
No, my lord, I'll fight.
[Aside]  I am angling now,
    Though you perceive me not how I give line.
Go, play, boy, play; thy mother plays, and I
    Play too; but so disgrac'd a part, whose issue
    Will hiss me to my grave.
There have been,
    Or I am much deceiv'd, cuckolds ere now;
    And many a man there is, even at this present,
    Now while I speak this, holds his wife by th' arm
    That little thinks she has been sluic'd in's absence,
    And his pond fish'd by his next neighbour, by
    Sir Smile, his neighbour.
I am like you, they say.
' 'Tis far gone
    When I shall gust it last.
I think most understand
    Bohemia stays here longer.
I have trusted thee, Camillo,
    With all the nearest things to my heart, as well
    My chamber-councils, wherein, priest-like, thou
    Hast cleans'd my bosom- I from thee departed
    Thy penitent reform'd; but we have been
    Deceiv'd in thy integrity, deceiv'd
    In that which seems so.
My gracious lord,
    I may be negligent, foolish, and fearful:
    In every one of these no man is free
    But that his negligence, his folly, fear,
    Among the infinite doings of the world,
    Sometime puts forth.
In your affairs, my lord,
    If ever I were wilfull-negligent,
    It was my folly; if industriously
    I play'd the fool, it was my negligence,
    Not weighing well the end; if ever fearful
    To do a thing where I the issue doubted,
    Whereof the execution did cry out
    Against the non-performance, 'twas a fear
    Which oft infects the wisest.
But, beseech your Grace,
    Be plainer with me; let me know my trespass
    By its own visage; if I then deny it,
    'Tis none of mine.
I would not be a stander-by to hear
    My sovereign mistress clouded so, without
    My present vengeance taken.
I say thou liest, Camillo, and I hate thee;
    Pronounce thee a gross lout, a mindless slave,
    Or else a hovering temporizer that  
    Canst with thine eyes at once see good and evil,
    Inclining to them both.
Why, he that wears her like her medal, hanging
    About his neck, Bohemia; who- if I
    Had servants true about me that bare eyes
    To see alike mine honour as their profits,
    Their own particular thrifts, they would do that
    Which should undo more doing.
Ay, and thou,
    His cupbearer- whom I from meaner form
    Have bench'd and rear'd to worship; who mayst see,
    Plainly as heaven sees earth and earth sees heaven,
    How I am gall'd- mightst bespice a cup
    To give mine enemy a lasting wink;
    Which draught to me were cordial.
Sir, my lord,
    I could do this; and that with no rash potion,
    But with a ling'ring dram that should not work  
    Maliciously like poison.
But I cannot
    Believe this crack to be in my dread mistress,
    So sovereignly being honourable.
I have lov'd thee-
  LEONTES.
Dost think I am so muddy, so unsettled,
    To appoint myself in this vexation; sully
    The purity and whiteness of my sheets-
    Which to preserve is sleep, which being spotted
    Is goads, thorns, nettles, tails of wasps;
    Give scandal to the blood o' th' Prince, my son-
    Who I do think is mine, and love as mine-
    Without ripe moving to 't?
Would I do this?
I must believe you, sir.
I do; and will fetch off Bohemia for't;
    Provided that, when he's remov'd, your Highness
    Will take again your queen as yours at first,
    Even for your son's sake; and thereby for sealing
    The injury of tongues in courts and kingdoms  
    Known and allied to yours.
Thou dost advise me
    Even so as I mine own course have set down.
I'll give no blemish to her honour, none.
I am his cupbearer;
    If from me he have wholesome beverage,
    Account me not your servant.
I'll do't, my lord.
I will seem friendly, as thou hast advis'd me.
But, for me,
    What case stand I in?
I must be the poisoner
    Of good Polixenes; and my ground to do't
    Is the obedience to a master; one
    Who, in rebellion with himself, will have  
    All that are his so too.
If I could find example
    Of thousands that had struck anointed kings
    And flourish'd after, I'd not do't; but since
    Nor brass, nor stone, nor parchment, bears not one,
    Let villainy itself forswear't.
I must
    Forsake the court.
The King hath on him such a countenance
    As he had lost some province, and a region  
    Lov'd as he loves himself; even now I met him
    With customary compliment, when he,
    Wafting his eyes to th' contrary and falling
    A lip of much contempt, speeds from me;
    So leaves me to consider what is breeding
    That changes thus his manners.
I dare not know, my lord.
Good Camillo,
    Your chang'd complexions are to me a mirror
    Which shows me mine chang'd too; for I must be
    A party in this alteration, finding
    Myself thus alter'd with't.
There is a sickness
    Which puts some of us in distemper; but
    I cannot name the disease; and it is caught
    Of you that yet are well.
Make me not sighted like the basilisk;
    I have look'd on thousands who have sped the better
    By my regard, but kill'd none so.
Camillo-
    As you are certainly a gentleman; thereto
    Clerk-like experienc'd, which no less adorns
    Our gentry than our parents' noble names,
    In whose success we are gentle- I beseech you,
    If you know aught which does behove my knowledge
    Thereof to be inform'd, imprison't not
    In ignorant concealment.
I may not answer.
A sickness caught of me, and yet I well?
I must be answer'd.
I conjure thee, by all the parts of man
    Which honour does acknowledge, whereof the least
    Is not this suit of mine, that thou declare
    What incidency thou dost guess of harm
    Is creeping toward me; how far off, how near;
    Which way to be prevented, if to be;
    If not, how best to bear it.
Sir, I will tell you;
    Since I am charg'd in honour, and by him
    That I think honourable.
Therefore mark my counsel,
    Which must be ev'n as swiftly followed as
    I mean to utter it, or both yourself and me
    Cry lost, and so goodnight.
I am appointed him to murder you.
Turn then my freshest reputation to
    A savour that may strike the dullest nostril  
    Where I arrive, and my approach be shunn'd,
    Nay, hated too, worse than the great'st infection
    That e'er was heard or read!
I know not; but I am sure 'tis safer to
    Avoid what's grown than question how 'tis born.
Your followers I will whisper to the business;
    And will, by twos and threes, at several posterns,
    Clear them o' th' city.
For myself, I'll put  
    My fortunes to your service, which are here
    By this discovery lost.
Be not uncertain,
    For, by the honour of my parents, I
    Have utt'red truth; which if you seek to prove,
    I dare not stand by; nor shall you be safer
    Than one condemn'd by the King's own mouth, thereon
    His execution sworn.
I do believe thee:
    I saw his heart in's face.
Come, Camillo;
    I will respect thee as a father, if
    Thou bear'st my life off hence.
SCENE I.
Come, my gracious lord,
    Shall I be your playfellow?
No, I'll none of you.
You'll kiss me hard, and speak to me as if
    I were a baby still.
I love you better.
I learn'd it out of women's faces.
I have seen a lady's nose
    That has been blue, but not her eyebrows.
Come, sir, now
    I am for you again.
I have one
    Of sprites and goblins.
Dwelt by a churchyard- I will tell it softly;
    Yond crickets shall not hear it.
Behind the tuft of pines I met them; never
    Saw I men scour so on their way.
I ey'd them
    Even to their ships.
How blest am I
    In my just censure, in my true opinion!
I have drunk, and seen the spider.
That false villain
    Whom I employ'd was pre-employ'd by him;
    He has discover'd my design, and I
    Remain a pinch'd thing; yea, a very trick
    For them to play at will.
I know't too well.
I am glad you did not nurse him;
    Though he does bear some signs of me, yet you
    Have too much blood in him.
But I'd say he had not,
    And I'll be sworn you would believe my saying,
    Howe'er you lean to th' nayward.
'
    Praise her but for this her without-door form,
    Which on my faith deserves high speech, and straight
    The shrug, the hum or ha, these petty brands
    That calumny doth use- O, I am out!
Which I'll not call a creature of thy place,
    Lest barbarism, making me the precedent,
    Should a like language use to all degrees
    And mannerly distinguishment leave out
    Betwixt the prince and beggar.
I have said
    She's an adultress; I have said with whom.
No; if I mistake
    In those foundations which I build upon,
    The centre is not big enough to bear
    A school-boy's top.
I must be patient till the heavens look
    With an aspect more favourable.
Good my lords,
    I am not prone to weeping, as our sex
    Commonly are- the want of which vain dew
    Perchance shall dry your pities- but I have
    That honourable grief lodg'd here which burns  
    Worse than tears drown.
[To the GUARD]  Shall I be heard?
Do not weep, good fools;
    There is no cause; when you shall know your mistress
    Has deserv'd prison, then abound in tears
    As I come out: this action I now go on
    Is for my better grace.
I never wish'd to see you sorry; now
    I trust I shall.
For her, my lord,
    I dare my life lay down- and will do't, sir,
    Please you t' accept it- that the Queen is spotless
    I' th' eyes of heaven and to you- I mean
    In this which you accuse her.
If it prove
    She's otherwise, I'll keep my stables where
    I lodge my wife; I'll go in couples with her;
    Than when I feel and see her no farther trust her;
    For every inch of woman in the world,
    Ay, every dram of woman's flesh is false,
    If she be.
Would I knew the villain!
I would land-damn him.
Be she honour-flaw'd-
    I have three daughters: the eldest is eleven;
    The second and the third, nine and some five;  
    If this prove true, they'll pay for 't.
By mine honour,
    I'll geld 'em all; fourteen they shall not see
    To bring false generations.
They are co-heirs;
    And I had rather glib myself than they
    Should not produce fair issue.
You smell this business with a sense as cold
    As is a dead man's nose; but I do see't and feel't
    As you feel doing thus; and see withal
    The instruments that feel.
Lack I credit?
I had rather you did lack than I, my lord,
    Upon this ground; and more it would content me
    To have her honour true than your suspicion,
    Be blam'd for't how you might.
And I wish, my liege,
    You had only in your silent judgment tried it,
    Without more overture.
Yet, for a greater confirmation-
    For, in an act of this importance, 'twere
    Most piteous to be wild- I have dispatch'd in post
    To sacred Delphos, to Apollo's temple,
    Cleomenes and Dion, whom you know
    Of stuff'd sufficiency.
Have I done well?
Though I am satisfied, and need no more
    Than what I know, yet shall the oracle
    Give rest to th' minds of others such as he
    Whose ignorant credulity will not
    Come up to th' truth.
[Aside]  To laughter, as I take it,  
    If the good truth were known.
The keeper of the prison- call to him;
    Let him have knowledge who I am.
For a worthy lady,
    And one who much I honour.
I may not, madam;
    To the contrary I have express commandment.
I pray now, call her.
And, madam,
    I must be present at your conference.
The Queen receives
    Much comfort in't; says 'My poor prisoner,
    I am as innocent as you.
I dare be sworn.
The office
    Becomes a woman best; I'll take't upon me;
    If I prove honey-mouth'd, let my tongue blister,
    And never to my red-look'd anger be
    The trumpet any more.
Pray you, Emilia,
    Commend my best obedience to the Queen;
    If she dares trust me with her little babe,
    I'll show't the King, and undertake to be
    Her advocate to th' loud'st.
Please your ladyship
    To visit the next room, I'll presently
    Acquaint the Queen of your most noble offer
    Who but to-day hammer'd of this design,
    But durst not tempt a minister of honour,
    Lest she should be denied.
Tell her, Emilia,
    I'll use that tongue I have; if wit flow from't
    As boldness from my bosom, let't not be doubted
    I shall do good.
I'll to the Queen.
Madam, if't please the Queen to send the babe,
    I know not what I shall incur to pass it,
    Having no warrant.
I do believe it.
Upon mine honour, I
    Will stand betwixt you and danger.
If
    The cause were not in being- part o' th' cause,
    She, th' adultress; for the harlot king
    Is quite beyond mine arm, out of the blank
    And level of my brain, plot-proof; but she
    I can hook to me- say that she were gone,
    Given to the fire, a moiety of my rest
    Might come to me again.
They should not laugh if I could reach them; nor
    Shall she, within my pow'r.
Not so hot, good sir;
    I come to bring him sleep.
'Tis such as you,
    That creep like shadows by him, and do sigh
    At each his needless heavings- such as you
    Nourish the cause of his awaking: I
    Do come with words as medicinal as true,
    Honest as either, to purge him of that humour
    That presses him from sleep.
Antigonus,
    I charg'd thee that she should not come about me;
    I knew she would.
I told her so, my lord,
    On your displeasure's peril, and on mine,
    She should not visit you.
When she will take the rein, I let her run;
    But she'll not stumble.
Good my liege, I come-
    And I beseech you hear me, who professes
    Myself your loyal servant, your physician,
    Your most obedient counsellor; yet that dares
    Less appear so, in comforting your evils,
    Than such as most seem yours- I say I come
    From your good Queen.
Good Queen, my lord, good Queen- I say good Queen;
    And would by combat make her good, so were I
    A man, the worst about you.
On mine own accord I'll off;
    But first I'll do my errand.
I am as ignorant in that as you
    In so entitling me; and no less honest
    Than you are mad; which is enough, I'll warrant,
    As this world goes, to pass for honest.
Take up the bastard;
    Take't up, I say; give't to thy crone.
So I would you did; then 'twere past all doubt
    You'd call your children yours.
I am none, by this good light.
Nor I; nor any
    But one that's here; and that's himself; for he
    The sacred honour of himself, his Queen's,
    His hopeful son's, his babe's, betrays to slander,
    Whose sting is sharper than the sword's; and will not-
    For, as the case now stands, it is a curse
    He cannot be compell'd to 't- once remove
    The root of his opinion, which is rotten
    As ever oak or stone was sound.
I'll ha' thee burnt.
I care not.
I'll not call you tyrant
    But this most cruel usage of your Queen-
    Not able to produce more accusation
    Than your own weak-hing'd fancy- something savours
    Of tyranny, and will ignoble make you,
    Yea, scandalous to the world.
Were I a tyrant,
    Where were her life?
I pray you, do not push me; I'll be gone.
Within this hour bring me word 'tis done,
    And by good testimony, or I'll seize thy life,
    With that thou else call'st thine.
If thou refuse,
    And wilt encounter with my wrath, say so;
    The bastard brains with these my proper hands
    Shall I dash out.
I did not, sir.
I am a feather for each wind that blows.
Shall I live on to see this bastard kneel
    And call me father?
At least, thus much:
    I'll pawn the little blood which I have left
    To save the innocent- anything possible.
I will, my lord.
As by strange fortune
    It came to us, I do in justice charge thee,
    On thy soul's peril and thy body's torture,
    That thou commend it strangely to some place  
    Where chance may nurse or end it.
I swear to do this, though a present death
    Had been more merciful.
No, I'll not rear
    Another's issue.
SCENE I.
I shall report,
    For most it caught me, the celestial habits-
    Methinks I so should term them- and the reverence
    Of the grave wearers.
But of all, the burst
    And the ear-deaf'ning voice o' th' oracle,
    Kin to Jove's thunder, so surpris'd my sense
    That I was nothing.
These proclamations,
    So forcing faults upon Hermione,
    I little like.
Since what I am to say must be but that
    Which contradicts my accusation, and
    The testimony on my part no other
    But what comes from myself, it shall scarce boot me
    To say 'Not guilty.
' Mine integrity
    Being counted falsehood shall, as I express it,
    Be so receiv'd.
But thus- if pow'rs divine
    Behold our human actions, as they do,
    I doubt not then but innocence shall make
    False accusation blush, and tyranny
    Tremble at patience.
You, my lord, best know-
    Who least will seem to do so- my past life
    Hath been as continent, as chaste, as true,
    As I am now unhappy; which is more  
    Than history can pattern, though devis'd
    And play'd to take spectators; for behold me-
    A fellow of the royal bed, which owe
    A moiety of the throne, a great king's daughter,
    The mother to a hopeful prince- here standing
    To prate and talk for life and honour fore
    Who please to come and hear.
For life, I prize it
    As I weigh grief, which I would spare; for honour,
    'Tis a derivative from me to mine,
    And only that I stand for.
I appeal
    To your own conscience, sir, before Polixenes
    Came to your court, how I was in your grace,
    How merited to be so; since he came,
    With what encounter so uncurrent I
    Have strain'd t' appear thus; if one jot beyond
    The bound of honour, or in act or will
    That way inclining, hard'ned be the hearts
    Of all that hear me, and my near'st of kin
    Cry fie upon my grave!
I ne'er heard yet  
    That any of these bolder vices wanted
    Less impudence to gainsay what they did
    Than to perform it first.
More than mistress of
    Which comes to me in name of fault, I must not
    At all acknowledge.
For Polixenes,
    With whom I am accus'd, I do confess
    I lov'd him as in honour he requir'd;
    With such a kind of love as might become
    A lady like me; with a love even such,
    So and no other, as yourself commanded;
    Which not to have done, I think had been in me
    Both disobedience and ingratitude
    To you and toward your friend; whose love had spoke,
    Ever since it could speak, from an infant, freely,
    That it was yours.
Now for conspiracy:
    I know not how it tastes, though it be dish'd  
    For me to try how; all I know of it
    Is that Camillo was an honest man;
    And why he left your court, the gods themselves,
    Wotting no more than I, are ignorant.
Sir,
    You speak a language that I understand not.
My life stands in the level of your dreams,
    Which I'll lay down.
You had a bastard by Polixenes,
    And I but dream'd it.
The bug which you would fright me with I seek.
The crown and comfort of my life, your favour,
    I do give lost, for I do feel it gone,
    But know not how it went; my second joy
    And first fruits of my body, from his presence
    I am barr'd, like one infectious; my third comfort,
    Starr'd most unluckily, is from my breast-
    The innocent milk in it most innocent mouth-
    Hal'd out to murder; myself on every post
    Proclaim'd a strumpet; with immodest hatred
    The child-bed privilege denied, which 'longs
    To women of all fashion; lastly, hurried
    Here to this place, i' th' open air, before
    I have got strength of limit.
Now, my liege,
    Tell me what blessings I have here alive
    That I should fear to die.
But yet hear this- mistake me not: no life,
    I prize it not a straw, but for mine honour  
    Which I would free- if I shall be condemn'd
    Upon surmises, all proofs sleeping else
    But what your jealousies awake, I tell you
    'Tis rigour, and not law.
Your honours all,
    I do refer me to the oracle:
    Apollo be my judge!
O sir, I shall be hated to report it:
    The Prince your son, with mere conceit and fear
    Of the Queen's speed, is gone.
I have too much believ'd mine own suspicion.
I'll reconcile me to Polixenes,
    New woo my queen, recall the good Camillo-
    Whom I proclaim a man of truth, of mercy.
For, being transported by my jealousies
    To bloody thoughts and to revenge, I chose
    Camillo for the minister to poison
    My friend Polixenes; which had been done
    But that the good mind of Camillo tardied
    My swift command, though I with death and with
    Reward did threaten and encourage him,
    Not doing it and being done.
What old or newer torture
    Must I receive, whose every word deserves
    To taste of thy most worst?
Nor was't much
    Thou wouldst have poison'd good Camillo's honour,  
    To have him kill a king- poor trespasses,
    More monstrous standing by; whereof I reckon
    The casting forth to crows thy baby daughter
    To be or none or little, though a devil
    Would have shed water out of fire ere done't;
    Nor is't directly laid to thee, the death
    Of the young Prince, whose honourable thoughts-
    Thoughts high for one so tender- cleft the heart
    That could conceive a gross and foolish sire
    Blemish'd his gracious dam.
This is not, no,
    Laid to thy answer; but the last- O lords,
    When I have said, cry 'Woe!
I say she's dead; I'll swear't.
If you can bring
    Tincture or lustre in her lip, her eye,
    Heat outwardly or breath within, I'll serve you
    As I would do the gods.
Thou canst not speak too much; I have deserv'd
    All tongues to talk their bitt'rest.
Say no more;
    Howe'er the business goes, you have made fault
    I' th' boldness of your speech.
I am sorry for't.
All faults I make, when I shall come to know them.
I do repent.
Alas, I have show'd too much
    The rashness of a woman!
Do not receive affliction
    At my petition; I beseech you, rather  
    Let me be punish'd that have minded you
    Of what you should forget.
The love I bore your queen- lo, fool again!
I'll speak of her no more, nor of your children;
    I'll not remember you of my own lord,
    Who is lost too.
Take your patience to you,
    And I'll say nothing.
Thou didst speak but well
    When most the truth; which I receive much better
    Than to be pitied of thee.
Once a day I'll visit
    The chapel where they lie; and tears shed there
    Shall be my recreation.
So long as nature
    Will bear up with this exercise, so long
    I daily vow to use it.
I'll not be long before
    I call upon thee.
Go thou away;
    I'll follow instantly.
I am glad at heart  
    To be so rid o' th' business.
I have heard, but not believ'd, the spirits o' th' dead
    May walk again.
To me comes a creature,
    Sometimes her head on one side some another-
    I never saw a vessel of like sorrow,
    So fill'd and so becoming; in pure white robes,
    Like very sanctity, she did approach
    My cabin where I lay; thrice bow'd before me;
    And, gasping to begin some speech, her eyes
    Became two spouts; the fury spent, anon
    Did this break from her: 'Good Antigonus,
    Since fate, against thy better disposition,
    Hath made thy person for the thrower-out
    Of my poor babe, according to thine oath,
    Places remote enough are in Bohemia,
    There weep, and leave it crying; and, for the babe
    Is counted lost for ever, Perdita  
    I prithee call't.
Affrighted much,
    I did in time collect myself, and thought
    This was so and no slumber.
Dreams are toys;
    Yet, for this once, yea, superstitiously,
    I will be squar'd by this.
I do believe
    Hermione hath suffer'd death, and that
    Apollo would, this being indeed the issue
    Of King Polixenes, it should here be laid,
    Either for life or death, upon the earth
    Of its right father.
Weep I cannot,  
    But my heart bleeds; and most accurs'd am I
    To be by oath enjoin'd to this.
Thou'rt like to have
    A lullaby too rough; I never saw
    The heavens so dim by day.
Well may I get aboard!
This is the chase;
    I am gone for ever.
I would there were no age between ten and three and
    twenty, or that youth would sleep out the rest; for there is
    nothing in the between but getting wenches with child, wronging
    the ancientry, stealing, fighting-  [Horns]  Hark you now!
They have scar'd away two of my best sheep, which I
    fear the wolf will sooner find than the master.
If any where I
    have them, 'tis by the sea-side, browsing of ivy.
A boy or a child, I wonder?
Though I am not
    bookish, yet I can read waiting-gentlewoman in the scape.
I'll
    take it up for pity; yet I'll tarry till my son come; he halloo'd
    but even now.
I have seen two such sights, by sea and by land!
But I am
    not to say it is a sea, for it is now the sky; betwixt the
    firmament and it you cannot thrust a bodkin's point.
I would you did but see how it chafes, how it rages, how it
    takes up the shore!
Now, now; I have not wink'd since I saw these sights; the
    men are not yet cold under water, nor the bear half din'd on the
    gentleman; he's at it now.
Would I had been by to have help'd the old man!
I would you had been by the ship-side, to have help'd her;
    there your charity would have lack'd footing.
Now bless thyself; thou met'st with things dying, I with things
    new-born.
So, let's see- it was told me I should be rich by the fairies.
I'll go see if the
    bear be gone from the gentleman, and how much he hath eaten.
If there be any of him
    left, I'll bury it.
Marry, will I; and you shall help to put him i' th' ground.
SCENE I.
I, that please some, try all, both joy and terror
    Of good and bad, that makes and unfolds error,
    Now take upon me, in the name of Time,
    To use my wings.
Impute it not a crime
    To me or my swift passage that I slide
    O'er sixteen years, and leave the growth untried
    Of that wide gap, since it is in my pow'r
    To o'erthrow law, and in one self-born hour
    To plant and o'erwhelm custom.
Let me pass
    The same I am, ere ancient'st order was
    Or what is now receiv'd.
I witness to
    The times that brought them in; so shall I do
    To th' freshest things now reigning, and make stale
    The glistering of this present, as my tale
    Now seems to it.
Your patience this allowing,
    I turn my glass, and give my scene such growing
    As you had slept between.
Leontes leaving-
    Th' effects of his fond jealousies so grieving  
    That he shuts up himself- imagine me,
    Gentle spectators, that I now may be
    In fair Bohemia; and remember well
    I mention'd a son o' th' King's, which Florizel
    I now name to you; and with speed so pace
    To speak of Perdita, now grown in grace
    Equal with wond'ring.
What of her ensues
    I list not prophesy; but let Time's news
    Be known when 'tis brought forth.
I pray thee, good Camillo, be no more importunate: 'tis
    a sickness denying thee anything; a death to grant this.
It is fifteen years since I saw my country; though I have
    for the most part been aired abroad, I desire to lay my bones
    there.
Besides, the penitent King, my master, hath sent for me;
    to whose feeling sorrows I might be some allay, or I o'erween to
    think so, which is another spur to my departure.
The need I have of thee thine own
    goodness hath made.
Better not to have had thee than thus to want
    thee; thou, having made me businesses which none without thee can
    sufficiently manage, must either stay to execute them thyself, or
    take away with thee the very services thou hast done; which if I
    have not enough considered- as too much I cannot- to be more
    thankful to thee shall be my study; and my profit therein the
    heaping friendships.
Sir, it is three days since I saw the Prince.
What his
    happier affairs may be are to me unknown; but I have missingly
    noted he is of late much retired from court, and is less frequent
    to his princely exercises than formerly he hath appeared.
I have considered so much, Camillo, and with some care,
    so far that I have eyes under my service which look upon his
    removedness; from whom I have this intelligence, that he is
    seldom from the house of a most homely shepherd- a man, they say,
    that from very nothing, and beyond the imagination of his
    neighbours, is grown into an unspeakable estate.
I have heard, sir, of such a man, who hath a daughter of
    most rare note.
That's likewise part of my intelligence; but, I fear, the  
    angle that plucks our son thither.
Thou shalt accompany us to the
    place; where we will, not appearing what we are, have some
    question with the shepherd; from whose simplicity I think it not
    uneasy to get the cause of my son's resort thither.
I willingly obey your command.
I have serv'd Prince Florizel, and in my time wore three-pile;
    but now I am out of service.
But shall I go mourn for that, my dear?
The pale moon shines by night;
      And when I wander here and there,
        I then do most go right.
If tinkers may have leave to live,
        And bear the sow-skin budget,
      Then my account I well may give
        And in the stocks avouch it.
My father nam'd me Autolycus; who, being, I as am, litter'd under
    Mercury, was likewise a snapper-up of unconsidered trifles.
With
    die and drab I purchas'd this caparison; and my revenue is the
    silly-cheat.
Gallows and knock are too powerful on the highway;
    beating and hanging are terrors to me; for the life to come, I
    sleep out the thought of it.
I cannot do 't without counters.
Let me see: what am I to
    buy for our sheep-shearing feast?
I must have saffron to colour
    the warden pies; mace; dates- none, that's out of my note;
    nutmegs, seven; race or two of ginger, but that I may beg; four
    pound of prunes, and as many of raisins o' th' sun.
[Grovelling on the ground]  O that ever I was born!
I' th' name of me!
O sir, the loathsomeness of them offend me more than the
    stripes I have received, which are mighty ones and millions.
I am robb'd, sir, and beaten; my money and apparel ta'en
    from me, and these detestable things put upon me.
Lend me thy hand, I'll help thee.
O, good sir, softly, good sir; I fear, sir, my shoulder
    blade is out.
I have a little money for thee.
No, good sweet sir; no, I beseech you, sir.
I have a
    kinsman not past three quarters of a mile hence, unto whom I was
    going; I shall there have money or anything I want.
Offer me no
    money, I pray you; that kills my heart.
A fellow, sir, that I have known to go about with
    troll-my-dames; I knew him once a servant of the Prince.
I cannot
    tell, good sir, for which of his virtues it was, but he was
    certainly whipt out of the court.
Vices, I would say, sir.
I know this man well; he hath
    been since an ape-bearer; then a process-server, a bailiff; then
    he compass'd a motion of the Prodigal Son, and married a tinker's
    wife within a mile where my land and living lies; and, having
    flown over many knavish professions, he settled only in rogue.
I must confess to you, sir, I am no fighter; I am false
    of heart that way, and that he knew, I warrant him.
Sweet sir, much better than I was; I can stand and walk.
I will even take my leave of you and pace softly towards my
    kinsman's.
Shall I bring thee on the way?
I must go buy spices for our
    sheep-shearing.
I'll be with
    you at your sheep-shearing too.
If I make not this cheat bring
    out another, and the shearers prove sheep, let me be unroll'd,
    and my name put in the book of virtue!
Sir, my gracious lord,
    To chide at your extremes it not becomes me-
    O, pardon that I name them!
But that our feasts
    In every mess have folly, and the feeders
    Digest it with a custom, I should blush
    To see you so attir'd; swoon, I think,
    To show myself a glass.
I bless the time
    When my good falcon made her flight across  
    Thy father's ground.
Even now I tremble
    To think your father, by some accident,
    Should pass this way, as you did.
Or how
    Should I, in these my borrowed flaunts, behold
    The sternness of his presence?
The gods themselves,
    Humbling their deities to love, have taken
    The shapes of beasts upon them: Jupiter
    Became a bull and bellow'd; the green Neptune
    A ram and bleated; and the fire-rob'd god,
    Golden Apollo, a poor humble swain,
    As I seem now.
One of these two must be necessities,
    Which then will speak, that you must change this purpose,
    Or I my life.
Thou dearest Perdita,
    With these forc'd thoughts, I prithee, darken not
    The mirth o' th' feast.
Or I'll be thine, my fair,
    Or not my father's; for I cannot be
    Mine own, nor anything to any, if
    I be not thine.
To this I am most constant,
    Though destiny say no.
It is my father's will I should take on me
    The hostess-ship o' th' day.
Of that kind
    Our rustic garden's barren; and I care not
    To get slips of them.
For I have heard it said
    There is an art which in their piedness shares
    With great creating nature.
I'll not put
    The dibble in earth to set one slip of them;
    No more than were I painted I would wish
    This youth should say 'twere well, and only therefore
    Desire to breed by me.
Here's flow'rs for you:
    Hot lavender, mints, savory, marjoram;
    The marigold, that goes to bed wi' th' sun,
    And with him rises weeping; these are flow'rs
    Of middle summer, and I think they are given
    To men of middle age.
I should leave grazing, were I of your flock,
    And only live by gazing.
Now, my fair'st friend,
    I would I had some flow'rs o' th' spring that might
    Become your time of day- and yours, and yours,
    That wear upon your virgin branches yet  
    Your maidenheads growing.
O, these I lack
    To make you garlands of, and my sweet friend
    To strew him o'er and o'er!
Methinks I play as I have seen them do
    In Whitsun pastorals.
When you speak, sweet,
    I'd have you do it ever.
When you sing,
    I'd have you buy and sell so; so give alms;
    Pray so; and, for the ord'ring your affairs,
    To sing them too.
When you do dance, I wish you
    A wave o' th' sea, that you might ever do
    Nothing but that; move still, still so,
    And own no other function.
But that your youth,
    And the true blood which peeps fairly through't,
    Do plainly give you out an unstain'd shepherd,
    With wisdom I might fear, my Doricles,
    You woo'd me the false way.
I think you have  
    As little skill to fear as I have purpose
    To put you to't.
But, come; our dance, I pray.
I'll swear for 'em.
They call him Doricles, and boasts himself
    To have a worthy feeding; but I have it
    Upon his own report, and I believe it:
    He looks like sooth.
He says he loves my daughter;
    I think so too; for never gaz'd the moon
    Upon the water as he'll stand and read,
    As 'twere my daughter's eyes; and, to be plain,
    I think there is not half a kiss to choose
    Who loves another best.
So she does any thing; though I report it
    That should be silent.
I love a
    ballad but even too well, if it be doleful matter merrily set
    down, or a very pleasant thing indeed and sung lamentably.
If I were not in love with Mopsa, thou shouldst take no
    money of me; but being enthrall'd as I am, it will also be the
    bondage of certain ribbons and gloves.
I was promis'd them against the feast; but they come not too
    late now.
I have done.
Have I not told thee how I was cozen'd by the way, and lost
    all my money?
I hope so, sir; for I have about me many parcels of
    charge.
I love a ballad in print a-life, for
    then we are sure they are true.
Why should I
    carry lies abroad?
' There's scarce a maid westward but  
    she sings it; 'tis in request, I can tell you.
I can bear my part; you must know 'tis my occupation.
Get you hence, for I must go
             Where it fits not you to know.
Wenches, I'll buy for you both.
I know, sir, we weary you.
Sooth, when I was young
    And handed love as you do, I was wont
    To load my she with knacks; I would have ransack'd
    The pedlar's silken treasury and have pour'd it
    To her acceptance: you have let him go
    And nothing marted with him.
Old sir, I know
    She prizes not such trifles as these are.
The gifts she looks from me are pack'd and lock'd
    Up in my heart, which I have given already,
    But not deliver'd.
I take thy hand- this hand,
    As soft as dove's down and as white as it,
    Or Ethiopian's tooth, or the fann'd snow that's bolted
    By th' northern blasts twice o'er.
I have put you out.
And he, and more  
    Than he, and men- the earth, the heavens, and all:
    That, were I crown'd the most imperial monarch,
    Thereof most worthy, were I the fairest youth
    That ever made eye swerve, had force and knowledge
    More than was ever man's, I would not prize them
    Without her love; for her employ them all;
    Commend them and condemn them to her service
    Or to their own perdition.
I cannot speak
    So well, nothing so well; no, nor mean better.
By th' pattern of mine own thoughts I cut out
    The purity of his.
And, friends unknown, you shall bear witness to't:
    I give my daughter to him, and will make
    Her portion equal his.
O, that must be
    I' th' virtue of your daughter.
One being dead,
    I shall have more than you can dream of yet;
    Enough then for your wonder.
I have, but what of him?
I yield all this;
    But, for some other reasons, my grave sir,
    Which 'tis not fit you know, I not acquaint
    My father of this business.
[Discovering himself]  Mark your divorce, young sir,
    Whom son I dare not call; thou art too base
    To be acknowledg'd- thou a sceptre's heir,
    That thus affects a sheep-hook!
Thou, old traitor,
    I am sorry that by hanging thee I can but
    Shorten thy life one week.
I'll have thy beauty scratch'd with briers and made
    More homely than thy state.
For thee, fond boy,
    If I may ever know thou dost but sigh
    That thou no more shalt see this knack- as never
    I mean thou shalt- we'll bar thee from succession;
    Not hold thee of our blood, no, not our kin,
    Farre than Deucalion off.
And you, enchantment,
    Worthy enough a herdsman- yea, him too
    That makes himself, but for our honour therein,
    Unworthy thee- if ever henceforth thou
    These rural latches to his entrance open,
    Or hoop his body more with thy embraces,
    I will devise a death as cruel for thee
    As thou art tender to't.
I was not much afeard; for once or twice
    I was about to speak and tell him plainly
    The self-same sun that shines upon his court
    Hides not his visage from our cottage, but
    Looks on alike.
I told you what would come of this.
This dream of mine-
    Being now awake, I'll queen it no inch farther,
    But milk my ewes and weep.
I cannot speak nor think,
    Nor dare to know that which I know.
If I might die within this hour, I have liv'd
    To die when I desire.
I am but sorry, not afeard; delay'd,
    But nothing alt'red.
What I was, I am:
    More straining on for plucking back; not following
    My leash unwillingly.
At this time  
    He will allow no speech- which I do guess
    You do not purpose to him- and as hardly
    Will he endure your sight as yet, I fear;
    Then, till the fury of his Highness settle,
    Come not before him.
I not purpose it.
I think Camillo?
How often have I told you 'twould be thus!
From my succession wipe me, father; I
    Am heir to my affection.
I am- and by my fancy; if my reason
    Will thereto be obedient, I have reason;  
    If not, my senses, better pleas'd with madness,
    Do bid it welcome.
So call it; but it does fulfil my vow:
    I needs must think it honesty.
Camillo,
    Not for Bohemia, nor the pomp that may
    Be thereat glean'd, for all the sun sees or
    The close earth wombs, or the profound seas hides
    In unknown fathoms, will I break my oath
    To this my fair belov'd.
Therefore, I pray you,
    As you have ever been my father's honour'd friend,
    When he shall miss me- as, in faith, I mean not
    To see him any more- cast your good counsels
    Upon his passion.
This you may know,
    And so deliver: I am put to sea
    With her who here I cannot hold on shore.
And most opportune to her need I have
    A vessel rides fast by, but not prepar'd
    For this design.
What course I mean to hold  
    Shall nothing benefit your knowledge, nor
    Concern me the reporting.
O my lord,
    I would your spirit were easier for advice.
[Takes her aside]
    [To CAMILLO]  I'll hear you by and by.
Now were I happy if
    His going I could frame to serve my turn,
    Save him from danger, do him love and honour,
    Purchase the sight again of dear Sicilia
    And that unhappy king, my master, whom
    I so much thirst to see.
Now, good Camillo,
    I am so fraught with curious business that
    I leave out ceremony.
Sir, I think
    You have heard of my poor services i' th' love
    That I have borne your father?
Well, my lord,
    If you may please to think I love the King,
    And through him what's nearest to him, which is
    Your gracious self, embrace but my direction.
If your more ponderous and settled project
    May suffer alteration, on mine honour,
    I'll point you where you shall have such receiving
    As shall become your Highness; where you may
    Enjoy your mistress, from the whom, I see,
    There's no disjunction to be made but by,
    As heavens forfend!
That I may call thee something more than man,
    And after that trust to thee.
This follows, if you will not change your purpose
    But undergo this flight: make for Sicilia,
    And there present yourself and your fair princess-
    For so, I see, she must be- fore Leontes.
Methinks I see
    Leontes opening his free arms and weeping
    His welcomes forth; asks thee there 'Son, forgiveness!
Worthy Camillo,
    What colour for my visitation shall I
    Hold up before him?
Sir,
    The manner of your bearing towards him, with
    What you as from your father shall deliver,
    Things known betwixt us three, I'll write you down;
    The which shall point you forth at every sitting
    What you must say, that he shall not perceive
    But that you have your father's bosom there
    And speak his very heart.
I am bound to you.
One of these is true:
    I think affliction may subdue the cheek,
    But not take in the mind.
I cannot say 'tis pity
    She lacks instructions, for she seems a mistress
    To most that teach.
Your pardon, sir; for this
    I'll blush you thanks.
I think you know my fortunes
    Do all lie there.
I have sold all my trumpery;  
    not a counterfeit stone, not a ribbon, glass, pomander, brooch,
    table-book, ballad, knife, tape, glove, shoe-tie, bracelet,
    horn-ring, to keep my pack from fasting.
They throng who should
    buy first, as if my trinkets had been hallowed and brought a
    benediction to the buyer; by which means I saw whose purse was
    best in picture; and what I saw, to my good use I rememb'red.
You might
    have pinch'd a placket, it was senseless; 'twas nothing to geld a
    codpiece of a purse; I would have fil'd keys off that hung in
    chains.
So that in this time of lethargy I pick'd and
    cut most of their festival purses; and had not the old man come
    in with whoobub against his daughter and the King's son and
    scar'd my choughs from the chaff, I had not left a purse alive in
    the whole army.
I am a poor fellow, sir.
I am a poor fellow, sir.
[Aside]  I know ye well
    enough.
[Aside]  I smell the trick
    on't.
Dispatch, I prithee.
Indeed, I have had earnest; but I cannot with conscience
    take it.
- you must retire yourself
    Into some covert; take your sweetheart's hat
    And pluck it o'er your brows, muffle your face,
    Dismantle you, and, as you can, disliken
    The truth of your own seeming, that you may-
    For I do fear eyes over- to shipboard  
    Get undescried.
I see the play so lies
    That I must bear a part.
Should I now meet my father,
    He would not call me son.
[Aside]  What I do next shall be to tell the King
    Of this escape, and whither they are bound;
    Wherein my hope is I shall so prevail
    To force him after; in whose company
    I shall re-view Sicilia, for whose sight
    I have a woman's longing.
I understand the business, I hear it.
I see this is the time that the unjust man doth
    thrive.
If I thought it were a piece of honesty to
    acquaint the King withal, I would not do't.
I hold it the more
    knavery to conceal it; and therein am I constant to my
    profession.
This being done,
    let the law go whistle; I warrant you.
I will tell the King all, every word- yea, and his son's
    pranks too; who, I may say, is no honest man, neither to his
    father nor to me, to go about to make me the King's
    brother-in-law.
Indeed, brother-in-law was the farthest off you could have
    been to him; and then your blood had been the dearer by I know
    how much an ounce.
[Aside]  I know not what impediment this complaint may
    be to the flight of my master.
[Aside]  Though I am not naturally honest, I am so
    sometimes by chance.
Whether it like me or no, I am a courtier.
Reflect I not on thy baseness court-contempt?
Think'st
    thou, for that I insinuate, that toaze from thee thy business, I
    am therefore no courtier?
I am courtier cap-a-pe, and one that
    will either push on or pluck back thy business there; whereupon I
    command the to open thy affair.
I know not, an't like you.
None, sir; I have no pheasant, cock nor hen.
Yet nature might have made me as these are,
    Therefore I will not disdain.
A great man, I'll warrant; I know by the picking on's teeth.
Sir, there lies such secrets in this fardel and box which
    none must know but the King; and which he shall know within this
    hour, if I may come to th' speech of him.
Some say he shall be ston'd; but that
    death is too soft for him, say I.
Being
    something gently consider'd, I'll bring you where he is aboard,  
    tender your persons to his presence, whisper him in your behalfs;
    and if it be in man besides the King to effect your suits, here
    is man shall do it.
An't please you, sir, to undertake the business for us,
    here is that gold I have.
I'll make it as much more, and leave
    this young man in pawn till I bring it you.
After I have done what I promised?
In some sort, sir; but though my case be a pitiful one, I
    hope I shall not be flay'd out of it.
Sir, I will give you as much as this
    old man does, when the business is performed; and remain, as he
    says, your pawn till it be brought you.
I will trust you.
Walk before toward the sea-side; go on
    the right-hand; I will but look upon the hedge, and follow you.
We are blest in this man, as I may say, even blest.
If I had a mind to be honest, I see Fortune would not
    suffer me: she drops booties in my mouth.
I am courted now with a
    double occasion- gold, and a means to do the Prince my master
    good; which who knows how that may turn back to my advancement?
I
    will bring these two moles, these blind ones, aboard him.
If he
    think it fit to shore them again, and that the complaint they
    have to the King concerns him nothing, let him call me rogue for
    being so far officious; for I am proof against that title, and
    what shame else belongs to't.
To him will I present them.
SCENE I.
Whilst I remember
    Her and her virtues, I cannot forget
    My blemishes in them, and so still think of
    The wrong I did myself; which was so much
    That heirless it hath made my kingdom, and
    Destroy'd the sweet'st companion that e'er man
    Bred his hopes out of.
I think so.
She I kill'd!
I did so; but thou strik'st me
    Sorely, to say I did.
Good Paulina,  
    Who hast the memory of Hermione,
    I know, in honour, O that ever I
    Had squar'd me to thy counsel!
Then, even now,
    I might have look'd upon my queen's full eyes,
    Have taken treasure from her lips-
  PAULINA.
She had; and would incense me
    To murder her I married.
I should so.
Were I the ghost that walk'd, I'd bid you mark
    Her eye, and tell me for what dull part in't  
    You chose her; then I'd shriek, that even your ears
    Should rift to hear me; and the words that follow'd
    Should be 'Remember mine.
Fear thou no wife;
    I'll have no wife, Paulina.
I have done.
One that gives out himself Prince Florizel,
    Son of Polixenes, with his princess- she
    The fairest I have yet beheld- desires access
    To your high presence.
Ay; the most peerless piece of earth, I think,
    That e'er the sun shone bright on.
The one I have almost forgot- your pardon;
    The other, when she has obtain'd your eye,
    Will have your tongue too.
Sure,
    When I shall see this gentleman, thy speeches
    Will bring me to consider that which may
    Unfurnish me of reason.
Were I but twenty-one,
    Your father's image is so hit in you
    His very air, that I should call you brother,
    As I did him, and speak of something wildly
    By us perform'd before.
I lost a couple that 'twixt heaven and earth
    Might thus have stood begetting wonder as
    You, gracious couple, do.
And then I lost-
    All mine own folly- the society,
    Amity too, of your brave father, whom,
    Though bearing misery, I desire my life
    Once more to look on him.
By his command
    Have I here touch'd Sicilia, and from him  
    Give you all greetings that a king, at friend,
    Can send his brother; and, but infirmity,
    Which waits upon worn times, hath something seiz'd
    His wish'd ability, he had himself
    The lands and waters 'twixt your throne and his
    Measur'd, to look upon you; whom he loves,
    He bade me say so, more than all the sceptres
    And those that bear them living.
- the wrongs I have done thee stir
    Afresh within me; and these thy offices,
    So rarely kind, are as interpreters
    Of my behind-hand slackness!
My best train
    I have from your Sicilian shores dismiss'd;
    Who for Bohemia bend, to signify
    Not only my success in Libya, sir,
    But my arrival and my wife's in safety
    Here where we are.
You have a holy father,
    A graceful gentleman, against whose person,
    So sacred as it is, I have done sin,
    For which the heavens, taking angry note,
    Have left me issueless; and your father's blest,
    As he from heaven merits it, with you,  
    Worthy his goodness.
What might I have been,
    Might I a son and daughter now have look'd on,
    Such goodly things as you!
Most noble sir,
    That which I shall report will bear no credit,
    Were not the proof so nigh.
Here in your city; I now came from him.
I speak amazedly; and it becomes
    My marvel and my message.
Camillo, sir; I spake with him; who now
    Has these poor men in question.
Never saw I
    Wretches so quake.
We are not, sir, nor are we like to be;  
    The stars, I see, will kiss the valleys first.
That 'once,' I see by your good father's speed,
    Will come on very slowly.
I am sorry,
    Most sorry, you have broken from his liking
    Where you were tied in duty; and as sorry
    Your choice is not so rich in worth as beauty,
    That you might well enjoy her.
Beseech you, sir,
    Remember since you ow'd no more to time
    Than I do now.
Would he do so, I'd beg your precious mistress,
    Which he counts but a trifle.
I thought of her
    Even in these looks I made.
I will to your father.
Your honour not o'erthrown by your desires,
    I am friend to them and you.
Upon which errand
    I now go toward him; therefore, follow me,
    And mark what way I make.
I was by at the opening of the fardel, heard the
    old shepherd deliver the manner how he found it; whereupon, after
    a little amazedness, we were all commanded out of the chamber;
    only this, methought I heard the shepherd say he found the child.
I would most gladly know the issue of it.
I make a broken delivery of the business; but the
    changes I perceived in the King and Camillo were very notes of
    admiration.
I never heard of
    such another encounter, which lames report to follow it and
    undoes description to do it.
'- I would fain say-
    bleed tears; for I am sure my heart wept blood.
I thought she had some great matter there in
    hand; for she hath privately twice or thrice a day, ever since
    the death of Hermione, visited that removed house.
Now, had I not the dash of my former life in me, would
    preferment drop on my head.
I brought the old man and his son
    aboard the Prince; told him I heard them talk of a fardel and I
    know not what; but he at that time over-fond of the shepherd's
    daughter- so he then took her to be- who began to be much
    sea-sick, and himself little better, extremity of weather
    continuing, this mystery remained undiscover'd.
But 'tis all one
    to me; for had I been the finder-out of this secret, it would not
    have relish'd among my other discredits.
Enter SHEPHERD and CLOWN

    Here come those I have done good to against my will, and already
    appearing in the blossoms of their fortune.
Come, boy; I am past moe children, but thy sons and
    daughters will be all gentlemen born.
You denied to fight with me this
    other day, because I was no gentleman born.
Give
    me the lie, do; and try whether I am not now a gentleman born.
I know you are now, sir, a gentleman born.
And so have I, boy.
So you have; but I was a gentleman born before my father;
    for the King's son took me by the hand and call'd me brother; and
    then the two kings call'd my father brother; and then the Prince,
    my brother, and the Princess, my sister, call'd my father father.
I humbly beseech you, sir, to pardon me all the faults I
    have committed to your worship, and to give me your good report
    to the Prince my master.
I will swear to the Prince thou art as
    honest a true fellow as any is in Bohemia.
Not swear it, now I am a gentleman?
Let boors and franklins
    say it: I'll swear it.
And I'll swear to the Prince thou art a
    tall fellow of thy hands and that thou wilt not be drunk; but I
    know thou art no tall fellow of thy hands and that thou wilt be
    drunk.
But I'll swear it; and I would thou wouldst be a tall
    fellow of thy hands.
I will prove so, sir, to my power.
If I do not wonder
    how thou dar'st venture to be drunk not being a tall fellow,
    trust me not.
O grave and good Paulina, the great comfort
    That I have had of thee!
What, sovereign sir,
    I did not well, I meant well.
As she liv'd peerless,
    So her dead likeness, I do well believe,
    Excels whatever yet you look'd upon
    Or hand of man hath done; therefore I keep it
    Lonely, apart.
[PAULINA draws a curtain, and discovers HERMIONE
                                         standing like a statue]
    I like your silence; it the more shows off
    Your wonder; but yet speak.
Chide me, dear stone, that I may say indeed
    Thou art Hermione; or rather, thou art she
    In thy not chiding; for she was as tender
    As infancy and grace.
O, thus she stood,
    Even with such life of majesty- warm life,
    As now it coldly stands- when first I woo'd her!
I am asham'd.
And give me leave,
    And do not say 'tis superstition that
    I kneel, and then implore her blessing.
Lady,
    Dear queen, that ended when I but began,
    Give me that hand of yours to kiss.
Indeed, my lord,
    If I had thought the sight of my poor image
    Would thus have wrought you- for the stone is mine-
    I'd not have show'd it.
Would I were dead, but that methinks already-  
    What was he that did make it?
I'll draw the curtain.
I am sorry, sir, I have thus far stirr'd you; but
    I could afflict you farther.
Let no man mock me,
    For I will kiss her.
Shall I draw the curtain?
So long could I
    Stand by, a looker-on.
If you can behold it,
    I'll make the statue move indeed, descend,
    And take you by the hand, but then you'll think-
    Which I protest against- I am assisted
    By wicked powers.
What you can make her do
    I am content to look on; what to speak
    I am content to hear; for 'tis as easy
    To make her speak as move.
Then all stand still;
    Or those that think it is unlawful business
    I am about, let them depart.
Come;
    I'll fill your grave up.
For thou shalt hear that I,
    Knowing by Paulina that the oracle  
    Gave hope thou wast in being, have preserv'd
    Myself to see the issue.
I, an old turtle,
    Will wing me to some wither'd bough, and there
    My mate, that's never to be found again,
    Lament till I am lost.
Thou shouldst a husband take by my consent,
    As I by thine a wife.
Thou hast found mine;
    But how, is to be question'd; for I saw her,
    As I thought, dead; and have, in vain, said many
    A prayer upon her grave.
I'll not seek far-
    For him, I partly know his mind- to find thee
    An honourable husband.
Both your pardons,
    That e'er I put between your holy looks
    My ill suspicion.
>>





1609

A LOVER'S COMPLAINT

by William Shakespeare



  From off a hill whose concave womb reworded
  A plaintful story from a sist'ring vale,
  My spirits t'attend this double voice accorded,
  And down I laid to list the sad-tuned tale,
  Ere long espied a fickle maid full pale,
  Tearing of papers, breaking rings atwain,
  Storming her world with sorrow's wind and rain.
'Father,' she says, 'though in me you behold  
  The injury of many a blasting hour,
  Let it not tell your judgement I am old:
  Not age, but sorrow, over me hath power.
I might as yet have been a spreading flower,
  Fresh to myself, if I had self-applied
  Love to myself, and to no love beside.
too early I attended
  A youthful suit- it was to gain my grace-
  O, one by nature's outwards so commended
  That maidens' eyes stuck over all his face.
'Yet did I not, as some my equals did,
  Demand of him, nor being desired yielded;
  Finding myself in honour so forbid,
  With safest distance I mine honour shielded.
'For further I could say this man's untrue,
  And knew the patterns of his foul beguiling;
  Heard where his plants in others' orchards grew;
  Saw how deceits were gilded in his smiling;
  Knew vows were ever brokers to defiling;
  Thought characters and words merely but art,
  And bastards of his foul adulterate heart.
'And long upon these terms I held my city,  
  Till thus he 'gan besiege me: "Gentle maid,
  Have of my suffering youth some feeling pity,
  And be not of my holy vows afraid.
That's to ye sworn to none was ever said;
  For feasts of love I have been called unto,
  Till now did ne'er invite nor never woo.
Harm have I done to them, but ne'er was harmed;  
  Kept hearts in liveries, but mine own was free,
  And reigned commanding in his monarchy.
'"And, lo, behold these talents of their hair,
  With twisted metal amorously empleached,
  I have receiv'd from many a several fair,
  Their kind acceptance weepingly beseeched,
  With the annexions of fair gems enriched,
  And deep-brained sonnets that did amplify
  Each stone's dear nature, worth, and quality.
'"Lo, all these trophies of affections hot,
  Of pensived and subdued desires the tender,
  Nature hath charged me that I hoard them not,
  But yield them up where I myself must render-
  That is, to you, my origin and ender;
  For these, of force, must your oblations be,
  Since I their altar, you enpatron me.
The broken bosoms that to me belong
  Have emptied all their fountains in my well,
  And mine I pour your ocean all among.
I strong o'er them, and you o'er me being strong,
  Must for your victory us all congest,
  As compound love to physic your cold breast.
'For lo, his passion, but an art of craft,
  Even there resolved my reason into tears;
  There my white stole of chastity I daffed,
  Shook off my sober guards and civil fears;
  Appear to him as he to me appears,  
  All melting; though our drops this diff'rence bore:
  His poisoned me, and mine did him restore.
Ay me, I fell, and yet do question make
  What I should do again for such a sake.